Why doesn't Jacob Rees Mogg want a Brexit transition? Because then we'd have to enforce the 2019 EU directives on Anti-Tax Avoidance.Never forget that.Never let them fool you.#StopBrexit 
I voted for brexit but regret it massively...I'm confident I'm not alone in this 
Hey, Leavers. If you don't like the way Brexit's going, why not have a 2nd ref on the deal?  
.How will Britain trade after Brexit?Poorly........ 
Double Penetrate My EU Referendum And Call Me Margaret It's 11:30PM 
Absolutely terrible, but can we be clear: this isn’t new. Lots of people have received death threats because of Brexit. It’s another thing Brexit has unleashed  Anna Soubry receives messages calling for her to be hanged as a traitor  
Public becoming more pessimistic over economic impact of Brexit, finds Bank of England.Stop the disaster for jobs and public services. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Could I just remind you of some facts?  She and the others have not said they want to overturn Brexit.  They just want a say in how it is done. Try thinking for yourself for a change instead of being told what to think. 
Stopping Brexit is becoming increasingly possible. We have to use twitter for information and building our case. We will not achieve it on social media though. Get out and talk to the people you know, even if they ate already remain. Radicalise them, educate the don't knows. 
There has been no attempt by @theresa_may to bring unity after the referendum. It's as if the 48% are not even allowed a voice. There will be a massive price to pay at the next election. 
The mentality that promoted Brexit and to some extent voted for it is unquestionably related to Empire propaganda, British exceptionalism and Supremacism. 
1-2 million people died during the partition of India. Given Brexit is basically a post-colonial identity crisis it's amazing these people know close to nothing about the rolling catastrophe that was the British Empire.  
Cameron arrogantly called a referendum, that was never needed, to sort out rifts within the Tory party, that what happened. What a mess he’s left us in, a country divided like never before. 
We all have to tighten our belts thanks to Brexit and austerity, whilst this imbecile wastes 50K on RAF flights. Put him on EasyJet, like the rest of us!   
That referendum happened. It was like someone turned over a stone to see what nasties were hiding underneath. It has to stop! This behaviour is being normalised and cannot be allowed to continue. #StopBrexit 
And me. Time to move on and build a consensus on Brexit. Good to see the Government listening to sensible #OneNation Tories 
Alas, too true. In 2016 Total Income from Farming Figure (TIFF) was £3.7 bn. Without EU CAP subsidies of £3bn, will Brexit mean bankruptcies? So why did Farmers mostly vote for out? Identity politics over self-interest?  
Terrified Tories surrendering path to crumbling Brexit, final date to be dodged, impossible NI frictionless border cover-up. Tears ahead. 
This is pretty much David Davis in the Brexit negotiations. 
The Brexit divorce process is so absorbing, we're becoming more inward looking as a nation, says @nfergus #newsnight 
Death threats against MPs are despicable; how come May hasn't roundly condemned them? My debate Brexit with @DCBMEP on Channel 4 News this evening 
Nigel Farage revels the "Price he has paid for Brexit" 
Jason Kenney's by-election victory a referendum on @RachelNotley carbon tax @SheilaGunnReid  | #abpoli #cdnpoli #tcot @jkenney 
Trying not to get too worked up about Brexit anymore but would like to see it stopped purely so men like Letts take to the streets in puffy rage and get tasered in the bollocks by a policeman whose great-grandmother was slaughtered at Amritsar.  
You can't make this nonsense up. The sheer patronising, ignorance of these responses. Ireland is seen as not being able to come up with its own foreign policy. The truth is it's the UK that doesn't have any, whereas Ireland has a nuanced, settled #brexit stance for a long time .  
Almost irrelevant...if #Brexit goes ahead it'll be lose lose...UK will be tied to EU rules & regs into the long term or there'll be divergence & then there's a hard border somewhere...so we end up with PAY & OBEY NO SAY..economy damaged, control & influence lost. #FinalSay & STAY 
It’s the same attitude that caused this Govt arrogantly to assume Ireland was not a Brexit problem. #Lostanempireneverfoundarole. 
#newsnight  But, Kirsty Wark,  the vast majority of scientists hate brexit.  The damage it's doing is already obvious 
The Republic of Ireland has set out plans to quintuple the number of higher education students learning a foreign language over the next decade as it prepares for Brexit 
Britain deserves respect in the Brexit talks given how much it has done to keep Europe safe #Premium 
Well you know how to make sure Brits have a say on EU laws, don’t you?#Brexit  
I didn't vote Brexit for this 
Cross Party work has only just begun in earnest & should encouraged at every opportunity, regardless of party politics. Now is not the time to shut down discussions between any MP's, especially amongst those that campaigned Remain during the Referendum  #FBPE #ExitFromBrexit 
Michael Portillo correctly analyses the cynical use by the EU of its puppet state Ireland in the Brexit talks.  
Household finances are worse since Brexit vote, says Bank of England  
I think I'm fairly switched on !BUTI haven't a clue where we are with this PESKY #Brexit gig !You know what ?I don't think the Govt have a clue either ! 
Cambridge Analytica, Brexit and Trump: The Data That Turned the World Upside Down  HT @noalpha via @motherboard 
11 Conservative MPs placed the wellbeing of their country before the undemocratic power grabbing aspirations of their party. They deserve our gratitude. That they numbered only 11 is shameful.#StopBrexit #Brexit #WithdrawalBill #ExitFromBrexit #UKPolitics #leave #meaningfulvote 
Interesting thread - Gavin Barwell - now Theresa May's Chief of Staff - the morning after the EU referendum 
Funny to see Tory MP @murdo_fraser on TV making demands on the Scot Gov for Scot economy ... ignoring Tory UK Gov controls big economic levers and Tory austerity and also bringing mad wild Brexit.... #HoHum 
'53, Separated and skint': Farage reveals the price he paid for Brexit  
The Labour Party will support a referendum to #repealthe8th  and the proposal to allow for abortion up to 12 weeks as endorsed by the Oireachtas #8Committee 
Sorry if i don't give a shit Nigel."'I'm 53, separated and skint': Nigel Farage reals the 'price he has paid for Brexit' claiming the referendum triumph has left him 'unable to walk down the street alone' in case he's attacked. " 
Brexit could cost Germany £7BILLION in blow to Angela Merkel  
I find this extremely offensive.The UK Gov has devastated Scotland's industries since Thatcher's attacks on us. May's Gov is even worse- Austerity, Trident, HS2, Big Ben, Buck Pal, Foodbanks. The Union is corrupt. Brexit is economic suicide. #indyref2  
'Sack them' May under pressure as poll urges PM to kick out Brexit rebels   
Today at the EU summit witnessed the UK’s total humiliation by Theresa May. She gave into all EU demands & will give into even more in the 2nd phase. All May is doing is trying to replicate EU membership after Brexit and make the people’s Brexit vote meaningless  
The past six months of UK–EU Brexit negotiations have been a poorly  scripted, badly directed, inadequately produced, dreadfully acted piece of theatre, and every Brit is considerably worse off as a result of it. 
Britten St Nicolas with a Swiss orchestra, German choir, Italian organist, in France. Music doesn’t want Brexit. 
Ironic, "taking back control" has given Dublin more power over Britain's #Brexit negotiations than Number 10.#StopBrexit #FBPE  
There is a lot of evidence that public opinion is turning against #brexit - many people who voted #leave in #EUREF regret their decision now the facts are clear. This account has been set up to share stories of those who are #remainernow & have been brave enough to say! #fbpe 
Phase 2 of the #Brexit Negotiations..."The long slow chuckle".. At the end of which EU will have a good guffaw..#StopBrexit #FBPE #Bresistance@RemainerCreates @spaceangel1964 @RemainingKind @Emma_Forage @nickreeves9876 @guyverhofstadt @theresa_may @lunaperla @mikegalsworthy 
please grab a large whisky (or gin  - whichever you prefer) & read this 3 times. It is nigh on perfect. Then believe it. It is happening .............yep - it really is. Then what? Well dress as a chicken or bang saucepans or shout "bollox to brexit" 
It was always nonsense to pretend that the City of London would be damaged by #Brexit. It was one of the world’s great financial centres before we joined the EU and it will remain so when we leave the EU.  
Michael Portillo - "I think the European Commission tried to get the Irish to make trouble for the British. They then found that the thing had run out of control. They did not realise how the DUP would react." #Brexit  
Nigel Farage - "I think if the 29 March 2019 was to be dropped as the date when we formally leave the EU, I think that would be a sign that the political class are basically stopping #Brexit from happening."  
We NEED NIGEL FARAGE BACK IN POLITICS AS UKIP LEADER AGAIN A TRUE CHAMPION OF BREXIT HONEST SAYS IT AS IT IS I COULD LISTEN TO HIM FOR HOURS I DO ON LBC THIS MAN WILL TAKE THE EU AND MAINSTREAM POLITICIANS ON AND WONT BACK DOWN WHO AGREES 
This English Town Backed Brexit. Now the Poles Are Leaving @UKIPNFKN @Anti__UKIP @BrexitBin @nickreeves9876 @JeanneBartram @JamesMelville @Femi_Sorry 
Loving @AngelaRayner on  #HIGNFY. #Brexit, DUP, women’s rights and anti Tory jokes plus nice ability to laugh at herself. Well done comrade!  
THREE DAYS.That's the amount of time between @SadiqKhan choosing to launch a costly, and useless, Brexit assessment, and then claiming there's no money left to fund subsidized transport for the disabled.Please take a minute to stand up against this. 
And of this climate of violence is being whipped up the #Brexit billionaire press, and by @Theresa_May who with her talk of the "Will of the People" is portraying political opponents as enemies of the people.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
“70% of Labour constituencies voted for Brexit. That’s 70% of Labour MPs that are going to have to explain to their constituents why they betrayed the Brexit. If Farage comes back into frontline politics both Labour and the Conservatives will pay a price for it” #LIVE #Brexit  
The EU has a message for Theresa May after securing the end of the beginning of Brexit: The next phase will be harder.  
Anna Soubry receives messages calling for her to be hanged as a traitor.Enough is enough! #Brexit must be cancelled immediately. To continue is to surrender to terrorism (by the govt's own definition).#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Labour want to cut the transport support for disabled Londoners (Despite finding cash for unneeded and useless Brexit assessments whilst in opposition)Please, take a second to try and take a stand against this, no matter what side of politics you are on. 
Last week they were comparing Brexit to Irish Independence. 
As Gove is the cabinet minister for Murdoch so Davis is the cabinet minister for Dacre. Dark, shady unelected people are controlling brexit, indeed our land, & the future of our children & grandchildren are hostage to their power grab. Wake up people!! 
We can add Anna Soubry name to the list of MPs on the far right Brexit extremist hit list. The people making these threats should be round up and dealt with like terrorist scum. They aren't patriots they are more a kin to Islamic fundamentalist groups. #StopBrexit 
Seems all Conservative MPs are happy with the proposed EU Withdrawal Bill amendment. The PM can now focus on getting the best #Brexit deal for the UK, and we should all give her 100% support. 
Also remember his magic while he was celebrating Pervez Musharraf’s Fraud Referendum sitting in PTV, Truly magical soul seller  
Even Angela Rayner can’t comment on Corbyn’s Brexit position without cracking up.#hignfy 
Over a million Brits live elsewhere in Europe. It’s time they were heard in the Brexit talks  
.@SkyNews announces “Europe confirms Britain has made sufficient progress to begin Brexit talks”.Listen, fuckwits: THE EU IS NOT EUROPE. STOP SPREADING FAKE NEWS. 
So record numbers of suicide in prisonsNot surprised Cuts mean less staff more time in cells More violence Low moralBut brexit hides a lot of bad newsThis is scandalous though People are dying Tories doing fuck all about it 
A few massacres here and there. Otherwise exactly like Brexit 
Varadkar giving a not-so-subtle reminder of what the UK is leaving by leaving the EU - strength in numbers.Ireland is a tiny country, but the #Brexit talks have shown being part of the EU gives it more power. UK is not quite the "major" power it thinks 
What an incredibly idiotic comment. Are people getting killed or having their human rights violated because of Brexit?  
EU nationals in Brexit Britain. #WeDontMeanYou 
Partition displaced 15 million. The mid-range of those who died is one million. Comparing inept handling of Brexit to the Partition of India is offensive beyond words.  
Or maybe we will see thousands of unarmed protesters killed in a London square by soldiers, because after all Brexit is just like the Raj. 
No 10 DENIES May is plotting a U-turn on her Brexit date amendment  via @MailOnline 
Winstons Churchills hard brexit deep block was too much for him 
I believe brexit will ultimately fail. 
Listening to Any Questions on R4 whether you accept brexit or not, 1 thing is clear. Brexiteers will never get the brexit they wanted. #fbpe 
“Don’t talk to me about parliamentary oversight like parliament is something God sent us to oversee our affairs. Parliament gave the Brexit decision to the people to make. The people made it and parliament has cheated them of it” @georgegalloway exclusively on @talkRADIO #Brexit  
Peter Brookes on Theresa May’s Brexit deal - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
# bbcaq heroes or traitors? reflects the polarised oversimplistic narrative that is fuelling a hate filled #Brexit discourse where you are outcast if you dare to disagree. This renders argument and debate obsolete. Very dangerous 4 democracy indeed. 
Our MP @DanielZeichner explains to a crowded room how Parliament is dominated by brexit and that this is preventing Labour from raising the important issues about poverty, homelessness and NHS (amongst others).Well done Daniel you earn and deserve our support.  
Spot on."Top Tory Lord Lawson tells May to get off her 'knees' and stop 'begging' Brussels over Brexit"  
In the new year, we will be challenging those seeking to overturn the referendum result to an open public debate in Central London. Open to everyone. Free. Details to follow. We will not stand by and watch our democracy be taken from us. 
we are alongside you Sarah - myself and the millions that are not being led down the garden path of #BrexitI do not like and will never again vote for your #tory party, but I respect the democratic principles you and the 11 showed this week.Keep it up, and now #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Vince speaks sense, with no final say referendum, how do the government even know they are still executing the will of the people?  
That's it. I can't be bothered with Brexit any more.Have a great weekend. 
BREXIT  was about sovereignty - making our laws again and controlling our borders. It has nothing to do with business which knows how to take care of its own interest. We voted out - yes or no - business was not the issue - democracy is the issue no democracy means no freedom.  
The sad thing is how how much more Scotland could accomplish in fighting inequality and poverty if it weren't chained to the Westminster's imperialist pretensions: Trident, Brexit, and revamping a palace, fixing up Westminster & Big Ben and an aircraft carrier with no planes. 
Theresa May 'poised to boost ranks of loyalist peers to protect Brexit'  
."Newly released data shows the Brexit Secretary's department spent almost £50,000 in less than a year shuttling him to EU meetings.". 
BrexitCentral’s @HughRBennett: The rebels behind the defeat who now talk about parliamentary sovereignty are those who have been “very committed to stop Brexit”, but this defeat “doesn’t change the substance of the negotiations”  
What I can't understand is why these people don't criticise the unelected House of Lords or the EU Commission which both hold democracy in contempt. Instead they sabre-rattle against an elected government and a referendum result which, both fully sanctioned by the will of voters. 
'If we want a nasty debate on abortion that is what we will get' - @unamullaly rightly points out the important role the media has to play in the type of referendum debate we get & ensuring the public is fully informed #repealthe8th via @IrishTimesOpEd 
But as you know, Anna, there’s no such thing as a good Brexit. Let’s not play their game. #Remain 
As a child I was v curious about whether those who fought in WW2 thought that the Allies might lose. Everyone I asked said no never, as if life imitates the old-fashioned film: The goodie wins in the end. I had this blind faith about Brexit, but we need Churchillian determination 
So when #Brexit politicians like @theresa_may claim to be carrying out the "Will of the People" they are not making a numerical error. They are directly attacking what is perhaps the most fundamental of democratic rights - the right to oppose.#StopBrexit #FBPE /4 
."Not all EU countries share Ireland’s desire for a close relationship with the UK after Brexit, Taoiseach Varadkar has said.". 
Lord Heseltine who wants to overturn referendum famously  wants us to still join Euro. Enough said 
Brexit means Brexit - John 2:11 
Lord Heseltine tells me on @LBC he’s indifferent to fact referendum biggest single issue mandate in our history & will try to overturn it 
MY FAMILY ARE FROM THE WELSH VALLEYS LABOUR SUPPORTERS ALL THEIR LIVES 55 YRS OF VOTING THEY HAVE SAID WILL NEVER PUT AN X BY A LABOUR CANDIDATE AGAIN OVER THE WAY LABOUR HAVE BEHAVED TOWARDS WALES OVER BREXIT WHO VOTED OUT IME THE SAME NEVER AGAIN 
#StopBrexit Lord Heseltine bloody dinosaur  still trying to stop Brexit. He’s been on Skynews talking rubbish. On LBC talking same nonsense. Give it a bloody rest boring us all to death.      
In Northern Ireland, Brexit reopens old wounds. 
Taking potshots is great fun, Keir, but when are you, Corbyn & Labour going to start building a positive case for permanently staying in Single Market & Customs Union, or even a referendum on final deal?At present, there’s no difference between Labour & Tory Brexit policies.  
The real problem of the "Will of the People" is not numerical inaccuracy. It is because it portrays opposition as subverting the democratic will of the people, thus delegitimising the fundamental democratic right to oppose.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
I'm an atheist, but I'll never forget the gift that God gave us on the 25th December 0000. He gave us his only son, Jesus.To Jesus, I say thank you for your service.This is a Christian country, and always will be. God bless the Queen, and God bless the Brexit process. 
Just to be clear where we are this evening. The date of Brexit is being put on the face of the Bill to ensure that date is locked. But it can be changed if required. 
David Davis arrives early for the latest round of Brexit negotiations  
52% voted for Brexit. Nobody voted for you. 
New amendment to EU Withdrawal Bill demonstrates how all @Conservatives MPs can work together to deliver best EU exit for the UK & our constituents & I will support it.  Amendment reflects Art 50 notice provisions & emphasises that Parliament will be fully involved in Brexit. 
We'll be delivering the Brexit people voted for.  
Thank you all for following this week.And if you value the free content (drivel?) on this account, please consider pre-ordering the Brexit book to be published next year:  
17.4m people did not vote for open borders and EU membership until 2021.People who Voted #Brexit will feel betrayed.#Brexit #ForBritain #LBCLIVE #skypapers #bbcdp #bbcqt #FarageOnLBC #Farage #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitDeal 
Merry Christmas to my fellow #Brexit Leavers!                 
there is a rich irony that the Tory rebels who defeated @theresa_may have made a no deal hard Brexit more likely 
In spite of the bitter cold, #Leeds for Europe’s street stall will be in Briggate this Saturday from 11am. We are proud Northern Europeans & will continue our campaign to stop #Brexit no matter how wintry the weather! pic.twitter.com/AaEX8bnEn8 
I am a remoaner and proud to be so I will never accept that any victory of hate lies over truth and reason can ever be permanent for to do so strikes at the very heart of what civilisation is supposed to be #brexit #stopbrexit 
This is exactly what I said would happen during the marriage referendum debate.   
After a car-crash defeat on Brexit vote, rumours that PM will now U-turn on gimmick exit day amendment: forced to get a Tory MP to amend her own amendment before its put to the vote! 
Leaving the EU has never been the settled will of the British people. The referendum produced a marginal result based on many falsehoods. Since then opinion polls show a small but growing majority against #Brexit. People deserve the chance to think again. 
Trump-Russia investigation requests emails from firm linked to Brexit campaign  Now we’re cooking w/hot grease. 
Theresa May 'set to make embarrassing climbdown' to avoid second Brexit defeat  
No.  I'm afraid the @scotgov  don't actually have the powers to cause a slowdown in the economy.  That's entirely due to 40 yrs of Tory/Labour neoliberal economic ideology and now Brexit which is 100% down to the Tories. Stop telling porkies.   
Not sure about that. Although EU leaders say in public they'd not renegotiate any deal voted down in Parl, in practice if Parl wanted a softer Brexit - ie different red lines - I think EU would agree to more talks @CER_EU 
Something to remember for those who argue that Brexit was a vote against austerity.  
make contact with flag people in Parliament SquareChristmas do last night with Lord Newby, said his office faces square giving out EU flags, regularly shout "Bollocks to Brexit", said wonderful to see, warmed spirit, please continue, you’re appreciated by some in parliament! 
EU Demand too much...German Chancellor Mrs Merkel says it's "not acceptable" for EU member states to protect their people from unlimited immigration & should meet minimum migrant quotas as demanded by Brussels.So glad we're Leaving #EU#Brexit 
Brexit strikes me as our Vietnam. Everybody rational knows it is – how can I put it politely? – not going well. But no one with authority seems able to say so. Does anyone have the clout and the courage to go with it? 
#Brexit Grinch teaser video... Full music video to come soon!Download now to get it in the #Xmas charts!Stream on spotify, share and RT!#StopBrexit this #ChristmasRound of applause to Alba for her outstanding acting in this clip! 
One of the few positives to come from Brexit is that the newspaper you are reading is still here, and it's still growing.   
This is what this is about from yday - modern day post Brexit trade discussion favours - involve Japanese foreign minister tweeting vids of Foreign Sec drinking peach juice from Fukushima: 
In my long read re: Brexit/cars I pointed out PM had promised Japan PM to lobby EU to reopen Fukushima food imports  
We have become a nation of Treaty breakers. Who can trust the word of a nation that walks away from the treaties it signs. Brexit has damaged Britain's place in the world and will carry on doing so for years to come. #StopBrexit 
Thread - by the best journalist explaining the detail of Brexit and Ireland.#Follow @tconnellyRTE 
Household finances are worse since Brexit vote, says Bank of England  
Another first: Brighton & Hove City Council call for national referendum on terms of a #Brexit deal. "Our City is pro-European, Brexit would be a disaster" says Green Councillor Ollie Sykes @Brunswick_Green 
Senior EU officials tells @rtenews the Irish border dilemma will remain “one of the very difficult” issues in Phase II of the Brexit negotiations. 
Brendan O'Neill on the moral crusade against Brexit  
BrexSec too grand to travel on Eurostar. Says all you need to know. He 'demanded use of private plane to go to Brexit talks'  
Priti Patel predicts ‘big bang Brexit’ as banks begin to see benefits of leaving. She has gone up in my estimation!  
Brexit pressure  
I’m proud to be a Conservative Brexit ‘traitor’. We had to take back control | Stephen Hammond  
Brexiteer - "We’ve made our decision, we know why we made it. I know you think we’re all thick up north, but I remember voting on my ballot paper and it said ‘leave or remain’." #Brexit  
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #6: Brexit Builds NOTHING! RT #StopBrexit 
David Davis celebrates Brexit talks moving on to phase two   
Tory Brexiteer @patel4witham predicts ‘big bang Brexit’ as banks begin to see benefits of leaving  
Two year transition to 2021 during which the UK will stay in CU, SM, keep FOM and pay membership in full (no rebate, no refunds), but will have no say or influence.So the real price of #Brexit will be nearer £80BWay to go Theresa 
Absolutely, millions in the UK, have been badly let down by Parliament.An unmistakable fact that around half of the UK clearly wanted nothing to do with Brexit, and believe that they are being unfairly separated and excluded from our EU family, a compromise was/is essential.  
ATTENTION ALL BREXIT SUPPORTERS,YOUR COUNTRY NEEDS YOU!last night we collected 15000 signatures in 24 hours,all we need is 5000 signatures now,please retweet/sign and let them know our voice   
Brits in Europe fear they will be stranded by Brexit  
rather, a waste of the civil service; imagine what all this talent could have done without the self-harming madness of #brexit...  
Peter Schrank on Theresa May Brexit imbroglio  - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Is this what Farage warned us of when he talked about widespread public anger if Brexit is not delivered? It is disgusting that people are threatening an MP for ensuring parliament gets the last say on the Brexit deal. #StopBrexit 
Woah. What a stat. Only 13% of FOI requests submitted to the Brexit Department since July 2016 have been granted in full.  
This afternoon 4 backbenchers - Letwin Jenkins Lefroy and Cox - have put down an amendment that is likely to be accepted by Government and could kill off next week’s row and vote over Brexit  date  
.@theresa_may: We'll deliver Brexit in a smooth and orderly way - without disrupting people's lives and without disrupting businesses.  
By then, the little Brexiteer who was promised a new rocking-horse when Brexit ended will have grown up, possessed himself of a real horse, and trotted away into the other world. (If any of you can spot the allusion.) 
#Brexit - built on an ever growing mountain of #LeaveLies.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Many millions in mainland EU follow our English tweets. They know we don’t want to be on this dreary #Brexit road to nowhere.Keep broadcasting.#StopTheMadness #StopBrexit@guyverhofstadt @eucopresident @JunckerEU 
I look at the accumulating evidence of voter manipulation behind Brexit and Trump, why they matter and why real democracy matters more #NoTurningBack  @jemgilbert @bungatuffie @hilarypepper @vronsta @paulmasonnews 
Lord Heseltine - Nobody's got the first idea what Theresa May believes..... she now has a slogan #brexit means brexit but that means absolutely nothing. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Difficult to see how UK can begin serious trade talks with third countries before 2021 (end of transition) and be finished before 2026 (usually 5-10 years).In other dates: 5 and 10 years after  referendum respectively.Long waits, and uncertain as trade talks often collapse. 
Farming and conservation groups call for guarantees on farmland wildlife schemes after Brexit. Vital that years of conservation work on farms is sustained.  
Britain's Brexit debate is incredibly insular. Here's one example of a total lack of unity at EU level on one issue that was central to Brexit vote - refugees & borders. Will confirm to Leavers that EU is unable to resolve crisis  
Back in SW1, amendment put down this afternoon that might kill off govt defeat on Brexit date next week - v likely govt will accept it which cuts down chances of another embarrassment for May in Commons 
My article just out in @ChathamHouse @TheWorldToday on what #Brexit means for British foreign policy & influence....& why we need to fix the roof back home.  
This is how the EU will handle the next phases of the Brexit process  
The Brexiteers will get their Brexit.  On 30 March 2019 UK is likely to not be a member of the EU.But by combination of two (plus) transition years and probable soft Brexit deal at the end, the Brexit is likely to be one in name only for a considerable period.7/ 
I already have done- it is my day job to explain the mess your Party is making of #Brexit, which is a Tory made disaster for Scotland.  But also to try and find a way forward… 
Phase1 of #Brexit negotiations is officially over. Thanks to so many on the Irish team in Dub & Brussels who worked to secure Ireland's interests. Well deserved rest for many before we move into new year and Phase2 begins.  
Answer to the problems ahead is to abandon the Tory madness of #Brexit or at the very least insist on continuing membership of Single Market & Customs Union.  Answer is not hysteria about progressive taxation. 
If the public wants to fall off a cliff in 2021, fine. If they want 5 or more years of transition fine. If they don't want either, let's stop Brexit. But whatever we do, let's be honest: a 2 year transition ain't enough. My latest.   
Ladybird Libertarians - how 1970s kids books formed the intellectual basis for Brexit - warning "may contain Dan Hannans" - by me#LadybirdLibertarians 
As the EU & UK move into the next phase of Brexit - it becomes even more obvious how divided Britain is. Theresa May's word can't be trusted, as there are too many competing entities demanding their will. It is a total #BrexitShambles We need to #StopBrexit 
Why did Davis leave Brexit negotiations to meet Dacre – and why so early?  
So @DanielJHannan will you be campaigning for Britain to join Switzerland in the Schengen area?#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Beyond all the ‘the EU is punishing us’ stuff - let’s not forget the British Cabinet will first have to decide what it wants re:future trade, and then back to the EU-27 we go. So Brexit ball back in Britain.  
EU’s job now is to show UK in no uncertain terms that any deal we get will be significantly worse than our current deal as an EU member. Voters were lied to in referendum campaign & it’s time for a large dose of reality. Public opinion & business reactions will then do the rest 
There are only 2 post-#Brexit trade deals that really matter to Britain, governing around 2/3 of our trade - those with the US and EU. And in both it will be a case of a desperate Britain being taken to the cleaners by a far more powerful trading bloc. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
This week’s Scotland in Europe Update: we are onto phase 2 of the Brexit negotiations but that doesn’t mean the deal is done. A number of important issues remain outstanding but enough has been agreed for the dialogue to expand 
Excellent summary from @MartinSLewis "A black and white vote on a rainbow of issues." This is why Brexit cannot succeed and why #Remain must succeed.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Take back control of the infamous Brexit Bus and see how long you can keep it from crashing. Can you do better than Boris, Michael, Liam and co?  
May gets faint praise and warnings from Brussels as path cleared for phase two of Brexit talks  
The outcome of these talks will affect jobs, living standards and prices for years to come. Yet with just over a year to go, the Cabinet still can't agree on what they want final deal to look like. The people must get the final say, including the option of an Exit from Brexit 
"This is an important step on the road to delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit. The UK and EU have shown what can be achieved by commitment and perseverance on both sides.” Prime Minister Theresa May  
"We have a Brexit party led by Remainers and a Remain party led by Brexiteers": great line from @MPphilwilson 
My blog on the outstanding work of the @UKCivilService on #Brexit. Sincere thanks to all the civil servants who contributed to today’s agreement - a significant milestone for the UK, HMG and @DExEUgovuk, and a testament to a #BrilliantCivilService 
This is important. The BBC has consistently failed on Brexit. 5 ways BBC is falling down on Brexit @InFactsOrg  
Single market membership post-Brexit would mean we would still pay into the EU, abide by EU law, carry on free movement and have no say in how EU law is made.People didn't vote leave to carry on EU contribution fees, to carry on free movement and to carry on abiding by EU laws.  
As the future of UK citizens living in Europe is being negotiated, their voices are ignored in the #Brexit debate, says @natalieben  
If another Eu referendum was to be held . How you will vote? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
I have just one wish for Christmas.  Please do stop talking about the will of the British people.  It was an advisory referendum and millions upon millions of British people still do not wish to leave the EU.  It is therefore nonsensical to say it is our collective will! 
I don’t get the logic of this? Finland is well governed. Therefore that undermines the case of Brexit?  Economist writers need a break from thinking about Brexit for a wee while ...  
One must not mistake the "Will of the People" as being about numbers. A majority has no more right than a minority to claim that theirs is the will of the people and so demonise opponents as anti-democratic "enemies of the people".#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
It’s Brexit TimeYou really need to be afraid.At Brexit TimeWe let no one in and we banish tradeAnd in our world of madnessOur eyes roll in despairThrow your arms into the airAt Brexit Time.1/2 
Top Tory Lord Lawson tells May to get off her 'knees' and stop 'begging' Brussels over Brexit  
Lord Heseltine - #Brexit is the worst decision this country has taken in peacetime in my life. There is no good news for Britain in this process. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Of the 316 Tory MPs in Parliament, 305 voted to give the Govt a faster hand, along with only 2 Labour MPs. No green no SNP no Libs no Plaid No SF. Don’t blame the Tories if Brexit is derailed or wrecked. Blame Corbyns power at all cost traitors. 
The PM is repeating the mantra of the "Will of the People",  a notion absolutely toxic to democracy; a device of dictators and demagogues that portrays democratic political opponents as "enemies of the people". @TheresaMay is peddling the rhetoric of tyranny!#StopBrexit #Brexit  
So the editor of a Hate Pamphlet Britain First circulate, disguised as a newspaper, is the REAL Brexit Secretary and Davis is his errand boy. Who's the real Foreign Secretary then? Murdoch? And trade? Branson presumably. This isnt a goverment it's a collection of corporate PAs 
. EU citizens living and contributing to our country are living in the uncertainty of a 'No deal' #Brexit. The @UKGov needs to put their rights into law now. Warm words are cheap, people need certainty and security. #BrexitShambles 
‘Brexit at ANY cost, to hell with the consequences, no matter how dire’ - if people like Steve Baker get their way. MPs & Lords must do their duty & protect the public from such blind & reckless zealotry  
The public are becoming more pessimistic over Brexit's economic impact  
Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
If the decline in small farms continues, farms under 50 hectares could all but disappear from the English countryside by the middle of the century. We need the government to ensure any new funding models after #Brexit can help farms of all sizes.  
First the DUP, now Dacre. Why doesn't Davis just bugger off to work in a Santa's grotto and let Dacre and Foster discuss Brexit with Barnier. Dacre will scribble a few death warrants of obstructive Remainers and Foster will take the contract 
Theresa May must put country before party in Brexit talks – @jeremycorbyn 
Nige callls the #EU "gangsters".We're contributing  to "Mr. Brexit's EU pension pot as  part of our de-merger settlement.I'm from Chicago.I know a gangster when I see one.#NigelFarage 
“David Davis went for dinner with Daily Mail Editor after bailing early on first round of Brexit talks”  
As far as I can tell we’re in a movie and Robert Mueller is about to save us from Trump and Brexit just in time for Christmas  
Good to see the Brexit Taliban can't bully sensible Conservative party members.The energy they spend threatening @Anna_Soubry & co and concocting Cromwellian fantasies about Ireland should be put to better use. 
Brexit: EU leaders agree to move talks to next stage  
We're not the only ones the far right and Putin are messing with. (Australia is a hot mess right now. Heaven help England and the #Brexit craziness, and here's another.)  
Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Theresa May, the daughter of a Pastor, who worked her way up to be Prime Minister was derided & lampooned even by her own Cabinet Ministers over the way she was handling BREXIT ... But BREXIT is on course & her critics are embarrassed.  
So, please stop. Stop with the jingoistic cock-swinging. Brexit is a monumental fumble; an unprecedented act of national self-harm. Sure, it will hurt the EU. But they will cope. Because they are 27 nations working together TO COPE with precisely this kind of market shock. 
#FridayMotivation Hear the words of a man #VictorOrban motivated solely by the welfare and safety of his countrymen  #Hungary will fight #Soros and #immigration#Brexit#MAGA#Trump#ExtremeVetting No #ChainMigration  
#MuellerIsComing ...to the UK.#CambridgeAnalytica-#Leave campaign.#BrexitHe'll be knocking on #SteveBannon 's door and looking into the  #Breitbart Cauldron next.@BreitbartLondon@BreitbartNews 
Spot on. Theresa May’s career-defining error was not to bring the 48% & 52% together by trying to shape a brexit that reflected the closeness of the result. Instead she stupidly ignored the 48% & created a massive rift in our country, one that could take generations to put right  
Important info on the public (legal) route to releasing the Davis' Brexit studies & the Treasury report:  
Brexit, Trump and a generation of incompetents  |via Financial Times  
BREAKING:  Robert Mueller has 'requested emails' from Cambridge Analytica, the firm linked to the 2016 campaign and Brexit.Also note that Steve Bannon was a VP at Cambridge Analytica and Robert Mercer is an Investor. 
#GrowYourBusinessWithMattOn #LocalCharitiesDay I’ve got a 30Sec#Business Gem the last #GYB of #2017This week I want to #encourage you to tell your own #story Everyone one of us has a #book in us#FridayFeeling #youthquake #TurkeyDash #London #PantoDay #Bitcoin #Brexit  
OKAY #Remainers! Here is our chance to get an anti #Brexit song in the #Xmas charts! We need at least 8,000 downloads between today Fri 15th- Thurs 21st to get anywhere near the #UKTop40Please download (on multiple platforms) and share! 
Chief whip betting Twitter he can get the date into the Brexit bill without another defeat?  
After March 2019 Britain will not have a deep and special relationship with anyone. We'll be a third country in every global market. It's all brains in the Brexit camp. #stopbrexit 
Theresa May: moving to second phase of #Brexit talks is "important step" towards "smooth and orderly" exit from EU  
The inspirational messages at Westminster Tube are psy-ops for Brexit: a conspiracy thread.  
Dear David @DavidDavisMP I work in the youth sector. Things are very tough for young people in poorest areas. We're trying to keep them safe. Any chance of a Brexit impact report into likely effect on already disadvantaged communities? CC: @ChukaUmunna @JamesCleverly #NoRush  
This was a redline for the Brexiteers in Cabinet, and rightly so, it's one of the key opportunities of Brexit. Liam Fox would have a pretty free diary without the ability to do so.  
Nuspeak is a speciality of the Brexit delusionists.  
I like to think that with each Brexit front page The Mail is becoming more like me trying to deal with my kids.  
There was no problem with it when he was a republican socialist for independence. Now he’s a hard right Brexit libertarian Unionist, he’s appalled. Simple.  
I’m proud to be a Conservative Brexit traitor. We rebels had to take back control | Stephen Hammond  
Ireland must be key to second phase of Brexit talks - Anderson  … via @M_AndersonSFLeft Home Sunday - now in Brussel’s Airport heading to Dublin #HubbyI’mComingHome 
EU leaders took 10 minutes to adopt today's Brexit guidelines. There was a 'very sober' discussion and then a 'sigh of relief' around the table when it was concluded, according to an official. 
WORKING CLASS BETRAYED AGAIN? Plain-Speaking Yorkshireman Spells It Out To The Libtard Elite - We The British People Are Sovereign - Not Parliamentarian Troughers With Gold-Plated Taxpayer-Funded Pensions +++ Brexit Betrayal Is Seditious And Treasonous 
Ireland must be key to second phase of Brexit talks - @M_AndersonSF 
Now for the hard bit: Brussels lays down the law to demand a Brexit transition that includes a ban on trade deals while keeping free movement and it WON'T open full-blown trade talks until at least March  via @MailOnline 
A dose of cold Brexit reality from Leo Varadkar: "you can’t have unfettered free trade, unless you agree some sort of common set of rules, some level playing field." 
Ultra #Remain vs. Extreme #Leave(a) If we don't #StopBrexit right now I will protest and write to my MP(b) If we don't hard #Brexit right now I will riot and kill a traitorous MPStop this dystopian madness #StopBrexit 
Good old Ken Clarke. Standing up for the majority of Britain that think Brexit is a bad idea. It is a shame there aren't more honest MPs like him wanting to overturn over the referendum decision rather than spouting normal "I respect the result" you hear all the time. #StopBrexit 
Alex Taylor was so angered by Brexit he decided to become French, a process which ended in a ceremony at the country’s Pantheon.  
The only compelling for argument in the shorter term for Brexit was historic conservative one of re-establishing parliamentary sovereignty.Turns out that in leaving the EU Brexiters are happy for every single parliament to decide on the final deal except ours. Remarkable. 
Crispin is absolutely right: “The clock is ticking”, yet the EU apparently can't start trade talks until March. Anyone who reckons Brexit process will make Brits feel enamoured of EU are deluded.  
Over a million Brits live elsewhere in Europe. It’s time they were heard in the Brexit talks  
Why is our weak,supine Tory Gov allowing the EU to control the timetable and the  agenda of Brexit?We should offer a free trade agreement and walk away.  
Leave promised a #Brexit in which the UK could have its cake and eat it. They then scrambled for cover, knowing it could not be delivered. They don't now get to redefine the mandate according to misconceived theories on whether most people were interested in eating the frosting. 
Mueller 'requests emails' from Cambridge Analytica firm linked to 2016 campaign and Brexit  
Disingenuous and anti-democratic to salami slice the referendum. Leave promised an end to FoM but they ALSO promised full access to the SM just like UK has now. They promised something that was undeliverable. You don't now get to divine which bits were more important to voters. 
Ireland’s #EUCO press conferences used to be held in something resembling a broom closet, with 3 or 4 journos. Now they’ve been moved to this large room, and they’re the hottest ticket in town.#Brexit  
Remaining EU countries agree to integrate military forces after Brexit.Unelected people in charge of an army, what on earth could go wrong? 
Maltese leader says talks could be extended if MPs reject Brexit deal.Wakey, wakey remain MPs, this is what happens when you let 27 other countries run your country. 
We are on a mess because you conned millions of people into believing their problems were caused by immigrants; made impossible to deliver promises about a land of milk, honey & trade deals post-Brexit; then resigned as party leader so you would not have to take responsibility.  
Brexit commentariat spent six months telling us today could not happen. Now brace for three months telling us it didn't happen  
Growth in the Irish economy has again confounded expectations, growing by 10.5 per cent year on year in the third quarter of 2017.Being in the EU doesn't seem to be harming the Celtic Tiger!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE #LeaveLies 
'We've been taken for mugs!' Farage's FURY as Brexit trade talks won't start until MARCH  
.@JunckerEU on #EUCO results : Good harvest on Social Europe, from words to action on Defence, staying the course of solidarity and responsibility in migration policy, EMU reform proposals now on the table allow for meaningful discussion in March, a good Brexit deal achieved.  
IMPOSSIBLE politically to postpone Brexit for more than a few weeks given that elections European Parliament will be in May 2019 and nobody wants that to be organised in U.K. Thus U.K. has to exit EU before! 
Brexit fears overblown as more tech workers come to UK from outside the EU  
The other EU countries publish their guidelines for 2nd phase of #Brexit talks. UK is welcome to stay in #CustomsUnion & #SingleMarket during transition, provided it follows same rules as everyone else: 
The clock is ticking, and we are far away from anything resembling a deal. Brexit is intractable and complicated, far more so than people were told at the time of the referendum. 5/ 
#BREAKING EU to start 'exploratory contacts' with UK on post-Brexit ties: Tusk 
Do you remember when @DavidDavisMP ducked out of Brexit talks in Brussels after about an hour? Government papers show he had to dash off back to London, for a meeting with Daily Mail Editor, Paul Dacre. Now you know who's pulling their strings. 
After months of grandstanding, they are now being confronted with the sheer complexity and monumental costs that Brexit entails. They are insufficiently prepared, and they have insufficient time. 2/ 
Thread on today's announcement from the EU: Eighteen months after the EU referendum, the Government have only just managed to make progress on three initial Brexit issues. 1/ 
Mayday! Will this be the PM's last Christmas? We evaluate the latest Brexit news in this weeks #MirrorInsider 
If there's one phrase that really drives me nuts it's "after Brexit". For the sake of my sanity, please stop it now! Feel free to replace with "after Brexit has been cancelled". You know it makes sense. #stopbrexit 
Macron on Brexit: 'we owe solidarity to Ireland'. 
The Tory Brextremist MPs want the middling-rich like themselves who can't afford the full range of offshore perks available to the super-rich to be able to enjoy them in their very own #BrexitTaxHaven.And screw the rest of us. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
"Britain has to tell us what they want," says Merkel, when asked if UK shd stay in customs union.  "I did not participate in the referendum." 
Robert Tombs is consistently the best advocate of the Brexit cause  
"We are heading for a big collision on this,” says one senior negotiator, who predicted trouble within months. “It is unavoidable. The Irish border is where reality meets Brexit fantasy.”  
The Government should also make that Brexit day - that way no-one will notice and it won’t be in the papers.  
Never try to miss an opportunity to post this.... 
Labour MEP Seb Dance on BBC Daily Politics wears his UK/EU lapel pin, sings the praises of European defence integration, and says he is unapologetic about wanting to stay in the #EU. Labour voters take note. #bbcdp #pesco @VeteransBritain @SebDance #brexit 
I told “not fake news channel” @CNN’s @richardquest that we will continue to fight for EU and UK citizens’ rights. #Brexit See full video:  
"Quite significant progress made" but next phase of EU-UK talks "even tougher" - German Chancellor Angela Merkel on #Brexit  
I love @MarinaHyde & this is full throttle brilliance. But @Nigel_Farage doesn't just need satirising. He also needs questioning. Why was he in Alabama endorsing Moore? Who paid? Where's Assange interview? He says Bannon "helped hugely" with Brexit - how? 
Siri, show me an obvious metaphor for how the next stage of Brexit talks will go  
EU leaders have agreed to proceed onto the next phase of #Brexit negotiations. Getting the best Brexit deal for our country will mean we can build a better future for our country by getting control of our laws, money and borders.  
This will definitely be true for the transition and more likely than not also for the long term relationship.But this realisation is the sound of Brexiteers political fictions crashing with the realities of international politics. #brexit  
Since City of London has greatest concentration of wanker-bankers it stands to reason they’ll suffer the worst fallout from #Bitcoin. Add the enterprise killing effect of Brexit and you end up with a lot of unemployed rent boys on Old Compton Street. 
Lunchtime reading: if Leavers want Brexit to work, they have to answer these questions, and damn fast. 
UK government had almost no sense of NI border issue until end of recent Brexit negotiations. Great account:  
How Ireland is shaping Britain’s post-Brexit trade policyBy me, at @FT 
NEW: @GeorgeMonbiot joined Gaia this Nov. to share his vision for a politics of belonging that can take us out of the wreckage of our current crises.It was the perfect tonic for any winter blues. Watch the full talk here: #FridayFeeling #Brexit  
Brexit has reopened a centuries-old debate about how Ireland should be governed  
Petition to leave EU immediately almost at 100k, at which point Parliament will have to debate it.  #Brexit  
.@M_AndersonSF speaking following the European Council meeting in Brussels says its vital that issues around Ireland and rights are central to next phase of Brexit negotiations  
The 2nd phase will be the tougher part of #Brexit negotiations. The EU27 must stand united. Sectoral interests should not make us forget about the big picture. The defense of EU citizens is the priority. #EUCO 
Immigration was a decisive factor in referendum. Ipsos MORI found it was by far the most important issue for voters in June 2016. Failure to achieve a reduction would risk generating a strong sense of betrayal among those who voted for Brexit & many others  
Today is an important step on the road to delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit and forging our deep and special future partnership.  
Tragic - once admirable Labour MP Frank Field @frankfieldteam being give top coverage by Arron Banks' fascist mouthpiece Westmonster #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
UTTER #TREACHERY! The more the #Eurocrats praise @theresa_may's 'determination' the more uneasy we should feel! #TheresaMay is not telling YOU the truth about the #EUDeal she is seeking with the #GANGSTERS in #BRUSSELS! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #UK #EU #BREXIT  
I think this campaign idea is worth repeating: Every day Remainers should try to post at least one comment and give likes to several pro-EU tweets in MSM comments pages. If lots of us do this it will have an impact, so please RT.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Over 17 million people voted for Brexit. We didn’t vote for a “soft” Brexit, or a “hard” Brexit, we just voted for Brexit. - Leave the single market.- Halt the free movement of people.- Limit the power of European courts. Anything else is betrayal. 
GALLOWAY: 'The Tory Brexit rebels are just bitter, sacked ministers,' @georgegalloway says. 
Out of touch and out of your depth!! #DodgyDave #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Appalling. This sorry #Brexit debacle reveals by the day the ugly totalitarian face behind these Brextremists...'They won' now they assume the right to shut everyone up who disagrees!#StopBrexit to save democracy #Remain allows a #FinalSay for all the People not just Brexiters. 
We will deliver on the will of the British people and get the best Brexit deal for our country - securing the greatest possible access to European markets, boosting free trade with countries across the world, and delivering control over our borders, laws and money.  
.@ChukaUmunna – Ministers are insufficiently prepared & have insufficient time for next phase of Brexit talks  
We do not want a so called soft brexit, we voted to leave not hang on or alighn to bits n pieces like most of parliament want thinking they know what we want. Remember that! 
The #BrexitVote was the biggest #vote in #UK history & all @theresa_may can do is to betray the country, Instead of working to make #Brexit #BRITAIN a Global #Economic success! #TheresaMay is working against her own people! DISGRACEFUL #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @ConHome #TORY 
.@IsabelOakeshott tells @NickyMorgan01 “I think this is all about you, you don’t believe in Brexit.” Watch the clip here:  
#EU27 leaders just agreed to pass to 2nd phase of #Brexit talks. Our infographic summarises possible scenarios for the future relation. More:  @FabianZuleeg #EUCO 
Today is a good day for Brexit and an important step for Britain. Thanks to hard work and determination, we have reached an important milestone and have achieved #sufficientprogress. There is still lots of work to come but we are ready for the next stage. 
#EU27 agreed: #Brexit negotiations can move on to 2nd phase. Sufficient progress made on: citizens' rights, Ireland & financial settlement. More info:  
Brexit: EU leaders agree to move talks onto next stage  
Fantastic news that @theresa_may has secured the agreement of EU leaders to move on to the second phase of Brexit talks. Now let's talk trade and the future, close, relationship that is critical for East Renfrewshire, Scotland and the UK 
Given the EU referendum did not allow for votes from those set to be most affected by it, sad and scary to see #DailyExpress demanding the #Amendment7 MPs be removed.This is how Brexit 'democracy' works- remove those who would disagree from votes, leaving only the converted.  
You got onto Brexit Phase two by agreeing a Transition deal which gets us all the economic benefits of EU membership, but with no say in any new laws....I don't want to say I told you so, but....  
When #Brexit is finally done, someone will list all the things we’ve lost and the price we’ve paid. They’ll point out that the gains are invisible to all but the wealthiest, yet the losses are palpable. Only then will the UK realise how it was duped. That it was all for nothing! 
"You're stabbing us in the back!" - A #bbcqt audience member in Barnsley who voted for #Brexit lets rip.  
European leaders agree to advance Brexit negotiations; now U.K. PM Theresa May must decide what she wants wants from a trade deal  
2. Please try to avoid throwing insults or using personalised language...calling people thick or stupid does not help the cause...it allows them to lump us in with them...we need to use language carefully. #Brexit campaigners lied to us..some are liars but few are stupid. 
Thank you to Presidents @JunckerEU and @donaldtusk. Today is an important step on the road to delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit and forging our deep and special future partnership.  
The decision to not hold David Davis in contempt of Parliament over the release of #Brexit impact assessments is “clearly unsatisfactory”, according to the SNP. 
Will be on @daily_politics from about 12.40 GMT. Brexit might come up, who knows? 
The reality of Brexit trade talks is set out clearly in the EU Council guidelines. No question of the UK getting anything but worse trade terms with the EU after Brexit.  
EU just officially confirmed "4 freedoms" +ECJ law to apply to end of #Brexit transition (ie atleast until 2021). So Brexit means no change for atleast 5years from 2016referendum apart from loss of power, EUagencies, £collapse & low growth. I wonder what UKmood will be come 2021? 
Hundreds of rough sleepers from East #Europe unable 2 be deported by Home Office because it's deemed to be discriminatory! I thought that under #EU law, if no job for 3 months you go back to your country. #liberal judges need to find some backbone. #Brexit  
1. Dear #Remain peeps...I share the frustration & anger with the travesty of this invalid non-binding #Brexit, based on an opinion of only 37% of voters being treated as the indisputable Will of the Ppl. I too am incredulous that folks still choose to wilfully ignore facts but.. 
Until we know our post-Brexit EU trade rules neither the UK nor other 3rd countries will, in practice, be able to negotiate much.  
EU Revenge list. After they have treated our nice Mrs May so badly I will deliver brutal retribution post Brexit:> Sell the VW and demand £1m diesel compo> Switch from Eurodisney to Orlando (cheaper anyway!)> No more Brie> Fill in the tunnel> Pay £50bn bung in coins. 
Regarding net neutrality, @mrjamesob, EU are coming down hard on this. UK likely to transfer EU legislation as part of Great Repeal Bill, but after Brexit, don't expect legislation to remain; US will likely want it removed as part of trade deal. 
Corbyn will be in no 10 by Christmas, he promised. I hope he's ok navigating the chimney, especially with that sack full of Labour support for Brexit. 
The combination of:- the 'sufficient progress' joint report now adopted by the European Council;- the European Parliament's resolution (and veto power); and- the Westminster 'meaningful vote'make a Soft Brexit more likely than any other outcome. Imo more likely than not. 
The inevitable logic of #Brexit. Time to end this folly and end Brexit! 
EU guidelines on next phase of Brexit negotiations officially adopted - full text  
EU says all EU Law will apply until end of transition, assumed to be 2021, and we have to stick with all four freedoms, which means EU immigration carries on as is for five years after the referendum  
Leavers, in the spirit of Christmas, spare a thought for Remainers at this difficult time as they realise finally that Brexit really means Brexit and Britain is leaving the EU. Everything else is detail. 
 EU make quick decision on next #Brexit stage, as sommelier has just uncorked a rather fine 68 and the lunch smells good. 
Here’s the EU’s negotiating guidelines for phase two of the Brexit talks. Looks as if they want all EU law and ECJ rulings enforced in the UK during transition  
EU leaders approve last week's deal. Theresa May has returned to the UK early, whilst the rest of the EU work on their formulating position. It is crucial that we do not accept ANYTHING which dilutes Brexit. No deal is far better than a bad deal! 
NOW ONLINE European Council (Art. 50) - Guidelines  #Brexit #EUCO 
BREAKING: European Union leaders give final clearance for Brexit negotiations with Britain to enter second phase involving trade. 
5/n it is beyond imagination of many that they wld learn languages or move to EU. They care about austerity, doctors, schools, housing, infrastructure. Brexit will devastate these, they affect us all. Talk about them first & LINK them to #brexit - don't assume they see the link 
Apparently @johnredwood does not believe in representative democracy or any role at all for MPs. BTW, @LibDems do not seek to ‘reverse’ Ref 16 decision, but respect voters enough to give them the final say once the actual facts of #Brexit become clear  
Brexit talks 'can move to next stage'  
3/3 ..Anna’s views on #Brexit are well known & Broxtowe Cons unanimously re-selected her earlier this year.” 
Progress. Could have been done in October, and without absurd and pointless burning of goodwill and trust.Now for the outstanding Exit issues. UK inevitably to break promises to one side on NI & accept EU27 transition terms in full. Zero chance of trade deal before Brexit day.  
BREXIT:The smug, self-congratulating Conservative Remainers compromised their country, their party, their Prime Minister. They sacrificed all loyalties & duties on the altar of their over-inflated egos & a bizarre fanaticism for the EU.  
Oh Danny boy you are such a joke!1.Switzerland in Schengen & UK NOT2. Try to squeeze a car/ delivery truck there @DanielJHannan#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
BREAKING: EU leaders agree to move on to Phase 2 of Brexit talks after sufficient progress reached  
EU leaders have agreed to move Brexit talks on to second phase, says European Council president Donald Tusk  
All signed off - Council agrees Sufficient Progress.. we are now in Phase 2 #brexit 
They'll only be defeated again. Government should stop resisting and start consulting parliament on the Brexit negotiations.  
Brexit. It makes sense if you really don't think about it.  
Tate and Lyle that backed Brexit?Tate and Lyle that owns the Belizean sugar industry?Tate and Lyle that will put British beet farmers out of business by importing cheap cane from Belize?That Tate and Lyle?#TakingBackControl 
#RETWEET: This #BREXIT gentleman speaks for all of us! spot on #ToryRebels like @NickyMorgan01 are #TRAITORS & @UKLabour are betraying the ordinary Working man & woman with the #singlemarket!  #BBC #SKY @Conservatives #LABOUR #TORY @ConHome #Conservatives 
EU leader signals Brexit talks could be extended following Tory rebels' ammendment. Big story from @faisalislam in Brussels 
.@mrjamesob's plea for a Brexit ceasefire this Christmas: "My Dad won't be here this Christmas, but if you gave me the choice of never talking about politics with him again and having him back, I'd bite your arm off." pic.twitter.com/ZroU0bHD7O 
Yet again Brexit portrayed as working class and northern. Rather than, say, the comfortable, home counties Brexity-types.  
11 Tory rebels threatened with death threats or deselection after #Brexit vote.  
Driving the new Audi A8. Bings and bongs to “warn” you of everything. Exactly the sort of nannying nonsense Brexit will banish. Britons should be allowed to reverse into whatever they want! 
VERY INTERESTING: First time  I hear this: transition cannot be extended, French Europe Minister tells Senate’s Foreign Affairs Committee. #Brexit  
"Member of Aberdeen University Conservative Association. "Isn't that stolen money paying your fees?"we the people get nothing back from the taxes we pay"Are you paying much tax as a student?So yet again another freeloading sponger turns out to be a brexit fan!.  
Whatever Brexit Trade Deal the PM secures it cannot satisfy:KIPPERSBREXTREMISTSRIGHT WING PRESSLABOURTHE 48%ISABEL OAKSHOTTBRIAN FROM BARNSLEYPerhaps 20% might be happyWhat's the point?#FBPE #stopbrexit 
Brexit latest:  
Very pleased with this: Ladybird Libertarians: Dan Hannan, Paddington and the pernicious impact of 1970s children's literature on Brexit thinking - by me. And yes it's got pictures.  
In 90 seconds, this bloke on Question Time explains why the Conservatives and Labour are  fearful of pushing for a softer Brexit  
Underlying this fairly technical debate was a series of other agendas. The Lib Dems openly seek to delay & disrupt Brexit as they wish to reverse the public decision. Many Remain Labour MPs want to slow & water it down because they don't really accept the judgement of the people. 
The Express backtracks on Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
The tragedy of the Remainers: remaining is very much in the economic interest of the UK (and what I had campaigned for). For the EU27, though, the long-term political risk of Remain has becomer greater than the short-term economic hit of Brexit. 
The Government has won all but one of the votes on the EU Withdrawal Bill. The most important vote, the one to approve Clause 1 which repeals the 1972 European Communities Act, passed by 318 to 68, as Labour accepted they needed to allow the repeal to permit Brexit. 
#brexit Sack the lot of them kick them out Conservative party traitors all of them. Disgraceful  celarbrating defeating there own party. These muppets do all they can to stop Brexit. You’ve made Theresa May getting deal with EU impossible.  
Just been to children's primary school carol service. They sang songs in Polish, Dutch, German, French, Spanish, Italian. The kids talked about different traditions in those countries at Christmas. It was gorgeous. And now Brexit. *breaks down in tears* 
"Theresa May has persuaded the EU to move to the next round of Brexit talks. Now she must decide which promises to break."  
Brexit, will it be good for us? Will it end the need for for food banks-probably not, possibly need more!Will it help the poorest in society-definitely not! Help the sick/disabled-No!Will it save our NHS-Definitely not. Is the pain & cost to us worth it - No, lets stop it NOW  
Parliament has a ‘meaningful’ say on Brexit now? If only | Jonathan Portes  
'Sack them' May under pressure as poll urges PM to kick out Brexit rebels   
Top discussion on @mrjamesob - me and my dad had lots of arguments over Brexit. He voted out. I said he probably wouldn’t be around in years to come to see the fallout. Then he died suddenly in February. I don’t regret the arguments but I regret not respecting his personal views. 
Important detail. Mueller subpoenaed Cambridge Analytica *before* the contacts with Assange emerged. #Brexit cannot be separated from the #TrumpRussia investigation 
Cut taxes to attract the wealthy to Britain for a 'Big Bang Brexit'  
The Tory Brexiteer true believers are satisfied with the PM because they believe Hard Brexit is still on track. EU leaders are satisfied with the PM because they believe she has decided to steer Britain towards Soft Brexit.They can't both be right. 
A slightly barbed xmas message from Lithuania's President for the British PM @theresa_may. Signals that EU leaders meeting in Brussels still aren't clear on what kind of #Brexit the UK gov wants. #EUCO 
May says brexit will happen. Its ludicrous, when it does happen we will be an EU member in everything but name but have no vote and no MEP's. May must think we're thick as 24 short planks. Small wonder the EU applaud her. 
DELAY: EU postpones Brexit trade talks until March. Brussels big wigs demand transitional deal is agreed first. Yet again May is dancing to the EU's tune. Weak.  
“We are heading towards a softer version [of Brexit]” Maltese PM Muscat tells me after bilateral with PM last night “pretty obvious now we are converging on a more sensible approach... not sure it is what the UKG says it prefers”  
EU admit we’re heading towards a soft Brexit, well and truly conned making referendum a complete farce, Parliament & Brussels are congratulating themselves, PM has sold us out for fear of a backlash from MPs.  
I have encountered so many self-declared lawyers (non-practising), business consultants, financial traders (online gamblers) journalists & authors (bloggers) in particular - who turn out to be pretenders.This is a feature of angry Brexit.It’s childlike & victimy.  
After this week, I refuse to believe that Brexit is unstoppable | Martin Kettle  
Gov transparency data is out - Brexit minister @DavidDavisMP had an interesting 24hrs in July 17/7 media reports Davies left EU negotiations early (after just 1hr)17/7 Davies meet Daily Mail editor Dacre for a ‘personal meeting’18/7 meets Dacre again for dinner 
we missed you Ruth! having a wee break from the #brexit shambles your party has inflicted on us to promote extreme right wing press hostile to Scotland. Still, you have your eyes on a bigger prize, right? 
Why referendums are dangerous when voters don't know the facts - from David Davis in 2002.Does the first sentence remind you of anything?#Brexit  
Memo to Theresa May:  You don’t need to legislate for a Brexit date. It’s already built in to the Article 50 process.  March 2019. 
#BBCQT “Brexiteer accidentally admits he didn't know what Brexit would entail” + He claimed Barnsley is being “damaged” by immigration  - when it only has 4% born outside UK anyway 
Most of the Brexit rebels are lawyers. Maybe experts are useful after all | Schona Jolly  
Brexit TRAITOR/QUISLING Clarke comes clean: 'Of course I'd REVERSE Brexit if it was left to me'  
Please retweet and get this important message out: The EU has indicated yet again that the UK can stop #Brexit and choose to #Remain. We must keep up the fight! #StopBrexit @LibDems @TheGreenParty @theSNP @UKLabour 
Brexit means death threats to democratically elected MPs. Let that sink in. 
Ditching Theresa May is the best chance of ditching Brexit, writes reader Daniel Hunt.  
Yesterday @vincecable visited Dublin where he explained how Brexit will damage the island of Ireland and the UK.  
Talks about #Brexit transition period should begin in January, a cheerful-looking @MichelBarnier tells me as we chat during the European Council. #Barnierbantz episode 57. 
Brexit is essentially a series of unsustainable tensions. Eventually the tensions will snap and it won’t be pretty.  
Friends! Summary:1. After this week, I refuse to believe Brexit is unstoppable.2. Come to think, I've been refusing to believe this since 24.6.16.3. Well, after all, I *do* work for the Guardian. Refusing to believe reality is part of our job description.4. That's all, folks!  
More than happy to pay more income tax. Still utterly fucked off it's principal use will be mitigating tory austerity while I'm also paying for Brexit, Trident, House of Lords and similar cuntish Westmonster abominations. We could've been well away from these bastards by now. 
Death threats have reportedly been sent to the Conservative MPs who voted against the Government in this week’s crunch Brexit bill vote.Terrorism such as this must not be rewarded. For this reason alone we should #StopBrexit#Brexit #FBPE 
We will deliver on the will of the British people and get the best Brexit deal for our country, securing the greatest possible access to European markets, boosting free trade with countries across the world, and delivering control over our borders, laws and money.  
Shocking to an ex-forces man like myself, national service needed after Hard Brexit followed by a good war. Invading France would be a worthy endeavour. Get the young nancyboys fighting!  
May has implicitly accepted EU plans to postpone Brexit trade talks until March, amid concern that the Government does not know what sort of trade deal it wantsHow did people make an informed vote for a mystery?  
The young are confused, lifelong members of the party are confused, maybe Jeremy is confused? It's time #Labour realised that it has to show a lead. Brexit IS economic suicide, any fool can see that - people are already £600 a year worse off. #Corbyn must say #StopBrexit - soon! 
Calling off #Brexit. Too embarrassing? Scared of riots? Frightened of Nigel?Get a grip! Get a spine! Get a brain!#StopTheMadness #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Brexit bile is rife after amndt 7. Hear this leavers, our fight against brexit is just and it is you ultimately on the losing side #FBPE X 
Oh jesus. Now I’m being Brexplained by Kate Hoey.Here’s a question, Kate: who agrees the law that governs how EASA or EFSA work?#brexit  
#ratificationreferendum, as @TheGreenParty calling for: "A year ago, opponents of a second vote had a 19-point poll lead. Now supporters have a lead of 16 points" #StopBrexit #Brexit @mollymep 
Watch this guy from #BBCQT nail it on #Brexit@UKLabour listen up and listen well and keep listening until you have got it. Ok?Watch @RLong_Bailey of #Labour squirm and struggle as this gentleman shows her up 
Ireland held a referendum because we were legally obliged to. Why in the name of goodness would any party want to put people through the heartache of campaigning when they don't absolutely have to?  
5 years of a lot of sitting down on TV, Trump, Brexit, Tory government jokes & one baby later and we are STILL a bunch of cutie pies   @joshwiddicombe @MrNishKumar 
Cabinet struggle to hold back public anger as MPs DEMAND Tory Brexit rebels are sacked  
The whole of Parliament should resign not one of them is worth being an MP of this Great Land. The people were sovereign in the referendum not Parliament & the people voted to leave the EU not to somehow part stay. 
"Fishing is not very important to UK - it's mainly symbolic" in terms of Brexit talks says guest on @BBCr4today .  Trust those Scottish  Brexit voting fisherfolk are duly comforted. 
Brexit to make Britain a tax haven. As has been so obvious to see for a long, long time.  Cut taxes to attract the wealthy to Britain for a 'Big Bang Brexit'  via @telegraphnews 
Brexit will only mean Brexit if we regain control of economic rules  
Good to see @PaulWilliamsMP highlighting the importance of European workers to the #NHS in the @HouseofCommons yesterday. Vital their post #Brexit future is assured  
Wannabe Brexit civil war fighter Sean must really hate the UK automotive sector. Even as a member of the Guild of Motoring Writers & former car sales manager.  
“We will continue to fight for EU and UK citizens’ rights. Watch my full speech here  #Brexit  
Knowing @BorisJohnson, the moment he says something is "unstoppable" you know (1) how worried he is, and (2) the opposite is true. #BREXIT is not certain, as @martinkettle makes clear 
We were sold a pup on Brexit. David Davis, Michael Gove, Liam Fox and Boris Johnson:Deliver what you promised or admit you got it wrong.  
Austrian Chancellor Kern says Brexit still has unsolved issues from phase 1. If you can't have a border in Ireland or between Northern Ireland and the UK, "even school children can see that's still a riddle that needs to be solved." 
Because, idiot, there’s a major difference between EU institutions and agencies. The latter have many non EU members, who refuse federal control but want to work with EU. Brexit never meant not cooperating with EU, but self determination to decide what we will cooperate on. Fool.  
57% of voters in the Aberavon constituency voted to leave the European Union.Our MP @SKinnock is doing everything he can to spanner the works of Brexit.He has nothing but contempt for democracy and his constituents. 
Priti 'Awful' patel talking about a 'Big Bang Brexit'! That'll be implosion or explosion? Implosion of the economy if Brexit happens...followed by an explosion of anger the like of which has never been see in Britain. Is that what you mean? 
According to @bbclaurak, a priority in phase 2 of #Brexit negotiations is now putting the Irish border guarantees in more formal, legally binding language. This is a situation entirely created by @DavidDavisMP's loose tongue. Incompetence eating into an already tight timetable. 
Theresa May expected to shy from firm Brexit date to avoid 'tying the UK’s hands together' Weak Leader! Time for Jacob Rees-Mogg!  
Dominic Grieve says he received death threats after #Brexit vote.The Daily Mail, The Express & The Sun all bear responsibility for Jo Cox's murder; by dehumanising & hating Remainers continually in the press they're inciting violence. 
EU and UK #Brexit negotiatiors are united in the absence of#lobbytransparency regarding details of their meetings ... and on corporatedominance.  
SDLP Leader @columeastwood has written to @NicolaSturgeon and @fmwales seeking support that parties who could potentially form a Stormont executive to be given a place at the Joint Ministerial Council. Theresa May cannot only consult the DUP on #Brexit 
Humiliation, economic and social collapse, rising unemployment, spiralling debt, loss of exports, millions living in poverty etc.?"Brexit: What to expect from the next phase" 
"your Brexit is soft, mine is a HARD Brexit"  
Chap nails it! The people command parliament & despite project fear voted to Leave! Not Leave..now turn to Qs.2- 'do you want hard or soft Brexit'. Arrogant metropolitan establishment dismiss Brexit as an ignorant hiccup.Same attitude caused rebellion in American colonies in 1775  
The perfect cartoon on the UK's triumphant advance to the next stage of #Brexit negotiations, by @CamleyCartoons for the @heraldscotland (h/t @mspjmason). I wish I could write like Steven can draw. 
You couldn’t make it up. Or maybe you could. A £350m-a-week-for-the-NHS Brexit newspaper accuses Remainers of lying.  
Excellent profile of David Davis from @TomMcTague includes this bit of gold: The Brexit Secretary once wrote an article for the Harvard Business Review on the importance of understanding big projects before you start them in order to avoid disaster later. 
WATCH Question Time's Brexit Hero  
"We have now to formalise the withdrawal agreement and put it to the approval of the @Europarl_EN. We will discuss future relations as soon as possible. Phase 2 will be more difficult than phase 1." @JunckerEU #EUCO #Brexit  
When you see Brexiteers demand that the EU27 "start talks about trade" they overlook the simple problem: UK has no position on post-Brexit trade with EU, and with no position there cannot be any negotiations. 
Exactly what we said on Wednesday night. Well done @UKLabour This is yours to own now.'Tory rebels have increased the chances of a “no deal” Brexit by giving Theresa May less time to negotiate a good deal for Britain, EU leaders have warned.'  
Past is history, future – a mystery. #Brexit #EUCO 
If EU27 suddenly said to UK: ok, let's talks about post-Brexit trade.......there would be a silence, a long painful silence.UK cabinet has not even discussed its policy on post-Brexit trade *eighteen months* after referendum.Such a daft predicament. 
The next stage of Brexit talks is not going to be about post-Brexit trade, regardless of all the excited headlines.Two reasons.One, it will be about transition arrangements.  Dull but crucial next step.And two, well, UK does not yet have a position on post-Brexit trade. 
Corbyn to lead another Brexit Bill rebellion. He said: "We will vote against there being the fixed date. "To put down what is in a sense an arbitrary date is not sensible." So he wants the option of delaying our leaving date. What a surprise! 
Greek European Affairs Minister George Katrougalos has a very definite take on Brexit #r4today 
Wake up to the cheery global words of my Brexit column, then 50 press-ups and you're set for the day  
Call me stupid, but I listen to the views of people who are independent experts on their subjects, not those of thugs who read the Daily Express. Between >95% of economists, who say Brexit is a terribleidea, and Sid and Doris Bonkers with a CSE in tattooing, I choose the former.  
Absolutely essential video about the day of the Referendum in Catalonia. With subtitles in Spanish, French, English  
A centuries-old debate about how Ireland should be governed has been reopened. And the Irish question in turn will play a role in determining what form Brexit takes. 
Rail fares have soared. Another kick in the teeth for rail users after poor service and strike action. #Brexit inflation is biting. 
David Davis’s Brexit dept is so secretive no one actually knows what he does  
I keep on saying it, but this is the man I stood with on numerous platforms as he spoke about state power and the untrustworthiness of government. David Davis's Brexit department tops government secrecy table  
WARNING: EU won't renegotiate with Theresa May if Parliament rejects Brexit deal, Luxembourg PM warns. 
#brexit the will of the people?The UK protest vote to leave the EU was an attack by a small  minority on my way of life,harming my family, offending my beliefs and curtailing my Freedoms. I will fight it to the bitter end  on Social Media, in pubs, streets and voting booths 
In an extraordinary development in Brexit policy, the UK government has noticed a looming unforced error and is *not* going to make the error.  
NAILED IT: Question Time audience member absolutely skewers Remoaner politicians for trying to defy the will of the people and block Brexit. Well said!  
How much tax does Rupert avoid?How much is Brexit going to cost both culturally and economically?How much money does the scrounging Royal Family get?How much is it costing to fix Big Ben?Wizen up, don't buy The Sun. 
If you’ve had enough of cynical MPs trying to sabotage #Brexit and a spiteful #EU trying to punish Britain, please sign and share this petition to quit negotiations and leave the rotten EU immediately with no “deal”. 
Cambridge Analytica also undermined British democracy in Brexit for Leave.  
The @Conservatives appear to be doing everything they can to subvert democracy and deny both parliament and the people a #FinalSay on #Brexit. Why?  
Divergent views on #FATA issue notwithstanding it is the question of the future of the people of FATA & they should have the right to decide. Whether merger or a separate province, a #Referendum as enshrined in Article 48(6) may be the most viable & democratic solution here 
May’s Brexit divorce deal: the inside story from Brussels, Dublin and London  
I Wonder why Starmer wants to delay & block Brexit? Oh yes.  
Wonderful must-read piece by @WomaninHavana on lawyers and Brexit: Schona Jolly QC (@WomaninHavana) really is the best lawyer to follow on Twitter. 
Theresa May and her rabid rancid Right Wing Media are lying to the stupid Brextremist mugs, she has capitulated over Brexit but too scared to tell them, they’ve been played for the fools that they are.. tools for power  
Detailed story of the London-Brussels-Dublin-DUP negotiations that led to agreement on moving to phase two of the #Brexit talks.Says Varadkar told May in Sweden he’d use Ireland’s veto ‘to take the hard border off the table’.Fascinating stuff.  
Welcome news that EU agrees that Brexit talks should formally move onto trade. Vindication of PM’s strategy. Time for calm but tenacious resolve.  
How have we got to the position where MPs voting simply to uphold the power of Parliament against executive arrogance are labelled 'traitors' by one rag while another calls for them to be  deselected? The dogma of #Brexit is blinding them to both the injustice & the irony 
.@BBCr4today #NetNeutrality is explicitly protected by EU law: Something else that might be lost after Brexit? I prefer the EU style of regulating and constraining power of corporations to US moves to allow their untrammelled domination in Information Age 
Mayday! Mayday! International distress signal Tories Brexit capitulation humiliates the country, Right Wing Media silent, A&E Crisis, homeless children up 70%, knife crime up 16%, meanwhile Theresa May abandoneds us all for Lobster+Beef Banquet with billionaires as benefits cut  
Too right! @IsabelOakeshott last night told @NickyMorgan01 what we’d all love to ie that she has done nothing but "humiliate" the Prime Minister & undermined her negotiating position #bbcqt #Brexit 
After this week, I refuse to believe that Brexit is unstoppable | Martin Kettle  
17.4 million people voted for Brexit. Nearly 50 million didn't - this ridiculous and catastrophic process has hurtled our nation into a disastrous nightmare. Resist. #bbcqt 
The thing that angers me most about #Brexit is that it is a solution to a problem that doesn't need fixing, and hence a masive distraction from problems that do, like homelessness and poverty  
Every single step from this government to implement Brexit has been mishandled. May and the Cabinet are completely incompetent #NotFittoGovern 
Geoff Norcott on #bbcqt was suggesting that if Brexit didn't happen, there wouldn't be public disorder but Leave voters would disengage with politics and not vote again.Based on the quality of points put forward by the Leave voters on the show, that sounds like a big bonus. 
I don’t think a lot of remainers have figured out that #hard #brexit is more of a possibility now because of those rebels. If parliament rejects the final deal it will mean WTO tariffs for trade. #planning 
Very timely piece in today’s @FT as I fly to Belfast for @healthyBrexit meeting. Yesterday in Brussels struck by how EU27 colleagues have moved on - Brexit way down list of priorities, seen as inexplicable and incomprehensible self-induced harm  
Brexit should be cancelled, Austrian prime minister says  
Great stuff: The inside story of the UK's messy deal to secure an amicable Brexit  -  via @FT 
'Stabbed in the back' FURIOUS BBC audience member attacks Labour betrayal of working class  #bbcqt #Brexit #Labour 
This. A zero tolerance approach to all these distorted facts is essential, they're the foundations on which the Brextremists have built their delusion that is so attractive to those looking for a scapegoat for their own particular prejudices. 
Looking at reports from #EUCO may I again stress that European leaders support eachother in difficult situations. You are rarely left alone. Each and everyone is under constant pressure at home. All will need collegiality at some stage. #Brexit 
Being interviewed live on most popular Bulgarian TV channel bTV just before 8am local time. Welcoming BG EU Presidency, Brexit citizens rights, future EU-UK Trade Deal & more. 
#NetNeutrality is under threat in the US but protected by EU law.Sign this petition to ensure that the internet stays free and open after #Brexit and does not become dominated by some corporationsWhat it means:   
MEP @VivianeRedingEU spells out in just over a minute what Brexit really means.  
Brexit, Trump and a generation of incompetents  Excellent from Simon Kuper 
Brexit, Trump and a generation of incompetents   | via Financial Times  
EU leaders to move Brexit to next stage  
Brexit vote: EU leaders set to move talks on to next stage  
Now that @carolecadwalla ripped the lid off Cambridge Analytica's #Brexit psychological warfare operation, Special Counsel Mueller's #TrumpRussia probe is closing in on them, and UK authorities are also investigating. 
This is an absolutely fascinating account. Remarkable that nobody saw the "irish issue" coming, despite warnings by academics, commentators and the Irish since before the referendum. Absurd hoop-jumping to spin the Fin Settlement.  
That's quite the carbon tax referendum happening in Calgary Lougheed right now.  
The only reason the MPs voted for the referendum was they thought the public would do as it was told . They all live in the Westminster bubble and are on the EU gravy train. Brexiteers are considered to be the uneducated extremists who should be treated with contept . 
BBC Question Time Brexiteer Accidentally Admits He Didn't Know What Brexit Would Entail#bbcqt 
May wins applause from EU leaders for Brexit efforts  
But since you seem to read symbolism into my avatar (from LONG before brexit) it's ironic that YOU don't see it as representing the defeat of Fascism, the mindset which pervades the majority of "send the w*gs home" brexiteers, spurred on by the Daily Bile of Julia's paymasters. 
Dear Leavers,Please stop spouting vacuous slogans. The time for that has passed. There are concrete problems facing us which need concrete solutions. If you can't offer any, and still support Brexit,  you're either a fool or a liar, or both.#StopBrexit 
Now both Canada and the UK are investigating AggregateIQ (affiliated with SCL, Cambridge Analytica’s parent company) in #Brexit At one point, SCL homepage was linked to AggregateIQ, but the link was taken down after @carolecadwalla reported. @profcarroll 
I’d tell him to stop Brexit. He might as well get one decent right thing done.  
With the effective clearing of phase one of Brexit negotiations, do the EU still support the option of Remain for Britain?Please RT. 
"In 2016, #CambridgeAnalytica, under the leadership of CEO Alexander Nix and vice-president #StephenBannon helped manipulate the British electorate to vote for #Brexit. The...company had achieved the unthinkable in breaking up the #EU and then began to turn its attention to #US" 
Treacherous Tory Remainers have INCREASED the chances of a hard Brexit, say critics: Brussels warns its leaders will not return to the negotiating table if MPs vote down final deal   via @MailOnline 
Brexit should be cancelled, Austrian Prime Minister Christian Kern says.Growing support at home and around the world to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
The reason why established UK political parties are in a major crisis is that they aren't designed to deal with a crisis of sovereignty, That's why decent hardworking Britons need a new party with a clear vision of confident and successful post-Brexit Britain.Sovereign 
“I know you say we’re thick up north”You’re not doing your region any favours. Banging on about problems in working class areas, blaming immigrants & EU instead of UK government policies, then thinking Brexit has all the answers, shows you are thick, and xenophobic.#BBCQT 
Yes, stopping Brexit is the aim. You and fellow Labour Brexiters are helping the Tories wreck our country. That’s betrayal.  
Nick Clegg: the Government is jumpy and insecure about Brexit.The risks keep growing, and the support is melting away. This is why a meaningful vote must include an option to Remain.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
I'm seeing this article making the rounds in Russian propaganda networks, touted as "proof" that Russia didn't mess w/ Brexit campaign.Note that a yr ago, Zuckerberg called it "pretty crazy" to suggest that Russia used FB to interfere in the US election. 
The Mercers have a big stake in Cambridge Analytica, Bannon a smaller stake.  The company was also allegedly involved in the Brexit vote. 
'Sanctimonious twaddle' Remoaner Nicky Morgan SLAMMED for voting to thwart Brexit on QT  #bbcqt #BBC #BrexitDeal 
Bob Geldof, the man who equated the men and women of the #EasterRising with Daesh and said during Scotland's independence referendum, "Nationalism is very dangerous...I know...I'm Irish!" Slán abhaile Sir Bob. Maith sibh DCC   
No Liam hard Brexit is complete madness as there is no evidence of any type to suggest there are any economic benefits from Brexit as in none no 350m a week  
Huge round of applause for #Barnsley #Yorkshire man who says on #BBC #QuestionTime #BBCQT (towards end of video below) that it did not say on his ballot paper in last year's #EU #Referendum if he wanted a soft or a hard #Brexit. Brexit now. (@LeaveEUOfficial r/t @Camelot_1966) 
A message from @theSNP to the 1 million Scots who are to pay more tax. Don’t be selfish like Tories,help fellow Scots in their time of need as #SNP works to protect Scotland from Tory #Brexit and #Austerity #BrokenVow 
Every single parliament in Europe will have to ratify Brexit. What the right wants, from @Michael_Heaver to @PrisonPlanet is for it to be every parliament but ours. They want us to be a laughing stock. 
Labour have voted with every single piece of legislation to get moving with Brexit. Stop pissing yourself you snowflake    
MPs warned EU will not renegotiate Brexit deal if Parliament rejects it Then the solution is simple.. the alternate option not WTO but must be to #StopBrexit & #Remain 
My position on #Brexit today is to the left, then second right past the King’s head and straight at the mini-roundabout, just past Tesco. 
Immigration, immigration & immigration drove the Brexit vote. The far left in Labour Momentum doesn't want to hear it, the liberal globalist Tories don't want to hear it but that's why Leave won. #ForBritain @AMDWaters 
Reminder,  Cambridge Analytics was in on Brexit. They were behind the invalid Kenya Elections. Kushner was leading this strategy.Do follow the yellow brick road to Trump and Russia.  
Nigel Farage RIPS APART Verhofstadt over 'RIDICULOUS' Brexit comments.Unelected Mr Verhofstadt can hardly be a supporter of parliamentary democracy since the “whole objective” of the EU is to “take away” parliamentary sovereignty.#Brexit #EU 
This has the potential to drag Brexit right into the heart of things  
A wise government would go with what the democracy voted for, otherwise there would have been no point in holding the referendum vote 
FT View: The so-called 'Brexit mutineers' in parliament should be congratulated  
Portillo hilariously asserts the EU is keener for a deal than UK. Same old idea they need us more than we need them. They don't. Difference between EU and UK is that one understands the consequences of Brexit and the other doesn't. But we will soon. #bbctw 
Remainer claims NHS is sinking due to Brexit PROVED WRONG with latest figures  
#bbcqt Audience member: "I don't trust Theresa May and David Davis to negotiate a Brexit deal for me. I didn't vote for that. I voted for my MP in parliament to be scrutinising the deal."  
Hard Brexit fails on its own terms:Regulations:- UK industry wants to keep EU alignment.Trade:- Even US think-tank says UK can do better US deal teamed with EU. Immigration:- Prioritising jobs for local Brits can be done within Free Movement. 
Petition: Leave EU immediatelyGovt should walk away from EU talks & leave immediately.#EU MUST offer a Punishment Deal otherwise other Countries will Leave.Why wait 18 months to take back control of our country, laws & borders?88,236 signed: Can we make 100,000...#Brexit 
EU countries agree to plan to integrate their military forces after Brexit.  
Yes, there was a marked change once they got off the subject of Brexit.  Just goes to show why @jeremycorbyn is having to walk such a tightrope on Brexit, & how successful he's been. 
It was made perfectly clear during the Referendum - Leave the EU means leave the Internal Market, the Customs Union, the ECJ. 
MERKEL: EU LEADERS COULD AGREE TO MOVE TO BREXIT PHASE 2 FRIDAY 
The last 18 months has been one long process of the political class and the left trying to sabotage & annul two democratic votes (Brexit & Trump).Let the history books show this. 
Someone I know voted #Brexit because she hadn't seen any English apples in the supermarket and thought if we were out of the EU we'd sell fewer apples abroad so there'd be more for us. @richard_jlucas 
He didn't though, did he. Stated that ref question didn't ask which type of Brexit people wanted, but failed to understand the obvious implication - that we need to have a national debate and not be railroaded in to a hard damaging version. 
Brexit, Trump and a generation of incompetents  | via Financial Times  
#bbcqt Shame on you, Isabel Oakeshott. The reason for the rise in homelessness is not immigration and you know it.The billions that are being wasted on Brexit and lost through taxation loopholes to offshore accounts, could house our rough sleepers many many times over. 
When you realise that more immigration has come from outside the EU for two decades are you going to want a referendum to leave the world? #bbcqt 
One has to ask whether, after the murder of Jo Cox, such targeted threats are deterring some politicians from opposing #Brexit, and/or to fear that stopping #Brexit will engender violence and terrorism. 
Homelessness, food banks, & rising poverty are real problems in the UK, but Brexit won't help these Barnsley people; it will only make things far, far worse.#bbcqt 
But it will divert attention—for five or ten years. If other things are your priority, you need to stop Brexit.  
Yes, the real Defence Union deal vigorously denied by Remainers throughout the Brexit referendum campaign.  
Ladies and gentlemen. The state of UK politics just now.A little reminder for anyone, well, thankfully normally shielded from it!#Brexit  
This isn't how it was meant to be, right? UK's non-existent Influence over 2 of biggest issues facing Europe. One them is Brexit.  
Come on Jonathan.  You know damn fine it was an attempt to stop Brexit. Don’t try to take us for fools.  
So sad that left wing #Brexiteers (#Lexiteers) don’t understand that #Brexit is a right wing libertarian dream ticket. UK will become a low tax, small state, with deregulated labour laws. Poorest will be hit hardest #bbcqt 
The language of the intolerant mob & xenophobic Daily Mail on #bbcqt. Seems fine in Dimbleby land to call Tory rebels "treacherous rebels" who supported "a stab in the back." #Brexit is making Scotland's #indyref seem positively serene. 
.@ProfRWinston, a member of the House of Lords, says that it is possible that Brexit might not happen, although that is a very unlikely scenario #bbcqt 
Why not just change the name from Question Time to The Brexit Lynch mob Show & give all the audience pitch forks. #BBCQT 
Labour's position on Brexit. #bbcqt 
Rebecca Long-Bailey: "The way the Government has dealt with Brexit so far has been shambolic."@RLong_Bailey#bbcqt 
People on programmes like #bbcqt should stop apologising for opposing Brexit. Opposing Brexit is the most rational, most important and most patriotic thing you can do. 
Isabel Oakeshott would no more mix with the people in this audience than concrete would mix with champagne. She's establishment up to the hilt of her expensively coiffurred hair. Only backs Brexit for the "angle" #bbcqt 
Do people like Robert Winston not realise they are part of the problem? People are so damn sick & tired off such patronising nonsense that he displayed there when discussing #Brexit #bbcqt 
People still think a side won the referendumWe all lostThe Leavers won't get what they voted for, they can't even agree what it isRemainers have lost their country, security, identity & confidence. We're now destined to be a mini Ulster-  sectarian, insular, agressive.#bbcqt 
#BBCQT David Cameron said he would activate Article 50 the day after the Brexit vote if it happened.Instead he announced he was resigning and left the country to it.  
Committed Leave voter calling in to @mrjamesob after hearing German woman fearful after #brexit“I want Karen to know that there will be no lists in our country… Listening to what she had to say made me realise there’s something bigger at stake.”  
The Tories have spent 7 years attacking the people it is supposed to protect through austere policies, yet we are still supposed to trust them to negotiate brexit with our partners abroad. It is just ridiculous #bbcqt 
When you see the pitiful level of debate we are still having around Brexit it's so deeply depressing. The country is so utterly, so bitterly  split on the subject and probably will be for a generation at least.Well done, David Cameron, this is your stinking legacy.#BBCQT 
#bbcqt This man is speaking on behalf of 17.4m people who remain silent over this. Why do we leave it up to one man to say it? Well done that man. #Brexit #ToryRebels 
.@RLong_Bailey says that the way that the government have so far handled Brexit negotiations has been "shambolic" and says Parliament must have a say over the final deal #bbcqt 
Ah, so Referendum shouldn't have happened because it's too complicated for thick bastards what don't talk posh.#bbcqt 
Brexit is all about non domiciled or foreign billionaires ensuring the EU doesn't force them to pay their fair share of Tax ...   
I really don't like it when people accuse Brexiteers of being thick/angry/ignorant etc but the Barnsley #bbcqt audience are consistently showing a surface level of understanding which is, unfortunately, fuelling the stereotype. #Brexit 
This guy basically just got a round of applause for admitting he voted Leave whilst knowing nothing about what Brexit would entail #bbcqt 
Brilliant #bbcqt audience putting the MPs in their place - 'My referendum ballot slip didn't have a question 2: do you want soft Brexit or hard Brexit?' 
Geez, this #bbcqt is something else. Even with the reality of the absolute, impoverishing chaos of this Brexit disaster they still want to 'bring it on'. Please Scotland, get us out of this..... 
Perhaps Barnsley could Brexit alone #bbcqt 
No it didn't have a second question saying "do you want a soft brexit or hard brexit", nor ask views on immigration, single market and more. That's the problem!We had a black and white vote on a rainbow of issues. It has been devastating, divisive and directionless. #bbcqt 
I really wish both the ardent Brexiteers and ardent Remainers would grow the fuck up and accept that the referendum gave a very muddy result that requires a degree of compromise. 
.@NickyMorgan01 explains her decision to vote against the Conservative Party line on Brexit in the Commons, saying that it is important that the UK government has a meaningful say on the final terms of exiting the EU #bbcqt 
Isabel Oakeshitt no more believes in Brexit than she believes in invisible unicorns with platinum dildos on their foreheads. She's a plastic nationalist, a plastecine  Libertarian a 2 bit phoney tabloid journalist on the make #bbcqt 
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #5: Equality, not Racism. RT #StopBrexit 
.@ProfRWinston congratulated Nicky Morgan over her vote in the Commons on Brexit, saying that it was the right thing to do #bbcqt 
17.4 million people voted for Brexit. Nearly 50 million didn't - this ridiculous and catastrophic process has hurtled our nation into a disastrous nightmare. Resist. #bbcqt 
#BBCQT Rebecca Long-Bailey just let it slip that vote yesterday was to guarantee that "EU" can make sure deal offered to UK is the best for Britain.There you have it.Labour have more faith in an unelected Commission than the people who voted in a Government to carry out Brexit.  
Worst thing about Isabel Oakeshott is not her awe-inspiring vileness but total ignorance of British traditions of free speech & opposition. It's not enough to accept Brexit; you have to want it, love it, believe it will defy reality. This is the true poison of our times. #bbcqt 
*the will of 48% of the people who voted in a referendum that took place 18 months ago in the wake of a pro-Leave campaign predicated on a manifesto of demonstrable untruths, a decisive proportion of whom would not vote the same way now, but hey whatever.  
Barnsley. One of the poorest regions in Britain voted Brexit despite being robbed of it's coal jobs by Thatcher then progressively fucked over by neocon Con/Lab governments. Blames the EU instead. Laugh? cry? #bbcqt 
Dear BBC Barnsley voted for Brexit why are you loading this program with Remainers? #bbcqt 
.@RLong_Bailey says that the vote in the Commons was not about stopping Brexit, but about giving the opportunity to parliament to scrutinise the deal #bbcqt 
.@IsabelOakeshott challenged Nicky Morgan over her decision to join the ten other Tory MPs who voted against their party line on Brexit in the Commons #bbcqt 
Dimbleby repeating the old lie that the majority of people in this country voted Brexit - they didn’t. The majority of those who voted did but this is not the majority of people #bbcqt 
.@NickyMorgan01 says that the Brexit referendum has been the most divisive issue she has ever come across in her political career and says there must be a proper debate about it #bbcqt 
How Brexit and Trump supporters must wish it were possible to con all the people all the time. 
While all eyes were on Brexit, thousands of people scored a victory against the DWP [IMAGE]  
Leo Varadkar: 'I’d hope that some of the people who supported Brexit and campaigned for that would realise or at least acknowledge that they’re the ones who created this problem' 
This should finish Theresa May but it won’t.. the Tories have been playing leavers for the fools that they are.. couldn’t make it up .. Theresa May to give up on Brexit leaving date this is absolutely massive  
Theresa May to give up on Brexit leaving date this is absolutely massive  
Brexit should be cancelled, Austrian prime minister says  
Dominic Grieve says he has had death threats after the #Brexit rebellionAnna Soubry received death threats after the Telegraph mutineer headlines. Such threats of violence are reason enough on their own to #StopBrexit!#FBPE. 
'They should never be MPs again' Dorries calls for Brexit Tory rebels to be DESELECTED  
Petition to ‘Leave the EU immediately’ approaches 80,000 signatures  via @Your Brexit 
Petition: Leave EU immediatelyGovt should walk away from EU talks & leave immediately.#EU MUST offer a Punishment Deal otherwise other Countries will Leave.Why wait 18 months to take back control of our country, laws & borders?87,135 signed#Brexit 
Britain's Brexit secretary spoke of a "Canada plus-plus-plus" trade deal with the EU. He is deluded  
Someone should get a petition going to have all 12 of the brave Tory Brexit rebels recognised in #newyearhonours 
This is priceless.Columnist Brendan O'Neill calls for more positive news stories about Brexit, but can only name one upside: that people voted for it! 
This Leave supporter fears Brexit is not going to happen, so he calls on Nigel Farage to return to frontline politics  
MPs have been warned Brussels will not re-negotiate a Brexit deal if Parliament rejects it  
Here's the problem with "I VOTED TO GIVE POWER BACK TO THE BRITISH PEOPLE". No, you didn't. You voted in a poorly worded advisory referendum. You don't get to fill in the wide blank spaces with your own special brand of personal bullshit. 
Brexit is the will of dead people, disaster capitalists & psychopaths  
Now that Tory rebels have voted against May on Brexit, it's time for ALL Labour Remain MPs to rebel against Corbyn.It's time to take back the party from the likes of Kate Hoey and Frank Field.#StopBrexit 
My mum’s best friend told me she voted Brexit because we won the war and she couldn’t understand why Germany is now stronger than we are. 
The Republic of Ireland has set out plans to quintuple the number of higher education students learning a foreign language over the next decade as it prepares for Brexit 
Applause for Theresa May for having navigating Brexit talks to Phase 2, from the EU27, at dinner at the Summit, according to German sources. She will not be here when formal “sufficient progress” decision taken 
My Brexit voting brother say he can't get an appointment with a doctor because of immigrants. I then pointed out that there were virtually no immigrants in his small Cheshire village. Like so many he just regugetates the poison in the Mail and Express. 
No.The horrible part is that the cabbie sees #Brexit as doing what he wants-but what he wants is existential. #Brexiteer Ultras know this.But they'll cross that bridge when they get to it.Leaving is all.It's their religion and  they don't care. 
David Davis's Brexit department tops government secrecy table  
Of #Trump, #Russia and #Brexit and how the three are inextricably entwined in big data and hedge fund billionaires. @AnthonyBarnett on the work of @carolecadwalla @J_amesp and @openDemocracyUK  via @nybooks 
Here’s hoping!  : Tory rebels have made 'no deal' Brexit more likely, EU leaders warn 
*Brexit Explained*  
You continually vote to give the Tories the power to do as the choose. It wouldn't be acceptable on health, on housing, on education, on the economy and on equality. Nor should it be acceptable on Brexit.  
Hilarious (although unsurprising): in order to spin post-Brexit bill as only €40-45 billion (although we're basically paying almost everything EU asked), UK asked to pay some of it in advance (ie before we actually leave).  
London cabbie  tonight told me he voted #Brexit because his two children-25 & 26-are still living at home...and they won't ever get a council house and he knows that they're just waiting for him and his wife to die and he blames it all on David Cameron, too. Didn't know about EU  
As Ken Clarke pointed out tonight, Brexit has already made us poorer - so what are we doing it for? Are we masochists? maybe we're just plain stupid. What Remain need to do now is to shout #StopBrexit even louder. And we need the #Labour party to grow up and show a lead. 
This is interesting. Here’s what the 1975 Referendum leaflet sent to every home in Britain said about sovereignty. It’s really very well written. If only it was so well said and widely understood today.  
Julia has realised that by 2019 more than a million new young voters will not have had their say on Brexit and quite rightly thinks they should get an opportunity in a referendum.  
If "the will of the people" really matters to Hartley-Brewer then she won't mind having a second referendum on accepting the Brexit deal or remaining in the EU. The Leavers have nothing to fear, after all, they keep telling us Brexit going to be great. #StopBrexit 
Leavers’ response to being poorer due to Brexit.  
I can't wait for that referendum and to see my daughter growing up as an individual with a proper set of legal rights and in control of her reproductive decisions. #repealthe8th Bring it on! 
Vital that we protect net neutrality rules as part of Brexit process, and in any proposed US/UK trade deals.  
Bad 24 hours for @ScotTories. MPs at Westminster voted against their constituents interests on #Brexit whilst @NicolaSturgeon made mincemeat of @RuthDavidsonMSP at #FMQs & @murdo_fraser made a fool of himself over #scotbudget. 
@Bonn1eGreer @GoodwinMJ  Tuesday evening in the Huddersfield Wetherspoon sharing a table with local sheet metal worker - he voted #Brexit because of Chinese steel dumping (which I explained UK refused to veto) and he hated Cameron and Osborne#democracydependsonknowledge 
"EU negotiators .. expect the north-south provisions on “alignment” to become .. pledge .. included in a binding withdrawal treaty.“We are heading for a big collision on this" says one senior negotiator. “It is unavoidable. The Irish border is where reality meets Brexit fantasy"  
Reminder that British support for Israel is rooted in colonial white supremacy and ANTISEMITIC desire to keep Jewish refugees out of UK. Little Miss Brexit should do us a Hanukkah favor and keep our names out her fashy little mouth  
Sensible and informed comments on Brexit are rare these days. We are all grateful for @anandMenon1 . Keep up the great work Anand. 
We can stop Brexit. Yes, we can.  
Tories spend £1bn of our taxes bribing DUP & £40bn plus for Brexit divorce bill. The @theSNP invest in public services & protect Scotland. 
You know what? If I'd believed the claims about the EU and Brexit made by Boris Johnson, Nigel Farage, Michael Gove, Daniel Hannan, Liam Fox, Andrea Leadsom and all that lot... then yes, I'd have voted Leave myself.But - and this may surprise you - I didn't believe them. 
#Brexit: UK in Erasmus student scheme until at least 2020 - Let’s stay in permanently by remaining in the EU. Too precious to lose.  
Farage as the Norma Desmond of politics: ‘He’s still big. It’s the Brexit that got small.’  
After the government's defeat in the Commons last night, this passionate Brexit supporter urged @Nigel_Farage to return to frontline politics 
MPs warned EU will not renegotiate Brexit deal if Parliament rejects it  
Brexit: UK in Erasmus student scheme until at least 2020  
Brexit Unity Cracks as EU Leaders Split on Migrants, Euro Area  
Brexiters fail to grasp that free, frictionless trade is less a free-for-all than a sport in which teams are free to play so long as they conform to the rules and pay the membership fees. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Eurozone GDP growth forecasts 'substantially' upgraded by ECB as Brexit Britain set to struggle  
Twitter has been slammed by the chair of a parliamentary committee for its "completely inadequate" response to an inquiry into Russian interference in the EU referendum  
Disgraceful! This proves that they share none of Labour’s core ethics. Corbyn needs to man up, start listening to the young people who voted him in and offer 48% of the British public a viable alternative to the farce that is Brexit. 
Most Leavers don't understand that free trade isn't a free-for-all. It's based on rules, about tariffs, but even more about regulations and product standards & ensuring level-playing fields. The freer the trade the more the interference in domestic policy. #StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
This article is specifically about paid promoted tweets. As in the USA, the bulk of the disinformation campaign was not accomplished via advertising. Here is an example of a Russian #Brexit account with 140K tweets and 100K followers. 
Isn’t it amazing how a little country like Iceland said no to joining the EU and has prospered ever since, how much more can Great Britain prosper under WTO rules, walk away before Brexit is watered down so much we’re still in. 
'EU in or EU out?': #Twitter reveals just 6 tweets posted from Russia to ‘influence’ Brexit vote... all from RT *we’ve compiled all the tweets – so you don’t have to 
Twitter finds "minimal" involvement of Russian attempts to influence Brexit. Just 6 tweets from RT. Another "muh Russia" conspiracy crumbles into dust.  
Farage seems to think Remainers should stop campaigning to remain, it is a ridiculous position to take, would he have stopped campaigning for leave if the referendum had gone the other way? Not a chance. @Nigel_Farage 
Out of a job after losing the referendum he tried to rig with his taxpayer-funded dodgy dossier, @David_Cameron is now complaining about @realDonaldTrump calling BBC and CNN “fake news” and hawking “It was Russia!” conspiracies to Soros-funded NGOs. Sad! 
BBC News - Brexit: Can Leavers and Remainers call a Christmas truce? . No sorry the fight to defeat Brexit must continue. About time the Church challenged the hate from the Leave side.#FBPE 
The Bank of England has said it sees a reduced risk of a disorderly Brexit following the Prime Minister's deal to secure trade talks with the EU  
History will judge Anna Soubry, Dominic Grieve et al well.  It will be those that blindly led us over the Brexit cliff that history will see as traitorous fools. 
Most of the Brexit rebels are lawyers. Maybe experts are useful after all > @WomaninHavana  
I voted leave and am determined more than ever to get out completely and get our country back. Remoaners have had nothing but a say. Leavers are ignored. Leavers are as important as remoaners and we have as much right to what happens to our country and our own lives. Hard Brexit. 
The idiocy of Brexit never quite peaks does it?  
Your world cups always feel like Brexit all over again. 
FT View: The so-called 'Brexit mutineers' in parliament should be congratulated  
BrexitCentral’s @isaby debates Tory MP Ken Clarke: My concern is with those who have “dressed up their rebellion” in terms of “parliamentary scrutiny” and “accountability”, when there is a clear agenda to “frustrate Brexit”  
David Davis has escaped being found in contempt of Parliament over the release of information on the economic impact of Brexit  
Nadine Dorries calls for Tory rebels to be deselected after Brexit vote defeat  
It's crucial that the truth about Russian interference in #Brexit comes into the public domain ASAP especially if it legally calls the whole validity of the Ref into question..it's bad enough that a non-binding Ref's been treated as mandatory on the basis of only 37% of the elect  
The death threats on Grieve just go to show again that Brexit in truth is a fascist project. We either #StopBrexit or we let the UK become a fascist country. If Brexit thugs want to start a civil war about that, so be it. They get shut down. Jail time big time for them. 
Brexit: A return to chaos and embarrassment for May  
.Good preparation for Brexit's write-up in the history books....."Never before has a world power elected to amputate various limbs in front of its horrified friends" pic.twitter.com/uSrSeGYx3P 
Theresa May has insisted she is "on course to deliver Brexit" as she tried to shrug off a Commons defeat on key legislation  
You are protected by wealth and privilege. You have absolutely no concept what a painful Brexit actually entails. Lost jobs, insecure futures, lives held in limbo. Brexit is for the rich, those lied and cheated into voting for it will probably suffer the worst. #StopBrexit 
Great turnout in #Vauxhall @KateHoeyMP constituency to learn about fighting Brexit. Find us across the UK in the new year  
You can make a plausible case that, pre-trump, Brexit was less obviously to Russian advantage. But the idea that they didn't even try to make our nuts, febrile hysteria more nuts and febrile is just historically ridiculous. And you'd think a Russia specialist would know that. 
It’s just about Parliament having a proper say, it’s not about stymying the referendum, honest  
We voted Hard Brexit to get our fishing rights back.  
At the All Parliamentary Russia Group last night, Bob Seely, Cons MP, who is also doing a PhD on Russian active measures said he'd 'seen no good evidence' of involvement in Brexit.' Have there been any investigations, I asked him?  Because, er, no. Not one. 
Wouldn't that be delightful? Brexit foiled by the same parliamentary sovereignty that Farage and co disingenuously fought for?Farage cried wolf only for it to come along and devour him.  
Tory frontbencher BRUTALLY dismisses Brexit rebels saying they WILL NOT stop Brexit  
Most of the Brexit rebels are lawyers. Maybe experts are useful after all | Schona Jolly  
Brexiteers May 2016: Turkey will join the EU next yearBrexiteers June 2016: Brexit is happening and it's going to be fantasticBrexiteers November 2016: We will trade with the rest of the world on WTO rulesBrexiteers December 2017: Nobody knows what the future will bring 
For those who find the EU iundemocratic, consider this. Every other EU country's Parliament will vote on the Brexit deal. Only UK Govt & 305 MPs have had to be dragged kicking & screaming to do this in the mother of all Parliaments & the country that Brexit affects most. #FBPE 
Dear @theresa_may , had Davis kept his mouth shut, you'd probably be beginning negotiations on the next stage of #Brexit today, instead of it being delayed until March. We would therefore like to ask you to keep him in place, to give us time to #StopBrexit before it's too late. 
Just got assaulted by May on German TV waffling that she would deliver the #Brexit the British people voted for. Nearly smashed the set.#StopTheMadness #MoreThanHalfSayNoBrexit #FBPE 
They keep repeating "we *will* be leaving the European Union" on TV and radio news almost as though they have to keep saying such to keep #Brexit alive.Brexit is now powered almost entirely by belief and no longer by the #EUref result.#StopBrexit #FBPE #exitfrombrexit 
Martin Rowson on Theresa May's Brexit rebels – cartoon  
When people issue death-threats, you know their enterprise is evil.#Brexit is pushing people to evil extremes of behaviour, because Leave leaders encouraged people to blame the EU for personal frustrations & feelings of not being in control. #StopBrexit  
Theresa May says she is "still on course to deliver Brexit" LOL 
Watch Brexit and the Battle for Democracy, spiked's film on the threat to Brexit and the struggle for suffrage, which gets more relevant by the day... Featuring @GiselaStuart @BrunoBrussels @PaulEmbery @Harsimrat__Kaur and @Tom_Slater_  #BrexitBetrayal 
Nope - you lied to your constituents telling them you would support Labour and lied to them again when you said that your support for brexit was to strengthen our parliament.  
We voted to leave the EU. We should have the final say. Not MPs.Last night's #Amendment7 vote was an affront to Democracy.RT if you agree.#Brexit #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp #FarageOnLBC #Farage #LBCLIVE 
Brexit bile is seeping through the Tory party - on a quite meaningless matter  
PM @JosephMuscat_JM & UK PM @theresa_may in a bilateral meeting in the margins of #EUCO @EUCouncil on #Brexit. PM @JosephMuscat_JM reiterated #Malta's willingness for a strong bilateral relationship w/ #UK & any future agrmnt btw #EU & #UK should safeguard #EU members @MaltaGov 
While all eyes were on Brexit, thousands of people scored a victory against the DWP [IMAGE]  
Matt on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Trump's appointee at the FCC has succeeded in overturning #NetNeutrality protection.In the UK, Net Neutrality is protected by EU law.#Brexit could change that. 
Two cheers for amendment 7 (but parliament is now a sideshow in the Brexit process). My latest blog post:  
JOHNSON: Brexit is unstoppable and MPs will not block itME: Luckily you & your Govt are no longer in charge of deciding that...you must be worried to have to state it. If the majority of the Ppl now want to #StopBrexit it must be stopped! 
The EU has warned that the UK will be “unable to renegotiate a new #Brexit deal if Parliament votes to reject the one struck by Theresa May next year.“So, essentially accept what you get or crash out with nothing. This makes last night totally pointless 
Dominic Grieve says he has had death threats after #Brexit rebellion  
Austrian leader hopes #Brexit can be reversed after Commons setback  
Not noticed a single Brextremist's anger being about the idea Brexit is the right thing for the country ... 
Wtf? 'Mr Brexit' says he is not a career politician ... Deluded. Screaming lime a scalded cat that MPs took back control for a day  
Here's a little column I wrote, about the calm way we're all dealing with Brexit, to soothe you through the chilly evening  
In case it wasn't clear, UK is staying in the single market and customs union or there won't be any planes or nuclear material. Tough call for the Brexit fundamentalists, relatively easy one for everyone else  
Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson says defeat in the Commons will not "for one second stop Brexit or stop the Brexit process"  
Event alert #demopart: "Taking a #Deliberative Approach to #Complexity: What can we learn from the #Citizens’ #Assembly on #Brexit?" Join us for this session with @WWScot @EdinburghPIR @marcgeddes @alanjrenwick @redpath42 @KaelaJS. Places free but limited:  
Good meeting with @vincecable today to discuss #Brexit  
Brexiteer calls for second referendum shock 
So, if the anti-Brexit rebels vote down the deal May has by then negotiated, there's *no* re-negotiation, and we're straight out, and on to WTO terms.Brilliant.  Bring it on.Didn't see that coming, did they? Or think it through.   
Last week I sat down with @nick_clegg to talk about Brexit, our disagreements on a second referendum, agreement on the importance of a meaningful vote, the weakness of the Brextremists, an EEA Brexit and more. Read it in the @theHouse_mag or online here: 
Considering my best mate was a Polish refugee who escaped the Nazi invasion of his country to fight in the tank corp in France and Belgium and married a Belgian in Halifax, I know he's not turning in his grave but wondering  why those for #Brexit think democracy is a one off.  
#Leavers show their true colours and total lack of respect for parliamentary democracy by issuing death threats after #Brexit rebellion. 
The Speaker criticises #DavidDavis over slow and partial release of #Brexit papers. Yet another bit of highly dubious David Davis #BrexitShambles 
BULLSHIT ALERT: There is no such thing as an 'advisory' referendum when the official government propaganda even stated the 'decision' would be 'implemented'.Nothing 'advisory' about that. Tards peddle shit. Just say 'no'. pic.twitter.com/PNbAVtw9Dh 
Gov has won 35 of 36 votes on the #EUWithdrawalBill Average majority of 22 Bill is making good progress On course to deliver will of the British people #ImWithMay #TeamTory #Brexit  
One of the biggest lies by remainers is “I accept the will of the people , we are leaving the EU” - while sitting in back rooms planning the demise of #Brexit #Traitors 
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that  
What is our ‘Brexit means Brexit’  Prime Minister going to do about this?  
PM @JosephMuscat_JM interviewed by @SkyNews @faisalislam in the margins of #EUCO @EUCouncil on #BREXIT @MaltaGov 
1 in 9 staff members come from overseas, many from the EU – these workers are vital to our NHS. I challenged Ministers to do more to ensure we don’t lose these experienced staff due to Brexit.  
It seems that the new judge appointed to investigate the 1 Oct vote in Catalonia actually took part in demonstrations against the referendum, and shared articles against independence. So he’s going to be very impartial ...  
Never hear squeak from anti-Brexit MPs moaning about #Brexit bill ‘lack of scrutiny’ when we roll EU regs into UK law. Just saying. 
I love Brighton and Hove. It is my home. But I was here campaigning for Brexit in a Remain city. However, to my dying day, I'll never forget all those hundreds of people who came to our stall in Hove and proclaimed with passion that they'd vote Leave. And, sure enough, the UK did 
Surprised UK press has not made more of @UniofOxford 's rather groundbreaking post-Brexit arrangements with Berlin, giving Oxford a foot in Europe. Shape of things to come... 
Twitter slammed over 'completely inadequate' Brexit inquiry response  
Given that just 15% want to overturn Brexit I say with respect that this is a minority view, one that leads us to further division not compromise  
Spanish justice now accuses mayors and councilors, etc. of disobedience, etc. by the referendum of Catalonia from 1-O. The accused are accused !? And in an election campaign imposed by Spain! What democracy is this? @EU_Commission @UN 
We're taking ambitious measures to unlock talent and see pupils fulfil their potential – no matter their background. That's why we're boosting funding and support for the people and places that need it most, helping to make Britain fit for the future post-Brexit.  
Absolutely.If the UK government (for once) thought through its Brexit strategy, it would realise the "meaningful vote" would strengthen its hand.But no. More playing to the gallery, stubbornness and unforced errors instead.  
If you put your country first Ms Hoey MP, you’d have made sure that Parliament is sovereign on Brexit as everything else. Anything less, and you are party to an agenda you don’t want to share or voice  
And not content with peddling fascist hate and lies, the Daily Mail is ripping off the British taxpayer. Tax-dodging peddlers of fascist hate and lies posing as patriots. That's the Daily Mail.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE  /3 
@finegael is a proud member of the EU's largest party the @EPP. That's how I was able to meet today with @JunckerEU @eucopresident @MichelBarnier and @jyrkikatainen on Phase II Brexit issues  
Imagine if remain had won and the victors declared that that means the UK must go all in and join Schengen and adopt the Euro. There would be outrage.It's exactly the same as them saying that their marginal #Brexit victory means leaving Euratom, ECHR, SM, CU and 759 agreements. 
Conservative MP Dominic Grieve, whose Amendment 7 was approved in the Commons yesterday giving Parliament final decision on Brexit deal, says he has since received death threats.The former Tory attorney has reported the incidents to the police. - Guardian 
Anyone who advocates spending billions on Trident, the monarchy, DUP deals and Brexit is in no position to lecture the Scottish Government on its finances. 
Our Director Jayne Adye has been quoted in the Daily Express about Remoaners like Lord Adonis revealing their plans to DEFEAT Brexit. She said Remoaner MPs will face serious electoral consequences. 
The Daily Mail in the 1930s and now. Fascist then, fascist now! #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE #StopFundingHate \1 
Yesterday Tory MP Dominic Grieve led parliamentary rebellion on #Brexit.Today he got death threats 
My paper on Brexit and International Trade law implications on the UK-EU trade relationship got accepted for publication today.Alhamdulilah. 
Theresa May insists she is 'on course to deliver Brexit' despite vote defeat How can she be 'on course' when the cabinet haven't yet decided on the final destination? 
Civil servants are haemorrhaging out of DexEU. You cannot force smart people with better options to spend their career implementing a stupid idea. Brexit can only be done badly, because it is a stupid idea.  
No Brexit renegotiation if MPs reject deal Theresa May gets, EU leader warns  
PM at #EUCO: I'm here to talk with friends and allies about the challenges we face around security and defence, and our deep and special partnership with the EU post-Brexit.  
“Labour could enhance its economic credibility for a post-Brexit election by declaring now the UK should remain permanently in the single market and a customs union. It should do so.” @laboursinglemkt @Labour4EU 
OMG!!! Theresa May is backing out of the Brexit date 29 March 2019.. surely that’s it.. she is busted.. We will be leaving?!? But when?! Never?!? Surely this is curtains!!!  
Reminder: Nigel Farage says he will leave Britain if Brexit is a disaster. Like a cheap con-man Farage will flee the country leaving its people to suffer while avoiding all responsibility & accountability for his actions.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
A total contempt for democracy being displayed here. He is totally dismissive of the results of the referendum and is clearly concerned with his own self-interests.  
Europe, Brexit and the credit cycle. I conclude that the Eurozone is most likely to trigger the next credit crisis, and that the UK is making a lucky escape. See 
It is hypocritical of the @theSNP to demand 111 powers go from Brussels to Holyrood when they continue to oppose Brexit.  
Brexit suggests we’re on the right side of history  
Andrew Adonis has blocked me. Brave enough to subvert Brexit but not brave enough to face the people that will suffer as a result. So, Red AND yellow. 
All You Need to Know About Leftists in Britain: They’re Trying To Undo The Results of a Democratic Referendum on BREXIT. There’s a Word For That - It’s Called TOTALITARIANISM  
#NigelFarage: The aspirations of our #political leaders are out of step with the people  they are meant to serve. I fear #Brexit may need to be refought all over again!  #BBC #SKY #UK @Conservatives @ConHome #News #BREXIT #Labour #UKIP #Conservatives #EU 
#StopTalkingShite lads, the mandate in 1975, a clear mandate, was twice the size of the 2016, slim majority, but let's not let the facts get in the way of the shite you talk, just to illustrate..... pic.twitter.com/KMyPl43wil 
People don't like being lied to, they don't like being treated as dupes, fools and tools. The Brexiters are sowing the wind. They will reap the whirlwind.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
UK can't sign trade deals while still in EU. If you don't know that then you aren't really fit to comment on brexit at all, are you. 
Those who drape themselves in the notion of Parliamentary sovereignty in a bid to overturn a referendum, a General Election, and an Act of Parliament, are utterly disingenuous. Whether it is the last refuge of a scoundrel or the first, they are betraying their voters.  
What happened in Ireland's marriage equality referendum:- we won- LGBT young people's support organisations got a TENFOLD INCREASE in people seeking mental health supportReferenda on these minority community rights issues are terribly damaging to vulnerable people. 
We must #BREXIT NOW #Petition #RETWEET & #SIGN: #Leave the CORRUPT #EU immediately!  #BBC #SKY #UK @Conservatives @ConHome #News #BREXIT #Labour #UKIP #Conservatives #LabourParty #EU 
'Last night’s vote showed that hard Brexit can be defeated if MPs come together'  
Remember this?This is YOUR decision.The Government will implement what YOU decide.A once in a generation decision...How time flies!#Brexit #EU 
Brexit bill defeat: The amendment passed with 309 MPs supporting the motion and 305 opposing  
#PLEASE #RETWEET & #SIGN this #Petition if you care about #BREXIT: Leave the #EU immediately!  #BBC #SKY #UK @Conservatives @ConHome #ConservativeParty #EUWithdrawalBill #MPs #BREXIT #Labour #UKIP #Conservatives #EU 
The Guardian’s @carolecadwalla won a major award for her “bombshell” on Russian engineering of Brexit — and you won’t believe what happened next.  
Dominic Grieve says he received death threats after Brexit rebellion - Politics live  
“We’ve actually had 36 votes on the #EUWithdrawalBill and we’ve won 35 of them with an average majority of 22. So the Bill is making good progress. We’re on course to deliver #Brexit, we’re on course to deliver the vote of the British people.” #ImWithMay 
No where in referendum did it explain what brexit would look like. If the version of brexit delivered is against the will of the British people ie a very soft or very hard brexit then Theresa can go swivel as far as I'm concerned! 
Yesterday Theresa May1. Lied about the number of homelessness people under her Govt 2. Lied about Hammond's disgraceful deceit in blaming the disabled for low productivity.3. Asked Parliament to trust her word when she said she would give it a meaningful say in Brexit deal 
Italy sends warning to EU: No deal Brexit is DANGEROUS and Brussels can’t let it happen  
‘Respect the wishes of the British people’ you say...OK, well 61% of Brits think MPs should have a vote on any Brexit deal... so that’s exactly what they did. Reference:  
Control freakeryvia @TheCanaryOTPBrexit in trouble as parliament is given actual sovereignty 
And that’s what Brexit has managed. 500 years of policy down the swannee, and all for the ego of a bleached Etonian Wookiee.  
Theresa May to back down over attempt to fix the date of Brexit in law, says @Peston - another big victory for Tory rebels/parliament if confirmed. 
Time to cut the crap. Parliament created this mess by voting for a referendum without due diligence so they alone must sort it. It’s a catastrophic Hard Brexit, a thoroughly stupid Soft Brexit, or remain and with a face-saving commitment to ‘reform’  
#Tbt 'We ask working class kids to consume, never to create' #Class & The #Media w/@redrumlisa @MsIbegbuna @jemgilbert #Brexit  
I have enjoyed all the Tory councillors denouncing the SNP for breaking their manifesto (not actually true) but if manifesto is holy writ can I remind them of that other commitment to hold a referendum on independence if Scotland is taken out the EU against our will? 
The people are sovereign over an elected government The people voted for Brexit So you need too implement this policy Those MPs Who want to remain in the EU I suggest you move there Sooner the better 
Boris says that Brexit is 'unstoppable'. Possibly not, but do we have to do it in a dumbass way? Definitely not. 
One of the problems is they haven't a clue about how the parliamentary system we have works.I heard more nonsense spoken today by frothing leavers than I thought possible.It seems a referendum makes experts of all of us. 
Lol, yes let’s have a second referendum and inject more poison into politics all because snobbish Remoaners can’t bear being beat by people they think of as thick uneducated bigots. & in a second referendum we’d bury you.  
The draft revision of the constitution to be adopted by referendum maintained the principle of limitation of presidential mandates in its article 97, paragraph 2, and protects ethnic and political minorities by safeguarding the balances of the Arusha Agreement of 2000! Wonderful!  
Our amazing @Appg_Brexit lead, Elspeth, was on @SkyNews earlier discussing why Brexit MUST work for young citizens. We want our VOICES heard   
I think this is a stitch up. Davis is as guilty as hell. The impact papers DO exist in a 'proper' form, but this choreographed obsfucation has managed to remove them from public scrutiny lest they harm (which they would have) the Brexit lunacy.  
The Budget and progress in Brexit negotiations are boosting our economy says the Bank of England  
That is not for Boris Johnson, or any politician, to decide. As the author of Art 50 and countless European leaders have repeatedly said, Brexit is reversible if people change their minds. Sorry Boris - it's up to the public what happens next.  
Friends! YES!This is just the latest of many, many first steps in defeating Brexit, e.g. Our 48%'s unbelievable victory in the Referendum, and Our Gina's highly successful court action to block Brexit!And yet Leavers STILL claim "Brexit's gonna happen"! Talk about deluded!  
The @bankofengland say that the budget and progress on Brexit has boosted the economy.  
When Momentum have had their views endorsed by 52% in a referendum, I’ll agree you have a point  
Can Brexit help end puppy smuggling? @BBCNews #brexit  
The overall turnout in the 2014 European elections was 35%.The youth (18-24) turnout in the Brexit referendum was 64%.(65+ = 90% hence where we are now)But sure, keep saying the youth didn't care. 
Let's get this moving Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Brexiteers are quite simply mad, brexit is a cult created by tax avoiders to control the masses.#FBPE #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Jeremy Corbyn defied the Whip 100s of times, then uses it with a vengeance when in powerTory Brexit MPs defied the whip (and plotted against their leaders) then call others traitors for simply protecting Parliament's sovereigntySuch is the way of Authoritarian politics 
The EU is not ‘an ever-closer union of the peoples of Europe’. It is a private club of Europe’s political elites:  #Brexit 
Anne you do realise that most of the Brexit leaders have voted against party several times, including the ones complaining today? 
Brexit: Can Leavers and Remainers call a Christmas truce?No. The Brexiter turkeys who voted for Christmas deserve a good stuffing 365 days a year. #Brexitxmastruce 
So if the Remoaners think it’s ok to ask the Electorate to vote again or alter stuff enough to render the Referendum result illusory, is it ok for last night’s Commons’ vote to be rerun or rendered illusory as well? 
I tried to tell Leave voters thinking of voting Labour at the last election that they were mad, but they wouldn't listen: they believed all the crap about delivering Brexit. I think they might understand I was right now.  
Does @Anna_Soubry endorse this? Or are they still pretending this is not about stopping Brexit.  
If the Referendum result is overturned democracy is dead. 1. What the people say is irrevelant. 2. We will be shackled to an undemocratic EU 
So he throws the award bsck to then but wants to stay on the list?? You're watching too much of the Brexit negotiations Bob.. when you're out, you're out  
.@theresa_may will not risk another defeat and will withdraw her own EU (Withdrawal) Bill amendment that would put into law the Brexit date of 29 March 2019. Or at least that’s what Tory MPs tell me.  We’ll see. Very high risk to press ahead. Tory rebels showing no remorse 
After 18 months of hoodwinking the public into thinking they respect the  referendum result our Establishment politicians have just voted to allow themselves the power to overturn the decision taken by the British people in June of last year. #Brexit betrayal is full steam ahead!  
Stopping #Brexit is the only sensible way forward, and that's what we're going to do! 
Spoke today on results of #8Committee deliberations.We need to re-assess whether campaign posters are appropriate for this particular referendum. Slogans and imagery that are often used are very upsetting for many people.#RepealThe8th 
The government are under pressure to drop plans enshrining the Brexit date into law.The Commons Exiting the EU Committee said setting a date would take away ministers' "flexibility"Do you think the government should write an exit date into law in #Brexit legislation? 
Tory MP: Brexit Rebels Betrayed Voters [VIDEO]  
On #r4today this am, @bbclaurak said most people just want to get Brexit over. I'm not aware of any opinion poll that backs that up. Pull your journalistic socks up Laura. #FBPE 
Leo Varadkar in Bxl asked for his message to unionists: “I would hope that some of the people who supported Brexit and campaigned for it would realize, or at least acknowledge, that they’re the ones who created this problem and I’m one of the people who is trying to resolve it.” 
How to be a Wall Street currency analyst for dummies:Draw a trend line on historical 12-month price graph.  Continue trend line for 6 months.  This is your price forecast.Blame Brexit and the Tories when you’re wrong. 
Hard Remainers openly gloat that #Amendment7 vote was “First step towards defeat of Brexit” – but don't worry, MPs still fully intend to respect the referendum result, honest!   
Nothing like a glass of champers to celebrate pissing all over the largest #DEMOCRATIC mandate ever given by the #BRITISH people to our elected politicians!  UTTER #SCUM! #BBC #SKY #UK @Conservatives @ConHome #ConservativeParty #TORIES #News #EUWithdrawalBill #MPs #BREXIT pic.twitter.com/Vll2St9PIZ 
Prime Minister Theresa May says the Government is "on course" to deliver Brexit but she is "disappointed" following yesterday's Commons defeat 
We're on course to deliver Brexit says @theresa_may 
Never let it be said the prime minister isn't getting into the Christmas spirit. Brexit is a pantomime with all of the pratfalls and none of the jokes.My piece on a week of wearily familiar and totally unnecessary chaos  
TIN FOIL: Twitter report extent of Russian spending on ads during Brexit referendum amounts to £769. The conspiracy theory continues to fall apart.  
Appeaser Theresa will never miss an opportunity for a good Brexit backslide...   
WATCH: British lawmakers vote to change Prime Minister Theresa May's blueprint for #Brexit to give themselves more power over the terms of withdrawal from the European Union.  via @ReutersTV 
Brexit: Traitor Tories Betray The People... Again! 
Theresa May says government is "making good progress" with #Brexit preparations despite Commons defeat on EU Withdrawal Bill #Amendment7  
#BREAKING Theresa May says 'disappointed' by UK parliament vote but 'on course to deliver Brexit' 
Davies: If MPs seek to overturn Brexit vote, backlash will be like none seen before  
'They should never be MPs again' Dorries calls for Brexit Tory rebels to be DESELECTED  
I think we should take issue with the 'divisive issue' framing of #8Committee's work and the upcoming referendum. What inevitably will be newsworthy will be a divisive conflict but I really think Irish people are much further on than that. 
Brexit should be cancelled, Austrian prime minister says  
Exactly! Get Retweeting! Rebels voted to weaken the PM and to stop Brexit, not for parliamentary sovereignty.  
"This is a seismic moment, it's a major signpost for @Conservatives' demise" says @JohnWight1 as @theresa_may​ tells MPs they'll get a vote on #Brexit deal if it ensures 'smooth and orderly' exit.  
Martin Wolf: Britain has more illusions to shed on Brexit  
P.M. 'Sharia' May and our Politicians should hang their heads in shame after voting against the will of the people. Millions of very brave Men and Boys gave their lives in 2 World Wars for our freedom.#brexit  
Last night’s vote is just more proof that hard Brexit died on election night. Theresa May knows it. The EU27 know it. The dogs in the street know it. Time for Tory Leavers to accept it too.   
Taoiseach must ensure Joint Report legally cast iron before moving to Phase 2 of Brexit talks @MaryLouMcDonald 
In case anyone missed it, Tim has admitted that he "accidentally" did Brexit. Why is there a media blackout on this? #TimDidBrexit #TimTimBrexitKing  
So David Davis has previously said that referendums should only be held when all the facts have been thoroughly tested beforehand...and...should not be a blank sheet of paper for MPs to fill in afterwards. Word for word what was wrong with #Brexit referendum .  
We can stop Brexit, yes we can. My take on last night's absolutely bloody fantastic victory  
NATO boss - Brexit will change UK relationship with EU but not relationship with NATO - for me Brexit highlights importance of NATO-EU cooperation 
Brexit = result of Direct DemocracyHouse of Commons = elected by broken vote system. See how it works ? https://t.co/bNhPFOSWsO?amp=1 
Brexit should be cancelled, Austrian prime minister Christian Kern says  
#AnnaSoubry "A #vote for me is a vote for @theresa_may" "The people need a Government they can trust...to deliver on #Brexit" @Anna_Soubry, not only have you betrayed your party & the 17.4m people who voted #leave but you've deceived the #constituents who voted for you! #Broxtowe 
Ridiculous. It was about putting country first ensuring parliamentary oversight, not petty party tribalism.However, on the latter they have also likely shored up Tory voters who rightly believe reckless hard Brexit is cuckoo-cloud land stuff.  
Italy breaks from EU - Demands 'tailor-made Brexit' after PM undermines Brussels bloc  
Exclusive Taoiseach interview with me ahead of the EU Summi re Brexit: “next step is to turn agreement into a legally binding international agreement, and after that we’ll move on to talking about the transition phase” 
This time from @KateHoeyMP, another of the torrent of #Brexit lies perverting and undermining our democracy. Either we stop the lies or they will destroy our democracy.#LeaveLies #StopBrexit #FBPE 
DM: "We must continue to make the case for a common sense solution to Brexit that keeps Scotland, and the UK, in the single market and customs union." #ScotBudget 
David Davis has been let off by the Speaker - his lies about Brexit Impact Assessments aren't 'Contempt of Parliament.' But, not preparing for Brexit is a breach of the public's trust - we can hold him to account, take action today:  
A week old (on the details of the Brexit negotiations) but relevant and depressing. Parts of the UK are not the country I thought I knew. I'm ashamed.  
Whilst we don't always 'win' based on these petitions, we do get exposure & debate at 100k signatures. This one especially important after #A7 win! So please sign & RT: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
So Gina Miller, a private citizen who sued the government, is a rich, meddling elite, but this millionaire who helped to buy Brexit is not?  
Those Tories attacking the MP "rebels" should remember that for every SEVEN CON voters who think Brexit was right the latest YouGov finds TWO who think it was wrong. 
Interesting facts about last night’s Tory rebels, who needlessly embarrassed TM on even of EU summit:  8 out of Juncker’s XI are former ministers 8 out of Juncker’s XI are lawyersDisgruntled elites?#Brexit #ImWithMay 
Boris Johnson gets away with risking a mother being in jail for 5+ yrs Jeremy Hunt gets away with making up NHS info & scaring sick patients away from hosptl David Davis gets away with misleading Parliament on Brexit reports, risking country’s future  
Field WRONG on numbers. Latest YouGov finds that for every TWO LAB voters who think Brexit was right SEVEN say it was wrong  
Brexit is too complicated, it's gonna be delayed and then be abandoned. 
#BREAKING  Mayor J.Badia of Callús town summoned for "disobedience" by Spanish "justice" due to his peaceful attempt to stop Spain occupation forces brutality during the #1O independence referendum in #Catalonia. 
The @Conservatives need to get rid of so called fake #Tory #MP's who use parliamentary discussion & process to LIE to 17,410,742 #British People, saying that they support #BREXIT, utter RUBBISH they want the #UK to stay in the #EU in all but name! #BBC #SKY #UK @ConHome #NEWS 
What happened last night in parliament was absolutely bloody wonderful, writes @Hugodixon. We can defeat Brexit. Yes, we can. 
Met with @EU_Commission chief Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier at the @EPP summit this afternoon. Now on to Phase II of negotiations. 
FILTHY #POLITICIAN #NickyMorgan @NickyMorgan01 #Tory #MP for #Loughborough is a RABID #Remoaner who is lying to the #BRITISH people! Her plan is to keep us in the #SingleMarket #CustomsUnion & ultimately in the #EU! #BBC #SKY #BREXIT #UK @Conservatives @ConHome #CONSERVATIVEPARTY 
Brexit Secretary David Davis when asked by me for clarification on terminology tells me to get a dictionary. No wonder he was reprimanded by EU Parliament for destroying trust with his forked tongue  
Brexit is about British PEOPLE taking back control - NOT Parliament   
#Brexit could be gey damagin, fur siccar, but it’s nae a maitter o life an death. The nuclear-airmed submarines oan the Clyde are. 
Rutte, the Dutch PM v supportive of May, said last Friday showed she shouldn’t be underestimated, and that most people in UK want a ‘reasonable’ Brexit 
In black and white. Adonis and his friends are only interested in stopping Brexit and that's why so many voted to defeat the govt last night.  
A key criticism has been that Labour's #Brexit position is muddled & unclear.As the opposition Party, it is important for it to hold a coherent policy on the #EU.What do you think? 
Brexit-ball-back-in-UK-court Klaxon!Dutch PM Mark Rutte: It's up to @theresa_may & her gov't to tell us first what she wants in Phase II. (And to make sure that Phase I agreement is legally binding). #EUCO 
The Daily Mail has sunk to an all-time-low with this noxious, anti-democratic, contemptible attack. Goebbels would have been proud.There is a lot to call these Conservative MPs out for, but making sure the Brexit deal gets maximum scrutiny is not one of them.  
U.K. lawmakers have given Parliament veto power on the Brexit deal  
REALITY: Labour MP @frankfieldteam warns party faces wipeout if it continues to try and cripple Brexit.  
We have today published detailed Tourist Market Profiles to help #Businesses diversify in face of Brexit challenge #GetBrexitReady  
“I VOTED FOR *INSERT PERSONAL OPINION* TYPE OF BREXIT” LIKE THE BALLOT HAD A FEEDBACK SECTION 
Pretty much everyone who works in our factory votes Labour. They nearly all voted for Brexit. Seemed to be a similar pattern across traditional Labour strongholds of Wales and Northern England on the Brexit vote breakdown. Hardly seems niche to me. 
"A vote for me is a vote for Theresa May.""The people need a Government they can trust...to deliver on Brexit"@Anna_Soubry, not only have you betrayed your party and the 17.4m people who voted leave but you've deceived the constituents who voted for you. 
Many people used to ask with astonishment how fascism could have taken hold of a rich and advanced country, and whether it could happen again. The last two years have provided a large part of the answer. Never take democracy for granted!#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Tusk: I have no doubt that the real test of our unity will be the second phase of the Brexit talks. 
I think a lot of it is also based on a rose tinted understanding of the Republic’s marriage referendum. It’s great that it passed but was still hugely damaging for many LGBT people to be forced to go door to door begging straight people for equal rights 
#KennethClarke #MP who is plotting with #Labour and the #LiberalDemocrats to defeat #BREXIT! He is the Ultimate #British #TRAITOR! The #ConservativeParty must now deselect this #political TURD or face the wrath of #Tory #Voters in the #UK!  #BBC #SKY 
Blatant lies by Tory Brexiters & especially by the PM are undermining our democracy. How can the public discuss & make informed voting decisions when they are being systematically misled? There must be harsh penalties including prison sentences for this kind of mendacity.#Brexit 
"The agreement itself is awfully woolly, which means ministers here can say one thing which go completely against the understandings they have of the agreement in Brussels" @anandMenon1 #Brexit #bbcdp 
Brexit is an impossible reality, a multitude of contradictory wishful delusions, a duplicity of deceits. Therefore it cannot happen. It must stop and it will.@StopBrexitMarch @acgrayling @spaceangel1964 @RemainingKind @LoubinWally @Emma_Forage @EUflagmafia#Bresist#StopBrexit 
There's betrayals and there's betrayals. Dropping the date #Brexit is written into law would be the ultimate betrayal to the 17,410,742. Absolutely do not give way on this @theresa_may. 
I am delighted to read this morning in the Independent that next year's referendum will "settle the issue for a generation". As it should. Don't let #repealthe8th forget this when they dislike the result. 
It’s also about safeguarding the national interest. Ducking your responsibilities over Brexit won’t be covered up like a pothole.  
The UK could have had the X MEN for the same price as leaving the EU. Brexit is a joke  
You’re quite willing to allow the people of #Gibraltar to become the collateral damage and a bargaining chip by giving Spain veto over Gibraltar being included in #Brexit -EU deal. Are you advocating a two-tier citizen system in which some are worth protection but others are not?  
Having a referendum on abortion or marriage equality in Northern Ireland is a terrible idea which would be extremely divisive. I don’t know any LGBT or pro-choice people here who think it’s a good idea 
There was nothing "unclear" about the position of @DavidDavisMP, he deliberately led Parliament and the Public to believe Brexit impact assessment's existed so to suggest his conduct was simply "regrettable" but not in Contempt of Parliament is ludicrous!   
The crazy thing about hard Brexit is that it fails on its own terms.  
Starmer on BBC News says the Brexit rebel amendment makes it more likely we will be key closely aligned to the single market & customs union because that's what he majority in Parliament want. That is not what the majority of Brits voted for though, Keir. 
Hypocrites!Julia Hartley-Brewer: “It’s laughable for the rebel Remain MPs to claim they want to bring power back to Parliament.They were perfectly happy to leave that power in Brussels for another 40 years!”#Brexit #EU 
"Do you think they betrayed those people?" @Jo_Coburn "Yes" @HenrySmithUK#bbcdp #Brexit  
Truth is, @theresa_may could have built consensus on Brexit. But she chose a general election. Thought she could get a massive majority & do as she liked. But the British people intervened in June, & if the PM won't listen, Parliament has a duty to ensure people are heard  
Nice one Freeman. He knew how to get a laugh. Ho ho. #GrahamHill #F1 #Brexit  
#TRAITOR #DominicGrieve the sanctimonious Anti #Brexit #MP who intends to  Vote against his own #Conservative #Government to STOP YOUR #BREXIT!  Dominic You are UTTER #SCUM! We feel sorry for the people of #Beaconsfield!   #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @ConHome #UK #EU #TORY #TORIES 
WATCH | The mask slips. In one breath, one of last night's Tory rebels @JDjanogly says he respects the referendum result and says decision to rebel was purely constitutional. In the next? "I would certainly like us to remain in the Single Market and possibly the Customs Union."  
 “TRAITOR #DominicGrieve the sanctimonious Anti #Brexit #Conservative #MP!” COMMANDER in CHIEF of the #FILTH of #WESTMINSTER! We demand that the @Conservatives in #Beaconsfield #DESELECT this #Political #TURD!  #BBC #SKY #UK #Conservatives @ConHome #EU 
Richmond Park MP and keen ‘Green Brexit’ supporter Zac Goldsmith has called on the Government to stop the badger cull  
Love how people are claiming the Tory rebels have massively undermined Theresa May and should be punished, while forgetting that Boris Johnson, David Davis and Phillip Hammond were actively undermining May's Brexit strategy on a regular basis. 
Brexit Labour whipping operation!  
"Are you proud of yourself?" @Jo_Coburn "I think we did the right thing, yes, absolutely" says @JDjanogly "This is the the biggest decision we have taken since the war, Parliament should look at these issues"  #bbcdp #Brexit  
Proud of themselves? 11 Tory rebels should be - and the 4 Labour Brexiters who voted with them to guarantee parliament a genuine vote. Read what this citizens assembly concluded - soft Brexit not Daily Mail Brexit 
Just been on @SkyNews live from Dublin explaining that the more the Conservatives push for a hard Brexit, the worse it will be for Ireland 
Tory rebels may not like Luxembourg PM Xavier Bettel's words on feasibility of doing 2nd Brexit deal:"To think Theresa May will negotiate something, we will negotiate something and then again [May] will go back to Westminster is not good for the position of the negotiations." 
Feels like the world’s brightened a little recently. Good things happening. Alabama, Brexit vote, the Ashes, Spurs back in the top 4. 
So @JDjanogly claims he didn't vote for the amendment last night to dilute Brexit...but then argues we should remain in the single market and customs union? Charlatan. #bbcdp 
RT I suggest #Bbcdp start to air daily politics public interest stories like this, not just pre-scripted #Brexit claptrap day after day after day. Same message to @SkyNews @BBCNews @LBC @bbc5live #Bbcqt #r4today #Marr #Skypapers #Bbcpapers #Newsnight 
It's all becoming very clear: Murdoch has sold Fox and with the money will buy the BBC, the proceeds of which will be used by the government to pay the Brexit bill. #FakeNews 
Brexit: The first time a customer has asked the supplier to charge a lot more for supplying a whole lot less. It's all brains in the Brexit camp. 
I spoke at the inaugural UKIP conference, Alan Sked was in the chair.I think Nigel became leader twelve years later?The strength of UKIP through th dark years was in its patriotic & totally committed members. Great people. They got us the referendum.  
Dear Remainers,We have Brexit on the run !!!The "breakthrough" on phase one and the victory for #Amendment7 show that the UK is finally waking up to the reality of Brexit. Lies, delusions and false promises don't cut it anymore.We're perfectly placed now to #StopBrexit in 2018 
The new and improved  is now live! Our free to access content includes blogs, briefings, videos & podcasts. Listen back to speeches, keep an eye on upcoming events, and check out our latest analysis on #Brexit #FutureofEurope & #EuropeanCouncil 
Obviously apart from @davidallengreen on Brexit.. but not a journalist he’s an *expert* anywaythis year @faisalislam has been outstanding and clearly the real *journalist of the year* 
They purport to do this by being able to glean the true motives of 17m voters as rejecting the ECJ's jurisdiction and Freedom of movement. This is also nonsense on multiple levels. First, it only takes 3% of all Leave voters to have voted on the basis of a soft Brexit to shift> 
This is so blindingly obvious and true, I marvel at how Brexiters have managed to hijack the referendum result with this plainly overreaching interpretation, aided by supposedly impartial commentators like @afneil shaking their pompoms for this. It is utter nonsense. 
In Oct 2016, a DExEU Minister literally testified to a Parliamentary Select Committee that the govt was assessing economic impact of Brexit on different sectors of the economy & described the methodology being used (retweeting thread).   
Proud of themselves? The Tory Brexit rebels certainly should be | Polly Toynbee  
Many thanks to @vincecable for joining us this morning. It is imperative that protecting UK business links with Ireland guides our approach in Brexit talks. Read our full statement here:  
We need to maintain the pressure, so please circulate this & let's stop #DavidDavis from locking us in to the 29/03/19 Brexit date. This is another critical action to ensure the Gov't cannot act without oversight. @DavidLammy @Anna_Soubry @Keir_Starmer @NickyMorgan01 #StopBrexit 
That is ridiculous. We have a fascist government with no concept of democracy. Their obsession with forcing Brexit on us suggests they have no confidence in being able to justify it rationally. 
Asked the Brexit Minister to reassure both patients and medicines developers about regulation and pricing post-Brexit – he couldn’t…  
A petition for the government to WALK AWAY from Brexit negotiations and to Leave the EU immediately has been signed 70,000 times! 
On arrival, Tusk won't comment on UK vote, but that unity among 27 is what has led to progress on Brexit, and unity will be tested more in phase 2 
.@JanOSullivanTD telling the media that yesterday was an historic day for #repealthe8th movement and has called for a May referendum to allow young people to vote. #8Committee 
Nigel Farage tweeted this after MPs’ Brexit vote and the replies were just gold  
The Leader of the House refuses to allow time for MPs to debate the impact of #brexit before the meaningful vote on the Deal. How meaningful can a vote on the Brexit Deal be without knowing the impact of Brexit on British families and jobs. 
Well done to these 11 MPs.  When you are condemned by a fascist newspaper, you know you have done the right thing.  All power to the saboteurs! #Brexit #BrexitShambles @Labour4EU @euromove 
Archbishop of Canterbury: It's 'perfectly possible' to make a success of Brexit as it gives Britain opportunities  
Facebook says there's little evidence of a Russian effort to influence the "Brexit" vote. A British minister is not convinced.  
Superb evisceration of May's Brexit woes by @jonlis1: "Never before has a world power elected to amputate various limbs in front of its horrified friends ..." 
Soubry: A Vote for Me is 'Vote for May' and 'Good Brexit Deal'  
Russia Today spent £767 on Twitter adverts during Brexit campaign  
Decisions on European defence/PESCO & Brexit show that only united can we perform the most difficult tasks.Divisions on migration and EMU are accompanied by emotions which make it hard to find common ground.We should work even more intensively to keep our unity. 
Luxembourg PM @Xavier_Bettel says no when asked if British Parliament could send Theresa May back to renegotiate Brexit deal - “would not be good for the negotiations” 
Brexit: A familiar return to chaos and embarrassment for May  
A tricky one for our local MP @S_Hammond yesterday. Country voted Brexit, constituency voted remain. He lost his job last night as a result of doing what he thought was right. Fair play, that's all anyone can ever do and he can sleep easy at night. @lovewimbledon. 
Take heart.  If the HoC votes down a proposed Brexit deal, then we leave without a deal in March 2019.  Probably the best possible outcome.  
Your periodic reminder that Hans Olaf Henkel:- was one of the founders of the Alternative für Deutschland (AfD)- is a marginal figure in German politics- just because he sits with the Tories in the EP does not make him relevant#Brexit@SHKMEP 
I mean, literally, a second referendum could do exactly that  
David Davis "We've been given instruction by 17.5 million British citizens to get on with leaving #EU & we have to do so as promptly & expeditiously as we can.""Extending transitional period indefinitely will be seen as a breach of that promise."#Brexit 
Very good event with @ibec_irl this morning. Many thanks to the IBEC team for organising. Very evident that Anglo-Irish relations in terms of business must continue to work together to stop #Brexit #ExitfromBrexit 
Theresa May accused of hiding links to billionaires after secret dinners with rich donors Our politics has become utterly corrupted by big money. #Brexit is just its most obvious manifestation. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Virtually every other Labour MP believes that Brexit will harm working people. As on hunting & Northern Ireland, Kate is eccentric and wrong.  
Our 18 favourite responses to that Daily Mail front page  #Brexit #BrexitDeal #DailyMail #TheresaMay 
Membership of Brexit CommitteeTories  10Lab   6SNP 2DUP 1Plaid C 1Do the *maths*  !  
Watching Brexiters who object to parliamentary sovereignty back themselves into a 2nd referendum corner this morning is weird, when the Brexity majority has now been lost due to better information & natural wastage  
Very interesting views from @HansOlafHenkel talking to @adamboultonSKY on @SkyNews - he believe Brussels should give @theresa_may a new deal to allow #Brexit to be avoided. Didn’t @David_Cameron try that? Yes, he says but things are different now. 
Punchy words on @theresa_may's handling of #Brexit from CBI's Paul Drechsler    via @business 
They're not just "rebelling against the government", though – they're defying the will of the general public as demonstrated in a national referendum, and in an election where 84 per cent of voters cast their ballots for parties promising a full exit from the Free Movement regime  
Surely you're not THIS ill informed ? OK google representative government and then referendum . I'll wait . 
So that means you'll be supporting the campaign for a second referendum on the final Brexit deal so the British people have the power to say yes or no to it?Or are you using "British people" as an absurd euphemism for "Theresa May and the hard-right fringe of the Tory party"?  
It isn't even about #Brexit per se any more, but about mass democracy itself.At least half of the combined Commons & Lords can barely conceal their contempt for the demos, & their intolerance of being subject to it. 
This one, unadvertised tweet has been seen by 1.2 million people.That’s the number of people it takes to sway a referendum. Now imagine a message being pushed by thousands of accounts, designed to actually influence voter behaviour.  
'The EU and Remoaners support parliamentary democracy like an electric chair supports your back'Brendan O'Neill on the problem with MPs' 'meaningful vote' on Brexit.  
Survey evidence bears this out. Attitudes to EU imms have become considerably more positive - among Leavers and Remainers - since Brexit vote.  
Labour faces wipeout in large numbers of seats which voted determinedly to leave the EU, if last night's voting trends continue. Any more messing around in an attempt to cripple our Brexit negotiators could spell electoral disaster. 
Why did @theresa_may sack Hammond immediately he 'rebelled'  on #Brexit voting on principle; while allowing TRAITOR Priti Patel, who tried to direct money to help terrorists, time to resign &, Porno Viewer at taxpayers expense, Damian Green still has his job? 
Commons now has hand on Brexit steering wheel, or perhaps a handbrake on the process, if not Brexit itself... a change in mood matters./5 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May headed to Brussels Thursday for a major summit of EU leaders, just hours after her government suffered a defeat in Parliament in a vote on key Brexit legislation  
Very disappointed in last night’s vote. The longer we spend sorting a Brexit deal, the longer it takes for us to move on to do things like: Improve the NHSTackle homelessnessBuild more housesImproving infrastructure and the economyLiterally anything that isn’t Brexit 
You have no values when you choose to ignore the will of the people who voted to leave during a referendum - Democracy as we know it is dead when professional politicians like you do everything to ignore the wishes of the people  
Do we have a problem in this country with racism xenophobia with hate with Brexit??? Where does it come from? What platforms?  
Attending EU Council with Taoiseach today, looking forward to sufficient progress being made on Phase1 of #brexit negotiations @meathchronicle #EUCouncil 
WATCH: British lawmakers vote to change Prime Minister Theresa May's blueprint for #Brexit to give themselves more power over the terms of withdrawal from the European Union.  via @ReutersTV 
Davis let off the hook...ruled he's not in contempt of Parl...no doubt let off on a technicality....he lied....so I am in no doubt he is in contempt of the UK public...give us the facts...let us make up our own minds...give us a #FinalSay in 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit 
There have been a number of meaningful votes already on the Brexit process, not least the decision by 17.4 million people to leave the EU. The public now expect politicians to respect this and get on with the job of getting the best Brexit deal 
British Prime Minister Theresa May lost a key Brexit vote yesterday  
Two cheers for amendment 7 (but parliament is now a sideshow in the Brexit process). My latest blogpost just up:  
Yes. Imagine if, following a referendum, those who'd voted one way were told every day, many times, that they had only done so because they were stupid, ill-educated, old, racist, naive, incomprehending & duped...  
From my interview on Talk Radio with @JuliaHB1. Labour and Lib Dem MPs saw last night’s vote as a way of inflicting damage on the British government to undermine Brexit but it is not the end of the Bill and does it not end the Brexit process. 
As a Leave voter, can you explain to me how my company will access the ECHA and REACH FoC, post-Brexit? Because that kind of matters to me, and my employees, and their families. This is exactly the kind of issue voters did not know about. It's why we have MPs, not referenda. 
Facebook found just 73 PENCE was spent by Russian group on pro Brexit ads during the referendum campaign casting doubt over claims the vote was swayed by Moscow's meddling  
#Brexit treachery and betrayal... like most bullies the Daily Mail's a bit of a one-trick pony.  
Dear oh dear, WAKEY WAKEY, our subservience to the ECJ does not end until 2028, so that is now the BREXIT date.Regulatory alignment? What the hell does that mean?£40 billion, an ex gratia gift for no reason.No fishing reform.& I'm supposed to be pleased?  
Brexit Secretary telly parly as far as he is aware, Scottish Tories made no representations to him ahead of yesterday’s vital Amendment 7 vote. Scottish Tories shutting up for Scotland. 
The UK is wasting finite time and resources with all these needless battles and unrealistic aims, on every front.  UK has also lost a great deal of credibility. Unforced error on top of unforced error.  There is no reason why Brexit has to be like this.  ends/ 
60% of Work Capability Assessment decisions which go to Appeal are being overturned - privatised assessments are not working. Important not to lose sight of these things while headlines are dominated by Brexit  
OTD in 1918 the Irish people voted overwhelmingly for freedom with @sinnfeinireland winning 73 seats from 105 - like #Brexit a century later the Brit Govt cared little for Irish democracy so partitioned the island instead   
Brexiteer Julia Hartley-Brewer @JuliaHB1  says Brexit is about British PEOPLE taking back control - NOT Parliament   
Since the referendum, too many MPs (from various parties) have put their party or personal interest above the national interest. We should be proud of all those who are brave and dignified enough to do the opposite.  
Petition: Leave EU immediately with No DealGovt should walk away from EU talks & leave immediately.EU MUST offer a Punishment Deal otherwise other Countries will Leave.Why wait 18 months to take back control of our country, laws & borders?#Brexit #EU 
In amongst the Brexit headlines, important to remember that a benefit change is being rolled out that will affect thousands of people over the next few months. Universal Credit will undoubtedly cause hardship & stress in NW Durham over the festive period:  
The insurrection against Brexit continues. Either the 17.4m rise up or accept that voting has no point anymore  
What does last night's vote mean?1) A meaningful vote for Parliament2) Likely defeat for government next week on set Brexit date3) Parliament will have power to demand government goes back to get a better deal@BBCR4Today 
Friends! Summary:1. This government defeat on Brexit can now inspire other Tory rebels.2. If they can thwart Brexit, Parliamentary democracy will be restored.3. Which then can be used to transfer all powers to a truly democratic organisation, i.e. Our EU.4. That's all, folks!  
Make no mistake, people, #TheresaMay had been appointed as PM to destrpoy #Brexit and she did just that, both through foul play and her appalling incompetence. All those votes in parliament mean nothing. The deed is done. The farce  that is now played out is just that, a farce. 
There is now a clear majority for. Referendum on the deal. Yesterday Parliament took back control. Now the public want to as well. About to ask David Davis why he doesn’t trust the public to decide for themselves. @libdems trust you to. 
‘@PhilipDaviesUK: If MPs seek to overturn Brexit vote, public backlash will be like none seen before.   
So deselection is good when it happens to sane Tories but bad when it happens to sane Labour and democracy is good when it might lead to mad Brexit but bad when it might lead to mad Corbyn. Am I getting this right? 
Time for all to sign this petition: 'Leave right away!' Brexit petition calling for May to ABANDON negotiations signed by 70k  
Confirmed: the judge investigating on the Catalan referendum participes in pro-unionist marches and shares articles against independence.Impressive the rule of law in Spain right @JunckerEU @TimmermansEU? 
As remain MPs again try to betray the Brexit vote, I think this petition is even more important! SIGN >>>  
I conclude that simply VOTING to obtain a timely and complete Brexit was naive. The political class are destroying it and now we face a choice. Accept what they do OR we must consider options. 
Farmers face a triple whammy from Brexit: loss of subsidies, the threat of tariffs, and a flood of cheap imports.  
Brexit: Theresa May's EU summit marred by embarrassing defeat at hands of Tory rebels  
Actually Brexit and our relationship with the EU is so very complex that I would say that most members of the British public don't understand it at all. That's the great unsayable thing in all of this.  
Anna Soubry stares down Tories mumbling in the Commons that the Brexit rebels were drinking champagne after victory last night. "Nobody drank champagne," she says. "Nobody drank champagne. Let's just nail that."Then says whips had not talked to rebels ***since Monday***. 
#brexit tweet of the week  
@IainDale I take it #Remainers  will be calling for a second vote on the #EUWithdrawalBill in the Commons.The defeat of the Government by 50.3% to 49.7% makes the 52%:48% referendum look like a landslide 
Surprising, but welcome, to see Julia HB joining the campaign for a #FinalSay referendum once we know the terms of the deal  
#Brexit is making some people seriously cray cray, bordering on unhinged 
A recent ECJ ruling strengthened protection against expulsion for long-term resident non-EU citizens (including Brits after Brexit)Analysis by @Dacostalaw -   
Asked one EU diplomat if thought that May's defeat would change how she seen among capitals ahead of summit. 'I don't particularly think so. We all knew her situation." #Brexit 
Even only 29% of *Remainers* want to stop #Brexit.It's a minority opinion, but that minority is disproportionately concentrated in the legislature, ~60% of which wants to stop it.The real rift in UK politics is now between People and Parliament.Where is our Oliver Cromwell?  
For Christmas I’d like the Tory party to split into two-on a pro and anti Brexit divide-and then go to the polls and let voters decide. They can’t continue to paralyse the nation with their backroom bickering! 
Julia seems to be under the impression that the Brexit vote was to turn us into some kind of Greek democracy, with rotational representation. Sorry, but it's still proportional, with advisory referendums 
Rather brilliantly, Brexit ministers up in the Commons this morning to take questions from MPs  
How did Conservative whips get Brexit bill rebellion so wrong?  
The majority of everyone in the UK voted for Brexit.You're only loyal to the Soubry party.Maybe defecting to Labour where you obviously belong, might be a good idea?  
Pleeeeeez, get your head down and write us a Brexit 'In the Thick of It'....Pleeeeeeez.  
Last night, thanks to 11 Conservative 'mutineers', MPs ensured Parliament has a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal. We want to say thanks to them - thank you Ken Clarke #YesTo7 
'I have no choice but to become French.. Britain after Brexit is no longer my country'  
Eleven rebels from Theresa May's Conservative Party joined opposition lawmakers to give Parliament the power to reject Brexit divorce terms she negotiates with the EU   
Last night, thanks to 11 Conservative 'mutineers', MPs ensured Parliament has a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal. We want to say thanks to them - firstly, Dominic Grieve #YesTo7 
Something which should be seen as normal is now ‘news’ We live in strange and worrying times. #Brexit Britain  
Delighted to see SoS Liam Fox promoting the #Commonwealth. #Brexit opens the door.  
Extremists (on both sides) struggling to grasp significance of last week. The govt is negotiating to leave with compromises. The EU is now trying to get there too. Parliament is against a pure no compromise Brexit, public are too it seems. Hurrah. 
Please post a photo of the referendum ballot that says these specific things. Mine didn't.  
Breaking News from "Financial Times:" "Russia-Linked Accounts Were Active on Facebook Ahead of Brexit"Check out the scale of RUSSIAN BREXIT INTERFERENCE: 
Six of the eleven Tory rebels who last night put Brexit at risk by going against the government are from LEAVE constituencies. They MUST be voted out at the next election! 
As I have long argued!! Banks set to move fewer than 6% of City jobs to the EU over #Brexit. My bet is The City will increase in size over the next decade as it globalizes by doing more biz w the US, EM, Commonwealth  
On the zealotry of hard #Brextremists ... #Brexit #StopBrexit #Article7 #Remain #Brexitshambles #FBPE 
Brexit has brought out some of the best qualities of the Brits eg Dominic Grieve's intervention yesterday but also some of the worst qualities of English nationalism, hubris, triumphalism & nostalgia for Empire & delusions about the Anglosphere. The country remains deeply divided 
Can't wait to see the look on the faces of these self-indulgent, egotistical prima-donnas when it eventually dawns on them that all they've done is increased the probability of a No-Deal Brexit.  
I am delighted to be here this morning with @ibec_irl to listen to Irish businesses both north and south of the island on the threat that #Brexit poses. #ExitFromBrexit 
A new day, with a chink of light penetrating the #Brexit fog. But we are not there yet. The madness must be continually exposed, Parliament or people must be given choice between deal and Remain.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Guardia Civil has detained the managing director of the postal service Unipost in the framework of the investigation of the #1O referendum preparations in #Catalonia. 
Necessary to set the record straight  - my letter in @theHerald this morning  : All devolved powers must remain with Holyrood after Brexit | HeraldScotland  
MPs have taken back control over Brexit by forcing the Government to hold a meaningful vote in Parliament at the end of the Brexit negotiations to approve the deal.Next step - giving the people the right to decide their future.  
Members of Parliament have voted in favor of lawmakers approving the final Brexit deal and the UK's withdrawal from the EU  
Tories denouncing the Tory MPs who voted for #ammendment7 as traitors should read this by Winston Churchill who made it very clear that an MP's loyalty to his or her party comes far behind their duty to their country.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
BREAKING: Newspaper obsessed with "regaining" parliamentary sovereignty upset by notion of parliamentary sovereignty.#Brexit #A7 #Amendment7 #Yesto7 
Predictable that Kate Hoey and Frank Field voted with the DUP and 293 Tories against Grieve's amendment. If May and Davis are serious about letting Parliament vote on the final Brexit deal, why were they so opposed to that being enshrined in law? 
SICKENING: Europhile Lord boasts that last night’s Commons vote is first step towards stopping Brexit. Establishment blatantly trying to reverse the referendum result.  
Speaking to @rtenews at the moment on last night's vote in the Commons. #Brexit can be stopped and @LibDems want the British public to have a vote on the final deal. #ExitFromBrexit 
Members of Parliament have voted in favor of lawmakers approving the final Brexit deal and the UK's withdrawal from the EU  
Unionist red or blue. Shout & moan, one way, or the other, about this Baad SNP, or that Baad SNP, But when you, YES YOU, Who have seen fit to vote for them, what do they do at Westminster ? They get in bed together Again, & vote for a hard Brexit.Now they'll be shouting Baad SNP  
Where next for the Conservatives? Weak and divided with Brexit overshadowing everything, can a next generation - the New Modernisers - revive the centre right?My @FTMag feature - with @RuthDavidsonMSP @Freeman_George @NeilDotObrien @NickBoles @SamGyimah 
"I didn’t want Brexit, but I assumed the Brexiters had a plan. I didn’t think Donald Trump had a plan, but I assumed the Republicans did. They didn’t. Whether you like these people or not, the question is: why are they incompetent?"  
“We are going to deliver Brexit” - @theresa_may #ImWithMay 
Dorries: Sack the anti-Brexit Tory Saboteurs  
Solid summary by @ChukaUmunna on why Phase 2 of negotiations will be so tricky:1- EU27 aware that Gove, Johnson, etc constantly undercutting May2- Cabinet still have not agreed on Brexit end-point 3- Canada +++ (esp incl services) not likely.  
They’re in a right old panic this morning. Anyone would think Brexit is such a bad idea it has to be rushed through before we find out? 
Hey, @DailyMailUK . Your front page got fixed. You're welcome. #stopbrexit #StopFundingHate #countrybeforeparty #sovereignty @Regret_Brexit @JolyonMaugham @ThatTimWalker @acgrayling @campbellclaret @thatginamiller @jeremycorbyn 
Last night’s Tory defeat on a ‘meaningful’ #BrexitDeal was a delight. When Brexit is in the balance, John & I will be there: to make sure it happens. 
- brexit will damage the UK economy, so let’s push for independence- but rUK is 4x more important to Scotland than EU as an export market, how would Indy reduce our exposure to rUK economy?- ...  
Actually, what is humiliating is that a Parliament that Brexiteers wanted to ‘take back control’ has to fight so hard just to get a vote on the Brexit deal. Unbelievable! The European Parliament will automatically get a vote  
Dear EU negotiators. Regarding phase 2 of negotiations regarding Brexit can you please make this a priority clause? That Sky Stop calling Irish people British. Ye can work on tradey stuff after.  
Labour Remainers - you have one job between now and next Autumn - dump Corbyn. We all know that if Brexit is ever seriously endangered by a ‘meaningful vote’ he’ll rescue the Govt. 
I don’t identify and define my life and aspirations through political parties, imho there are amazing people across the political spectrum, in most parties.UK Democracy is in the ‘Emergency Room’ and it’s taken a good beating from Brexit, time now for it to recover, for us all. 
So why did you go to an Exit from Brexit fundraiser Anna? The actions of East Midlands  MPs such as yourself and @NickyMorgan01  last night are a betrayal of the will of the people freely expressed in the referendum. Once we leave your welcome to campaign for re-entry.  
."Theresa May is refusing to engage with Northern Ireland's nationalist voices on Brexit.". 
This:No British institution is sacred to hard core brexiters. The EU, Parliament, our Judges, anything which frustrates #Brexit via due process in the smallest way is attacked.This is damaging our DemocracyThis is what fascism looks like  
Last night @uklabour placed their party interest before country. Today @theresa_may is in Europe to deliver #Brexit for the UK. It is time to get behind her. Forget talk of hard, soft, medium Brexit. Come together in the cause of #Brexit overallUse your #ImWithMay hashtag 
BREXIT news: chocolate currency now stronger than the pound   
."Grieve & fellow rebel Stephen Hammond said ANOTHER defeat was likely next week if May persisted in her attempt to enshrine a FIXED Brexit date in law.". 
No, that doesn't mean we need a 2nd EU referendum. We only needed the first one because our oh -so-democratic MPs repeatedly ignored the views of the majority of the British people.  
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 14: as new facts come to light, the British people are free to change their minds on Brexit. Please RT:  
.What were the rebels thinking of? Oh yes. Killing Brexit  
The ugliness of the language being used about the Tory Brexit rebels shows the ugliness of the Brextremists and the ugliness of their cause. 
There’s probably a majority for ‘no Brexit’ as reality dawns  
This government defeat on Brexit can now inspire other Tory rebels | Polly Toynbee  
Today’s programme is live from the Maxilla Social Centre, which sits in the shadow of the charred shell of Grenfell Tower. Just arrived. Brexit shenanigans suddenly seem rather less important than they did last night. 
And don’t forget, on Tory benches there are many powerful Brexit voices concerned about May’s concessions to EU, how would they have reacted to concessions to their internal rivals? 
Not surprised in the slightest. The SNP don’t want a single Brexit Power for the Scottish Parliament as they want EU to retain control of them all #StrongerForBrussels  
The Bow Group's Senior Patron @johnredwood with a reminder that if Parliament rejects the British Government's #EUdeal we do not remain in the EU, we have a "#NodealBrexit ". Or what others may term a "hard #Brexit "#brexitbill 
New report by @nationaltrust @Natures_Voice & @WildlifeTrusts reveals that the UK needs to invest 5 times more in the farmed environment to meet existing commitments to protect our natural heritage after #Brexit  
Is.. is she calling for a referendum on the final deal?  
But it’s one vote on one bill, Parliament was always going to be choppy for govt with no majority - Remainers hoping to soften Brexit shouldn’t bank on this suddenly changes everything 
73% of the 11 #Tory rebels are either barristers or solicitors. They are from the wealthy #liberal elite living in their secure leafy bubbles and most probably completely out of touch with the rest of the #UK especially with the working classes #Brexit 
I prefer this version! But to be clear vote was NOT attempt to stop or hinder Brexit it WAS about ensuring that our nation’s future is discussed by Parliament and not just implemented  by an unchecked Executive.  
Any PM has to work with what they can get through Parliament - if looser arrangement with EU after Brexit can’t get the votes, it can’t happen - rightly or wrongly 
‘@NadineDorries: Sack the anti-Brexit Tory Saboteurs.  
Nick Ferrari tells Tory "rebel leader" Dominic Grieve: "You've weakened your Prime Minister over Brexit."  
Today's twitter poll:  If someone admits to you their Brexit view is different to yours (eg you're a remainer, they're a leaver or vice-versa), be honest does it negatively change your opinion of them a little (or even a lot)? 
DISGRACE: MPs vote for veto on Brexit. The betrayal is underway.  
No Anna.  It would mean we remain members of the EU in all but name — but on worse terms.  It is a deliberate betrayal of Brexit.  
EU and Japan finalise deal for trade zone covering 30% of global GDP. So since the referendum, EU has made trade deals with 2 out of the 3 non-EU countries in the G8. Only the US left.  
Former head of MI6 Richard Dearlove on @BBCNewsnight made case for Brexit, predicting 5 yrs of turbulence. Another older person prepared to inflict hardship on younger generation for illusory gains. 
Exactly.  Politics already suffered from our adversarial system - pushing people to oppose not compromise. That has now been ramped up with flaming rhetoric been fired in both Brexit directions.  
Cool. Looks like more & more people are demanding a public vote on the final Brexit deal.  
Having sat on their hands over Brexit, Labour now try to steal credit from Dominic Grieve’s govt defeat  
Jeremy Hunt is all over the place. Last year he called for proper scrutiny and a referendum giving pple a final say on a #Brexit deal; on @BBCr4today he pretends the ‘meaningful vote’ for Parliament on the deal, forced through last night, didn’t happen 
Chris Grayling on @SkyNews pathetic. Trying to deflect blame for #Amendment7 defeat from Tory rebels to @UKLabour. Newsflash Chris it is the opposition’s job to oppose. Did you really think government would be allowed to decide on #Brexit deal based on record to date. #Remain 
Govt said referendum result would be final. Tory Remain rebels, most sacked ministers or overlooked for jobs, should remember that 
Theresa May and Brexiters will downplay yesterday...but this was the crack in the dam. All else will follow and we shall remember this vote as the beginning of the end of #Brexit #Amendment7 #FBPE #stopbrexit 
Parliament is reasserting itself against the state; Britain is having the debate on Brexit it should have had before the referendum @Law_and_Policy nails it  via @FT 
Fantastic to have support from @JuliaHB1 for a Referendum on the deal, the first Referendum on the actual facts of #Brexit  
Spain's Guardia Civil is now raiding the offices of a mail delivery service, looking for 'evidence' about the costs of the referendum, which we demanded that our political representatives hold.  #SpanishDemocracy 
The morning after the massive story of Theresa May’s defeat on #Article7 on #Brexit #r4today has in depth reports on:- the state of the Church of England- the size of wine glasses- the history of banking regulations 
READ | Apart from all the benefits Brexit will bring, the likes of Adonis need to consider the irreparable damage of pulling out. The man's a traitor, an agent of Brussels. He needs to be locked up.  
.@KateHoeyMP at our hustings in May you committed to support the Labour position on #brexit - how can you justify voting with the Tories last night on an amendment to give parliament more power over the process? @VauxhallLabour how can you justify your continued support for her? 
Sounds like Julia’s advocating referendum on a final deal.  
WATCH: British lawmakers vote to change Prime Minister Theresa May's blueprint for #Brexit to give themselves more power over the terms of withdrawal from the European Union.  via @ReutersTV 
Financial Times Survey: Banks' Brexit Relocations By March 2019 Much Lower Than Feared  
Are you advocating a referendum on any final deal, then, Julia? 
The goal would be to pay lecturers ‘to teach full time’. What about research? Where would teaching be if we simply relied on others to research and write the books and articles we teach from? No recognition of the UK’s research power, even with the threat posed by Brexit. /5 
NEW Nadine Dorries calls for Tory rebels to be deselected after Brexit vote defeat  
@AMDWaters .... being bullied and dumbed down ... Waking up this morning to this and brexit news... I am PISSED OFF !!!  
The Hard Right not the Hard Left is the wolf at the door. Brexit is its policy & the Tories who see this & resist will be applauded by history, like the ‘rebels’ in May 1940  
One of the striking things after last night’s vote were the smiles & laughter of Ministers who oppose a hard #Brexit 
"WILL NO DEAL MEAN NO BREXIT?" How the Remoaner Rump want to thwart #Brexit :  
Doesn't quite fit with your "take back control of our laws" line, if you hand control of lawmaking to... what, exactly? Referendum? Kangaroo Court? Telephone poll? Twitter feed? You and your chums mis-sold #brexit to the British People  
This government defeat on Brexit can now inspire other Tory rebels | Polly Toynbee  
The fight continues - stay angry and fight Brexit! Get 26 issues of The New European for just £30:  
it's called democracy Mr Dacre - wasn't "taking back control" what Brexit was all about? If you're unfamiliar with the idea of democracy, look it up.  
I may be wrong, but if we had PR, all the grievances that were inappropriately channelled through the binary Brexit ref could have been acknowledged in a more constructive way.  More parties representing more points of view. 
"As a Pakistani, as a result of regular report of referendum, the campaign against the Model town killers is started". #LawyersConventionOnMT 
Calling all #Tory Branches & Associations to de-select your MP candidate if they voted against the government in a bid to derail #BREXIT #Quislings 
Grieve fought to strengthen Parliament’s hand. That’s what Leave claimed Brexit was all about 18 months ago.May’s Govt - in Miller, in triggering #Art50, in calling election, in setting red lines, in approach to #EUWithdrawalBill - has been all about personal whim, will & win. 
Brexit: Tory rebels inflict major defeat on Theresa May  
Sacked Stephen Hammond on Nadine Dorries' call for Tory Brexit rebels to be deselected: "I make it a cardinal rule not to be rude about my colleagues in public and I'm not going to start now." #r4today 
@AMDWaters party #ForBritain has been kicked off Facebook for the heinous crime of telling the truth. Anne discusses the important topics of the day including the Brexit debacle.Please listen and like, she needs & deserves as much support as possible. 
Rebelling per se isn’t the problem.It’s being dishonest about the reasons why you are rebelling & being in denial about the impact on difficult intnational negotiations when it is crucial for the UK to present a united front.AND in context of a referendum.  
#Facebook have informed the Electoral Commission that they have found little evidence of any #Russian interference in the #Brexit referendum, with just $0.97 spent on 3 adverts. => Will PM @theresa_may now claim that #Russia interefered with less than 1$?? 
Last night the anti-Brexit parliamentary majority discovered a collective backbone. Just in time to stop this national self-mutiliation in 2018. 
The Daily Mail turns into the Daily Mail on steroids.#Amendment7 #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
Theresa May defeated in parliament over #Brexit blueprint, handing MPs more say over a final exit deal  
The anti Brexit vote in the Commons was nothing to do with democracy or parliamentary sovereignty. It was a vote to try to thwart to democratic vote of the electorate by Globalist MPs. 
You can apparently stay in May's government for lying, incompetence, gross misconduct and alleged sexual offences, however, not if you support parliamentary sovereignty. That's one hell of a red-line to stick to for #Brexit @theresa_may. 
So many great Labour MPs leading the fight against Brexit & doing sterling work for their constituencies. @ChukaUmunna @DavidLammy @YvetteCooperMP @stellacreasy @lucianaberger @hilarybennmp 
Concerned that some colleagues are seeking to frustrate Brexit dressed up as principle and that is regrettable. We should not be refighting the Referendum and I say this as someone who voted remain. 
Morning London, while you were sleeping this story about the Tory Brexit rebellion was our most read article  
How loudly Labour MP's cheered to the rafters at their success in setting back the Brexit we voted for. How they must love the EU. How much I despise them for arrogantly ignoring the will of their own supporters. 
“Career politicians like you, Mr Farage, MEP since the 1990s?”He falls back, completely astounded. My incredibly inventive and original Twitter quip has completely destroyed him, leading to the cancellation of Brexit and (cont. p84)  
Euro rebels YOU'VE REALLY PISSED OFF THE DAILY MAIL proud of yourselves? You should be #brexit @Anna_Soubry 
Three points of a shape1. Sufficient progress joint report (including paragraphs on Irish border re Single Market etc)2. European Parliament approving the report3. Last night's Commons voteThe final Brexit deal now likely to be a shape formed between these three points. 
Was the government bluffing about the existence of Brexit impact assessments? Read the factcheck:  
Julia makes a compelling case for a referendum on the final deal.#IAgreeWithJulia#AskThePeople if we want to #StopBrexit#r4today @LBC @Skynews @UKLabour 
Dear Remoaners, please read this  Let's get #Brexit sorted for the sake of our seas 
Desperate Remoaners are always looking to discredit the referendum result. In his first broadcast interview, watch  Brexit supporting former Head of MI6 Sir Richard Dearlove dismiss Remain claims about Russian interference in Brexit referendum.....  
”Former Swedish PM Carl Bildt warns on Brexit trade deal”. @BBCNews 
Britain's May urges EU leaders to move on with Brexit talks  
#Amendment7Sarah Wollaston voted for Amendment 7. She is the Conservative MP for Totnes. 53.9% voted LEAVE in Totnes.  Source on EUref Result: Referendum voting analysis by Chris Hanretty, Reader in Politics, University of East Anglia. 
The House Of Commons has taken control of Brexit away from Theresa Mayhem. 
PM Theresa May loses key Brexit vote in U.K. Parliament  
New guidelines on setting UK vice-chancellors’ pay are set to be debated amid warnings that the continuing furore over remuneration is undermining universities’ ability to fight their corner on key issues such as Brexit 
I think the next tactical voting campaign will be to punish the big parties for their Brexit lunacy, and drag politics from the headbanging far fringes back to the sensible middle ground.Reduce the size of the two main parties until the UK gets proportional representation. 
UK urgently needs Brexit transition deal, and more time after that, lawmakers say  
NINE YouGov polls since Aug asked:“In hindsight, do you think Britain was right or wrong to vote to leave the European Union”.The answers?NOT ONE of the nine polls has majority for “right”.It was wrong. Rebels are right to establish a #brexit checkpoint for parliament. 
#Amendment7 Nothing says Brexit fraud than Brexiteers arguing against parliament exercising its sovereignty. Another Brexit claim bites the dust  
Theresa May heads for a crucial #Brexit summit hours after crushing Commons defeat, plus memorial service to be held for six-month anniversary of Grenfell  
Good bit of cross party working, great to see. Shows just how toxic brexit is that *voting to give UK Parliament a meaningful vote* is branded disloyal.  
Italy's PM breaks ranks with EU with call for special Brexit trade deal with UK  
Simon Kuper: Brexit, Trump and a generation of incompetents  
'Meaningful vote': Theresa May suffered her first defeat over #Brexit in Parliament  
They should be very proud. But a long way to go in the battle for the future of Britain, the battle to defeat #Brexit and the pernicious attitudes and politics associated with it.  
Is Rs. 50 lakh fine enough to punish Narayana Junior Colleges?#AndhraPradesh #GujaratRound2 #NeerajVora #ThursdayThoughts #AdangaMaru #Vote4Jhadu #VoteCongress #PrajaSankalpaYatra #INSKalvari #HBDRanaDaggubati #GujaratElection2017 #JamesVince #Brexit #SurjitBhalla #Amarnath 
"Brexit negotiations" the old school way would be focused on cementing an alliance with Poland, Hungary, and the Czechs. 
Members of Parliament have voted in favor of lawmakers approving the final Brexit deal and the UK's withdrawal from the EU  
I met Dominic Grieve QC at the CCRC conference in London a very principled and intelligent  man. He stood up to the bullies of Westminster in regards brexit and stood up for his country. Top man in my opinion. 
Proud of Yourselves? 
UK Parliament demands greater say over #Brexit, defying PM Theresa May in narrow vote.  
Not one shred of truth in that entire statement That rag wouldn't know the truth if it fell over itThe one thing Brexit has taught me is that the whip system has no place in democracy MPs should be given a free vote on all the issues & it should NOT be made public or monitored 
Thank You for welcoming @realDonaldTrump, Tony!Did the UK notice that Winston made it back in @WhiteHouse ?Well wishes on #brexit !!#MAGAMarchForJustice 
The entitled Brexit generation who've benefitted from the EU, immigration and job security, vote against what made them rich because they don't like brown faces.  
BREAKING: BRITISH PARLIAMENT FACED DOWN PM THERESA MAY AND SAID “NO” TO EXITING BREXIT-Parliament & the British people RULE-Not PM May & the PC police #RuleBrittania #BREXIT #YesBREXIT #EnglandForever #MAGA #MBGA #tcot 
Can we deselect you instead? You barely have any time for your constituents and have married yourself to the hardest Brexit possible. Don't try to lecture anyone on decency, Nadine. You're a national joke who sells out at every opportunity. Dominic Grieve and co are heroes. 
Perhaps I am a little slow on the up take but did the Brexiteers actually think that we'd all get behind Brexit? You can't be serious. 
May defeated in parliament over Brexit blueprint  
My statement on tonight's House of Commons vote:MPs should consider the consequences of their actions. Brexit is backed by a referendum, a General Election, and an Act of Parliament. Does anything in history have a stronger democratic mandate? #Amendment7 
You mean the ones who votes for Brexit?!?!  
1. ‘Of course EU residents didn’t get a vote. GE rules apply.' They say as they happily deny the vote to people here for decades, working, taxpaying, with family.But it wasn’t a GE. It was an advisory referendum. So it didn’t need a supermajority. 
So Labour MPs Kate Hoey & Frank Field voted WITH the Tory government, and against a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. 
Theresa may suffers humilating defeat as an Amendment is carried out to EU Bill with help of Rebel Conservative MPs which mandates any final Brexit Deal shall be subject to statutory approval by British Parliament. In a sense the MPs have a VETO now over will of the people.  
Ireland and Brexit: Five things you need to know  
Sorry Dave, you lost all credibility, with your begging-bowl rounds to #EU table; remainer lies, £9m waste of taxpayers money to scare people to vote remain, & after promising 'if Brexit won', you'd invoke Article-50 next day, you *Bottled-it* So, butt-out. #DJT is great. #MAGA 
U.K. lawmakers have given Parliament veto power on the Brexit deal  
Outcome be dammed, but hopefully no one turns this into a referendum on the trade... right? 
When the Brexit talks go poorly, Cervantes, Montaigne, and Lope de Vega mock me without pity.When Brexit talks go well ... I know not. 
Iranian Kurdistan: Solidarity for the Independence Referendum Harshly Sentenced @UNPOintl  
Members of Parliament have voted in favor of lawmakers approving the final Brexit deal and the UK's withdrawal from the EU  
Anti-Brexit skirmishes will continue to trouble the Govt but more importantly PM May will face more challenges to her leadership. As the Govt continues to be destabilised, PM May will become vulnerable to defeat. It wouldn’t be inconceivable for a GE to be held in Spring 2018 
Second referendum then Nigel, 'cause 52/48 was always unfinished business, remember?  
UK urgently needs Brexit transition deal, and more time after that, lawmakers say  
Theresa May suffered a serious defeat for her key Brexit law  
#NBReferendum18  Excited to announce the www.nbreferendum18 web site for all the information on the March 13, 2018 special referendum.#BetterSchoolsBetterChoice.  Please take some time and review the information so you can cast an informed vote in March. 
Brexit: Theresa May to meet with EU27 hours after crushing Commons defeat  
Great result for Parliamentary sovereignty last night.Which is, of course, exactly what Brexiteers said voting to quit the EU was what they wanted to preserve. Careful what you wish for Brexit bill: Government loses key vote 
David Cameron scammed the people of this country in his bid to crush Ed Miliband; Nigel Farage and Bill  Cash. He knew that referenda in the UK are not legally binding, but he didn't think he'd lose. Now others are left to address  his  mess.#Brexit  
End of Brexit. Sanity prevails. Now it's just a question of how long the sigh of relief takes. There was never going to be a Brexit. It was based on lies peddled by fools and liars and a conspiracy against the public interest. 
Facebook ads linked to Russian agency accused of 'helping' #Brexit referendum cost $0.97 
As the @DailyMailUK produces yet another disgraceful front page for tomorrow - was just reminded of two previous covers that don't look so smart now... #Brexit  
8. Still having no agreement within own cabinet let alone party what final #Brexit looks like 9. Still not firing Johnson, Davies, Green — too weak 10. Still not preparing public that next phase is talks on trade deal not actual talks for trade deal 
Lol, I actually thought you said: “Brexit may need to be rethought...”  
Referendum was advisory. It's up to #Parliament to accept advice. They chose to, now they'll do what they see fit.  This a parliamentary democracy, governed by Parliament, not plebiscite. Pls study how the UK works.Enlightening.The "will of the voters"- is to have a Parliament! 
My statement on tonight's House of Commons vote: MPs should consider the consequences of their actions. Brexit is backed by a referendum, a General Election, and an Act of Parliament. Does anything in history have a stronger democratic mandate? #Amendment7  
You voted Brexit because you thought it was good for the UK?Well... "Brexit" changes with every clause in the agreement, every penny on the bill, every trade barrier....So if you aren't keeping a close eye on whether it's STILL good for UK, that is not patriotic...#Amendment7 
I am elated to see Theresa May and the #MadBrexiteers defeated over #Brexit  
It's partly because of  the arrogance of people like this lot that 17.4 m of us voted for #Brexit in the first place  
This government defeat on Brexit can now inspire other Tory rebels. Remainers need to stand up for parliamentary democracy. Just 12 MPs voting with their conscience can make a huge difference. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Aye @RuthDavidsonMSP answer me this - how can your Scottish tory MPs be representing Scotland when Scotland voted 62% Remain, yet your useless 13 have consistently voted against our interests in #Brexit votes at WM ? Why are they there - not for us obviously   
The "BTP" effect – Brexit-Trump-Putin – has created a powerful impetus for deeper EU integration. @carlbildt 
Theresa May has sacked Stephen Hammond remarkably quickly.Damien Green still in his post.Boris Johnson still in his post.Philip Hammond still in his post.#Amendment7 #Brexit #ToriesOut 
This is just marvellous news! Can today get better? High profile Brexit Ultra @JuliaHB1 calls for a referendum on the Brexit deal. A #FinalSayForAll 
This is quite incredible. Adonis called tonight the first step in the defeat of Brexit. Nick Timothy tells him to dream on. Soubry then reveals her true colours..  Perfidy at its best.  
People just didn't understand the referendum.Some of them thought it was to get rid of Muslims. Some of them thought it was about leaving the Single Market.This poor lady thought she was voting to abolish parliamentary democracy.  
It’s because I understand democracy that I say it. Most of our MPs do not want Brexit and will do anything to stop it. Asking the people was a big mistake in their eyes. 
A legal marijuana referendum will be on the Cook County ballot in March 
Those 11 Tory MPs want to derail Brexit. Apart from Ken Clarke, none of them are being honest in their intentions. Instead they try to hide behind the "putting the country first" line. I don't believe you; neither does the majority of the country. They have tied the PM's hands.  
Apparently the ballot paper for #Brexit also included an entirely new mob based system of government, which I apparently missed  
The broader absurdity of the Brexit debacle notwithstanding, this vote is another ocassion to remark that Westminster parliamentary system > presidential system. Strong legislatures over strong executives make for healthier democracies.  
Watch our exclusive interview with former MI6 head Sir Richard Dearlove on Brexit, Trump, and terrorism on YouTube:  
Hey people, here comes The Victory Bus - how far can we drive it? RT  #Amendment7 #Brexit #Brexshit #StopBrexit #No10Vigil #SODEM @TheNewEuropean @EUflagmafia @WalesForEurope @Mcr4EU @acgrayling @4Worcestershire @Gwentforeurope @HaveWeLeft @mk1969 @spaceangel1964 pic.twitter.com/XbCkRMsHvQ 
Many British businesses are clamouring to stay under EU rules even after Brexit. Here's why:  
We're going to stop Brexit! (sighs... no you're not.) That's the end of Brexit! (sighs... no it isn't.) Repeat until early 2021. 
Through a second referendum then? That or parliament. Parliament won, you lost, get over it!  
I'm not a Sinn Féin supporter but can you imagine the look on @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 's face if SF took their seats to block brexit in alliance with UK Labour #Amendment7Absolutely Priceless... 
Yes it is obvious. The authorisation of Art. 50 notification was not procedurally correct: because Parliament has never held any debate on a motion to leave the EU. There has been no democratic decision. A referendum vote is not a decision: Parliament is sovereign. 
They're not voting "against the referendum". they voted 2 stop a handful f individuals frm making unilateral decision about what they think is right 4 the UK, rather than taking the decision 2 the Parliament. Isn't that what leavers wanted? To take back sovereignty? 
Julia Hartley-Brewer accidentally declares support for a referendum on the #brexit deal vs Remain.  
Great news I look forward to our #FinalSay to either Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit..At least 50% of us now want it..& the numbers will grow. Glad you support it. 
My joint effort with @paulmcgrade in the News Letter today on the need now for UK to get real about post Brexit border governance.Inc. that UK/EU FTA wd not be enough to avoid hard borders & that border controls aren't  optional but subject to intl law.  
Can we take a minute to remember that it's this smug ******* who's got us into this whole sorry mess.He never imagined Leave would win so never planned for it and then threw his toys out of the pram as soon as they did. Thanks, Dave.  #Amendment7 #brexit  
11 self-consumed malcontents,17.4 Brexit voters,1 slippy rug,And a Marxist partridge in a pear tree.   
What Scotland has to remember is that we didn’t vote for their Brexit and want nothing whatsoever to do with it. Anything that makes it less likely is in line with what we want as a nation. 
'Leave right away!' Brexit petition calling for May to ABANDON negotiations signed by 70k  
Britain has much to lose from Brexit, and nothing to gain.Growing awareness of the damaging terms of Brexit have led to a rise in support for a second referendum, says leader of biggest EU party. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
In Brexit Britain, saboteurs crush you  
So you’re saying you want a second referendum.  
MP’s holding govt to account = mutineers Judges holding govt to account  = enemies of the people Doctors trying to ensure govt held to account  = militantsThe people voting (& trying to hold govt to account)  = saboteurs #Amendment7 #Brexit  
When the press intimidate and bully our elected representatives for - more or less - voting with their conscience, they lose the argument that the government must always respect the independence and freedom of the press. No matter your stance on Brexit.  
These are the men that should be leading the Labour Party@ChukaUmunna@DavidLammy Well done for continuing to speak out against Brexit. 
Hey #Theresa!!!!Guess what?!?!WE DIDN'T WRITE YOUR GOVERNMENT A BLANK CHEQUE ON #BREXIT.Looks like someone is going to have to rethink their strategy...Good luck!#StopBrexit 
“I see this more as an opportunity than a disaster” says former MI6 head Sir Richard Dearlove on Brexit. He has written an open letter to President Macron for @prospect_uk 
No, they represent the whole country. You voted leave - well done, you won a narrow referendum, but you don't get your own way for the next ten years. Democracy moves on 
You had to vote for an MP in 2015 to give (or attempt to prevent) the last government the mandate to hold the referendum in the first place. That's how it works. 
To paraphrase: 'People who voted for the UK Parliament to "take back control" betrayed by MPs who voted for Parliament to [attempt to] take back [some degree of] control over Brexit.'  
""Experts” claim this is a referendum on President Trump. However, that's just not true. Polls show that the majority of Alabamians support President Trump. We remain a pro-Trump state. We just don't like Roy Moore." A conservative Alabamian's take:  
Good of Julia to call for a referendum on the final Brexit agreement like this.  
Mmmm, careful, Tim.   My speech and argument was sincere.  I’m 100% reconciled to Brexit: but not one that divides, alienates, impoverishes or deepens distrust in our Parliament. We HAVE to do it Properly & Transparently to build trust.  That is NOT trying to stop it.  
Yes but the question was too broad. It was a populist question from a govt scared that UKIP would be taking seats from them so they rushed a referendum. I respect the result of the poll but not if it means national Suicide. Parliament must act in the best interests of the nation. 
Nonsense. You wanted sovereignty for parliament, did you not? Now our parliament will help shape Brexit! 
Our struggle is not just against #Brexit it's a struggle to defend our democracy against those who are using Brexit to attack the fundamental democratic right to oppose. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
We have to ask ourselves, what's more likely: hardcore remain MPs suddenly care about parliamentary democracy (after 44 years of happily watching EU regulations completely bypass Parliament), or that they want to scupper Brexit? 
They should have bloody well accepted that after the election. Theresa May could not have been clearer that she went to the country to get a mandate for Brexit. She didn't get it. Then she ignored the electorate. No wonder we're in this crashing mess.Cloth ears. #FBPE 
Once again @DailyMailUK starts its bullying campaign... their front page tomorrow asks if these Tory MPs are proud of themselves?Surely the answer is obvious? Yes Proud to have voted w/ them to protect parliamentary democracy#Amendment7 #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
This @DailyMailUK hysteria is a thing to behold. It’s not going to block Brexit fgs, just make it a softer landing  
Nick is a good man but too generous here. His colleagues say one thing but mean another. They are trying to stop #Brexit and their hiding behind clever devices to undermine the referendum result doesn’t deserve an ounce of respect.  
Yes. Proud to #TakeBackControl for our Parliament, where there is no majority for a chaotic no-deal Brexit.  
The ref in #TaylorMcCaskill is clearly pro #brexit . Being a proper dick to KT! #YouIrish 
Hooray!! Brexit now in hands of whole Parliament, not just May's Govt. Proper Xmas present.[YouTube version] 
No, we didn't need to vote for an MP to vote in the EU referendum, did we? 
We have our say by voting in the MP's. How else can 'the people' have our say, have a referendum on every decision? 
Second referendum then please!... 
This is awful. The press have no right to question a democratic vote in parliament like this. Very sinister to single out some MPs. May needs to stamp down on these rags. #conservatives #Brexit @theresa_may 
And, as a final thought before bed, on a rare good day for parliamentary democracy and UK public life: Brexit Ultras, you lost. Get over it. And get used the idea of it happening a lot more in the future. 17/17 
The government shouldn’t have to act on the international stage knowing that it lacks full authority. Remainers are siding with the EU, against Britain, in order to thwart Brexit.   
Thus says a career politician horrified by the realisation that Arron Bank's money (let us not ask where it came from) and all the lies and hate of the Brexit billionaire press could not put a good fascist end to democratic contention over Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
British lawmakers defeat May's government on Brexit law  
“You are going to hear this new phrase… BREXINOS - people who want Brexit in name only” says @BernardJenkin #newsnight 
Very proud of the Brexit HEROES who helped Parliament take back control.  
Essence of why we voted to leave: the politician no Brit voted for who opposes the people’s referendum passes judgment on what’s good for British democracy.  
The BBC are keen at the moment on pushing the line that the SNP manifesto said they would protect the basic rate of income tax.Not so keen on pointing out that it also promised a referendum on indepenence if we were dragged out if the EU against our will. 
The Government has suffered its first defeat on key Brexit legislation after 11 Tory MPs staged a rebellion to demand a "meaningful" vote on any divorce deal with the EU  
“I see this more as an opportunity than a disaster” - former MI6 head Sir Richard Dearlove on Brexit #newsnight 
Weak, weak, weak. Too weak to govern. General election February 2018?PM Theresa May loses key Brexit vote in U.K. Parliament  
The blatant lies of May and the other right wing Brexiters are perverting & undermining our democracy. Without a shared ground of truth there can be no trust & no debate, only yelling, anger, insults & ultimately violence.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
“I’m not very concerned about knives being out for me” - Dominic Grieve MP says the right thing is to carry out Brexit in an orderly and sensible way  #newsnight 
Tomorrows Daily Mail on those #brexit rebels that disregarded the Nations interests tonight.  
UK business lobbyists constantly say we need certainty re a #Brexit plan so I await the concern over events today where the gov “deal” seen as +ve yesterday is now more uncertain.  
This also dispels the biggest worry for COM/EU27, which was that Brexit Ultras who want UKGov to walk away from talks ultimately had a hold on May, and were driving UKGov policy. 5/ 
No, you didn't.You put 2 things above the UK.1) The unelected foreign drunkards who wish to enslave our people.2) Your own self-importance, given you have been, & will be, irrelevant without Brexit.#ShameOnYou 
Things that can get you sacked from the Conserative Party- Having Porn on a work computer? No- Lying about the Brexit Impact Papers, negligence and incompetence? Nope- Racism? Nope- Claims of Sexual Harassment? Nope- Voting for a bill that supports democracy? Yes! 
I cant wait for those celebrating tonights defeat to realise that they have now increased the chances of a no deal #BrexitWell done for putting your selfish interests before those of the nation.  
"Just slagging people off and calling us mutineers and traitors and all the rest of it is not acceptable"After Theresa May's defeat on key Brexit legislation, Conservative MP Anna Soubry insists "the mood in the country is changing"  
“This is the moment when the government needs to accept there is no majority in this parliament for a hard Brexit” - senior Remain figure has told @nicholaswatt #newsnight 
Little tip for EU negotiations: if those you’re negotiating with think your position is more legitimate, they are more likely to listen to it.Tonight’s vote means May has to listen to Parliament, and her position is hence more legitimate.#Brexit  
This dreadful woman & failed Minister @NickyMorgan01 wants to derail #Brexit. Let her know what you think of her. I think she’s an evil anti-democrat. 
3 thoughts of the day from the perspective of sunny Tokyo this morning at a conference on Brexit & Trump: (1) Corbyn whipping Labour to support the Tories on Brexit is a disgrace (2) Farage’s hissy fit fearing the end of Brexit cheers one up, as does (3) the news from Alabama. 
The Guardian front page, Thursday 14.12.17: Tory rebellion humiliates PM on Brexit bill  
Is the Government Brexit defeat a game-changer?One Labour MP said Ken Clarke told him and his colleagues: “This proves there’s a majority for soft Brexit.” Read the @garygibbonblog: 
'They should never be MPs again' Dorries calls for Brexit Tory rebels to be DESELECTED.   
If #Amendment7 had not been passed this evening Britain would no longer be a parliamentary democracy. This applies irrespective of anyone's perspective on the desirability of Brexit.   #newsnight 
Toby Young, Jacob Rees Mogg, Boris Johnson, John Redwood, Bill Cash, Nadine Dorries, Julia Hartley Brewer, Paul Dacre, Rupert Murdoch, Tony Parsons, Rod Liddle, Julie Burchill & Michael Gove -its almost as if #brexit is a tool to enable identification of the very worst in society 
Is this the turning point? Is our voice starting to be heard where it matters? Time will tell, but yes, our first, small but significant, victory in the long fight to stop #Brexit does feel good. Now we move onto the next battle with renewed belief!  
Absolutely perfect analysis. A 'transition' will see the UK leave in name only as we will have in effect re-acceded to obeying ALL EU law after Brexit. It will make the UK a vassal state and see what's left of our fishing industry put to death. May & her Remainers are quislings.  
Watch the moment Theresa May was defeated by her own MPs in humiliating Brexit vote  
if any MP who voted the opposite of their constituency on the EU referendum then the constituency should seek legal advice on how to start proceeding to have their MP de-selected as they are failing to support their constituency  Betrayal by MP's should never be allowed  
Tomorrow's front page:Revenge of the rebels● MPs win right to final vote on Brexit ● Drama as senior Tory sacked ● May undermined before Brussels trip#tomorrowspaperstoday 
Nadine Dorries Rages At 'Treacherous' Tory MPs After Brexit RebellionConveniently forgetting the 47 times she rebelled against her own party and confirming a career long tendency of talking complete bollocks.  
Today's the day that keeps givingFoodbank at AnfieldFoodbank at St James Park Brexit voteGood to touch base with our Geordie comrades. Fingers crossed that you get the club you deserve.#HungerDoesntWearClubColours 
So proud of all of you! See @ulrikeguerot what our UK pro-EU friends reached. Thanks for your support!Tory Brexit rebels inflict major defeat on Theresa MayMPs on both sides of Commons back amendment promising them a decisive vote on final Brexit deal! 
Never forget - we did this by voting Labour at the last election. If Theresa May had got the 100 seat majority she wanted, the Tories would have been able to force through an unaccountable hard #Brexit. #Amendment7 
Control and the final say on #brexit is now back where it belongs in Parliament. Well done to the MPs who followed their principles. Shame on those who abstained #Amendment7 #brexitbill #EUWithdrawalBill 
Tonight: @UKLabour joined with hard-line @Conservatives Remainers to derail BrexitAll the MPs who let the EU write our laws for years, claim that ‘Parliament now prevails’The irony is Orwellian The effect is anti-democratic 
Only 12 brave Tories stood up for parliamentary sovereignty tonight. Why wouldn't May give a vote to let MPs scrutinise and amend the final Brexit deal? Rarely such a well-deserved defeat: my instant take 
"I find your lack of Brexit faith disturbing"  
Don't be fooled by people saying #Amendment7 is about parliamentary sovereignty.It's really just about trying to stop Brexit.  
So relieved we won the vote to have scrutiny of Brexit deal. It’s not right that a national referendum is only acted on by a handful of Tory Ministers, everyone needs to be represented 
Any Conservative MPs who voted against the government on #Amendment7 - including Dominic Grieve, Stephen Hammond, Kenneth Clarke and Anna Soubry - should be deselected as they have betrayed the will of the British people and clearly cannot accept a full #Brexit happening. 
Disgraceful.  It is NOT their Brexit, it is ours the People's.  We instructed them to deliver whatever we decided which was #Leave.  They are trying to railroad it.  I will NEVER trust MPs again. 
Hugely important result tonight. Theresa May defeated on her Brexit Bill  attempts to bypass parliamentary scrutiny. #Amendment7 will ensure a meaningful vote on any final Brexit deal. #EUWithdrawalBill 
How dare they threaten the Brexit chaos...  
The remoaners have trapped themselves now . If they refuse the Brexit deal,we leave with no deal at all,which is preferable to any deal the EU  will offer.  
TELEGRAPH: Mutiny in the Commons blows up storm for May’s Brexit talks #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Not a Tory but incredibly proud of my MP Dominic Grieve today! #DominicGrieve #brexit 
Everyone? I voted to Leave the EU. You are clearly working to stop #Brexit. How dare you claim to act in my interest.  
The mood is definitely changing.More MP’s now calling for a new referendum. The Govt has lied and deceived too much,people are angry with them and want the chance to stop their madness. 
Government suffers Brexit vote defeat on EU Withdrawal Bill  
@BBCScotlandNews FFS leads with 'a Scottish Tory abstained' on the Brexit amendment Honestly!!! Nothing about the SNP MPs that voted For the Amendment or the 12 Torys that voted against,  BBC is ridiculously biased #bbcbias 
'Let’s be clear about what is happening here: Britain’s cultural and media elites are cheering an unelected oligarchy as it seeks to weaken the democratic cry of their own fellow citizens.'Brendan O'Neill on the moral crusade against Brexit 
Parliament has taken back control of Brexit! #Amendment7 #BrexitBill 
The Brexit dam has been broken and the "will of the people" nonsense swept away. We are no longer under the thumb of charlatans, liars and conmen. 
More Remainers have changed their minds than Brexit voters! Many people have seen the truth about the EU since referendum day! Corrupt and controlling! 
.@MarkHDurkan & I met with the Head of the Civil Service this evening to raise:details of 1% pay rise to health workers, need for a decent public sector pay rise, urgency of releasing payments to victims of abuse, legacy, mental health, Brexit & political decision making by NICS 
This week phase I concluded with a soft #brexit and Parliament got its vote on the final deal. I have blocked more bots than in all my time on twitter. Someone panicking? 
The House of Commons hears the result of a vote that means British MPs will have a "meaningful vote" on the Brexit withdrawal deal  
'Leave right away!' Brexit petition calling for May to ABANDON negotiations signed by 70k  
No, I think their ideal outcome is to keep us exactly as we are now only without representation in Brussels. Sadly, there are some British MPs who, whether from ignorance or annoyance at the referendum, will help them. 
In case you missed it this is what happened on the Theresa May Tory Govt Brexit vote tonight   
Today these tory rebels gave parliament, and so the people, a say over what kind of Brexit we get. Bravo @dominicgrieve @Anna_Soubry @KennethClark @heidiallen75 @JonathanDjanogly @StephenHammond @SirOliverHeald @NickyMorgan01 @RobertNeil @Sandbach @JohnStevensonMP @sarahwollaston 
March primary ballot to include advisory referendum asking Cook County voters if recreational marijuana use should be legalized in Illinois  
Truth be told, its very unlikely that an abortion referendum which seeks abortion on demand up to 12 weeks as sought by the #8thCommittee would pass through the Dáil never mind the country. 
FT BREXIT PAGE ONE: Banks defy gloomy Brexit forecasts with plans to shift just 6% of jobs #tomorrowspaperstoday 
(whispers)there will be no brexit eventually everyone will agree to pretend it never happened  
Rubbish. A few tories finally show some backbone on Brexit - a mess of their own making - and you want to break out the medals? Get real. I’m pleased they rebelled but if this rebellion hastens the downfall of this Tory govt one day I’ll cheer hard.  
I am really pleased with tonight’s vote but what the UK needs is to cancel Brexit and restore its place in the world as a forward looking inclusive society that drives EU policy for good. 
“Britain will be WORSE OFF out of the EU under ALL Brexit scenarios"   via @LondonEconomic 
They keep saying Parliamentary approval is necessary because we live in a 'representative democracy'.Just who are MPs representing? It's certainly not their constituents.#A7 #amendment7 #brexitbill #brexit #newsnight #democracy #BrexitVote #bbcdp #r4today #lbc #labour #tories 
Brexit is happening and we must allow our Prime Minister to get on and get the best deal for Britain. 
All those right-wingers demanding deselection of rebel MPs on Brexit should:(a) remember the wrecking history of Euroscepticism(b) recall their past arguments on parliamentary sovereignty(c) look up the meaning of hypocrisy 
I'm mostly a Labour voter.But honestly, the Tory rebels have my respect tonight.It must be hard to stand up for what's right, when your party wants you to lie down for narrow political advantage.Time for Labour to do what's right too: oppose Brexit. 
Not one Tory MP from Scotland - a country that voted Remain - amongst the Tories who rebelled tonight to ensure elected Parliament’s role enhanced re Brexit. 
Don’t often agree with Lord Adonis but this renaming of the Brexit Bill is first class.  
A bad 24 hours for right-wing American & British nationalists (Alabama & Brexit). Here's hoping the fightback continues.  
David Cameron had a plan: hold a referendum to end Tory in-fighting over Europe. Here's my latest update on how it's going:  
Strange that. I was sure 52% had voted for Brexit. 
Fantastic quote tonight from Brexit rebel Stephen Hammond  
No; I was trying to get Tantalotoo to take his blinkers off for a sec. If you took #Brexit out of the equation, nobody would ever accept the way the Tories have run rough-shod over parliament. Sadly, most brexiters can't see beyond *Brexit* so are blind to the harm being done. 
By meaningful vote, you mean veto. That is a betrayal of the 77% of Tory constituencies that voted Leave. You have emboldened Barnier & weakened the UK in Brexit talks. Well done! 
Stand tall Theresa May. Vast majority of #Conservative MPs & members are behind you tonight. No pathetically small amount of egotistical Tory rebels or opportunistic #Labour MPs will stop you & the gov delivering in the national interest. #ImWithMay #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit 
Significant - but would have liked the same devotion to democracy to have inspired a similar Tory rebellion on powers of devolved parliaments when debated last week.....Government loses key Brexit bill vote after Tory rebellion - BBC News  
I'll say it again. It's quite simple.The last 18 months have been one long process of the political class and the left trying to sabotage & annul two democratic votes (Brexit & Trump).Let the history books show this. 
Theresa May’s position after tonight’s defeat is no longer tenable. Tory MPs have rightly rebelled against her, making her weak and no longer trusted to lead the country & Brexit. #Amendment7 
Wilshere just sent Noble back to the Brexit vote 
Theresa May suffered her first major legislative defeat on Wednesday over Brexit. Here's what it means:  
The oddest thing is environmentalists applauding Remainer efforts to keep us in the EU. The EU’s Common Agricultural and Fisheries policies have absolutely wrecked our natural environment. #Brexit is the best opportunity for environmental regeneration we’ve ever had. 
The Republic of Ireland has set out plans to quintuple the number of higher education students learning a foreign language over the next decade as it prepares for Brexit 
12 Tory MPs rebelled against the government to secure a veto on #Brexit. The full list is: Dominic GrieveAnna SoubryKen ClarkeNicky MorganJohn StevensonBob NeillStephen HammondSir Oliver HealdSarah WollastonJonathan DjanoglyAntoinette SandbachHeidi Allen 
Tomorrow's front page: Tories are defeated by the Rebel Alliance as MPs join together to force vote on Brexit bill #TheLastJedi 
What did you hope to achieve by this? If parliament vetos a deal it will be an automatic no deal. You won’t be stopping brexit whatever your new Corbynite pals think. All you’ve really done is undermine us in front of the EU. So thanks for that.  
Now this is a development... the @Daily_Express actually now admitting that Brexit was a mistake.  
An advisory referendum that Parlt always intended should come back to itself to decide. Govt had no right to say it would implement the result. That was for Parlt to decide. Tonight Parlt took its sovereignty back.  
Let’s just put Claude in charge of Brexit and we can all sleep easy #TheApprentice 
I found it difficult to sleep last night, thinking about how our flawed system of government has been subverted and hijacked by extreme Brexit supporters. I will sleep a bit better tonight. Thanks to the MPs who stood up for what's right. #EUWithdrawalBill 
It only goes to show how vindictive & authoritarian your Govt has become...thank you for standing by your principles...I hope having done right by your country if not your Govt, you continue to keep all #Brexit/#StopBrexit options open...thank you. 
Very well said Nadine. They are traitors. Why? Because they have given the EU the upper hand in the Brexit negotiations & stuck their proverbial two fingers up to 17.4m people, including those in the 77% of Tory constituencies that voted Leave.  
Steve Bell on Theresa May's Brexit defeat – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Pfff. Foolishly listening to BBC Radio 5 reporting the #Brexit vote.All framed as Theresa May losing her authority prior to tomorrow’s summit.NO.This is about the government not listening to Parliament, and being defeated as a result. 
Why shouldn't there be a movement to stop Brexit?  People don't want it to happen, and voted against it.  We are then entitled to fight against it, in the same way the movement to leave the E.U was started. 
The executive has repeatedly behaved like a dictatorship on Brexit. Tonight, thanks to brave and principled Conservative MPs, our sovereign Parliament rose for representative democracy. #StopBrexit 
Very telling that not a single @ScotTories MP stood up to the government on this #Brexit vote tonight  
Once the hysteria dies away, people might start to realise that May's deal last week and tonight's vote mean we are on course for the pragmatic, orderly Brexit most British voters want. 
Living in Scotland watching England make most of the vital decisions for you, I get a sense of what it must have been like as a suffragette, watching the men folk make all the big decisions. #brexit 
Remember this: Not one single Scottish Tory MP voted against keeping the terms of the final #Brexit deal entirely under control of the Conservative government, or to enable the UK Parliament having any say. Party comes first. They are no democrats. 
When Guy Verhofstadt is cheering at the outcome of a vote on Brexit you know you've fucked up.Take note, @UKLabour and moron Tory rebels. 
Tory MP “This vote was either about ego or about indulging those who hate the public for voting Brexit. They should be ashamed of themselves for lining up with Corbyn & his hateful brand of socialism. The people voted for Brexit & parliament should respect the will of the people” 
Given @theresa_may has just sacked this chap instantly for voting against #Brexit never, ever, question her loyalty to the public to deliver #Brexit  
Govt suffers Brexit defeat amid Tory rebellion on EU Withdrawal BillMay reacts. Rebel MP Stephen Hammond sacked as Tory vice-chair. So there you have it May thows her toys out the pram. 
Oh, we are, Timothy, we are! Brexit promised a mansion but is turning out to be a public inconvenience.Brexit was mis-sold.People are changing their minds as the truth emerges & more would now vote for Remain.Sorry! Democracy, innit! #FinalSay#NoPointBrexit 
Tory Brexit rebels inflict major defeat on Theresa May  Yay! What else is there to say? Very good news 
Stephen Hammond sacked as vice chair of Conservative Party after rebelling in key #Brexit vote  
Prime Minister, @Theresa_May, suffered a major defeat in the Commons tonight when MPs voted to curb government powers on #Brexit – something she definitely didn’t want. Read and share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
An embarrassment for May - especially on eve of that historic EU Brexit summit - but not a disaster  
All this democracy, kinda makes you wonder why we (the UK) voted Brexit in the first place....  
Tonight you did us proud Mr Grieve! You spoke to our conference in October and gave us hope and now we see the fruits of your labours. We thank you. @_Britain4Europe #Brexit  
Theresa May loses Commons Brexit vote - Parliament has taken back control. The final Brexit deal will have to be approved by Parliament.#EUWithdrawalBill 
Actually, I don't think it will make much difference to her credibility. The EU have always known that (1) the PM is weak; (2) anyone else would be worse; and (3) the Westminster parliament, emasculated after the referendum, will support the Article 50 treaty in the end.  
Opinion: The Government's Brexit defeat reveals there is a majority in the Commons for a soft Brexit  
But, perhaps ironically, the degree of control Parliament can assert over the Brexit terms is itself limited by Article 50 - which, of course, Parliament authorised the Government to trigger earlier this year.  /ends 
How come so many people in Britain are so afraid of no-deal #Brexit ? The EU has a huge positive annual trade balance with the UK and its economy will simply collapse if it loses it. So telling Brussels to go fuck itself is a great option. 
Some people losing the plot this evening. Parliament voted to have a say on Brexit. It didn't vote against Brexit. Most of the rebels, and a significant number of Labour MPs, won't vote to block Brexit and precipitate an election. 
The Brexit rebellion is an embarrassment for Theresa May, not a disaster says Robert Peston:  
The Tory MPs who defied the Govt and Brexit today: #Brexit #Amendment7 
Very disappointing. @katehoeymp told the Vauxhall Labour Party AGM last month that she wouldn’t rebel against Jeremy Corbyn whip on Withdrawal Bill. We all know Kate’s supports for Brexit but this vote was about Parliament taking back control.  
No you didn’t Anna. I represent 7.5 million people in the NW the majority voted for Brexit ! So who are you talking about ? Seems to me more like ‘revenge’ on your part - sadly ! 
Tory MP: “The fig leaf has gone. They got the concessions they were asking for but still turned their noses up at it. No one can now pretend they aren’t out to scupper Brexit.” 
A petition to MPs calling for Theresa May to abandon the #Brexit negotiations and pull Britain out of the EU immediately has attracted more than 70,000 signatures.  
The Tories have sacked their own vice-chairman after he helped defeat the Government over Brexit  
Sad day when MPs are sacked for doing what they think is right for the country. Government must be stopped from imposing their botched Brexit without giving Parliament and British people a say  
For some Brexiteers, having anything but the most hardline position on Brexit is increasingly treated almost like a criminal act.  
Well that’s interesting, so now the HoCs has the same say as the European Parliament on the Brexit deal. How about giving that say to those who started all of this? The British people! 
Barnier is now negotiating with the House of Commons as the PM @Number10gov has been effectively rendered impotent. Chances of a no deal #brexit have gone up having gone down last week. 
Old enough to remember Foreign Secretary pushing own Brexit terms week before May's Florence speech. So don't gimme this "undermines PM in Brussels" guff. 
Brexit Government forced to add democracy to Brexit. What a win for the British people and a slap in the face to these Brexit powergrabbers  
Brexit supporters moaning about British MPs using their own vote in a sovereign parliament: so delicious, so very delicious. 
Theresa May LOSES Brexit battle: Tory TRAITORS willing to Destroy the UK to save EU    @heidiallen75 @Anna_Soubry @NickyMorgan01 @sarahwollaston @S_Hammond @neill_bob Dominic Grieve Ken Clarke @OliverHealdUK @JDjanogly @Sandbach 
Wilshere just sent Noble back to phase one of the Brexit negotiations 
One of the *constant* complaints about the EU in the UK for decades was that EU membership constrained parliamentary sovereignty.No Brexiteer can deny that.Tonight parliament reasserted itself. Hence any Brexiteer opposing Grieve’s amendment is a hypocrite.#Brexit 
To those insisting that Amendment 7 was merely about parliamentary scrutiny should reflect on the fact that the people celebrating most vociferously tonight are the most ardent anti-Brexit campaigners whose aim is to reverse the referendum result #EUWithdrawalBill 
The EU has *NO* money!It’s your bloody money used against you to turn you towards acceptance of a United States of Europe and the fall of the UK as an independent state!  Let’s call it EU Empire ‘Economic Warfare’!*For the Love of God* wake up!#Brexit #amendment7 
Proud to be part of cross-party vote backing #Amendment7 to #EUWithdrawal Bill - disappointed not a single Scottish Tory voted in favour, siding w their Govt trying (& failing!) to deny @HouseofCommons a final say on #Brexit deal 
All credit to Dominic Grieve for a splendid victory in the face of bullying. But incredible that it took such heavy lifting against a govt which is championing a Brexit supposedly justified on basis of ‘take back control’ for ‘Westminster parl sovy’. A Henry 8th government indeed 
The Irish referendum was reversed, the Dutch referendum was ignored and the British referendum is being rigged. PM is no more than the EU’s poodle on a string, with Corbyn acting like lap dog at their feet. This is really shoddy. Are we really going to let this happen? 
At the general election 2017 around 85% of votes were cast in favour of parties who promised to deliver the result of the referendum- delaying it or doing anything to undermine that is a massive affront to democracy. Why can’t certain establishment figures understand that. 
The efforts of Remainers to scupper the referendum result, at all costs, and especially tonight’s vote in Parliament, have made me realise quite how deeply and passionately I want the UK to leave the undemocratic EU behemoth. I suspect millions of others feel the same.  
That would all seem to be broadly true. But then the rebels insist they’re not out to thwart Brexit.  
Now it is apparent for all to see just what our Prime Minister @Number10gov  is up against as she works tirelessly in our country's interest to the deliver the successful #Brexit the British people want. 
Till my last day in politics I'll always state HMG should have opted for Norway+ SM&CU status for 5 years to honour Brexit but reunite party &nation but sadly its intransigent hard Brexit policy with questionable mandate resulted in tonight's defeat which reflects public disquiet 
Translation; when I said I would respect the vote for #Brexit, I was porky pie-ing  
In the 18th C and early 19th C Wilberforce defied his party many times and was branded a #Rebel.Tonight some believe the 12 Tory rebels are wrong, maybe they are. But isn’t it healthy that we live in a democracy where our representatives follow their convictions? #Brexit 
Welcome to the reality of an advisory referendum, a representative democracy and a sovereign parliament, you complete fucking idiots.  
No you didn’t. You’ve made Hard Brexit more likely and in the process, undermined the PM & Govt. You’ve made the prospect of getting a good deal even more tricky and you’ve handed a boost to Labour on a plate. How could you??! 
We defeated the Government! They'll now have to hold a meaningful vote in Parliament on the final Brexit deal  
Two Labour MPs voted with the government on Grieve amendment for vote in Brexit deal - Kate Hoey and Frank Field. 
#UK  | Establishment politicians have just voted to allow themselves the power to overturn the decision taken by the British people in June of last year.Brexit betrayal is full steam ahead!      #fo2eu 
The Tories Rebels should each have bronze statues erected in your constituency. They are saving Britain from the absurdity of Brexit.  Good for them!!! 
#Breaking Stephen Hammond has been sacked as vice chair of the Conservative Party after rebelling against the Government in a critical Brexit vote in the House of Commons, a Number 10 source confirmed  
Fantastic news as May loses vote on EU Withdrawal Bill - parliament has taken back control from these Brexit power grabbers  
It was that very sovereignty that tonight dealt what will be the first of many blows to the Russian/Belizean project we call Brexit. I guess the claim that it had been lost was just one more leaver lie to add to the pile. 
Good on U @Anna_Soubry...here's one in the eye for the haters...millions more back your stance. These ppl must not be our future..37% voters isn't the Will. All options must be retained incl a Binding #FinalSay in 2018 when Ppl should be allowed to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit 
Anna Soubry says Parliament has been excluded from the Brexit debate, they voted to give us a legitimate democratic referendum, we voted Out but they didn’t like or expect that answer so want MPs to vote again. 
The government were defeated today when parliament voted in support of #Amendent7 . This allows our MPs to have the final say on any Brexit deal. They should now be given the option to vote to revoke article 50 if they believe the effects of Brexit will be damaging to the U.K. 
Conservative MP Stephen Hammond has been sacked as vice-chairman of the party after voting in favour of giving MPs a vote on the final Brexit deal with the European Union 
So Parliament has taken back control. Tony Benn would have been delighted. #Amendment7 #Brexit #WithdrawalBill 
Meaningful vote passed 309-305 in the Commons!For anyone not in the Brexit bubble/UK, this means Parliament can decide the country’s future on Brexit, and indeed whether to leave the EU at all.  More on why tonight’s vote really really mattered here:  
12 Tory MPs, including Anna Soubry and Kenneth Clarke, defied the Prime Minister and backed the Brexit vote amendment.  
East Renfrewshire, which @PM4EastRen represents, voted 74% Remain. On a crucial #Brexit vote he abstains. I'm sure constituents will draw their own conclusions.  
Tonight MPs have taken back control for the British people. We will scrutinise the Brexit process on behalf of our constituents, and we will not tolerate a #Brexit that damages our economy or our great country. (4/4) 
The Commons has been absolutely clear tonight that we will not permit our country to be railroaded into a job-destroying hard #Brexit, or even a no deal Brexit, without Parliament having a meaningful vote on the matter. (2/4) 
Look at the response from Labour MP’s after winning a Brexit vote in Parliament (after about a million tries). They’re bragging about “humiliating” the Gov’t. They care more about that than what they actually voted for. Proof they’re putting party before country. 
"Tonight wasn't a govt defeat but a victory for British democracy Next year's meaningful vote means no Brexit is a credible option" #YesTo7 
Let’s be clear. Tory rebels defeated the government not Labour as, because we lost the June GE under pitiful Corbyn, Labour were impotent on their own. Corbyn should have been fighting Brexit altogether, which he ain’t   
UK government Brexit defeat: 12 Conservative MPs voted against their own party on EU Withdrawal Bill #Amendment7, including 8 ex-ministers 
Democracy. As far as I was aware, there was a democratic vote in favour of brexit. It appears however to have taken a knock tonight. 
There are Tories who would rather see Corbyn in No10 than the Brexit vote honoured #Deathwish 
Be wary of claims that tonight’s defeat marks the end of Brexit or of May. They’ve said that before many times before. But it does remind you that one good day in Europe does not a Brexit make 
READ | The Tory MPs who rebelled to secure a veto over Brexit for our out-of-touch politicians.  
Victory for democracy in Parliament tonight. Londoners & Brits across the country voted against an extreme Tory hard Brexit - the government must now listen.  
Which Brexit paper will be the first to stick their faces on the stars: Sun, Mail, Express or Telegraph?  
DIRTY DOZEN: Full list of 12 Remoaner Tory MPs who have given politicians veto on Brexit.  
Absolutely humiliating defeat tonight for the government as their hopes for an unaccountable Brexit deal have been scuppered. Parliament will have final vote on the deal. 
UK Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn calls government's defeat on EU Withdrawal Bill "a humiliating loss of authority" and repeats call for "meaningful vote" on #Brexit deal  
Government loses key Brexit vote, meaning Parliament has taken back control over Brexit.Brexiteers cannot complain. Their whole premise for Brexit was that we needed to take back control and protect our sovereignty.#Amendment7 #brexitbill 
Thank you to all of our supporters across the country who were campaigning to ensure our MPs have a proper vote on the Brexit deal!  
Since the referendum, we have made the case for a meaningful vote in Parliament on the terms of Brexit – this defeat is a humiliating loss of authority for Theresa May and her government #Amendment7 
IF ONLY 48% OF THE COUNTRY HAD WARNED YOU THAT BREXIT WOULD HAVE GONE THIS BADLY 
Congratulations to 12 brave Tories who speak for England and Britain Parliament to play its proper role.  #Brexit bullies finally challenged 
Another unforced error if government does this.Limited ministerial time and energy needed elsewhere on Brexit.  
Theresa May's Government suffered a major defeat in the Commons after Tory Rebels voted in favour of an amendment to the Brexit Bill  
Huge! Theresa May loses Commons Brexit vote as Parliament takes back control:  final Brexit deal will have to be approved by Parliament. #EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7 
Congratulations to Dominic Grieve and Tory MPs who voted for amendment 7. Commons now in driving seat on Brexit terms.  PM can no longer fix terms talking only to DUP, but needs to carry majority of Commons, and they won’t be bullied. 
WATCH: @Nigel_Farage’s instant reaction after the government is defeated in a key vote on its Brexit bill  
.@Theresa_May's Govt was hoping to prevent MPs from having a final say on #Brexit deal.Today's vote gave power back to Parliament and reinstated its sovereignty.#EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7 
Amazing moment to be in the chamber tonight as the Labour-led opposition defeated the Government on the right for Parliament to exercise its sovereignty and for elected MPs to have the final say over the Brexit deal. The Red Flag sung with gusto as we went through the lobbies. 
Do you agree with MPs who voted to give Parliament a legal guarantee of a vote on the final Brexit deal struck with Brussels?  - Tory rebels defeat PM over Brexit vote RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Poll: 85 Per Cent of Brits Don’t Want Brexit Abandoned  
Whatever Faisal Ahmed, Chukka Umunna & Stephen Hammond say the government’s defeat on BREXIT procedure, on a point of principle - however laudable - will be interpreted as subversive activity to stop BREXIT! 
A reminder.If you backed Brexit, then trusted Corbyn with your vote at the election, you have just been totally and unashamedly betrayed.Labour want to keep us in the EU. They can NOT be trusted to see this through.#Amendment7 #EUWithdrawalBill 
Grieve ended his speech today by quoting Churchill. It certainly  rallied his troops in the Brexit wars. Here is his peroration.  
Theresa May loses Commons Brexit vote - Parliament has taken back control. The final Brexit deal will have to be approved by Parliament. #EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7 
The amendment has passed. Another nail in Brexit's coffin!Remain has a great springboard now for 2018.Well done all!#StopBrexit 
Looking forward to all the Brexit-backing papers roundly welcoming this increase in powers for Britain's sovereign parliament #Amendment7 
- Stevenson a new name here - will be a big worry for Whips - though he has clearly signalled in PArliament he is worried, he has told of a cancelled tyre factory in constituency, because of investors pulling out after Brexit - suggested looking at Efta/EEA 
Parliament takes back control.The delicious irony of Parliamentary sovereignty.#EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7#Brexit 
In the ongoing battles against Trump and Brexit, today has been a good day  
Well done to the Tory rebels for standing up to May. Now the rest of the MP #Remainers need to show a backbone too. This #Brexit madness can be stopped by a sovereign parliament where MPs do what is right for the country, not what is right for their party or their careers 
BFE: Congratulations to ALL our campaigners up and down the land! In a blow to Prime Minister Theresa May, MPs voted to give Parliament a legal guarantee of a vote on the final Brexit deal struck with Brussels! Feels good, doesn't it? #StopBrexit #FBPE @16MillionRising 
In Britain, it is recognised that the Grieve amendment doesn’t legally change anything. In Brussels, though, it will be taken as a sign that Brexit can be halted, and will encourage the EU to toughen its terms in the mistaken belief that we might drop the whole idea. 
Labour MPs cheering now. Let's see how happy they are when they finally have to make the decisive choice on whether or not to give the green light to Brexit. 
Parliament has taken back control! And rightly so. Earlier today I spoke in our other Parliament about the realities of Brexit, the gap between government rhetoric and reality... and taking back control.  
Historic defeat for Government on #Brexit Bill. Thanks to all who campaigned and stood up for what's right. #YesTo7 
Could tonight's Brexit defeat in Parliament open the way to the Wilson option for Labour - ie reject Tories deal with Europe & run for election on promise to renegotiate it with referendum on any new deal ? 
Shocking that almost half MPs are happy to have no say in final Brexit deal. Kick in teeth for their constituents, WHO THEY REPRESENT  
Massively important vote in the Commons just now. Ayes 309, Noes 305. May defeated for the first time on the EU Withdrawal Bill. Any final Brexit deal with the European Union would now have to be passed by statute in Parliament. Huge check & balance on unaccountable Govt power. 
And if Parliament votes against the final deal do you really think Brussels are going to say 'OK, here's a better one'? You just want to block Brexit  
.Parliament 1   Brexit 0 . 
#Amendment7 is only 1 battle won...This is the first real tactical victory & opens the door to others. But this war ain't won & we mustn't think the tide has turned...#Brexit is still a threat & the majority of MPs still support #Brexit & deny a #FinalSay but now we have HOPE. 
The Latest: British lawmakers deliver a defeat to Prime Minister May's Brexit plans by giving Parliament the final say on any exit agreement with the European Union.  
Theresa May loses Commons Brexit vote - Parliament has taken back control. The final Brexit deal will have to be approved by Parliament.#EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7 
Brexit in big trouble.Trump in big trouble.Who knows. Maybe there are reasons to be cautiously optimistic. Maybe a real kick out of complacency was all democracy needed. 
So that’s that. Parliament get the vote on the final Brexit deal. Moore down and out and now this. WADDADAY 
BREAKING: Theresa May suffers fresh humiliation as she loses key Brexit vote in Commons 
I find it interesting that after listening to MPs all afternoon saying this was not about defeating Brexit - anti-Brexit MPs are now tweeting that  it was....no wonder that the public have so little trust in politicians.  Lying seems a necessary qualification! 
Well tonight we got away with clapping  in the @HouseofCommons - as #Amendment7 passed allowing the UK Parliament to have a say on the final #Brexit deal. Fair play to the Tory rebels. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Full credit to Tories who had the gumption to defeat the Govt.  I doff my cap to them! Naturally @ScotTories not amongst them #EUWithdawalBill #Amendment7 #govtdefeat #brexit 
First step towards defeat of Brexit. And this is before the Lords has got going on the National Betrayal Bill. 
Boom!! Government defeated...Brexit is in the hands of our Parliament, not Executive whim.  
Tory rebels defeat PM over Brexit vote  
Bye bye Brexit. If they exercise this power, the U.K. is officially NOT a democracy, and anyone arguing otherwise hasn’t got a leg to stand on.  
After 18 months of hoodwinking the public into thinking they respect the referendum result, our Establishment politicians have just voted to allow themselves the power to overturn the decision taken by the British people in June of last year.Brexit betrayal is full steam ahead. 
Huge respect and thanks to Conservatives MPs who put country ahead of party and voted tonight to ensure Parliament has a say on #Brexit. And well done to everybody who lobbied so hard to make sure this happened. @BestForBritain @Open_Britain 
After that Brexit defeat for the government, we now go live to Paul Dacre  
So 1.2 million votes isn't a big enough margin for Brexit.But 5 votes is a big enough margin in Parliament to try and derail Brexit.Funny the things Remainers show uproar about and then applaud... 
Victory on Grieve amendment! Labour overwhelmingly backed vote & with courageous Tories voting with us, parliament now votes on Brexit terms 
Good day for Parliamentary sovereignty when the House of Commons votes 309-305 to take back control of Brexit. Defeat for May on eve of EU summit 
Actually felt emotional listening to that result. A victory for Parliament over an arrogant Government. Brexit affects us all and Parliament must shape it. 
1.The government defeat on the vote for Brexit deal is the first sign that the Commons is taking control of the process-as it has every right and duty to do so. T May asked for a Brexit mandate at the election and didn't get it. 
Why Brexit bill defeat matters: 1. MPs have legal guarantee of vote on final deal (rather than verbal one). 2. Vote will be statutory (so amendments can be tabled). 
BREAKING: Remoaners secure veto on Brexit by 309 to 305 votes. The betrayal is well underway.  
The Government has suffered its first defeat over the European Union (Withdrawal) Bill after MPs supported a Tory rebel amendment for a "meaningful vote" on any Brexit deal by 309 votes to 305, majority four. 
Government defeated by four votes on demand for “meaningful vote” on Brexit deal. Embarrassing for Mrs May but not sure it changes much. 
He's right. If MPs come to believe Brexit is not in the national interest we can Remain. And that's why this victory for Parliamentary democracy is so important.  
The Government has suffered its first defeat on Brexit after MPs voted 309-305 in favour of an amendment stating the final deal with the European Union must be approved by a law passed by Parliament 
Yes. The Commons vote for Amendment 7. Parliament takes a step forward in saving the UK from a shambolic, failing, divided Government, bereft of a plan, unwilling to listen to advice, & mistrusted by negotiating partners, with the sole discernible aim of Brexit at any cost 
Parliament has taken back control. The final Brexit deal will have to be approved by Parliament. Hats off to the Tory rebels who held firm and stuck to their principles. #EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7 
Parliament erupts In shouts & cheers! Ayes 309, No 305 - thanks to all who campaigned so hard for parliament to have a meaningful vote on #Brexit - we did it! 
Well well. Government defeated on Brexit bill on eve of EU summit. 
The House of Commons has agreed a proposal that the final #Brexit deal has to be approved in a new law passed by Parliament. MPs vote 309 to 305 to approve Amendment 7 to the #EUWithdrawalBill. 
BREAKING - we did it!Thanks to your campaigning, MPs have just secured a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal. #YesTo7 
Breaking: Government defeated by EU rebels to enforce 'meaningful vote' on the final Brexit deal; 309 v 305.  Wow. 
Oof. Tory rebels narrowly beat government. There will be a meaningful parliamentary vote in the form of a vote for or against a statute on the terms of Brexit.  Or so cheers in Commons indicate 
BREAKING: Government loses the vote on whether or not MPs should have a final say on the Brexit deal, promised in law. Labour MPs cheer. 
David Davis in 2002 on how a referendum should be fair and democratic.   
Brexit is pushing up Britain's supermarket prices  
Facebook says there's little evidence of a Russian effort to influence the "Brexit" vote. A British minister is not convinced.  
Just going through the voting lobbies in one one of the most important votes - respect to all those who are putting democracy & national interest above party interest - crossing fingers that cross party collaboration will pay off  #Brexit  
SNP lost IndyRef Lost EU Referendum Lost Score of seats GE 2017 i look forward to SNP losing every by election and vanishing from Scotland entirely 
'The referendum was a meaningful vote!' - @PhilipDaviesUK slams the 'meaningful vote' amendment as a plot to overturn Brexit  
Interesting discussion outside voting lobby between the chancellor and Vicky Ford, a would-be Brexit rebel. If the DUP can be bought for £1bn, what will Chelmsford get for her loyalty? Steve Smith signing for Essex next season? 
THE NEW EUROPEAN: Another fine Brexit mess #tomorrowspaperstoday 
CONFIRMED: Russian trolls spent a MASSIVE seventy-three pence on Facebook ads about immigration during the Brexit referendum, seen by a WHOPPING two-hundred people! #SecondReferendumNow 
We are voting on amendment 7 now - vital that MPs are given a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal if we are to genuinely take back control and ensure a Brexit that works for and reunites our divided country.  
SHOCK as Daily Express discovers Brexit is bad 
Remoaner MPs conveniently using Brexiteer argument for parliamentary sovereignty to push for soft Brexit didn’t mind conceding sovereignty to Brussels for the last 40 years. 
Government about to suffer its first serious parliamentary Brexit setback. Grieve rebels to win. Or at least that's my bet 
Should MPs have a say on the final Brexit deal? @Nigel_Farage is live from Strasbourg. Listen:  #FarageOnLBC 
.@nick_clegg was right when he said power to stop hard Brexit lies with backbench Tory and Labour MPs.  At last some are stepping up. 
Dominic Grieve says Government climbdown over meaningful vote is TOO LATE. Terrific drama in the Commons. Government staring down barrel of first Brexit defeat 
UK makes desperate plea to EU negotiators as fears rise about time remaining for Brexit trade deal.  
"Denying the devolved countries a say on the final deal risks subjecting Wales to policies and an ideology that has so far caused our country grievous harm." @HywelPlaidCymru urges Labour to support our calls for Wales to have a say on the final #Brexit deal. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Minister Dominic Raab announces what sounds like a concession - but Tory rebels shouting "too late" #brexit 
Brexit literally dying  
David Davis promised free trade deals with US, China & others would be ready by Sept 2018.He said he'd secure a bilateral deal with Germany.He said he'd produced 58 sectoral analyses, then said they don't exist.Why would MPs believe his promise of a vote on the Brexit deal? 
Raab & other Brexiteers have no proper answer to Grieve's powerful & compelling arguments putting the principle of parliamentary sovereignty first. Wasn't that what they said Brexit was all about to start with? #EUWithdrawalBill 
I will back Dominic Grieve's amendment giving Parliament a proper say on the Brexit deal if he pushes it to a vote tonight. The terms of our future are not for the government alone to determine. #brexit 
A Conservative MP is calling for Parliament to have sovereignty as an amendment to a Brexit bill which was, in part, about the UK parliament having sovereignty...and now the government whips are trying to defy parliamentary sovereignty to prevent parliamentary sovereignty. Okay? 
This is depressing and tragic. Whatever one's views on Brexit, how did the UK allow its reputation for fairness and tolerance to be so terribly damaged.  A German report on being European in Brexit Britain:  
George Freeman MP now up... ex No 10 policy board chief... says he’s backing the PM BUT...  says a sovereign Parliament is what Brexit vote was about.Criticising Clause 9, “makes no sense” hasn’t rebelled before.Will back Amendment 7.Going to be v v tight now. 
Apparently I am “Paid to try and destroy Brexit” Actually I am paid to represent my constituents and use my judgement.  The rest comes free  
This is exactly why people of Kurdistan voted YES in the referendum, Baghdad will never in a million years feel sympathy or empathy for Kurds, even Kurds die of hunger. This unity thing is just rubbish talk, @HaiderAlAbadi prove me wrong! 
Interesting to see Remain MPs now making a no deal Brexit much more likely again 
After the bullshit about the Brexit sectoral analyses, no sensible MP should accept mere ministerial assurances on a meaningful vote.The trust has gone.Get the Bill amended, and let parliament "take back control". 
.  @UKGov still don't get that the problems for EU nationals are not something that needs to be sorted by March 2019; the uncertainty and anxiety is happening right NOW #BrexitShambles #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg just DESTROYED the Wets argument.The government has already given a meaningful vote to the house regarding the final deal.What Dominic Grieves' amendment is doing, is trying to deny the ability for ANY deal to go through at all, good or lacking. #Brexit 
Study shows U.K. economy will be worse off after Brexit  
Imagine if @ChukaUmunna was leader of the Labour Party, that would be a true opposition on Brexit.  
Sorry did I miss something? David Davis lied to parliament & the country for a year over the existence of Brexit impact reports. Why is he still running Brexit? #EUWithdrawalBill 
Woman MP 'reduced to tears by bully boy Tory whips' ahead of crucial Brexit vote | London Evening Standard  
We said “Trump won’t be president.”We said “Brexit won’t happen.” People say “Net Neutrality won’t end.”Don’t sit back and assume the best. Resist. Speak up. #NetNeutrality 
The Government claims that the 2016 EU referendum was a legal decision to leave the European Union. This is a lie. The Government has blatantly misled Parliament, the public and the EU. 
Fox apparently still imagines UK can be outside the single market yet have 'virtually identical' trading terms. After all these months, Brexit thinking still hasn't advanced beyond cakeism.  
Any special #Brexit arrangements for Northern Ireland must also be available for the sitting and accountable parliaments of Scotland and Wales #EUWithdrawalBill 
If ever there was a community that deserves to see the benefits of brexit it's our fishermen and their families in our forgotten seaside towns.  
Uniting behind Brexit a bit hard if you think it's shit pic.twitter.com/NgqHh1AjEv 
INCREDIBLE: November 2002 and David Davis MP is explaining to the House of Commons why referendums are dangerous - particularly when the electorate is not fully availed of the facts. It's brilliantly put and absolutely correct #Brexit #Amendment7 
Yes, this is truly grim. Our challenges may be different but we stand united with @The3Million as we all face the Brexit onslaught together.  
Saddened by #8Committee proposal - but not in the least bit disheartened. There is no cause more noble than speaking up for those who can’t speak for themselves. Now there’s a referendum to be won. 
Righto. Can we now all please stop pretending that Labour have any interest whatsoever in keeping us in the single market and customs union, when it's clearly evident that they do not? Once again, the @LibDems are the only party fighting a hard and destructive Brexit. 
The Government has clearly explained how MPs will scrutinise the final Brexit deal but some MPs still want to back an amendment tonight that risks Brexit chaos.Email your MP now urging them to OPPOSE Amendment 7 #EUWithdrawalBill #NoTo7 →  
20. More to the point, remoanerism is cowardly. The pleas I am hearing are more to do with the ineptitude in the Brexit process rather than a principled vote of confidence in the EU. That is not a reason to remain in the EU - and it never was. Lets just get it done. We'll manage. 
Most of the country is sick to the back teeth of Brexit. After a night where temperatures dropped to -13C, I would suggest homelessness is far more relevant. Unless you happen to be a handsomely-paid Telegraph reporter.  
15. Eventually the UK will recover from Brexit, and by leaving the EU we will unlock potential that has gone untapped, simply by tailoring our aid and trade spending to UK interests rather than offshoring responsibility to the EU. 
#Brexit Minister Dominic Raab has been trying to bore the House to death for more than an hour without answering a single point made by Grieve & others. #Brexit Bill. 
Russia spent a whopping 73p on @facebook ads to ‘influence’ #Brexit referendum.  
#BURUNDI: President Pierre Nkurunziza (53) who has been in power since 2005, has launched a referendum campaign to extend his stay in power until 2034.  
In Euro Parl vote on #Brexit resolution today Tories abstained on: 'future EU-UK relationship [must uphold]... policies [on] environment, climate change, consumer protection, the fight against tax evasion & avoidance... workers’ rights...'Nuff said. #BrexitReality 
Remember all that hysteria about Russian social media trolls influencing Brexit? According to the @ft, they spent $0.97 (slightly less than 72p) on three ads, seen by perhaps 200 people  … 
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #4: Choice, Not Commitment. RT #StopBrexit 
MPs vote on a key amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill this evening #Brexit  
Environment Secretary Michael Gove has bowed to public pressure over animal sentience, saying he will “make Brexit work for animals”.  
Why is it that Brexiters so quickly reach for the language of treachery.  This amendment seeks to return control to parliament from the executive, you know the parliamentary sovereignty which you banged on about during the referendum.  
Brexit will have to be fought all over again, warns Nigel Farage in fiery debate with MEPs  
The referendum hasn’t happened yet, but this is a very historic day for Irish women, in a country that has silenced, shamed and judged women and girls, locked them up, & intruded on their bodily autonomy.  #RepealThe8th #8thcommittee 
How are academics exploring the UK’s withdrawal from the #EU? Find out about #Brexit research initiatives in our guest blog post from @POST_UK  @UKandEU @ESRC 
This anti-Brexit bus has cheered me up so much. Please support its journey round the country  @crowdfunderuk 
"We are leaving the EU and that of necessity means we leave the Single Market and the Customs Union". Justice Minister Dominic Raab continues to peddle the biggest of all #Brexit myths. 
More than anything else today’s seemingly legalistic debate about the EU (Withdrawal) bill is about whether the PM and the executive should have relatively unfettered discretion to shape Brexit or whether our elected representatives in Parliament should have a serious influence 
New doodle. 'English Tapas' blew my mind so, in honour of my favourite album of last year, I drew a NSFW @SleafordMods strip imagining my favourite album of next year... #Brexit  
How dare you say that giving OUR elected representatives a vote on the final Brexit deal will weaken your hand in negotiations #TheresaMay You and your team of incompetents have been doing that for 18 months. #YesTo7 #Amendment7 #StopBrexit  @Keir_Starmer 
Moore’s loss was due to well timed allegations against him, period. If not for these unproven allegations, he would have won the seat by at least 20%-30%. Anyone telling you this is a referendum on the Trump agenda is either incredibly dishonest or incredibly naive. 
Dominic Raab rejects another referendum on the deal because the time for this to be agreed was when the EU referendum was enacted. May I remind @DominicRaab that the Act only provided for an advisory referendum. Acting on the result as if it were a mandate is an abuse of power. 
Dominic Raab no... this Govt does not have a Mandate for it's #Brexit...37% of voters in a non-binding test of opinion, after a flawed process, following an election in which the Tory majority was lost, does not give you the right to impose that on the UK...#FinalSay only Way 
Dominic Grieve is a Brexit traitor working to sabotage the Brexit process. Remainer MPs like him must not be allowed to weaken the government's negotiating hand  
LOL!!!!Facebook says it has evidence that Russia meddled in the #BrExit Referendum by spending less than £1 on Facebook ads  
Facebook criticised for response to questions on Russia and Brexit  
Today's Brexit Alert Level: 6  
Let there be no dispute. If the proposals of #8Committee are passed by government & referendum, there will be absolutely NO constitutional protection for human life until after birth.  
Right so is NOBODY gonna talk about the fact that Tescos pasta pots increased from £1.50 to £1.60? As if that wasn’t enough . They’ve raised it to £1.70!! This is Brexit Tory Britain. 
Whenever Oliver Letwin is in the public eye, we feel it is vital that everyone should know that he wrote the blueprint for privatising our most valuable public service - the NHS. Do you think based on this he should have a key role in Brexit? 
Facebook found just three Russian-bought Brexit ads, amounting to less than $1  
Ukip to face tribunal over use of data in EU referendum campaign  
No-one thinks leaving Euratom is a good idea. @CommonsBEIS unanimously agreed that we need to keep as close an association as possible with Euratom after Brexit to ensure there is no deterioration of civil nuclear safeguarding standards.  
Labour MPs were ordered last night not to back an amendment to leave open option of staying in the single market. On the biggest issue facing the country in a generation, the Labour leadership sat on their hands instead of standing up to a Tory botched Brexit 
MPs have already had their meaningful Brexit vote. Have they not realised what it meant? - The Telegraph  
Those are not vanity projects. Those are examples of a government doing the right thing for the people. Brexit is a vanity project. Destroy the economy & the future so people can claim not to be ruled by EU which they never were 
48% voted Remain but many of them accepted the result and now believe we should leave. May and Corbyn for example. The Brexit stoppers  represent only the minority who want to stop Brexit They must be dealt with at next General Election 
2. What's happening is the Govt denying any real scrutiny or Parl control which might take into account a change in the Ppl's Will..it is about driving thru an undemocratic #Brexit no matter the cost on the basis of only 37% of the electorate. There must be a #StopBrexit option. 
The Referendum Act provided that the Brexit referendum had to take place by the end of 2017, see (Government then opted for June 2016.)So in another universe, the referendum is still to take place and all this is yet to come... 
Bam .... More to the point: if you have nothing to hide, why would you not cooperate? So ....  Ukip to face tribunal over use of data in EU referendum campaign  
Last sentence here is killing me. Going to go out on a limb here and say that Putin didn't personally pore over a masterplan and authorise 75p of spending on the referendum campaign.  
The @Europarl_EN has given his support to allow #Brexit talks to move to phase 2. However, this morning MEPs adopted a resolution asking for commitments reached in phase 1 to be translated into a legal text as soon as possible.All the details →   
Ukip to face tribunal over use of data in EU referendum campaign  
The BREXIT leave vote was carried overwhelmingly by labour voters.Check a map showing the results.Why do you hold your own supporters in such contempt?  
Theresa May is against Amendment 7 giving Parliament meaningful vote over the Brexit deal. She would rather give the power of veto to 10 DUP MPs, bought with £1.5bn of public money and who will remain EU citizens in any case because they live in Northern Ireland. 
There is no such thing as an "orderly and smooth" Brexit and that is a fact. It has been a mess from day one. Giving the MPs a meaningful vote won't make it any less of a mess, but it return control to parliament which was what we were told Brexit was all about. #StopBrexit 
We cannot allow #Brexit undermine children's rights, human rights and equality....strong message coming from my talks in Belfast @SCI_Belfast @AmnestyNI @ChildRightsIRL @ChildLawCentre 
If you see an Irish person saying anything about Russian interference in Brexit etc please remind them that we have had George Soros pay 300k ILLEGALLY to 3 Irish charities to influence politics here. 
Grieve - “I am still this afternoon absolutely at sea as to why the Government needs this (Clause 9) power.. I am not prepared to sign away this power, surrendering control of this House over how Government conducts Brexit” 
Glorious post-#Brexit Britain - the gateway to nowhere. How can we be so dumb? #StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
Friends! Five sayings that *prove* someone is a psychopath: 1. "Thatcher did get some things right!"2. "Maybe Brexit won't be a total disaster!"3. "Trump isn't all bad, you know!"4. "I'm not sure I trust Jeremy, actually!" 5. "The Indy has really gone downhill, hasn't it?"  
So after all that hand-wringing over Russian trolls pushing Brexit, turns out they spent $0.97 on three ads that were maybe seen by 200 people  
Facebook: Just three Russian Brexit ads found by inquiry  
'You DON'T trust your own Government?' Andrew Neil ROASTS Treacherous Tory Remainer  @heidiallen75  over Brexit vote  Treacherous Tory Remainers are working to save their beloved EU and in doing so will destroy the UK 
Well, if that hasn’t made the case for a 2nd EU referendum, nothing will.  
I don’t remember voting for this woman. No one voted for her to be an EU Commissioner. No Brits voted for her to be an MEP. So why is our Brexit vote any of her business?  
I will back Dominic Grieve's amendment giving Parliament a proper say on the Brexit deal if he pushes it to a vote tonight. The terms of our future are not for the government alone to determine. 
Top 20 Brexit Wrecking MPs Signed 193 Amendments Each  
The likes of Soubry, Morgan etc appear to be trying to actually block Brexit happening at all despite being elected on a Brexit manifesto. 
Shadow Brexit minister Pennycook: “Is Parliament a spectator, a passive observer into one of the most important decisions that has faced our country in generations? - Parliament must have a grip on the process” 
Labour let down British workers last night. This ends any pretence that Jeremy Corbyn is fighting for us to stay in the single market. This is now a Tory-Labour Brexit.  
Beggars belief that despite all the concessions Mrs May has made Tory pro-EU rebels are still looking to hijack Brexit legislation #wreckers 
5) I've met with Facebook today and again asked them for a full response to my letter sent on behalf of @CommonsCMS on 19th Oct, as part of our inquiry into fake news. This includes looking for Russian activity linked to the 2017 General Election, as well as the EU referendum. 
Cross party committee in Lords’ believes ‘No Deal’ Brexit is worst possible outcome. But, but, but, ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’? No Deal is a bad deal. In fact it is an atrocious deal. 
4) Are we to believe that Russian backed targeting of voters through social media with fake news was limited only to Twitter during the EU referendum, when both Twitter and Facebook had been used by them in the USA during the Presidential election. 
3) Facebook conducted research to identify 10,000s of fake pages and accounts that were active during the French Presidential election. They should do the same for the EU referendum, and not just rely on external sources referring evidence of suspicious activity back to them 
Brexit agreement to be made into legally binding treaty before trade talks can begin Thanks to @DavidDavisMP!#DavidDavisMustGo#brexitshambles 
Conservative former minister Dominic Grieve has suggested he and the government have run out of road over his call for a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal  
The unions are sounding the alarm over Brexit. Why isn’t Jeremy Corbyn? | Hugo Dixon  I wish I could answer that 
Society, like science, sometimes advances funeral by funeral. In Enlightenment Now I plot a graph showing steep dropoff in support for Trump, Brexit, & Europopulism with birth year.  
The #8thcommittee has voted in favour of full #repealthe8th. Remember in the long, contentious and personally exhausting path to this referendum: we won this WITHOUT tempering our asks. WITHOUT agreeing to pander to the narrative that women cannot be trusted with our pregnancies. 
So a UK city spent nearly 1 MILLION GBP on an award from the EU, now complaining they might not get it coz of Brexit? How about spending FOR your taxpayers? Or not taking it from them in the 1st place? Also your logo was made in MS Paint?!  
I’m beginning to get an incy-wincy feeling Brexit might not be a brilliant idea. Retweet if you are beginning to get that feeling too. 
committee has just voted for a straightforward repeal referendum. onwards to a referendum in May #repealthe8th 
REPEAL!! we did it;14 to 6; now to win the referendum; congrats to all those women who fought and campaigned for 34 years to end this barbaric law! and in memory of those who suffered so cruelly #8thcommittee #8amendment #repealthe8th 
Where is the screaming conspiracy theory about Russia and the EU referendum, now we we know they spent less than £1 on Facebook?  
Brexit Briefing: David Davis offends at home and abroad; meanwhile UK voters have few 'Bregrets'  
German industry TERRIFIED of Brexit as UK exports PLUNGE by QUARTER OF A BILLION  
Hard Brexit Tories who are serial rebels cannot lecture colleagues for breaking the whip. John Redwood has rebelled 73 times. #LeaveWatch 
Russia caused Brexit! 3 adverts that cost less than $1 swung the vote for Leave!As I was saying.... cuckoo land. 
Our Brexit Barometer falls again after Britain loses the most jobs since 2015  
Grieve making absolutely clear now he *will* vote against Government in pushing his Amendment 7 and that if it doesn't win he will vote against Clause 9 of #Brexit Bill. Crucial stuff. Brave speech defending basic Parliamentary democracy and sovereignty. #YesTo7 
Britain is in crisis... and the most orderly Brexit we can achieve now is to walk away,..anything else is a trap with devastating consequences for Britian in the short term and the long term !WALK AWAY RIGHT NOW FOR THE LOVE OF BRITAIN  
This overview of Brexit from Scotland's perspective by @Feorlean is stunningly good. A must-watch for all interested in Brexit proceedings. 
Dominic Grieve points out that HS2 aside he's never rebelled in 20 yrs as MP. But will do so on Brexit Amendment 7. Quotes Churchill: 'a good party man...will put country before his party' 
Facebook has told the Electoral Commission it has found little evidence of Russian interference during the 2016 European Union referendum and less than one U.S. dollar was spent by accounts linked to Russia's Internet Research Agency on advertising during the campaign 
Grieve: I’m not prepared to sign away such an extensive power when it appears to be contrary to govt’s stated policy as to how Brexit is to be carried out & is surrendering control of this House over how govt conducts Brexit without any good reason. 
Theresa May is lying again. There was no option to leave the Single Market on the voting slip. This torrent of Brexit lies is perverting and undermining our democracy. #JailTheLeaveLiars!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Not sure Tory Brexiteer Sir Desmond Swayne entirely enjoys listening to Ken Clarke talk about Brexit  
“Theresa the Appeaser has given in on virtually everything. … I think Brexit at some point in the future may need to be refought all over again.” - @Nigel_Farage 
It will never be too late for a patriotic government to take control and make Brexit happen - My speech in the European parliament today  
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that 
Fox News host: Alabama wasn't a referendum on Trump, but on Harvey Weinstein  
Grieve: difficulty with this referendum is the risk of losing sight that 48% of the electorate did not wish for the policy that we are currently pursuing #EUWithdrawalBill 
PARLIAMENT: EU Withdrawal Bill: Dominic Grieve (Cons):  we have lost our way, hurling of public abuse etc, losing sight of real issues.We are Parl of deeply divided country on this issue. Run risk of losing sight of view of 48% who did not vote for Brexit. 
The Tory bullies are out in force and trying to silencing the moderate Tory MPs for revealing how they are being bullied by the whips. Brexit is getting nasty. #StopBrexit 
Facebook admits that Russia used its ad platform to interfere in the Brexit referendum. (Er, ahem, at a cost of 75 pence worth of spending on three adverts which reached 200 people.)  
Female Kurdish activist sentenced to 50 lashes in Iran for backing independence referendum  
I don't want to be part of unequal union (The UK).I don't want Brexit.I don't want Trident based in my country. I'm going to vote Labour. They'll not be in favour of all these things. Wait a minute they are. So why vote for them? 
Northern Ireland-based investigative news website The Detail has won €400,000 (Stg £352,000) funding from Google’s Digital News Initiative (DNI) Innovation Fund for a major new digital media project examining Brexit’s impact on the island of Ireland.  
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar says he intends to hold a referendum on abortion in May 2018:  
Ds lose nat’l with awful candidate=RUSSIANS!Rs lose local with awful candidate=NATIONAL REFERENDUM ON THE GOP 
SHOCK as Daily Express discovers Brexit is bad 
Right on YvetteCooper,Parliament needs to have complete authority to vote the Brexit deal either positively or No Brexit because it is bad for the country  
Brexit squeeze on earnings continues in run-up to Christmas.Hard-pressed families risk being pushed into debt to pay for presents and visiting relatives. Those feeling the pinch should blame Govt for pursuing an extreme Brexit that is pushing up prices  
Brexit won't happen for the very good reason that it makes no f--king sense at all. Never has done. 
If they kill Brexit, they kill democracy  
#Brexit has done what no man ever achieved. My heart is broken, the country I always proudly called home has been hijacked by people with undeclared, selfish motives, whose aim is to crush the best people in the world, steal their rights & make them poorer. #BrexitBritain #FBPE 
So the European Parliament will have a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal but it's uncertain whether the UK parliament will get that chance. It looks like the UK could learn some lessons about democracy from the EU. 
Father Of The House 'Kenneth Clarke'.. Single handedly taking on the Hard Tory Right ... Bravo, Sir  #EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit 
“Let's give our NHS the £350m the EU takes every week”. Son el Brexit. Son la Lega Nord. Son el N-VA. Son trumpismo puro y posverdad.  
Heard peak #Brexit delusion while speaking to someone at lunch who said: "There's too much stuff showing how bad Brexit is. When you get this much evidence of something you know it has to be faked. It will be the best thing we could ever have done."  
As things stand May refusing to budge on giving Parliament a meaningful vote on withdrawal terms before Brexit.  So we will vote to try and enforce it at 7pm tonight.  You could call it taking back control. 
If MPs don’t know what Leave means, how can it be argued that the people did when they voted in the referendum nearly 18 months ago?? 
Although the surface layer (in-out) seems unchanged, there are big shifts happening with the underlying mood and expectations of Brexit.  
Thanks to courageous and patriotic Tory rebels. The fight against brexit is the fight against authoritarian antidemocrats of Right and Left. 
Two positive things about Brexit A (slow) revitalisation of parliament and an improved public understanding of UK’s position in the world By me, at @FT 
Ken Clarke tells “my desperately paranoid Eurosceptic friends” that  “they don’t know what leave means because nobody discussed what leave means when we were having the referendum” #EUWithdrawalBill 
Harvey wasn't running.And IT WAS A REFERENDUM ON TRUMP AND THE GOP!WE ARE COMING FOR ALL OF THEM!!!!!#BlueWave2018#VoteThemOut 
Barnier: EU will not accept any Brexit deal that undermines ‘four freedoms’  via @FT 
'I have no choice but to become French,' says @AlexTaylorNews 'Britain after Brexit is no longer my country'  
The Detail awarded €400,000 for new project monitoring Brexit’s impact on the island of Ireland:  #DNIfund #Brexit 
In leaving the EU, surely we should all wish to bolster Parliamentary democracy rather than diminish it through overwhelming HenryVIII powers #Brexit #Article7 
I'm the fat lady he's talking about and I'll be singing from the rooftops when we have a referendum to #repealthe8th later today 
"Theresa the appeaser has given in on virtually everything."Former Ukip leader Nigel Farage says the Prime Minister was prepared to put herself through "ritual humiliation" to achieve a Brexit deal with the EU.  
Neither is going to stop Brexit (directly at least).But both are valuable for the immense challenges ahead, and it is better we have them than don't have them.Read the post setting this out: /ends 
Fox News host: Alabama wasn't a referendum on Trump, but on Harvey Weinstein  
I know the people spoke, I know SF have been clear on abstention, I know I'll be told I'm out of touch... but it really frustrates me that my MP was at a drinks reception last night while crucial Brexit votes were taking place a mile away. 
Its vital that #Brexit is a moment of democratic &  Parliamentary #Renewal.  And that public trust in Parliament is enhanced. Which means people must SEE that Parliament (and @Conservatives Party) is working for & representing all views on #EUbill #Article7 #PMQs 
Despite a clear instruction from the people to leave the EU and its institutions, our Parliament is still packed with Remoaners, whether they will admit it or not!The Remoaning elite may be vocal but they are a small minority. Just 12% of the public back abandoning Brexit!  
It's clear Mattie McGrath has no basic respect for women. Looking forward to opposing him in referendum on 8th and seeing his views soundly rejected by the decent people of Ireland. #8Committee #RepealThe8th 
Promises by @Number10gov just now and @DavidDavisMP in lengthy statement that there will be meaningful vote on Brexit terms have not won over Grieve and Tory rebels. What more pressure will government apply? 
Once again Scottish unemployment is  whilst unemployment in rUK is .So who will be the first SNP Minister to blame Westminster/Tories/Brexit? 
Today's report from @crae_official shows vulnerable children are being left behind while political focus stays firmly on #Brexit. #ChildRights17 
If they kill #Brexit, they kill democracy  
maybe it was a referendum on Roger Ailes   
Fantastic news for everyone @TheDetailTV & an important new public interest #Brexit project, thanks to financial support from #DNIfund 
#NigelFarage blasts the deception of the #British public by @theresa_may in signing up to a transition phase that could see us tied to the #SingleMarket &  #CustomsUnion "I fear #Brexit at some point in the future may need to be re-fought all  over again."  
If there was ever a time for a pro EU #ProgressiveAlliance it is now. Tribal politics will kill any chance of remaining at the heart of the European family of nations and the values it represents. Only together can we defeat #Brexit! 
Talking single market with @heidi_mp who says her #Brexit amendment will ensure “proper democratic oversight”@theresa_may says "the people of this country who voted to leave the EU, and this government will deliver for the people of this country" #pmqs 
The “issue of the day” for those homeless is getting a roof over their head. It’s exactly right @jeremycorbyn holds this nasty Government to account. #Brexit is continually being dealt with & discussed so don’t you fret. #PMQs 
Was the government bluffing about the existence of Brexit impact assessments? Read the factcheck:  #PMQs 
@CNN analysis of last night’s race complete absent of discussion of race despite the FACT that black Alabamians clearly delivered an overwhelming moral and decent referendum.  Please do better, the country needs you to do better.  I’m about to turn the channel 
My cartoon Wednesday @TheTimes on this polluted environment #Brexit #Plastics #MichaelGove 
Watch the Referendum debates: Johnson is clear we will have 'full access to Single Market'. Rudd challenged this, but Johnson assured all watching. 
Burundi's President Pierre Nkurunziza, 53, who has been in power since 2005, has launched a referendum campaign to extend his stay in power until 2034 #NBSUpdates 
The Detail is awarded €400,000 for new project monitoring Brexit’s impact on the island of Ireland  #DNIfund #Brexit  
#Labour coming out in favour of #NoBrexit would tip the polls heavily towards Remain. Labour can't sit on the fence or fiddle with a Brexit fudge, they need to come out strongly for staying in the EU. The country needs leadership - do they have any? 
On #Brexit, the @Europarl_EN is fighting for citizens and defending Ireland's interests. Great unity of MEPs at our vote on the #Brexit resolution just now  
Also worth noting, (again), that Corbyn has ducked the major issue of the day, (Brexit), again. 
Follow @davidallengreen for his great commentary on #Brexit. The EU has been clear from day one- transition means prolongation of EU acquis. Status quo with an exception that UK no longer participates in EU decision-making. So much for taking back control...  
On the day of a titanic battle between No10 and Parliament for who controls Brexit, Corbyn turns #PMQs into a dull committee hearing. Some achievement. 
By 556 votes to 62, the European Parliament #EPlenary has just confirmed its conditional support for the #Article50 #Brexit talks to move to phase 2 BUT... 1/  
The President’s favorite show proclaiming Doug Jones stunning win “a referendum on Harvey Weinstein...not President Trump.” With a straight face. 
People will ask why Corbyn isn't going on Brexit. But he's got form judging the national mood - and right now, in many homes across the nation the focus is on family budgets, not Brexit bills. #PMQs 
“Sceptical #MPs – frightened of seeming disloyal – are pretending to be happy. I know they are not – & the same applies to millions of people across the country.”  Not good enough! #Brexit #MPs must put country before party for once & call on #May to go! 
Put your gullible faith in 'Lefty Jeremy' if you like....you'll be disappointed...as usual....he's just more of the same who has found himself in a position he never really imagined in his wildest dreams.He's Pro Brexit and quite willing to tolerate Trident in his CND world 
As negotiations "progress", Jeremy Corbyn is still sticking to his strategy of vagueness. The @LibDems are not. We are, and always have been, very clear on our position: It should be the British people who get the final say on the Brexit deal, not the politicians. #ExitFromBrexit 
Neither of the options proposed by the Uluru Statement necessarily require a referendum, they simply require political-will and leadership.But we need a national discussion to heal and move forward. Australia is ready to become a better nation, not settle for the status quo! 
The town burns, the crops rot in the field & the child is ignored, while the people struggle up a ladder to nowhere, grasping at the unreachable. Brexit encapsulated!In a remarkable act of prescience, the artist Damien Bove () drew this in 2008! 
ECJ, immigration lawNew AG opinion: Member State in Schengen expelling a non-EU citizen must first consult the Member State which gave him/her a residence permit: Relevant to British citizens after Brexit 
More #BrexitWoes....@LidlUK have reduced the staff Xmas discount to 15% (usually 20%) and explained it is related to downturn caused by Brexit. Anyone got other examples, so we can compile a #BrexitWoes list? @AldiUK @asda @Morrisons @sainsburys @Tesco @bbcstrictly #StopBrexit 
The Leavers are on the right side of history, argues Cambridge University historian Robert Tombs. Whatever our high-minded elites say about Brexit, ordinary people seem intuitively to feel the opposite.  
The people voted for #Brexit -It is the duty of all politicians to respect the democratic will of the people. MPs should bear that in mind when voting tonight.#Brexit #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp #PMQs #BrexitDeal #BrexitVote 
NOTE to the PMWhilst you stumble your way through the shambles that is #Brexit and dissemble as usual at #PMQsWhat about those *burning injustices* you pontificated about ?#JustAPoliteReminder 
There is a lorry load of hypocrisy from Brexiteers over how they are treating Tory colleagues planning to break the whip when they have done it so often themselves. Parliament is taking back control of the Brexit process. #YesTo7 
If that’s your view you cannot support last week’s report as that puts a limit on ECJ oversight. Plus while Brexit sure isn’t the fault of @The3Million, it also isn’t that of @BritishInEurope either. I ask you and @EUparliament not to forget that. 
Today Parliament is voting on Amendment 7 to EU (Withdrawal) Bill.  We support Amendment 7 which requires that Parliament is given meaningful vote on final Brexit deal, where option to remain in EU is kept on table.  Resources for you to make difference:  
Significant.Means Common Commercial Policy.Means no UK trade deals with third countries for entire transition period.Means Brexit in name only.Means a waste of time and energy, on any sensible view.  
MPs are debating the EU Withdrawal Bill today and our rights are at stake. Here's why you should tell your MP to vote for a #PeoplesClause so we keep our rights after #Brexit  
.@realDonaldTrump was the most pro-gay Presidential nominee of the GOP ever, Roy Moore was arguably the most anti-gay GOP Senate nominee ever. Not a referendum on Trump, this was a referendum on Roy Moore. 
MPs rally outside parliament to demand the power to vote down May's Brexit deal.  
Intersting take on how UK must abide by EU environmental rules after #Brexit if it wants to the retain its current level of access to the European aviation market. And more pay without say.  
The Tory Brexiters are fighting to deny Parliament the sovereignty and democratic right to vote on any final Brexit deal.#Brexit is being used to undermine democracy & Parliamentary sovereignty.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Correct. Not worth the paper it is written on. If the Govnt are so confident of getting a good deal and making a success of Brexit there is no reason for them to be scared of Parliament having a meaningful vote in 2019.  
Absolutely the correct position from Labour's Shadow Brexit Secretary - the Brexit deal is too important to allow the government to push it through with no Parliamentary oversight #FBPE 
Poll on the relation between social and cultural change and attitude towards #Brexit. Please RT for wider coverage.Do you think that on the whole Britain has improved socially and culturally since the early 1970s? 
Guy Verhofstadt asks “why the hell would you want" to leave the Brussels club.Fair question, so let's remind ourselves of why a majority in UK voted to leave the #EU Brussels club run by people like @guyverhofstadt#Brexit 
We're no mutineers - but Parliament must have a binding vote on the final Brexit deal, writes @heidiallen75 #Premium  
Merkel ally says Brexit talks have raised UK support for second referendum  
Italy has called on the EU to offer a “tailor-made” Brexit trade deal to the UK, in an accommodating move towards London  
It is vital that Parliament passes Amendment 7 to the #EU Withdrawal Bill, to support sovereignty and respect the will of the people at the last general election. MPs need a genuinely meaningful vote on any #Brexit deal before we leave the EU. #YesTo7 
Lots of tweets anxiously legalsplaining that the "sufficient progress" joint report not legally binding from those who were dismissive when it was pointed out referendum not legally binding.Pick-and-mix binds of law. 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage blasts the deception of the British public by Theresa May in signing up to a transition phase that could see us tied to the Single Market and Customs Union indefinitely."I fear Brexit at some point in the future may need to be re-fought all over again."  
Fox & Friends host on Doug Jones winning in Alabama: "This was not a referendum on Trump. I feel like it was a referendum on Harvey Weinstein"  
Davis, Johnson, Fox. The Three Brexiteers are the biggest risk to a smooth and orderly Brexit. Sack them.  
The Referendum Constitutional Dialogues are also the most significant debates on constitutional law Australia has ever seen at a community level. WE should be extremely proud of this process. It delivered a consensus. 
Chef Marcus Wareing has said that Brexit will make people in the UK ‘better employers’ by taking care of its workforce. He is right, Brexit can lead to a period of #NationalRenewal 
Congratulations to all these good people fighting for Parliament, not a small cabal of self-interested Tory Eurosceptics, to take control of #Brexit@Mcr4EU @Labour4EU @BrexitBin @spaceangel1964 #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
My message to EU staff in the NHS following the progress in Brexitnegotiations  
This is very important.The European Parliament does not trust the British side will actually do what it says, and will negotiate accordingly. The EU side is right in its analysis.#Brexit  
Brexit SHOCK - @Daily_Express begins to WAKE UP to REALITY... 
.@MichelBarnier: There will be no transition period if there is no #brexit deal #eplenary 
#brexit All the usual bloody Remoaner bores, out trying to derail brexit again !!! Chuka Umunna, Anna Soubry, Dominic Grieve. Labours MPs out as well trying to stop Brexit. Get it through your thick skulls 17 million voted leave. We’re leaving get it.       
Yesterday the Gov. refused to say whether they would honour the commitment to help at-risk child refugees in Europe after Brexit. Does leaving the EU mean we forget our morals obligations? #RefugeesWelcome 
Great to join @Open_Britain in Parliament Square earlier. Parliament must have a vote on any Brexit deal - so please urge your MP to support amendment 7 #YesTo7 
Photos of @ChukaUmunna, @CarolineLucas, @thomasbrake & @StephenGethins speaking at the morning's @Open_Britain event in support of Amendment 7.MPs will vote on the amendment, calling for a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal, tonight. Labour have confirmed support. #YesTo7 #FBPE 
Labour will have to make a choice on Brexit, and soon | Rafael Behr  
The SNP @theSNP will back Dominic Grieve's amendment 7 to #EUWithdrawalBill giving Parliament a proper say on the Brexit deal if he pushes it to a vote tonight. We urge him to do so #Brexit  
MPs should not use parliamentary procedure to frustrate the Brexit process simply because they refuse to accept the result. Any attempts to tie the Government’s hands will only encourage the EU to give us a bad deal  
In 1973 the @RoyalMail commemorated going into the European Community by issuing a stamp. Let’s have a Brexit stamp! Any design suggestions? Answers on a postcard!  
After 18 months of denial, everyone now knows what #Brexit really means for the UK: spinning out of control instead of taking back control. #EPlenary @EPPGroup @Europarl_EN 
Population of UK: 65.64m, number who voted #Brexit 17.4m, number who did not vote #Leave 48.24m - #Remain is rising #FBPE 
How do you want your MP to vote tonight on Amendment 7, which would give Parliament a #MeaningfulVote on the final Brexit deal? #YesTo7 
No mention of the SNP there AnnaThe SNP voted for the Single Market amendment tooJeremy is not in the closet about BrexitHe's holding hands with Theresa May  
#Brexit and #Trump are two cheeks of the same arse.Today #Alabama put it's pants back on.#StopBrexit 
.@M_AndersonSF speaking during European Parliament debate on resolution on joint Brexit agreement, reminding MEPs that implementation is key when it comes to agreements made with the British government  
This evening MPs vote on one of the biggest issues of #Brexit - a vote on whether the terms of the final deal is acceptable to Parliament. The Government must not be allowed to drive through a hard Brexit on their own. I'll be voting FOR Amendment 7.  
David Davis' desperate plea as backbench revolt threatens to derail Brexit bill, Theresa May has been warned she faces a rebellion unless MPs are guaranteed a meaningful vote on the terms of the UK's withdrawal from the European Union  
Imagine if Sean Dyche took over the Brexit negotiations, the EU would probably be applying to join the UK by the end of the season 
Ten years ago today the Lisbon Treaty was signed. Should the British public have been given a referendum on it? 
The aspirations of our political leaders are out of step with the people they are meant to serve. I fear Brexit may need to be refought all over again.  
'You rebels want to stop Brexit!’ Piers Morgan tears into Treacherous Deceitful EU Remainers @Anna_Soubry  & Grieve in heated TV row 
At least Americans can move bit by bit against Trump. We here are stuck with Brexit loonies forever. 
May has come out of the closet and exposed herself as a Remainer and will do what is necessary to thwart Brexit. Very disappointed that Davis has gone along with it. A new PM and negotiating team with pro Brexit bureaucrats now essential. 
Thank you @DanielZeichner for supporting the amendment on Single Market Membership yesterday, and good luck with today's more critical vote on a #FinalSay on #Brexit  #YesTo7 
Net immigration falling... Wages still falling. Who's laughing? Your boss. Your boss is laughing.Oh and the ones who convinced you to vote Brexit to reduce immigration. They're in hysterics.  
Amusing. The language startup @iliniFrench is offering the UK’s #Brexit negotiators free French courses “On ne peut pas avoir le beurre et l’argent du beurre” - you can’t have your cake and eat it“Vous pouvez toujours courir” - you can go whistle 
1. We're slowly losing our rights, our voice & our democracy to a #Brexit coup driven thru by Far Right & Socialist ideology in both main parties & cynical party machines acting in self interest 2 either retain or gain power! I can't find the words to describe the helpless anger.  
'Get up off your knees!' Lord Lawson demands PM ends 'demeaning' Brexit negotiations with Brussels  
Staying in the Single Market and Customs Union is the best anti-austerity policy out there. I spoke to @adampayne26 from Business Insider about Brexit, David Davis, and austerity.  
The UK’s vote to leave the EU will have major implications for health and social care in England. See our analysis of the key issues that must remain high on the government’s agenda during #Brexit negotiations:  
"We had all sorts of gloomy forecasts before the referendum...and those forecasts were obviously wrong.,” says @johnredwood 
Where's your "paradigm shift" now, trump-and-brexit authoritarians? Your US/UK result was an outlier. People are getting tired of your shit.  
I've signed the cross party amendment to the #EUWithdrawalBill that would guarantee Parliament a vote on the final Brexit deal - if Brexit is about how we #TakeBackControl then we should start with the deal itself. Parliament is either sovereign or it is not. 
“We can still turn this around. Let us demand a #finalsay on Brexit deal.” says @MollyMEP in #epplenary 
1 Why trust an informal commitment by Davis (Mr "Brexit impact assessments")?2 Why only a parliamentary resolution? Eurosceptics demanded an Act of Parliament for all amendments to the EU Treaties. Now they want *less* parliamentary control of Brexit?  
Brexit will hurt the poorest and most vulnerable in our society the most. It will hugely damage all our public services and yet Corbyn sits on his hands. Time for a new leader to actually oppose this Government. 
It's clear the Tories are still the nasty pasty. They've welcomed back Anne Marie Morris even after she made such an appallingly racist comment.May is so weak and desperate to avoid a parliamentary defeat on Brexit she has forgiven & forgetten racism 
More appalling behaviour by UKIP MEPs in the chamber today. Further national embarrassment and undermining of credibility by those who claim to be patriots #Brexit 
When even @uklabour press refers to the @jeremycorbyn #Brexit position as ambiguous, opaque and fuzzy...... What an utter, utter, epic mess he has got them into with his playing people.Huge #LabourFail ☭  
If we have to let the express believe it was its idea to stop Brexit, I can suck that up.  
2) Starmer was the great hope for Labour at one point, fiercely intelligent & a great pedigree.He's now using that intellect to enable Labour to duck & dodge around #Brexit, supporting the Government whilst almost but not quiet appearing not toIs this the legacy he hoped for? 
We have been airbrushed out of the debate entirely. Your scripts & commentators start with the assumption we will #leave. Yet the referendum was vanishingly close & advisory. Time to rethink this - we are going nowhere. We will #stopbrexit. Then what will you do for news? not to 
Unbelievably uninformed Brexit voters spouting nonsense for whole hour on @bbc5live right now. They literally don’t know what they’re talking about, saying stuff that’s untrue, & all going largely unchallenged. Truly lamentable 
Burundi's President Pierre Nkurunziza has launched a referendum campaign to prolong his stay in power until 2034,  
MPs warn impact of leaving nuclear regulator after Brexit will be "profound" and call for an extended transitional period  
At Parliament Square yesterday, this bloke was repeatedly shouting "STOP BREXIT!" at anybody who'd listen. I said to him, "how do we do that?" His response? "STOP BREXIT!"   
So, you are trying to assume complete jurisdictional rights for post-#Brexit UK.  You don't get it do you?  We are leaving the #EU behind 
MORNING TWITTER! So, if the good people of #Alabama can stick 2 fingers up to Trump, let us follow their example and tell this nasty racist Govt where it can stick its #Brexit! (clue: where the sun don't shine) 
WATCH: @Anna_Soubry & Dominic Grieve on why they'll be backing Amendment 7 tonight to give Parliament a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal #YesTo7 
We as the European Parliament, will seek to protect the rights of all EU citizens, whether they are from the continent, or from the UK #Eplenary #Brexit 
So, NZF wants a referendum on the assisted dying bill because it is too important an issue for 120 MPs to decide on behalf of NZ. But they have no problem with one old drunkard deciding who will lead our Government. #Hypocrites. 
Pathetic effort to sectarianise Brexit on @StephenNolan Brexit is not a green and orange issue except in a programme which has no other playbook. A majority of the people of the North voted to remain in the EU. Change the record. 
"English rivers polluted by powerful insecticides, first tests reveal">Yet another reason why the #PrecautionaryPrinciple is so important & why it must be strengthened not watered down during #Brexit 
This was a referendum against Trump, religious hypocrisy, racism, sexual abusers & bigotry. They lost in their own back yard. Stunning result.  
“On the first day of Choicemas, my repealers gave to me… thousands of voices calling for a referendum! " You can join this collective call by signing ARC’s petition for a referendum to #repealthe8th #choicemas  
We will never allow the Irish people to become the collateral damage of #Brexit. We will continue to stand behind Ireland. #EPlenary 
Nobody seems to trust the Home Office anymore - too many bad things have happened to EU citizens living in the UK. #Brexit is not their fault, so why do they have to pay for the consequences of it? 
As the wheels continue to fall off the Brexit bus and the reality becomes clearer, Parliament having a vote between a bad deal or no deal in 2019 is not a meaningful vote. I will be in Parliament later hoping to speak in favour of keeping all options on the table in  
The European Parliament is clear: not all problems have been solved in phase one talks on the Withdrawal Agreement. Especially on citizens’ rights #Brexit #Eplenary 
I will be supporting cross-party Amendment 7 to the #Brexit Bill today #YesTo7 
For those who think that Brexit was an expression of uniquely rabid nativism, the figures cited in this article are quite eye-opening:  
We're no mutineers - but Parliament must have a binding vote on the final Brexit deal   via @Telegraph 
.@ManfredWeber says that first phase of Brexit talks was about building trust but behaviour of @DavidDavisMP has ‘not been helpful’. Very diplomatic language for the anger felt here at attempts by UK govt to renege on last week’s agreement 
Parliament must have a meaningful vote on the final #Brexit deal. You can't have a referendum in 2016, claim its current validity, and then use Henry VIII powers to force it through @thatginamiller @theresa_may #clause9 
I was in London during Brexit. Went to bed seeing sad Farage on television. Woke up to the news Farage won. Now in London w/tears of gratitude this morning. Farage, Bannon, rest of the Kremlin Klown Kar lost, & an honorable man is going to the Senate. Thank you, AL! #ALSenateRace 
Make sure you do. You really screwed up last night with the Single Market vote. Why is Corbyn following the Tories with his cap in his hand? Sort it out and start acting like an opposition. #Brexit #corbyn #singlemarket #EUWithdrawalBill 
Relieved that a racist child molester lost an election by a whisker and doubtful that our sovereign Parliament will secure a meaningful vote on Brexit, which people claim they voted for because our Parliament lacked sovereignty.Good Times. 
Labour will back Dominic Grieve's amendment giving Parliament a proper say on the Brexit deal if he pushes it to a vote tonight. The terms of our future are not for the government alone to determine. 
WATCH: @thomasbrake expertly explains why MPs must say #YesTo7 today & vote for Amendment 7 to secure a meaningful vote on any Brexit deal. Pls RT:  
Latest #Brexit economic doomsaying think tank is #EU funded  Who'd have thunk? 
Will be on my feet shortly in Strasbourg Parliament talking about the Brexit negotiations & the behaviour of the British Government - no one knows their negotiation tactics better than us #StandUp4YrRights 
Leaving the EU is not inevitable until it is inevitable. It is not a done deal until the deal is done. MPs can respect the vote of an advisory referendum but must also acknowledge and respect that many who voted leave have now changed their minds. Leaving is not inevitable. 
Hard WTO Brexit would savage British jobs. It is unacceptable. Should we lose 1m British job to appease the Brexit Taliban? No way. They made a load of big promises. Now they deliver or Brexit’s off. #RemainersNow #FBPE 
Brexit suggests we’re on the right side of history, says Prof Robert Tombs in the Spectator Christmas special (out now)  
."Brexit discussions will be suspended if British commitments in phase one talks are reneged on.". 
VETO: Remoaner MPs are pushing for Parliament to have a vote on Brexit deal. They must respect will of the people who backed exit from Single Market, Customs Union and end to open borders!  
Brexit has had unexpected results. If we the people aren’t given the chance to answer the question ‘are you happy with it?’ our MPs must be 
Please pass this GoFundMe page link to any leavers you know so the can donate to pay for brexit   #Stopbrexit #FBPE 
Brexit Explained  
A No-Deal Brexit would cost the UK economy £105bn! All of the Brexit options will result in big losses - nowhere is there a benefit that could fulfil the promises of the Brexit voted for #StopBrexit #r4today 
Why the Brexit negotiations are about to get harder  
Ouch! Brussels to focus on transition deal, ruling out Brexit trade talks till March 2018  via @FT 
The only #brexit SHOCK here is the Daily Express being realistic.  
Surprise surprise! Actual impact of Brexit increasingly recognised small on most fs sectors. Remainer angst.... Brexit relocations by City banks set to fall short of fears -  via @FT 
Dem lawmaker: Alabama Senate race was a “referendum on morality and Trump lost"  
#ConservativeChristmas Door13: David Davis has lied and misspoken throughout the Brexit process. Calling the phase 1 agreement 'merely a statement of intent' has done real harm to relations. He is not a very smart man. #MerryBrexmess #AdventCalendar 
Brexit Secretary David Davis’ Statement this morning on the Procedures for the Approval and Implementation of EU Exit Agreements - just gone up 1/2  
And yesterday the FT reported the supposed Q1 2018 "point of no return" for banks' Brexit planning is "being erased", i.e. was not true. Funny that.  
If you're not entirely certain of the significance of #Amendment7 in the context of #Brexit, @Reuters has a clear explanation here: 
EU "will not accept any backtracking" from Britain on Brexit breakthrough, Michel Barnier says  
The key elements of a ‘meaningful’ Parliamentary vote on #Brexit:1. Must come before exit day;2. Parl provided beforehand with comprehensive details of the deal, not simple heads of terms;3. Act of Parl approving terms before the PM signs any agreement.  
Former Catalan president Artur Mas, ministers Rigau, Ortega and Homs have lost ownership of their private HOMES as fine for organising 2014 Referendum. When will Spain's Francoist Erdogan-like tyrany end? @NoamChomsky_es @JulianAssange @KRLS @EUparliament @UN 
It is absolutely vital Parliament reasserts itself in the #Brexit process and does not give the Government a blank cheque. This is Dominic Grieve’s crucial Amendment 7 to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill, being voted on later, to ensure Parliament takes back control.  
Everyone has the right to go to work in the morning with the expectation they will come home safe to their families at night #Brexit can’t allow Tories to take away workers’ rights & vital EU health & safety law @TUCnews @unionstogether @Manuel_TSSA @TheProgressives 
For a century, theorists have argued that the nation state is obsolete. Brexit suggests otherwise, says Robert Tombs  
So many struggling to put food on the table and keep a roof over their heads. #lowpay economy is failing in its basic task to meet people's needs. And effect of #Brexit  
MEPs will have their say on the latest Brexit developments this morning. Watch live →  #EPlenary 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 13: as new facts come to light, the British people are free to change their minds on Brexit.  
This morning I discuss #Brexit phase 1 deal with #EP which has been from the start strong and vigilant on priority of #citizensrights. See Q & A 
This English town backed Brexit. Now its Polish workers are leaving  
Off to do @BBCRadioScot Good Morning Scotland on brexit talks and the vote later today in Strasbourg on whether to move to Phase Two. Much more needed on rights of citizens. 
Good to see a Bible bashing huckster lose, but let’s not get carried away by a very close ( tighter even than Brexit) & deeply divisive result. An angry Trump is a dangerous Trump  
Theresa May's parliamentary showdown with #Brexit rebels  via @WJames_Reuters 
Labour are not going to save the UK from Brexit.Labour are not for remain, they're not even for the single market and customs union.On the biggest issue of our time Labour are not providing any opposition. Corbyn is a failure, even if he means well. He needs to go.  
FUN FACT: On several occasions during recent speeches Steve Bannon said: “This election is a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. A vote for Roy Moore is a vote FOR or AGAINST Donald Trump.” #AlabamaSenateElection 
It’s not a SHOCK when anyone with any knowledge or experience of the matter has been telling you this since long before the referendum, you shysters.  
The Brexit mist is clearing. Corbyn will have to show his hand and soon/Rafael Behr  
Brexit relocations by City banks set to fall short of fears  
Dem lawmaker: Alabama Senate race was a “referendum on morality and Trump lost"  
Some differences here: MA race was largely seen as referendum on health care (in a way AL wasn’t on taxes). And Brown’s win meant Dems no longer had 60 votes, forcing them to take longer using reconciliation. 
.@TurnbullMalcolm's appalling political judgement on full display. If he thinks he might lose #Bennelong why would he turn it into a referendum on his government like he did today??? What an idiot. #auspol 
I just cannot buy into the notion that tonight was a referendum on anyone other than Roy Moore. The takes calling this a rebuke of Bannon and/or Trump are already out there, but that is a huge extrapolation right now. 
This was a referendum on morality and @realDonaldTrump lost. Get ready for 2018. 
Former NBA player and Alabama native Charles Barkley says Doug Jones’ victory is a referendum on the state: “We really needed this”  
.@CeciliaVega: "Without a doubt, this race in Alabama was 100% a referendum on President Trump...a vote against Roy Moore was a vote against Donald Trump."  #ALSen 
This is a referendum against you, bannon, the alt right and the GOP! Keep making excuses and pushing your fake news. Americans aren't buying it any more. 
This is a turning point. This is a pivotal moment in our nation's history. This is a referendum on the hateful, ugly, petty and lecherous #Trump presidency. Change is on the horizon. Dignity and respect will once again rise to the top. #DougJones 
Dems will surely make noise in slowing it down. But this race was not a referendum on tax bill, and Rs already had set goal to send this to Trump by Dec 20  
A Doug Jones victory—a moment of morality + sanity + decency + justice, a referendum on Trump, a win for (and bc of!) African-Americans + women, a success for bipartisanship, a historic moment for countless reasons.My thoughts on #AlabamaSenateElection…  
Referendum on Moore, NOT Trump. 
Don't fool yourself, @realDonaldTrump, this is a referendum on YOU! #ThankYouAlabama 
Two things I can't wait for tomorrow:-Marmalade Mussolini's early morning tweetstorm claiming that none of this is a referendum on him-Sarah Huckabee Sanders' rude presser in which she claims that Trump never "really" endorsed or supported Roy Moore#AlambamaSenateElection 
Thoughts on the #AlabamaSenateElection:1. Moore was a terrible candidate2. McConnell needs to be replaced ASAP3. Doug Jones only won a 2-year seat, he will be short lived4. This is not a referendum on Trump5. GOP projected to pick up 1-2 Senate seats in 2018 #ALSenate 
.@tarapalmeri says a White House official is saying Moore had issues, lost previous elections, race not a referendum on the president. 
Note to Roy Moore: You’ve been rejected. Good has prevailed over evil. Note to Steve Bannon: Everything you touch turns to shit. Give it up. Note to Donald Trump: This is a referendum. You are hated. 2018 will not be kind to you. #AlabamaSenateElection #ALSEN 
The Alabama special Senate election is not only a rejection of Roy Moore, but is also a referendum on Donald Trump! The Blue Tsunami is coming!!! 
Hooray! I mean, a 1.1% win over a backwards, racist pedophile who was endorsed by America’s loudest asshole and supported solely out of spite isn’t exactly a referendum to pin a lot of hope for humanity on. But, hooray! 
Yes Trump, this loss is also a referendum on you 
Tonight’s election in #Albama was the referendum on #MeeToo movement! Congratulations to @GDouglasJones and All Americas who held onto their moral compass.  
It was more than a race for Senate, it was a referendum on Trump politics and on sexual abusers.And Alabama said NO! America says NO! #AlabamaSenateElectionCongratulations Doug Jones. 
I am not emotional but tonight that will change. Thank you for giving me hope Alabama. This election is a referendum on Trump and American values. Thank you all who voted for Doug Jones.#DougJonesSenatorOfAlabama #AlabamaSenateElection #ALSenate 
Doug Jones has just barely won the senate seat in Alabama... now before you liberals start saying this was a referendum on the GOP or the president himself you're wrong. This was a referendum on accusations that came out a month before an election with no proof. Dirty politics 
@UKLabour abstaining on key Brexit votes.We won't forget this @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer . You want to pretend you have the Tories on the run but you're a party of cowardly enablers.And don't tell me "Brexit is a Tory mess". Labour rubbing into the carpet and smearing walls. 
UK's May faces parliamentary showdown with Brexit rebels  
Don't trust the UK Tory Govt...the majority of UK citizens don't...it's them aided by a self serving opposition that have brought this country to this #Brexit debacle & now seek to force it through on the basis of 37% of the UK voters. Pin them down in  us. 
Gee I think you forgot to add about your boss sounding out Ms Keneally for the Vatican Ambassador post & appointing her to the 'Referendum Council for the recognition of Aboriginal Australians'?   
Jones always had a better chance of winning a race that was a referendum on Moore’s fitness for office than one where voters were focused his policies.  
The Labour leadership as with the Tories have shown their true colours time and again...such a strategic mistake...#Remain is growing & will wreak a terrible revenge on those backing #Brexit. We are witnessing a travesty of democracy.  
You can imagine the look on the Express readers faces, like showing a caveman fire for the first time  
I told you the other day Mundell has already said they'll be no need for holyrood after brexit ? This is just the beginning of the end for holyrood as we know it 
I just wish @jeremycorbyn would love social justice & prosperity more than he hates the #EU. Instead of fighting anti-immigrant nonsense among his supporters, he promotes it by supporting @Brexit. Worst government in history meets worst opposition in history. Tragedy for the #UK 
I don't think that the AL special election is the referendum on the state of the union that people are making it out to be.But I do think that the efforts to support these communities should be a model for all of us going forward. 
The Guardian view on the Brexit vote: mutiny wanted | Editorial  
Another night, another vote, another Labour Brexit betrayal. Nothing new here. 
Qu for Leavers & Remainers who have resigned themselves to leaving EU: “Is no Brexit better than a bad Brexit?” (Pls RT out of my bubble) 
Again? AGAIN! AGAINNNN?!? What the hell are you playing at @UKLabour? What will it take for you to at least try and be competent in being the opposition. Your actions on ANOTHER #brexit issue is sick.  
@LibDems single market amendment defeated after Labour abstain.@vincecable said of Corbyn:"He whipped his MPs to support the Conservatives, sitting on his hands rather than voting against their extreme Brexit plans."This is now a Tory-Labour Brexit." 
Negotiations with the EU seem to be nothing more or less than them saying this is what's on offer take it or leave it. That our government can allow us to be humiliated and treated in this way is outrageous. Where are the Tory brexit rebels, never needed more than now. 
I never use the word 'Remoaner' because I respect the fact that people can hold a different view to me. I voted for Brexit. That does not make an extremist. @Nigel_Farage is a friend of mine. That doesn't mean I support all his views. Do you support all the views of your friends? 
The #Labour front bench and scores of MPs have sided with Mrs May's Conservatives again. @UKLabour pretend to be against #Brexit, whilst doing everything possible to achieve Brexit. They shed crocodile tears.  
Remind me when that silly #Brexit referendum was again?  
Theresa May faces choice of retreat or defeat over her Brexit law  
Hollande : Brexit is IRREVERSIBLE  
Here's Seumas Milne with Putin in Sochi in October 2014 and a link to an article in April 2014 in which Corbyn recycled the Kremlin line on Ukraine (also the stance of some Tory MPs) It's in this light that I view Corbyn's support for #Brexit.  
Oh dear. The Express has finally discovered that Brexit will leave Britain worse off. And it is SHOCKED... Time for them to join the growing #StopBrexit campaign. #FBPE.  
Things you don’t hear much from Theresa May & the Brexiters these days:1. Brexit means Brexit2. No-deal is better than a bad deal3. We hold all the cards(I may have missed a few: please add your suggestions)#BrexitShambles 
Obama gave an American viewpoint on Britain post Brexit. Trump gave a platform to a racist and Fascist organisation Britain First. If you can’t tell the difference go back to googling democracy to learn…  
To ensure Brexit goes ahead, so a schizoid Labour Party can take over from a schizoid Tory & totally wreck what’s left of OUR country!?  
Missed this - Labour Leaver @JohnMannMP suggests Switzerland-style option for Brexit - ie EFTA, praises Norway too  
MPs. This is potentially your last chance to maintain Parliament as a serious check on executive power on Brexit. Without this, the future of the UK will be decided solely by government, not by you.  
Oh. Better late than never, eh, Daily Express?#Brexit  
Let’s hear the good news about Brexit more often - by Brendan O'Neill.  
Even the Daily Express admits #brexit would be a costly, damaging exercise, under ANY scenario:  
You’ll have had your devolution...... the vow was a lie, there is no family of equals in this union. Scotland deserves better than this dogs brexit #Brexishambles 
The Express, once again, reporting so called “Project Fear”. More evidence of a subtle shift in the pro-#Brexit media? Let’s hope so. #StopBrexit #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll 
Labour must say it: Britain should stay in the single market after Brexit - @ChukaUmunna Or even better, stay in the EU - polls show the majority think Brexit is a mistake and want to Remain.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
The UK will be worse off under almost all Brexit scenarios, an influential think tank has found  
Follow @tconnellyRTE for the non-empire, non-jingoistic-view of Brexit 
There you go gang - a Brexit success. Tesco admitting that they are now using foreign produced sugar by an American firm over British beet. Well done @LeaveEUOfficial - job done @andywigmore 
Brexit SHOCK Daily Express warns its readers UK will be worse off as a result of #BrexitIf only they'd had been saying this earlier!  
And so it begins.  The UK is on its way to becoming a dictatorship with the kind of “enabling act” that secured Adolf Hitler's place in history.  The only way to stop this now is to stop Brexit altogether.  
15% nationally want to stop brexit. Fifteen percent. Yes. Fifteen. I wish the media would stop listening to these extremely loud yet unrepresentative voices instead of the massive majority. One can only think that the media ARE the 15%. x  
Political cowardice by @UKLabour once again. They're a hard Brexit party and are fooling no one. They are failing in their duty to represent their core vote, the ones who will suffer the most from a hard Brexit. Shameful. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
93 MPs voted for the Single Market and for British jobs. Lib Dems, SNP, Soubry, Clarke and 40+ Labour. Where were the Labour front bench? Tories voted against of course. #Brexit #FBPE 
No fudge. No wordplay. Barnier’s team clearly setting out a series of practical Q&As on the agreement on post-Brexit citizens’ rights.  
Very good Q&A from @EU_Commission on rights of EU citizens in UK and UK citizens in EU after Brexit.  
Two-thirds of young people want Brexit abandoned, new poll saysIt's their future & it's been stolen by the majority of older generation!!!  
No change. Just as there has been no change since 2014. If anything, the complexities of Brexit have reinforced No voters' support for the Union.I voted Remain. But one regrettable decision doesn't make me want to vote for a second.  
Labour Remainers: L'ship wants a hard #BrexitL'ship believes you have nowhere else to go & so will keep forgiving/ignoring their pro Brexit support of GovernmentTalk of "jobs 1st Brexit" is cheapAll that really matters are the Brexit supporting votesWhen will you jump?  
No-one should be surprised that a thinktank churning out gloomy Brexit reports was EU-funded.In fact, the same EU-funded thinktank (RAND Corporation) competes with us for MPs attention over UK-EU defence policy!See below.  
Margaret Thatcher's great legacy, the European Single Market - not on the ballot paper in the referendum. But Tories voted to leave it tonight, and Labour abstained. Whether we're in the EU or not, we need a common market. 
To every first-time voter who trusted Jeremy Corbyn in June 2017 because you felt betrayed by #Brexit, the betrayal didn't stop there. It won't stop until you accept that Labour isn't a #Remain party and change your vote. 
Lord Lawson demands PM ends 'demeaning' Brexit  negotiations  via  
The Alabama election is a referendum on the following question: "Should predatory pedophiles be elected to the United States Senate?" Vote accordingly 
So the people who brought the UK Brexit Mensch/Farage/Banks/Wigmore/Kassam/ are liars? I am so SHOCKED!   
Based on circulation of 391,000 and a daily price of 45p, five days a week, the Daily Express has made just under £60 million over the last 17 months by filling its readers full of disinformation and hate around Brexit, ironically costing them billions more in the process. 
Voting on #WithdrawalBill.  Sad sight of majority of official opposition (with usual honourable exceptions) sitting out an opportunity to keep open the opportunity to remain in Single Market #Brexit 
German MEP says 'Keep your £39 Billion, we don't want it!''EVERYTHING is off the table!'Good News at last from Brussels!No Deal is much better than a humiliatingly bad deal.WTO Trade Rules will be just fine for Britain (but not for EU!)#Brexit #EU 
Voting now to ensure Ministers should keep the UK aligned with Single Market #amendment124 #brexit 
Don't delay Brexit. Stop Brexit  
So what exactly have the EU and the UK agreed on citizens’ rights post #Brexit? See the Q &A here:  via @EU_Commission 
David Davis scrambles to salvage EU relations after 'damaging trust'Another example of utter ineptitude from the #Brexit BulldogIt’s all just so embarrassing 
Avec M. Brexit  Thank you @Nigel_Farage !  
German minister tells May to stop Brexit double talk . How shameful the British Government has to be reminded how to behave in a decent way. Of course they treat the British public with contempt too. #FBPE 
While lots of people blaming today's 3.1% inflation on brexit. Let's remind them of black Wednesday in 1992. Thanks to the disastrous ERM inflation jumped 5% in one day to 15% cost UK taxpayers £3.4bn and made George Soros £1bnLet that sink in! 
for Worst Attempt At A Solo Career i put Brexit  
Britain wants a "virtually identical" trading relationship with EU after Brexit, Liam Fox says  
Gloomy #Brexit report by #EU-funded think tank hyped by also #EU-funded #BiasedBBC,via @EuroGuido.Quelle surprise. 
BBC Hypes Gloomy Brexit Report By EU-Funded Think Tank  
This is your daily reminder that Brexit-Wankers are thick as fuck.  
My piece on why tomorrow is the biggest moment so far in Brexit politics @BestforBritain 
Right who is going to be the brave soul & simply say what we’re all thinking .Brexit is proving to be too complicated, too expensive & is bringing out the worst in society. Let’s just fuck it in the bin & start sorting out our education, health services & Infrastructure. 
So now this sexist comment has become a chance for a WH-led referendum on campaign finances, special interests, the swamp, and why Trump beat Hillary Clinton. It's a stunning pivot, really. 
DON'T SIGN ANYTHING !  IT WAS OUR VOTE AND ONLY OURS, NOT POLITICIANS AND WE ARE NOT HAPPY YOU ARE BETRAYING THE 17.4 MILLION THAT VOTED TO LEAVE ! The European Parliament is to demand that last week’s Brexit deal is converted into a legally binding text as soon as possible.  
This is the reason American Sugar Refining owned Tate & Lyle was all over Brexit; the EU, whilst ending sugar beet quotas for EU members, is keeping its punitive tariffs on imported cane sugar used by Tate & Lyle - whose former Director is David Davis! 
New #Poll shows 61% of Brits want MPs to be able to vote on the final #Brexit divorce deal  via @leftfootfwd 
Two in every three people disapprove of the shambolic way the Government is handling Brexit negotiations.Ask your MP to support Amendment 7 to give Parliament a meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal  
Take that Remainers! Francois Hollande says Brexit is IRREVERSIBLE  @theresa_may 
my mum has lived in this country since she was my age and she keeps getting letters from politicians assuring her won’t have to leave due to brexit lol 
BOLLOX TO #BREXIT BUS!  footage from yesterday with @albawhitewolf and @mikegalsworthy wearing a very fetching "All I Want For #Xmas Is #EU" jumper... Seriously though, it is all that I want...  #StopBrexit 
The Guardian view on the Brexit vote: mutiny wanted | Editorial  
"BUT YOU CAN NEVER LEAVE!" So, Brexit can't now be completed by March 2019, so in fact the UK will not be allowed to leave. We'll be hogtied and strangled until the European megalomaniacs grinds the UK into the dirt. Damn the Remainers who have brought this down on our heads. 
Off to do #skypapers to talk about Brexit with @thecarolemalone like 
Brexit debate: how many MPs does it take to fill eight hours of dead air?  | John Crace  
EU sends stark warning to airlines on post-Brexit flying "UK flights to the EU will be grounded in March 2019 should no agreement be reached"#brexitshamblesWhat is Chris Grayling doing all day? 
Former #Spanish army officer says the Spanish Gov deployed psychological warfare techniques to try to abort #Catalonia's #1Oct referendum and that, after obviously failing to prevent voting, raised its threat level to contemplate a military intervention. 
#Abadi, Iraqi PM, compares the #Kurdistan independence referendum to the crimes of #ISIS. In Paris, London, Washington, everywhere, at this absurdity, we waver between the simple ridiculousness and disgust, between bursting out in laughter and nausea.  
MEP blasts 'BLUSTERING' David Davis for Brexit 'farce' as she kicks off legal challenge 
EU countries have toughened their stance on Brexit – again  
The Guardian view on the Brexit vote: mutiny wanted | Editorial  
‘@_HenryBolton: “The only party that is fully behind Brexit, and the only party that is fully behind the vote of the 23 June? It’s UKIP and that is not over dramatic. It is true. We are the only party that can do it, properly” 
Respecting the outcome means respecting the lies we were told and the austerity Brexit inflicts.We're amongst many, campaigning for truth and future prosperity for the 100%.#StopBrexit 
Question 1: Are Remainers all educated and Brexiters all uneducated?Brexit Panel Debate with @BromsgroveLab @UKLabour Full Version:  
Former Tory MEP @vickyford warns @angelasmithmp against “scaremongering” over environmental protections post-Brexit, arguing that “much of that great European environment legislation has been led by British influence”  
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #3: The Road to Isolation. RT #StopBrexit 
Brexit update: The EU has literally added amendments to stop David Davis from talking nonsense. Marvellous.  
Seriously, can we all just accept that Tories’ handling of Brexit is shit and Labour’s handling of Tories’ Brexit is shit.Stop trying to pretend otherwise. It’s embarrassing. pic.twitter.com/unJkssurVT 
This is Ian. Ian introduced an amendment to the #EUWithdrawalBill & then had to watch @johnmcdonnellMP @BarryGardiner & other @UKLabour #Brexit backers walk through the division lobbies with the @Conservatives to vote down his amendment.  #StopBrexit #ExitBrexit #finalsaydebate 
Donald Tusk calls Brexit talks a furious race against time  
British airlines will lose all flying rights to the European Union if there is no transition agreement after Brexit, the EU executive said on Tuesday. #FinalSay #stopbrexit @RLong_Bailey @KateOsamor @BarryGardiner @UKLabour 
I thought this week I was starting to suffer from mental health issues. Then I suddenly realised, ‘Oh no, Trump and Brexit’. Depression and anxiety are perfectly rational responses to the sea of shit in which we live. 
A lovely line here in @tconnellyRTE's Brexit book: pic.twitter.com/rF7TaVQnAF 
Number of votes where we know what kind of Brexit Leave voters wanted = 0. The only democratic option is a #ratificationreferendum. 
On behalf of the Maldives, I don’t just respect the Brexit vote - I welcome it, writes Ahmed Shiaan, Maldives Ambassador to the UK and the EU  
As @DougHeye told me, “the Moore team is using the race as a referendum against the media, Washington, 'The Establishment,' etcetera.” Will it work?  
What's driving fast-rising UK inflation? 'Clearly, the main culprit is Brexit.'  
Rebel Tory MPs refuse to drop their demand for EU (Withdrawal) bill to put into law that final Brexit terms must be enshrined in separate statute before we leave EU. Crucial vote on whether MPs can reject the Brexit deal will be tomorrow.  
Even Sky News (Ed Conway) put the cause squarely down to the Referendum result and the subsequent fall in the pound.  
With regard to #Brexit party loyalty is pretty much synonymous with betrayal of the country. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
BBC well & truly nobbled by Brexiters. Inflation hits 3.1%, from 0.5% June 2016, & NO mention of referendum and £!!!  
Labour must say it: Britain should stay in the single market after Brexit | Chuka Umunna  
Brexit going swimmingly then. Just as the disaster capitalists intended. #stopbrexit and #Remain 
Joe is of course the guy who did the instantly iconic marriage equality piece on the corner of George’s St during the referendum  
We still have a responsibility to help bring families back together post-Brexit. Let's protect child refugees, and help reunite them with loved ones.   
**your regular twitter reality check**% who want to abandon Brexit completely:nationally: 15%middle/upper class: 19%18-24 yr olds: 21%London: 21%Labour: 24%Remainers: 29%Lib Dems: 37%YouGov, Dec 10-11 
Is the tide turning on #Brexit? Yes, the latest opinion polls strongly suggest that it is, writes our Guest Writer for Today, Professor Adrian Low. Please read and re-Tweet. Link:  
Two thirds of young people want Brexit abandoned, new poll says 
German minister tells May to stop Brexit double talk  
EU Council President, Donald Tusk says EU “unity” will be key to an orderly Brexit. Of course, he doesn’t mean the unity of EU citizens. He means the unity of EU elitists around a (dangerous) hunger for a European superstate. 
Who knows? Very good question. Uncertainty must STOP before #Brexit Phase 2! LIFETIME guarantees and right to stay + Settled Status off the table NOW.Put 5 million #PeopleB4Politics, and before trade deals!Cc @MichelBarnier @guyverhofstadt @Number10gov @DavidDavisMP 
Attention #Brexitcasters! We're hosting our first (and most likely last) #Brexitcast LIVE on Mon 18th Dec in London. We're inviting a small audience. If you want to come please message me with the answer to this question: How many Brexit ring binders does @adamfleming have? 
I’m in the lords Security wanted to take the bollocks to Brexit sticker off my phone but the couldn’t 
Clear, balanced, insightful explanation of where Brexit negotiations stand/where we're going by @pmdfoster.  Summary: "The British  will be boiled slowly.". 
‘Britain is behaving like a GANGSTER’ Belgian MEP's furious rant at Davis over Brexit deal  From a nation of shopkeepers to a nation of gangsters in 200 years. Is that progress? 
EU readies 'David Davis-proof' #Brexit summit  
Seems big: BRUSSELS (Reuters) - British airlines will lose all flying rights to the European Union if there is no transition agreement after Brexit, the EU executive said on Tuesday 
Media coverage of Brexit negotiations disgraceful. EU presented as all knowing and all powerful. UK presented as bumbling incompetents. 
EU sends stark warning to airlines on post-Brexit flying  
Food inflation soars to 4.4% as a result of the pounds collapse against the Euro following #Brexit vote.And remember these increases are forever. Even if inflation falls next year, it will still be on top of these rises.Well done Farage with your £75K index linked EU pension 
'Difficult' devolved Brexit talks end without deal - BBC News  
The referendum Leave option was so vague & hand-waving that Diane James can claim the vote was all about immigration, while Dan Hannan claims anyone who says that is almost certainly a Remainer!No basis or mandate for a huge and complex change. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Jeremy Corbyn happy to clarify his precise Brexit position.  
Inflation. Another Brexit triumph 
We have 650 MPs & 798 peers yet only 40 have viewed the 850 page #Brexit impact analyses in Parliament. Where’s the scrutiny? 
Government just refused 2 say would honour commitments government made 2 help child refugees in Europe and refusing to write that commitment into brexit legislation. We are not just leaving EU under their watch, UK also leaving our principles behind too it seems.. #brexithaos 
Can someone please ask if there are any Brexit impact assessments in there? He definitely told us he had them..  
At the heart of this question is whether "no Brexit worse than a bad Brexit" ?Per HM Treasury forecast, Canada dry would knock 4.6%-7.8% of UK GDP by 2031. Or lower tax receipts of £36bn, equivalent to 8p on income tax. Of course UK trade negotiators will hope to do better /7 
Given fractious politics in UK, might a broad commitment to a "deep and special partnership" [EU source: "adjectives are free"] be tempting?It would mask limitations "Canada Dry" deal. It would get May over the line - recall #Brexit has always been about Tory party management/6 
For Tim Martin, the ruination of British farmers is a price worth paying for 3.5p off a Wetherspoons meal and 0.5p off the price of a pint.And even those "benefits" are highly doubtful - #Brexit-related inflation has already pushed food prices up steeply.#StopBrexit 
Brexit minister Steve Baker holds up our book 'the Devil is in the Detail' in the Commons but says now is not the time for complete reform of the delegated legislation process. We'd like to know: when will it be the time? 
This is pretty provacative: Europe's post-Brexit financial capital will be ... London  
Why is Guy Verhofstadt angry with David Davis? Because Britain has the Brexit strategy of a toddler  via @NewsNowUK#FBPE 
Germany’s Europe minister suggested that Theresa May is presenting different versions of the #Brexit talks at home and abroad  
"Anyone who is found guilty of sadistic cruelty towards animals will face a five-year jail sentence." Michael Gove pledges to make Brexit work for animals  
EU toughens stance on Brexit.Clearly a response to the irresponsible comments from @DavidDavisMP on the #Marr show.Is he deliberating undermining Theresa May? His negotiating team? The country? Why is he still in this most crucial role? 
.@MichelBarnier : "no possibility" of a UK-EU trade being concluded by #Brexit in March 2019. This is not news, even to @DavidDavisMP So what can UK realistically get next year? And does that tell us about UK strategy?1/thread 
So let's spell this out: today the Leader of the Opposition's team admitted that he deliberately pretended to be on BOTH sides of the fence on Brexit. Labour members/supporters, you ok with that? 
Theresa May has no one else to blame but herself for allowing her cabinet ministers to make such a great show at scoffing at the politically binding nature of the Brexit withdrawal agreement 
Uncertain as whether to pick a liar or an idiot to negotiate Brexit, Theresa May decided to go for both.#TheresaMay #DavidDavis #Liar #Idiot #Brexit  
Belize, Wigmore, Tate and Lyle. Not a 70s super group - rather the biggest Brexit scandal you've never heard of #BigSugar 
#DavidDavis serial mistakes on #brexit reveal a man completely out of his depth: 
Good #Brexit discussion w/ 27 ministers. Negotiations in phase 2 will progress only if joint report commitments are reflected in full in withdrawal agreement.Also: thank you @EU2017EE for excellent work- now off to Strasbourg to debate #Brexit w/ #EP 
Please share far and wide: New one-year post doctoral fellowship on Brexit and Administrative Justice with the @publiclawprojct: Happy to speak to anyone considering applying. 
There is "no possibility" that Britain and the EU can conclude a free trade agreement by the time Britain leaves in March 2019, Michel Barner said on Tuesday. - This means MPs will vote on #Brexit without knowing what comes next, unacceptable!  
Not Brexit.Please read this disturbing thread by (outstanding) junior barrister @MaryRachel_McC How bad policy creates nasty real-life situations. 
The European Parliament is demanding that the Brexit deal signed last Friday is converted into a legally binding text, as it’s not confident that the UK Government will keep its word.  
Sick of Labour people having a "What can Labour do?" attitude towards Brexit.Stop being Corbyn & start being honest. Tell Labour Brexiters the truth: rich will get richer, poor will get poorer; the rights that their ancestors fought for will be lost. Get off the bloody fence!  
Reagan once said that 'freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction.' I wonder if Mrs May - having made sure she has majorities on all the parliamentary committees and three-line whips her MPs to vote through Brexit - altogether appreciates its fragility. 
We all looking forward to Brexit?How's that Keaton boy getting on, by the way?Fucking freezing, int it? 
Now that we've got 280 chars, it's good to use the #StopBrexit and #FBPE (follow back pro-EU) tags, which will make our campaign more prominent on Twitter.Also please use #Brexit to reach a wider audience.Please RT. 
. @ScotGov absolutely clear that there must be acceptable , agreed amendments to EU Withdrawal Bill and clarity on frameworks before any progress on LCM .  Disappointed that didn’t happen today at JMC (EN) in London but will keep trying. #Brexit  
It is important to ask why May does not replace an obviously incompetent Minister for Brexit, and an incompetent Foreign Secretary. As an exercise. Because it tells you about where power lies right now in the UK. (An answer here:   Happy to hear others.) 
Inflation hits 3.1% while wages only rise by 2.2%, so due to #Brexit living standards are falling.#Brexit lies are making Britain poorer.#StopBrexit #FBPE #FBPE 
Meanwhile Barnier says “No possibility of full EU-UK trade deal by time of Brexit” a free trade agreement “will take longer” 
Nothing is agreed until everything agreed, Brexit means Brexit , strong & stable , let me clear & what a lot of bollocks !  
Tusk writes to EU leaders re Summit agenda on “moderate progress” re Brexit because “we only have ten months left to determine transition and future relations”... which will need “a furious race against time”  
It is absolutely gutting to read internal EU member statements on 27 unity regarding Brexit.I didn't pick this fight and yet I and millions of others are getting dragged along with it as Britain roars ever forward on its path of isolation and irrelevance.#StopBrexit 
When @DavidDavisMP said that the Brexit agreement wasn't binding, he pissed off negotiators in Belfast, Dublin, and Brussels. He's the #RealSaboteur #DavisMustGo 
Fantastic, slightly terrifying summation with @mrjamesob of how our views and decisions on #brexit have been manipulated / bought /sold via @facebook 
How many ways can one type how idiotic Davis's bluster was at the weekend?  This is dreadful stuff.UK needs to refresh the Brexit ministerial team.  
Let’s hear the good news about Brexit more often. Brendan O'Neill talking sense yet again....  
German Europe minister says he was “somewhat surprised” that what the British gov't said in Brussels was “a little different” to what was said in London - on UK only paying Brexit bill if there is a trade deal  
Diet, life expectancy, #obesity, #HIV, #Ebola vaccine, #pollution, physical activity and #Brexit – Lancet and @TheLancetHIV papers make up 12 of the @altmetric top 100 of 2017. All papers #openaccess or #free to read for 1 month 
The first phase of #Brexit negotiations was meant to build trust. By downgrading this agreement to a statement of intent, the UK Government is putting our trust at risk. The EU 27 & UK must make it clear on Thursday that the agreement is binding for both sides. #EUCO 
So simple to contact your MP to ask them to preserve our parliament's sovereignty. We need a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. Email your MP here  #Amendment7 #FinalSay #StopBrexit @StopBrexit17 
- BBC neglected to mention Rand is funded by the EU- Their report gets the Brexit bill wrong- And bases its figures on the debunked Treasury model from referendum - And doesn't look at the government's actual plan  
BBC Hypes Gloomy Brexit Report By EU-Funded Think Tank:  
Project Fear Lives: BBC Pushes Anti-Brexit Study by Group Funded by the EU and Advised by Top Eurocrats  
Labour must say it: Britain should stay in the single market after Brexit | Chuka Umunna  
Shocked by statement of @EU_Commission that British people in EU27 lose freedom of movement cos of UK gvt choices. Dear Commission: British people are still EU citizens, you have to represent them and secure their rights after #Brexit like all other EU citizens! 
'Nobody cares about us': Britons living in rest of EU voice their dismay at Brexit process  
Why is Guy Verhofstadt angry with David Davis? Because Britain has the Brexit strategy of a toddler l New StatesmanA toddler would make a better job of it than the lazy, blustering arrogance of the bungling Davis 
Only when Mrs May has written a sunset date in 2020 or early 2021 (preferably in blood) on her "implementation period" (which is really a non-implementation period) will many Brexit voters feel entitled to be more hopeful they aren't going to be sold out. 
Wrote this about how the Tories are making a mess of Brexit negotiations and why, contrary to recent reporting, Labour's position makes most sense   
Henry VIII himself would blush at the government's bid for powers under Brexit legislation, says @ChrisLeslieMP  
Dear @TheSun Over my dead body. Nobody in my family nor my friends want #Brexit - #StopBrexit #ExitBrexit #FinalSay #FBPERemainers and Leavers must finally call a truce to move forward with Brexit  
German minister accuses May of not being open with voters about UK paying 'Brexit bill' before trade deal finalised -  
A German Minister, Michael Roth, has accused Theresa May of not being open with British voters.Welcome to our world, Herr Roth. #Brexit #bbcnews 
This will never end. Do you all understand? It will never end. Never. The debate on Brexit will outlast the sun 
Opinion: European Court and not London will decide if #Brexit deal binding  
Why the success of English contributes to the failures of Brexit:  
Europe’s post-Brexit financial capital will be… London, says @matthew_elliott  
We Asked Famous Londoner Steve-O His Thoughts on Brexit and He Lit His Dick on Fire  
Is last week's Brexit deal binding? My analysis for @ConversationUK - 
Theresa May Claims Brexit Bill ‘Conditional,’ EU Parliament Demands Deal Made Binding  
Some very useful amendments emerging to the @Europarl_EN report on #brexit to be voted tomorrow. This shows huge support from MEPs for Irish gov position @FineGael 
"As we leave the EU, we'll be able to end the live export of animals for slaughter." Tory MP @ZacGoldsmith says the UK should set "a trend" in animal welfare after Brexit, including banning caging.  
This is indeed the key point for me. This is in effect you @bbcnickrobinson [or the BBC] declaring that there is now no alternative and that Brexit must be delivered. That is clearly not "due impartiality". There are still alternatives.  #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Now that the contract has been signed by everyone, I can announce ‘Discourses of Brexit: critical approaches to voices from before and after the British EU referendum’, edited by @su_sa_ne, @miglmarl and me, published by Routledge. Expected publication date: March 2019. 
David Davis says "I don't have to be very clever" to do his job. He's certainly not very clever. His ill-judged comments on Marr have undermined trust with EU and set back Brexit talks. When will he do the decent and fall on his sword? 
IMPORTANT THREAD, providing that the govt has definitely done detailed analysis of the impact of Brexit on different sectors of the economy, despite David Davis now claiming otherwise. Here is oral evidence by DExEU Minister Lord Bridges to a Select Committee in October 2016...  
Shadow Brexit minister Matthew Pennycook argues govt behaviour on opposition day motions suggests they won't respect convention on Henry VIII powers 
Ignore the media's tiresome anti-Brexit fearmongers - Brexit is the most inspiring, democratic thing to happen to British politics in a generation, says Brendan O'Neill 
Today’s @EveningStandard: inflation up again, as Brexit devaluation hits prices & government concedes families are feeling the squeeze  
Just imagine if somebody in the European Commission had undermined the agreement in the way David Davis did, and imagine how the UK media and pro Brexit politicians would have reacted. I don’t think they’d have been as restrained as @guyverhofstadt 
WATCH: Leave campaigners told us that Brexit was all about restoring Parliamentary sovereignty. By voting for Amendment 7 tomorrow, they can give back sovereignty to MPs & give them a say on any Brexit deal.Please SHARE:  
‘Brexit cannot come fast enough’ Cornwall fisherman says EU is killing his industry  
Brexit represents the greatest democratic blow for popular sovereignty of the past 50 years, says Brendan O'Neill 
Every single utterance from any of the vile EU turds involved in the farce of the Brexit "deal" illustrates how low, childish, peurile, & devoid of good faith those wankers are. Walk away. Let them sell the BMWs & Mercs to Greece, good luck with that, tossers... 
Environment Secretary @michaelgove confirms that animals will be recognised as 'sentient beings' in UK law after Brexit, despite 'fake news' claims to the contrary  
European Parliament names and shames David Davis for jeopardising Brexit talks with Marr gaffe   
If you thought our Brexit negotiating position couldn't be weaker, you have drastically underestimated the skills of David Davis.  
BREAKING: Brexit Secretary David Davis says he has agreed with European Parliament Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt to "shut the fuck up while the big boys are talking" in future trade deal negotiations. 
Brexit Britain to have 3rd slowest retail growth in the world next year.  
Brexit Secretary David Davis says he has agreed with European Parliament Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt to work together to convert the joint report on the Brexit deal into legal text as soon as possible 
The arrogance of the EU is astonishing. This is a man no Briton ever voted for seeking to undermine an elected member of Britain's elected government. The EU is a foul menace to democracy. Brexit should be the No1 priority of every democrat.  
Michael Gove UK Enviro SecState promises standards will rise with Brexit. New body to be set up. Hmm. What budget? Paid from falling tax revenues? Might UK be leaving giant EU scientific regulatory structures (which US fears) and replace with minnows?  
Campaign idea: Every day Remainers should try to post at least one comment and give likes to several pro-EU tweets in MSM comments pages. If lots of us do this it will have an impact, so please RT.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
EU digs heels in REFUSING to talk trade unless Brexit phase 1 deal put into LAW. No, we still need option to Leave No Deal!  
Labour are taking both the Remain camp & the Leave camp for fools. Promising all things to all people whilst lining up behind the Tories to support a hard Brexit  
Remainers have consistently sided with the EU in the Brexit negotiations, & r partly responsible 4 the billions we r now going 2 pay the EU. Remainers say UK should pay what it owes in a divorce bill then they have the cheek 2 say the government has been humiliated #noshame 
.@LibDems Brexit spokesman @thomasbrake: 'Davis has endangered entire divorce agt because couldn’t resist playing to Brexit gallery..sheer incompetence & chaos coming from govt unprecedented..every time Davis speaks, Brexit divorce grows worse for Britain'  
A handy guide to #brexit bluffer terminology by @WhelanKarl 
@guyverhofstadtDavid Davis is an incompetent buffoon.We apologise wholeheartedly that this ignoramus is in charge of #Brexit negs. Brexit is tragic and farcical and must be cancelled #FBPE #StopBrexit #Remain 
Senior EU official on their guidelines for the next few months of Brexit talks: "They are Davis-proofed”. 
Putting the case for proper commemorative Brexit stamps on the @daily_politics today 
Did Theresa May have a different referendum ballot paper from the rest of us last year? Why are the single market, customs union and Euratom being swept off the table at the start of the negotiations? (TD office)  
Labour isn’t flip-flopping on Brexit – this is practical politics | Maya Goodfellow  
Corbyn is still refusing to spell out Labour's Brexit plans out of fear of alienating both Remain and Leave supporting Labour voters  
Short reminder: Democracy is not a one-off event. It's an ongoing process, and it certainly didn't die on 24th June 2016. The people must have the final say on the #Brexit deal. 
Dominic Grieve confirms on BBC #WATO that he will be voting for his Amendment 7 tomorrow, to ensure MPs get a meaningful vote on any final Brexit deal. Vital that all MPs who believe in the sovereignty of Parliament do the same. 
Bad faith and mendacity are the hallmarks of every leading Brexiteer. The whole notion of Brexit is founded on the exploitation of public ignorance by liars. I don't know why anyone should be surprised at anything @DavidDavisMP says. It's totally in keeping with the Brexit ethos.  
Theresa May faces another Brexit showdown over 'meaningful vote' on final deal  
Ministers trying to take sweeping powers from Parliament into their own order-making hands. My amendments in today’s debate seek to curtail this power grab by the Government #brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Incredible that Brexit Select Committee went to NI border, but Rees-Mogg and a Brexiteer DUP MP declined to go. Shocking failure to even recognise, let alone address, problems they’ve created. 
"This is a massive historical event" @prwhittle tellls @EllieJPrice backing a Brexit stamp"We should be issuing stamps that celebrate things that bring us together like a royal wedding" @eloisetodd #bbcdp 
I am afraid Liam Fox didn't get the memo. He will be lucky if EU-27 allows UK to talk about trade talks with third countries during transition but he cannot expect EU to allow UK to keep benefits of the single market post-Brexit and throw away commitments:  
David Davis' incompetence and arrogance has been undermining UK interests from day one as Brexit Secretary. There's genuinely no beginning to his talents.  
Like all international treaties, the EU treaties impose a binding, legal obligation on signatories to deal with each other in good faith.The government's bizarre brexit negotiation antics are on the face of it in breach of our existing treaty obligations. 
@AMDWaters Immigration, immigration & immigration drove Brexit vote yet Boris, Gove & Davies all pro-immigration only talk about trade deals around the world. A 5-year freeze on all immigration indefinitely on low skilled low wage immigration is what many voters want #ForBritain 
David Davis’s claim that UK’s concessions in agreement to move on Brexit negotiations were merely "a statement of intent" has damaged trust and will see a hardening of positions in Brussels says European parliament’s coordinator Guy Verhofstadt  
Weren't we told that inflation had peaked last month at 3%? The post-referendum plunge in the value of the pound and rising prices are hammering people's finances. Merry Christmas. 
Teela Reid “Why won’t you respect our proposal to take it to a referendum & put it to the people like you put the marriage equality to the people? 61% of Austs support this proposal.”Turnbull clenches fists aggressive\hostile\arms as barriers\shut off\defensive\superior. #QandA 
We don’t have to do this. Brexit can be reversed with a referendum on the deal.   
David Davis trying to undersell UK Brexit concessions over the weekend have damaged the Brexit negotiations. Calling agreements 'merely a statement of intent' is misleading & deemed unacceptable by the EU. They'll harden their stance now for the the next phase... #BrexitShambles 
Five yes or no questions Labour needs to answer on Brexit:  
We have the worst government in living memory, and Labour can't pull away from them in the polls?Looks like Remainers have had enough of Corbyn's two faced Brexit position. Time for Lanour to dump him and embrace Remain.#StopBrexit 
Alabama is holding a referendum on pedophiliia. It’s a close call. 
Let us be clear. We believe the British people should have the final say on Brexit in a referendum on the deal #TheEngineer #Brexitdeal 
A guide to Brexit bluffer terminology.  
Save Brexit Britain by appointing Peppa Pig as Prime Minister, and putting Dr Brown Bear in charge of the NHS; Postman Pat in charge of communications and Thomas the Tank Engine in charge of transport. 
Lord Flight: "The country voted for Brexit because a majority was fed up with being told what to do, and with never-ending rules and regulations from an unaccountable EU bureaucracy."   
Labour's next excellent plan to spend YOUR TAX money after Brexit - BRITAIN TO PAY TO REBUILD SYRIA FOR MR ASSAD!!  
1. OLIVER LETWIN: 'The British Ppl voted to leave the EU'..#Brexit is 'certainly secondary to whether we maintain a democracy'ME: 37% of voters in a non-binding vote isn't the Britsh Ppl! & to maintain democracy the Ppl must be given a #FinalSay 2018 with a #StopBrexit option. 
EU & UK in fishing discussions  today . We at present are only taking 40% - EU takes 60% from our fishing waters .We should have it all back post Brexit but watch us get stitched up again by May. And do not expect it to appear on MSM 
Lord Liddle: "Labour should have courage to argue a hard Brexit isn’t actually the will of the people and staying in the EU is far preferable to self-destructive self-mutilation."Labour shouldn't be fence-sitting, they should be trying to change minds. 
Today @DefraGovUK has published a draft bill to introduce tougher sentences for cruelty to animals, enshrining animal sentience into British law post-Brexit #GreenBrexit  
Let's face it, you'd never back David Davis to play poker would you? or to do much else for that matter?More seriously this has to be the right move by @guyverhofstadtIt's acting responsibly for all EU citizens (inc. Brits) re #Brexit unlike our own govt.#ExitFromBrexit 
I'm the same - Labour all my life never ever Tory but I can't vote Labour now because of Brexit - I support a lot of JC's policies but a combination of being committed to Brexit, an intense dislike of McDonnell and the behaviour of Momentum will prevent me from voting Labour 
Both the Conservatives and Labour have rejected petitions calling for a second EU referendum to be held  
Welcome to Brexit folks.  
The UK government has gone rogue. They are stripping the devolved governments of power. Ignoring democracy in the UK. Ignoring the obvious catastrophic damage that brexit will do to all of the ordinary people 
The consequences of unedifying wordplay at the highest levels of govt #Brexit  
UK cost of living is squeezed even more as inflation rises to 3.1%. Food prices up by 4.1%, transport costs up 4.5% and clothing by 3%. The main cause - Brexit. The collapse in the pound following Brexit is starting to bite - and hard. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/lqMjZrWO8q 
The European Parliament is to demand that last week's Brexit deal is converted into a legally binding text as soon as possible  
Labour cannot, with any credibility, criticise the Government's Brexit plan when they refuse to outline their alternative.  
#brexit Every time turn TV radio on Remoaner Labour bore Chuka Umunna on. Unbelievable the dweeb on everywhere saying same thing everyday nonsense. Newsnight, Skynews, BBC, ITV, Channel 4 News. From the man who bottled it when he had his chance become Labour leader. Go away FFS.  
There are two members of the Brexit Steering Group of the European Parliament on there - wider amendment clarifies second phase can only progress if Phase 1 “fully translated into Withdrawal Agreement” and UK government “fully respects commitments”  
UK minister David Davis has failed to produce his promised Brexit sectoral impact assessments.But don't worry! Our economists, with colleagues from @CityREDI and @UoS_Management, have done the calculations.Here are the results. They aren't pretty. 
A democracy worthy of the name must mean voters having a real say over the biggest decisions affecting their lives. That's why we're calling for a ratification referendum giving the people the #FinalSay on the #Brexit deal. And that has to include the option to stay in the EU.  
Thanks to Tory #Brexit inflation is at a 6 year high. This is bad news in the run-up to Christmas with higher food prices and a 3.4% price rise in January for rail commuters. 
Support for a second referendum grows. As it should. People have the right to change their mind.  
So a US Think Tank that is paid by the European Parliament and the European Commission to carry out investigations for them has concluded that Brexit would be a disaster. Shocked, really I am!!Fears grow across the Atlantic over Brexit fallout -  
European Parliament Brexit co-ordinator hits out at David Davis: 'Unhelpful and undermines trust''  
David Davis has damaged trust in the UK for Brexit talks, says Verhofstadt  
Democracy is a process not an event. The people must have a Vote on the Deal. #Brexit #FBPE 
When I discussed Brexit in Rome - I was shocked to find out that no one here seems to care about Italian Prosecco producers. They were actually more interested in their own elections next year. 
What an honor: David Davis gets his own amendment in the European Parliament's #Brexit resolution  
MEPs will toughen their Brexit demands after David Davis's 'unhelpful' interview, says Verhofstadt - Politics live  
I no longer see my MP as a British MP I see all MPs as traitors to the British people! We were never going to get Brexit not as far as the Tory, Labour or LibDems are concerned. The Referendum & Brexit was a lie for all to see. Germany have really won this war!  
When SF said that this is exactly what the Lisbon treaty meant we were accused of scare mongering. FF & FG lied during the referendum campaign & they're lying now. Don't believe me?Ask Juncker!#PESCO is a major, dangerous step toward an EU army. 
Disappointing denial of democracy by @UKLabour - #democracy demands #FinalSayForAll, since 2016 Leave campaign didn't ID type of #Brexit or explain impacts #FinalSay 
And the (directly elected) EP appointed him as their point man on brexit.  Direct democracy all over the place with this one! 
84% of men convicted of grooming young white girls are Muslim. A disgustingly staggering figure when you consider that male muslims account for 1.8% of the population. Can you believe this. What are government doing apart from conning us with brexit. 
Theresa May warns Brussels that the financial settlement will be "off the table" if they don't agree to an acceptable trade deal with Britain after Brexit  
Inflation's risen almost continously since #Brexit vote. Now clearly outstripping pay increases. I hope we don't hear leavers complaining about this, it's largely result of  their actions. Words turkeys, voting & christmas spring to mind!#exitfrombrexit 
Not only has David Davis lost trust in Parliament with his Brexit impact analysis fiasco, in our view he is clearly incompetent and should be removed from his post forthwith.  
The irony that this (potential) serious setback is about a minister crowing about a thing not being legally binding, when the whole of Brexit is based on another thing which was not legally binding.  
hang on, but we're not supposed to point out that the referendum itself wasn't legally binding?  
Around a third of voters want a second referendum on leaving the EU, the poll suggests - up from 1/4 in January -  
bout to surround him with cheap english players viva Brexit FC 
EU to require Brexit agreement in binding treaty after David Davis says it is just a 'statement of intent'  
European Parliament's Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt says Brexit Secretary David Davis' comment that deal agreed with the European Commission is not binding is "unhelpful and undermines trust" 
Crowing about the "sufficient Progress" document being "legally non-binding" may become the latest of a number of serious unforced errors by UK ministers on Brexit.Idiotic, needless, self-inflicted setback. 
Your rebuke is what we Brits refer to as 'the kettle calling the pot black.' You, too, have made many unhelpful remarks during the Brexit process. And many were just to big yourself up and stroke your own ego. You're like a mischievous little boy with a box of matches - Grow up 
Tánaiste @simoncoveney meeting @MichelBarnier in Brussels today. Reviewing phase 1 of the negotiations and looking ahead to phase 2. #Brexit  
Kate Hoey really really doesn't want the sovereign Parliament of the UK to have a vote on the eventual #EU withdrawal deal. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE @adamboultonSKY 
UK Members of Parliament, Peers and journalists... everyone: please read up on how world trade works. Start here:  Then look at EU page:  Then UK page:  #Trade #Brexit #EU 
The UK government should asap "refresh" the ministerial teams on Brexit.  This is a natural moment, at end of phase 1.The likes of @TomTugendhat and @RoryStewartUK should replace Davis and others. 
The sensible thing to do would be to abandon Brexit #FBPE #StopBrexit but failing that how is associate eu citizenship for UK citizens coming along? I want to retain my EU identity whatever happens. #EUBRIT 
UK will be worse off under almost all Brexit scenarios, finds think tank  
Fantastic thread.  I want you to know I'm British and agree with every word.  Nothing hurts more, in this Brexit debacle, than the way what I believed once to be an open and tolerant country is treating Euro Citz who've made it their home.  I'm so, so sorry. 
Earlier, @guyverhofstadt mentioned that MEPS amendments will be released today so #Brexit can move on to Phase 2. Here are some ideas: - LIFETIME Right to stay + ECJ oversight on #citizensrights- Settled status OFF the table (meaning don't let our most vulnerable ones behind) 
Remarks by David Davis that Phase one deal last week not binding were unhelpful & undermines trust. EP text will now reflect this & insist agreement translated into legal text ASAP #Brexit 
Sophisticated independent analysis from US giant @RANDEurope  analysing potential economic implications of 8 trade scenarios. Shows UK will be economically worse-off outside of EU.  Key question for the UK is how much worse-off it will be post-Brexit. 
Brexit is certainly a crisis. So it was great to see Camilla backing an Exit From Brexit referendum!  
Interesting reading for Brexit Ireland geeks - the specific language of paragraphs 49 and 50 (Ireland clauses)  trumps the general language in the conflicting pars elsewhere, says legal expert   
My speech in yesterday’s parliamentary debate on a referendum to ratify the *terms* of #Brexit. Voters must have the final say once the facts are clear, and we can see what Brexit actually means  
"Britain wants an EU trade deal after #Brexit that's "virtually identical" to the current one"..@BrexitSo, why...? So far we've got:#inflation#sterling depreciation..banking and skills #brexodusoverall reputational damage...pic.twitter.com/ZHFmSm54VY 
Kasarani is as empty as the polling stations were on the 26th October referendum #EmptyKasarani 
Honoured to "do the double" @pressgazette #BJA2017. So many sound judgements of late: Brexit, Trump, Ferrari Journalist of the Year..! NF 
Almost all potential Brexit outcomes will leave UK worse off, says US thinktank - Politics live  
The #BrexitVote was the biggest #vote in #UK history & all @theresa_may can do is to betray the country, Instead of working to make #Brexit #BRITAIN a Global #Economic success! #TheresaMay is working against her own people! DISGRACEFUL #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @ConHome #TORY 
Hah! Project Fear lied! They said households would be £4000 worse off under Brexit whereas the truth is we’ll only be £1585 worse off. #BrexitGoodNews 
Another good meeting with @MichelBarnier discussing progress on #Brexit negotiations following last weeks agreement - Irish issues will remain a priority in Phase 2  
I was one of the first to arrive and stayed until it was dark. It was cold and wet but I was there in the front row carrying the flags of UK and EU.If you disagree with Brexit as facts emerge, you don't have to have money to fight it. Just the determination to take a stand.  
BBC gave coverage to a petition to hold another referendum... this is why we need to get this one over 100k!  
Good to touch base with Tánaiste @simoncoveney after last week’s agreement. Now to discuss phase two. EU will fully support #Ireland throughout #Brexit talks. Ireland distinct strand in phase 2  
The scrutiny which should have been given to Gov't's handling of health service, education and transport has been suffocated under blanket Brexit coverage Which is why Chris Grayling has yet to be fully held to account for his “bailout” of Stagecoach  
Lord Lawson says Margaret Thatcher would be "deeply concerned" about the Brexit talks. He thinks the Government should stop begging the EU for a trade deal.  
Am told Tory "mutineers" plan to push "meaningful vote" ammdt on Brexit bill to vote #troubleahead 
Bad news!If you voted for Brexit to end austerity, instead you are going to get #BrexitTax +++. You will soon be looking back and longing for austerity. #BrexitTax, coming for that last £pound in your pocket. 
Britain's inflation hits the highest rate since 2012 and Mark Carney must explain why  
I’m starting to get an incy-wincy feeling that Brexit might not be brilliant idea. Retweet if you are getting it too  
Our kids are being taught at university that ideas like Brexit (belief in national democracy) and wanting to control immigration are Far Right. This books sounds like a Dave Spart parody. What a load of rubbish.  
From Maygabe’s brief moment of ‘triumph’ on phase 1 it’s not taken long to unravel, as her Brexit strategy is again revealed to exclusively a Tory party management strategy 
Oh dear. Another "forecast" (necessarily based on highly speculative assumptions) of doom & gloom post #Brexit. Old news. Move on.   
Almost all potential Brexit outcomes will leave UK worse off, says US thinktank - Politics live  
Have Brexiteers not managed to put two and two together yet? Brexit has cost them nearly £700 but they don’t seem to mind...and it’s going to get worse. Bloody mindedness and stupidity has a high price. 
Brexit voters. Your far-right leader Farage supports a man accused of underage sex crimes because he's a Trump supporter.  
But despite that 2014 referendum, the Swiss have - under EU pressure - kept free movement.  
Just like our peer reviewed NHS Brexit Impact study. All types of Brexit are harmful. Still no assessment from UKGOV. No one voted to be poorer, no one voted for a weaker NHS. @DavidDavisMP is sleepwalking us there anyway 
Breaking: Inflation at 3.1%Dear Philip HammondInflation is above 3% because Brexit means Brexit!!!Regards Mark Carney 
But that is not all you said. For example you mention people who "seem not to accept that the war is over." Who are you to say that the war is over? Brexit is reversible. Many millions want to see it reversed. Your remark treats them as deluded.  
Another great letter from @2351onthelist exposing the hypocrisy of Ian Blackford's position on Brexit.  
US think tank conducts Brexit impact assessment, says all flavours of brexit leave the UK poorer. UKGOV still not done any impact assessments.   
Phase one of the Brexit talks is proving hard. Just wait for phase two  
do we know if George Osborne and Michael Gove's dogs are still married to each other or did they get a dog divorce after Brexit 
EU trade deal could be sorted 'in 10 minutes'“The Canadians started off with 10,000 different tariff lines, the EU had 15,000 different tariffs."“We start with zero tariffs.We want to end with zero tariffs.That takes 10 minutes.”#Brexit #EU 
“Nearly all the possible trading relationships between Britain and the European Union following Brexit would be less favourable than staying in the European Union, according to an influential US think tank.”  
A new centrist party must be a team of all the talents, also must include among others: the most unpopular man in British politics, the man who lost an election to him, the man who called the referendum with no plans for losing, the man who wrecked the UK's last centrist party... 
UK will be worse off under almost all Brexit scenarios, finds think tank  
At 10h50CET I will be live on Facebook to present latest developments on #Brexit and #RuleOfLaw in Poland  
1) Theresa May has begged @The3Million EU nationals and both @TheSun & @DailyMailUK reported about it.The comments below the articles seem to prove those wrong who said #Brexit was not about xenophobia. Brace yourself for a long and eye opening thread...  
Ironic that Corbyn now calling for the Brexit date of March 2019 to be delayed. If he'd had his way Article 50 would have been triggered right after the referendum and we'd be out by June 2018! 
Scottish Government waiting on 'basic answers' on #Brexit as Mundell refuses to name a single power that will return to Holyrood. 
Yet another sector wants to be exempt from #brexit - in this case to avoid making Britain's #HousingCrisis even worse! 
There was an interesting article in the Economist which said that populism has taken over from representative democracy in the UK. Vast majority of MPs against Brexit but most have jumped onto the  dangerous ‘will of the people’ populist bandwagon. Dereliction of duty. 
The woman who sent vans around London telling migrants to f...k off has now written a letter  begging them to stay. You couldn't make it up. #Brexit #TheresaMay 
CHRISTMAS QUIZ!When is £40 billion not a lot of money?When it's for #Brexit.When is £4 billion a lot of money?When it's for the NHS 
Matthew D'Ancona is dead right. #Brexit is an exercise in re-inventing the wheel, at huge cost in money and effort that should be devoted to other things. @DExEUgov civil servants: you are wasting the country's time and resources! 
My position on #Brexit today is wobbly past jellyflobber with a twisty of hobsbollock. 
Away from Brexit, here's a fascinating under-the-radar story by @steve_hawkes. 
11. And kids have also been subject to a lot more racism in schools post-#Brexit vote. Kids, Theresa, kids! Check @MigrantYouth report on this for one example:  
Just heard Mundell wriggling like a snake on #bbcgms Couldn't name a single power that Scotland would get after #brexit, fingers in his ears re devolving immigration & @BBCGaryR nailed it when he asked why FM didn't have a seat at negotiating table when Arlene Foster has a veto? 
When EVERY reliable think tank in EVERY country (even the US) predicts the UK will be much poorer post #Brexit, & won't have as good trade deals as now, can someone explain WHY it is a good idea? Given current #austerity etc.No platitudes, or sound-bites please, just FACTS! pic.twitter.com/DFQOuPkPrH 
Congratulations to @carolecadwalla Rightly rewarded for her courageous and relentless work to explore Russian influence on the #Brexit referendum 
Thanks to the hopelessness and incompetence of Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP there really is no longer any way of telling what is true and what is not, a very sad reflection of politics today and this Government in general 
Excellent, but 1. It must come at a point before a rejection of the agreement would automatically result in a no-deal Brexit - ie before it is sent for EP ratification in November 2018.  
Just look at the state of @uklabourDawn Butler rambles on about “easy movement” created by @Keir_Starmer to replace Freedom if Movement after #Brexit but admits they have not a clue what it is they are talking aboutAbsolute bunch of clowns  
YouGov poll via @MattChorley @timesredbox "In a question about who voters would most trust to negotiate Brexit, 32% said May, 16% said Jeremy Corbyn and 33% said neither." 
Former Chancellor Lawson: We must get up off our knees on Brexit  
Never mind the poll tax, bedroom tax, student loans, here comes #brexittax +++, for the many, not the few. You will pay for Brexit through your taxes, and everything you buy. 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 12: as new facts come to light, the British people are free to change their minds on Brexit. Please RT:  
Another day of the sounds of Brexit bouncing off the walls of reality. 
Off to Sky to talk about Bitcoin & it strikes me that it's like Brexit: all sorts of people who haven't a clue diving in gleefully to something very complex that they don't understand, endorsed by twatty celebs that which might well turn around and bite them hard on the arse. 
Britain's trading relationship with the EU should be "virtually identical" after Brexit, Liam Fox tells Bloomberg  
My Christmas list:1. The fall of the current wave of populist fascism sweeping through the western world.2. Impeachment of Donald Trump3. Cancellation of #Brexit4. New socks 
Here is a simple FACT the Brexit Tories don't understand: "The larger and closer that economies are the more they trade with each other. The smaller and farther away that they are the less they trade with one another. " Being in the EU is good for Britain. #StopBrexit 
Mrs. May your deceit & arrogance are transparent. We can't have a 'successful #Brexit, it's a contradiction in terms. Your definition can only be applied to your own self-serving policy to carry it out & stay in power..nothing else; it's certainly not in our interest or the UK's. 
Dept of No Shit, Sherlock: Detailed Rand Corporation survey concludes that everything about #Brexit is harmful to our economy and #NoDeal would be worst of all.  
Theresa May seems to be taking a lead for her self promotion from Paul Dacre and the Daily Mail - quoting their editorial lines almost word for word over Brexit... #DitchTheDailyMail 
It doesn't matter how much the 'divorce' settlement is, Brexit must be paid for and we, the British taxpayer, will pay dearly for it. Brexit will not be paid for by those who wanted it but don't pay their taxes here. Brexit #brexittax is the Poll tax plus plus plus, for the many. 
EU leaders 'will delay Brexit trade talks' unless divorce deal becomes law  via @PoliticsHome Given the perfidious behaviour of David Davis I think this an entirely reasonable demand 
Labour's position on Brexit explained:  
It was great to meet determined Remainers like Scott & others who braved the freezing cold for hours to make this point: no giving up the fight to stop Brexit!  
INTERESTING FACT:If the Brexit Divorce Bill of £39bn is paid over 2 years, that would equate to £375m a week.Some may say that could be better spent elsewhere... 
Tom Brake: Senior Labour sources have told me how angry MPs are at Corbyn's Brexit stance  
The Guardian, 31 August 2017: Theresa May secures Japanese pledge on post-Brexit trade deal. Leaders announce in Tokyo that the two countries will seek to instantly replace a EU trade deal with a copycat deal for the UK.  
** KEEP THE PRESSURE ON!! **Yesterday @Suewilson91 chatted with several MPs after the #Brexit debate & main message is keep the pressure on with all the lobbying and raising awareness that we are doing. It is being noticed & concession after concession can lead to #StopBrexit 
'Nothing's agreed until everything's agreed' 'nothing more will be agreed until what has already been agreed is definitely agreed' 'oh yes it will' 'Oh no it won't'  the Brexit pantomime continues. 
As time goes by, becomes more plain that the Article 50 notification was not when UK started "taking back control" but when UK lost control of the Brexit process.Now everything at behest of EU27 (including Ireland) and potential trade partners. Their decisions, not ours. 
Apparently doing & saying nothing on #Brexit and waiting for the Tories to fail isn't the bullet proof strategy for success @UKLabour thought it was 
If the Labour leader had been saying what @ChukaUmunna has been saying all along, they’d be far ahead now. Instead the priority was to hide JC & McDonnell’s pro Brexit beliefs behind ambiguity, & wait for Tory collapse.  
This, though a Parliamentary sketch, has an awful lot of sad truth in it ..Political incompetence heralds new era of Brexit doublethink | John Crace | Politics | The Guardian  
The Rand corporation, a huge US think tank, says there is NO scenario in which the UK does better out of Brexit compared to staying in the EU. Zip. Nada.   
This whole #Brexit debacle has become surreal...how can so many of of those who are meant to have our best interests at heart sustain this madness...just #StopBrexit..stop the self harm & #Remain in the EU. It'll be very cold & lonely outside...#FinalSay 2018. 
New analysis shows #Brexit Britain will be worse-off outside EU under all scenarios. Is that your conclusion too @DExEUgov @DavidDavisMP?#BrexitStudies #BrexitReality 
Britain wants an EU trade deal after Brexit that's "virtually identical" to the current one  
US analysis finds all Brexit deals leave UK worse off economically than no Brexit. ‘No deal’ is the worst outcome for us.The Lords & the US have now reported on economic impact, the DexEU still making excuses.   
EU27’s share of world GDP fell to just 18.3% in 2016. If you’re pro-#Brexit, the trend is your friend. Details here:  
Going to keep on asking you @Keir_Starmer @jeremycorbyn : what is the official @UKLabour position on #Brexit ? Pls RT if you too would like to know. 
Tory MP mocking those who say Brexit is complicatedBoth front benches having a laugh at each other over who is more confused about BrexitI'm a European, get me out of here  
Unshackle us now! Scottish Fishermen’s Federation chief executive called for the nation’s fishermen to be unshackled from the “utterly inequitable and hopelessly inadequate” Common Fisheries Policy (CFP) WITHOUT full Brexit transition.   
All the billions of wasted money, political turmoil and economic damage to try and get a trade deal which is ‘virtually identical’ to what we have now. The very definition of futility. #Brexit makes no sense!  
People talking up conspiracies about Spanish election ballot irregularities, who earlier this year claimed a referendum in which you could print your own ballot and vote at any polling station was democratic, should probably take a hard look at themselves. #Catalonia 
WATCH: Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May hails new optimism over #Brexit  via @ReutersTV 
As Maldives Ambassador to the UK  I welcome Brexit  
Brexit as street theatre - performed by Mike Parry. 
Key points: "If the prospect of a chaotic Brexit looks dreadful now, it will be positively unthinkable this time next year.Second, 'nothing is agreed until everything is agreed' applies to the Article 50 Withdrawal Agreement only."  
So how’s that “by-elections will be a referendum on Trudeau’s leadership” narrative working out?  #cdnpoli 
Pleased to see UK Government publishing a draft bill giving legal recognition to animal sentience post-Brexit. A hugely welcome development. Looking forward to seeing more details & to working to ensure final bill is as strong as possible. @ciwf 
New: Economic consequences of #Brexit, by Charles P. Ries, @econ_hafner +UK worse off economically, EU slightly worse off, US could benefit in some casesWith online calculator - vary the assumptions   via @RANDEurope 
The public and Parliamentarians need the material to inform how they should lobby or vote on the final Brexit deal. /18  
We need this material to be able to hold Government to account. Businesses, organisations and individuals need it to be able to plan for life after Brexit. /17  
Nearly all the possible trading relationships between Britain and the European Union following #Brexit would be less favourable than staying in the European Union, according to an influential US think tank  
Unshackle us now! Fishermen demand UK leaves EU WITHOUT full Brexit transition   @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
So why on earth are we not contesting the Brexit result??? Carole s brilliant,  but shouldn't we be using her conclusions to halt this suicidal act that is Brexit? C'mon, Remainers. Let's challenge the result of this absurd referendum. And Cameron should be bloody ashamed. SFB. 
Corbyn is a Brexiteer; he's voted (& whipped his party) in favour of the hardest possible Brexit on every occasion.Voting Labour will not stop Brexit. They are enabling it.  
New report: The UK economy is likely to suffer under the most probable post-#Brexit trade scenarios.  
Brexit and the signing of a trade deal between the EU and Japan means the latter's investment is Britain is no longer safe, including car factories.To Japan, Britain was the door to the EU. Now we're a locked door in a wide open plain.#Brexit #jobs #cars #factories 
No-deal Brexit will cost everyone in UK £1,585, says US thinktank  
Here's what @MollyMEP and @GoodLawProject say are the legal obligations of the DExEU Secretary and the Chancellor in relation to their secret Brexit documents. THREAD. 
Early results show the Liberals barely above 10% in a Saskatchewan by-election, down 1/3 from 2015. That's a carbon tax referendum right there.  
UK Govt incapable of creating own Brexit impact assessments; yet from Japan to US others prove HIGHLY capable. Striking consistency? ALL their Brexit scenarios show it’s bad for UK. When facts change, minds can change #BetterWithoutBrexit #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Who else beyond @carolecadwalla would've uncovered an obscure data shop in Canada with an alleged license agreement with SCL Elections, the British company that also processed Americans voter data in London, also entangled with irregularities of Brexit?  
That was an important point you made Teela. Those MPs were elected as party members not as representatives of First Nations people. Turnbull chose to misunderstand you. Sadly. PS many Australians would support a referendum 
Fears grow across the Atlantic over #Brexit fallout.Amazing isn't it...everyone else seems to be doing impact assessments on us none of them good...wonder why our incompetent Govt is having so much trouble completing or finding them! #StopBrexit & #Remain  
Leavers say UK was never given a choice before about leaving the EU.That's wrong.Heath told us exactly what the EU/EEC was when we joined, and in the first Brexit ref in '75 Remain won 67%. We've also had elections since where parties stood on Leave platforms, like Foot in 83  
Thread. The continued misrepresentation of the Brexit financial settlement.  
More MPs call for second EU referendum.Growing support for an option to #ExitFromBrexit.Time to #StopBrexit and Remain in the EU. 
It would appear at least one of Roy Moore’s supporters believes tomorrow’s election is…a referendum on God?This seems like a tricky theological claim: if Moore loses, does that imply the things Porter claims AREN’T true?  
Dear Ireland.Do not sign off on phase one of the Brexit talks until there's a concrete commitment in place that the #Brexit headbangers can't worm out of.  Phase two must not start until phase one is set in stone.Yours,The #StopBrexit majority. 
CNN's @brianstelter asks: Is Tuesday's special election in Alabama a referendum on the media?  
Fears grow across the Atlantic over Brexit fallout“Nearly all the possible trading relationships would be less favourable than staying in the European Union” - US think tank.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Jonathan Ford: A hard Brexit would hurt the EU’s financial sector more than the UK's. Here's why:  
“Nearly all the possible trading relationships between Britain and the EU following Brexit would be less favourable than staying in the EU.”Looks like the unicorns are on hold. Permanently.  
Gove insists Brexit is great for animal welfare, with draft bill raising jail time for cruelty  
Brexit will be stopped.  
Only the bottom 20% economists were pro-#Brexit. As for Patrick "I-get-my-sums-wrong" Minford, all the profit he shows comes from cutting workers rights & environmental standards.His #Brexit business case (the only one to show a profit) was discredited.  
David Davis misled parliament or as we would say, lied.Nothing is to be done about it.Nothing. Let that sink in.A minister of the crown lies and we just accept it.We have lost our democracy.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Fears grow across the Atlantic over Brexit fallout  
Leading refuge funding debate first thing them moving two amendments to the Brexit bill in afternoon. Just finished speeches, let's hope they aren't full of midnight mania 
That’s why Brexit is so expensive.... It’s a complete clusterfucking of our entire multifaceted economy for a chickenfeed 0.5%  dividend and no extra money either from deregulation nor added trade deal opportunities... rather, any UK-US deal is likely to be very one way. 
Two thirds of young people want Brexit abandoned, new poll says.“This needs to be a wake-up call to the government. Young people fear for their future and want the government to change direction” - @BestForBritain CEO @eloisetodd.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.  
All I want for xmas is THE TORIES OUT OF POWER, BREXIT CANCELLED, THE RE-NATIONALISATION OF UTILITIES, A LIVING WAGE FOR ALL, ALL THE FUNDING THE NHS COULD EVER WANT, ABOLISHMENT OF THE MONARCHY, OPEN BORDERS... ☭☭☭ 
The people’s final say on Brexit by means of a referendum on the outcome has been denied by parliament. This is a huge defeat for our  democracy and is very disappointing from the majority of our elected representatives.  
Done? Good - now add in:- Extra civ service/ consultant hiring x those salaries for 2 depts (DExEU, DIT)- Opportunity cost of focus on Brexit to other national probs- Loss of EMA, EBA & assoc infrastructure- Replication of dozens of EU agencies...- 
So... just the recent Govt budget showed growth slashed by 0.5% year on year because of Brexit (and remember growth is cumulative). That’s before you think about the £ devaluation, which adds £1bn/year on NHS purchases alone... now think of other Govt & UK biz purchases abroad. 
Brexit is robbing Britain of the best and brightest minds in Europe and beyond. Who would want to come to a xenophobic, inward looking isolationist nation that is just about to commit an act of national self harm? It is time to #StopBrexit 
A reminder. While you are all obsessed with Brexit, your government is quietly trying to turn the #NHS into US-style "Accountable Care Organisations". Support @jr4nhs 
The supposed dividend of Brexit (£350m/week) was false. But let’s put it in easier terms: All countries commit 1% of GDP to EU budget. With UK - about half of that is returned in obvious payments.That means that if Brexit costs more than 0.5% GDP - it’s a money-loser. 
Facts matter, people. You can’t just say “we’re paying £40bn for Brexit” as if we would not have paid this money if we voted Remain. It’s commitments we signed up to - and a chunk is for Single Market access, science, etc bringing considerable returns. 
Frustrating to see BBC journalists, Remainers & others believing/saying this £40bn is some additional bill for leaving.It’s not. It’s settling costs we would’ve paid in EU anyway. Get it right.BTW Brexit ‘dividend’ of 0.5% GDP is trivial compared to real Brexit costs [thread]  
If you voted for Brexit, you should read about the effects your decision has had on people who came to this country, who contributed to our economy and society, and who made the UK their home.One rapidly pencilled X on a ballot paper -for dreams of yesteryear- has wrecked lives  
This is exactly how dim Corbyn is.He apparently doesn't know he whipped thru a 2 year fixed clock on #Brexit  
Parliament Square today. Anti-democrats demanding the imprisonment of Brexit-supporting politicians.Chilling.  
Labour supporters, and the young, who are often Labour supporters, want #Brexit stopped.Do we really think they're going to change their minds?  
More indications that #brexitreality means public opinion is swinging against #Brexit via @leftfootfwd 
Because @jeremycorbyn is a terrorist-supporting, lies-peddling, fantasy-fuelling, jam-tomorrow promising, Brexit-deceiving conman?  
Brexit turkeys excited about Christmas Phase 1 Deal.#Brexit #Turkeys #BrexitDeal  
A campaign suggestion: Try each day to post at least one pro-EU comment in an MSM comment section and give some likes to any pro-EU comments you find.Please RT - if we get a lot of people doing this it will be effective. #StopBrexit #Brexit#FBPE 
.@ChukaUmunna says the Canada option for post-Brexit trade with the EU would be "pretty disastrous" as it wouldn't include services which make up 80% of the UK's economy #newsnight 
'Enough is Enough'  Fumes Lord Lawson.Theresa May had got Britain into an "humiliating state of cringe", begging Brussels for a good deal it had no intention of granting."We must get up off our knees.  Enough is Enough."#Brexit #EU 
Just imagine how far Labour would be ahead just now if they were a proper anti-Brexit party? 
Last year the public voted to leave the EU. That meant taking back control of our Borders, Laws, Money and Trade.RT if you would do the same again.#Brexit #BrexitDeal #skypapers 
Brexit Will it go on longer than coronation street Is it more depressing than east enders Will it be a harder battle than the chaseDo we have a mastermind to get us through it YesYesYesNoFor 40 billion I expect Einstein But we got forest Gump 
Night after night, Nick Watt misinforms people on Newsnight about Brexit. Said tonight that the Irish elements of the joint report are dependent on next stage agreements with the EU. Has he even read the thing?  
YouGov - should there be second Brexit referendum?Yes 33%No 42%This is very different from recent Survation which had, to a differently worded question,  a 16% lead to yes. 
Brexit deal 'UNRAVELLING quicker than a hand-knitted jumper', blasts Labour peer  via @NewsNowUK#StopBrexit #DDexit #FBPE 
Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
Making Money with Charles PayneAlabama Election ShowdownTerrorist Attack in NYCTax Bills Lumbers OnwardSarah Sanders Slays Press BulliesMore Market RecordsSBA Linda McMahonAlabama Trump Referendum@FoxBusiness 
Do you believe that @theresa_may will deliver a deal that is good for both Brexiteers and Remainers? - Theresa May says Brexit deal 'good news' for all voters  @DavidDavisMP RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
At each stage of Brexit where on the outside (looking carefully at public domain information)some of us assessed that the government did not - could not - have a clue...it appears that the government indeed did not have a clue. 
If I've learnt anything in the last 7 years, it's this: no matter how bad things look; never, ever, ever, EVER vote conservative.#StopBrexit #FBPE #noconfidence #Brexit #leave #Remainers #BrexitShambles 
Someone's getting it wrong. Survation has support for second referendum at 50%. YouGov has it at 33%. 
No cabinet discussion before May ruled out ECJ jurisdiction and freedom of movement in her Birmingham speech, even though necessary implication was leaving Single Market and Customs Union.Irrevocable Hard Brexit just for cheers and claps at on a first day of a Tory conference. 
Progress on Brexit looks like it’s given May a boost over Corbyn: 37% now think she’d be the best PM (up 3), ahead of Corbyn on 28%(down 2) and don’t know 35%(-1).That’s a 9 pt lead, and it was a 4pt lead last week 
Am reading @ShippersUnbound's new book with close to utter horror.The standard of policy-making at each significant step of Brexit was far worse than anything we on the outside could have guessed.Clueless and scary. 
I initally felt betrayed by the Labour party in 1979- Referendum, then again in 2003 - Iraq War but I still gave them my trust and my vote! With the revelations of the McCrone Report and The Maritime Boundary Heist, I will never trust them again!  
Jeremy Corbyn refuses to firm up Labour's #Brexit plans - On the biggest issue to face Britain in generations. A dereliction of their duty as an official opposition.  
David Davis says EU deal not binding. Did he mention the referendum was not binding too?  
.@thomasbrake: "Heroically, Neil Kinnock attacked the 'obscenity' of Labour’s Militant tendency for costing the jobs of working people. Who in Labour will lead the charge against the obscenity of a Momentum Brexit?"  
David Torrance, .@NicolaSturgeon biggest problem is the Torys, Brexit, Mays shambolic government causing Scottish people no end of harm, but she’s working on that; while you’re writing ridiculous articles that are probably the least of her worries....  
Brexit has made me realise that Britain never really dealt with its post imperial identity. There were always Powellite renegades dreaming of British Exceptionalism who would ensure this national humiliation  
Jeremy Corbyn calls for Brexit to be delayed if it allows the Government to secure 'a better deal'  
The Observer’s @carolecadwalla wins British journalism award for her searing expose of Russian influence on Brexit. Has to be pulled out of the ladies because she doesn’t realise ceremony has started 
Political incompetence heralds new era of Brexit doublethink | John Crace  
Broadcasters @STVNews @BBCScotlandNews are seeking more female experts to appear on TV in all kinds of fields - Brexit to business, fishing and agriculture to law. Is this you or someone you know? More info here...    
How strange* - they don't mention that Jimmy Buchan, the "Scot who can’t wait to finish Brexit and get out of the EU", stood as the Tory candidate in Banff & Buchan in #GE2010*Not strange 
No automated bots. No sad shills sitting in their basements. Real people, willing to stand and wait in the cold to see our elected representatives and let them know how millions of us feel. In our small way, all of us who fight brexit are heroes. 
If you really want an #ExitFromBrexit, please bear in mind that the only way of achieving this is through a democratic vote, i.e. a referendum on the final Brexit deal. The @LibDems are the only party pushing for just that. 
Conversation between two shop assistants in the men's clothing section of a department store, overheard today: "We've already started losing jobs, and #Brexit hasn't even started yet." The penny is dropping. #StopBrexit 
The EU doesn’t want to see a free-trading nation on its doorstep, competing effectively with its protectionist market  #Brexit 
Britons were massively misinformed on the main #Brexit issues, in all cases to the advantage of the #Leave campaign.John Major said "if they decide to leave on the basis of inaccurate information.... then I regard that to be deceitful"#StopBrexit #FBPE 
3. Make a big offer to business. With the Tories all at sea over Brexit and the cabinet in open warfare, *now* is the time for Labour to side with business over the EU. 
Jeremy Corbyn refuses to firm up Labour's Brexit plans  
1.5 million people since 2010 and - thanks to May ignoring the number one issue in the referendum - another 1.5 million on the way before we maybe “take back control”. The British people voted to end mass migration 18 months ago, not in 5 years’ time!  
The tide's turning & the general & generational trend increasingly's for #exitfrombrexitLong term electoral futures & reputations of those who pursued #Brexit, and those who've enabled it, look bleak. It'll be their Iraq war equivalent. via @PoliticsHome 
The @LibDems are calling for a first referendum on the facts once the Brexit deal has been fully negotiated. The British people should be given the final say - either to accept the deal or to have an #ExitFromBrexit. We started this process with democracy, let's end it that way. 
'constant social media attacks that Lab no different from Tories on Brexit..has been getting through. Team Corbyn want to stay in touch with young voters on Facebook & Twitter. These voters do not want to lose the right to live, work or travel in Europe.' (Keep it up guys!!)  
Steven Camley in @heraldscotland.Brexit means...turkeys voting for Christmas.  
Keep the messages going to target the under-45s. Remind them that cuts, lack of housing, and Brexit are "due to the Conservatives". Remind them who failed to build homes. 
Imagine after the 2014 referendum, Westminster came for the Stone of Scone and other artifacts.Inexact analogy, I know, but not too far off it.  
The Conservatives big worry at the moment is that they're becoming seen as the Brexit party. Reinforce this. Keep saying, in relation to Brexit,  "due to the Conservatives". They know how badly this is hurting them. 
Two thirds of young people want Brexit abandoned, new poll says  via @PoliticsHome 
One has to ask why leavers seem so shocked and surprised that Remainers should fiercely resist a self-destructive policy which we consider to be based on a cynical abuse of democracy and a torrent of press hate & lies.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
'Google it!' May's brilliant SLAP DOWN on SNP chief during fiery Brexit exchange  
Theresa May forced to accept new Brexit scrutiny committee  
Soft Brexit is like an innocent man (with strong evidence of his innocence) being persuaded by his lawyers to enter a plea bargain because they are too lazy, incompetent, or corrupt to defend him. 
Killing Brexit in the pub.#StopBrexit#FinalSayForAll#LondonProtest 
It was great to speak to @acgrayling at the protest outside Parliament today, timed to coincide with the debate in parliament about a vote on the final Brexit deal.Here is a photo taken of him with our very cold looking Chair, Scott.  
The Tories Cannot Be Trusted On Brexit, says @DavidCoburnUKIP  
Political incompetence heralds new era of Brexit doublethink | John Crace  
My thoughts on today's joint letter to the Taoiseach. Brexit & Arlene's DUP have helped civic nationalism find a voice.  
Brexit, and not a moment too soon...  
There wasn't a stamp in 1975 to honour the landslide win by Remain in the first referendum, so why the hell should their be one to commemorate and narrow victory in 2016 by Leave? It is time to take back control. Have a second vote and #StopBrexit 
PM says the divorce settlement is good news for both leavers and remainers whilst in fact Brexit is good news for nobody but the few, not the many. 
If this was a Labour govt. the right-wing press would be tearing it to shreds. But they don’t have the patriotism or honesty to point out the failings of a Conservative govt. and its approach to #Brexit. 
Yip. Brexit has discombobulated our journalistic trade. We’re chasing hares all over the place, to no public benefit. US journalists doing same with Trump.  
This by @bbcnickrobinson explains why the BBC is so woefully failing to maintain balance between Remainers & Leavers. It's because the referendum is over & the BBC believes opposition to it is no longer newsworthy. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
Confused about what type of Brexit you prefer?Try replacing 'Brexit' with 'Suicide' Soft SuicideHard SuicideRed White and Blue SuicideNo Suicide 
President Macron’s approval rating back up over 50%. French seem to like his activist foreign policy while Britain consumed by Brexit and Merkel struggles to form a new government. 
Theresa May: £40bn Brexit offer 'off the table' without final deal  
Huge turnout for Mike Russell's Brexit speech addressing the SNP Youth Wing tonight...  
Why did @rtenews not include this in RTE One 6 News Brexit item? Can you imagine newsroom or Tommie Gorman passing up alternative unionist demand by 200 well known peeps? Nope, didn't think so.  
I'm happy for the PM to try to bamboozle the EU, but she had better not deceive Brexit voters & stitch us up! 
British MEP blasts Theresa May for 'NATIONALLY HUMILIATING' Brexit deal with Brussels  
If the next phase of Brexit talks goes badly we must walk away without a deal, says economist @RogerBootle 
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #2: The Criminality of the Cost RT #StopBrexit 
NEWS! EU grateful that UK didn’t choose someone ‘very clever’ to lead Brexit department  
Wouldn’t it be great if 2018 saw the end of the #Trump Presidency and the collapse of #Brexit? It would become my favourite year ever! We, the people of America and Britain can make it happen, it’s up to us, let’s make it happen! 
Two thirds of young people want Brexit abandoned, new poll says 
From inside the Brexit debating chamber: It's a sign of the times that hearing somebody talk sense on #Brexit is so astonishing but @CarolineLucas has just eloquently dismantled Brexit & rather rattled her opponents @BremainInSpain @Suewilson91 #MakeMondayMassive #LondonProtest 
Polish Reject ‘EU OCCUPATION’"Europe is not developing. Eurosocialism is regressing us.”Frustrated young people are struggling to come to terms with rules imposed by Brussels’ unelected elite of bureaucrats & call for immediate #EU withdrawal.#Brexit 
A 2nd referendum is coming. I can feel it: @jeremycorbyn calls for Brexit to be delayed if it allows for 'better deal'  
.@SDoughtyMP asks if the PM will publish these so-called 'significant savings' from Brexit from her statement:  
This feels quite significant ... Jeremy Corbyn calls for Brexit deadline to be delayed as Labour stance softens further 
Brexit latest. “I’ve agreed phase one of Christmas”  
Philip Hammond let slip an awkward truth last week. There is no mandate for the unseen, final Brexit deal. We deserve a #FinalSay. 
@jeremycorbyn Please, please for Christ's sake start opposing Brexit. Surely you can see the disaster unfolding? The government is on the brink of collapse, as soon as you come out against Brexit, you'll be in no. 10. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
This video shows out of touch most Labour MPs (except for a few including @KateHoeyMP and others) are on Brexit vote when they groan at their colleague's question. I'm glad @ChukaUmunna was sat close by to get the message... 
WATCH: @SeemaMalhotra1 asks the PM if she read the Brexit impact report about the chemicals industry & what assurances she can give them:  
On Brexit, Labour is now for the few, not the many  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Jeremy Corbyn: "18 months on from the referendum result, and the Prime Minister has scraped through phase 1 of the negotiations."This weekend,Tory Cabinet members have managed to contradict each other, and some have gone further and contradict themselves" 
We managed 16 million on 23rd June 2016. Small as this display may seem, it is one of many consistent #StopBrexit / #FinalSay public showings since last year. Leave has had no such luck since the referendum.The tide is turning and people are speaking yet again. That's democracy  
Jeremy Corbyn on Brexit: "I don't want us to cut ourselves off - either from Europe or the rest of the world. We have to be an outgoing nation"  
Today, in parliament the Prime Minister failed to explain exactly what she has agreed in phase one of the Brexit negotiations.  
Got a VERY special guest on @RemainiacsCast on Weds: NICK CLEGG, ex-Lib Dem leader, ex-Dep PM & author of 'How To Stop #Brexit'. We've got questions but we want yours too. Tweet them at #CleggRoom and we'll ask the best ones. #OwnTheRemoan 
In 2012, @DavidDavisMP proposed a 'double referendum strategy' where the people get a final say. In 2017, he says that would wreck his plans. We deserve a #FinalSay. 
Who is running the UK? Is it @theresa_may? or @DUPleader? #Brexit  
Ha! The PM CLAIMS she's SATISFIED *remainers* & *leavers*This pesky 1st phase #Brexit is so VAGUE - people are reading into it whatever they want to !#ConstructiveAmbiguity 
Just like Mr Davis, I don't NEED to know a lot to be #EUsupergirl...  But having some understanding of the complexity of issues we're dealing with and knowledge of the likely disastrous implications of #Brexit does help to stop me looking like a prize twat.  #StopBrexit 
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna asks the PM - why the Whitehall coverup on Brexit impact reports?  
Lords collapses in laughter as Tory leader in Lords claims Cabinet is united on #Brexit 
Theresa May claiming victory in phase 1 of Brexit negotiations...Agreement was late & UK conceded everything- inc sovereignty to DUP. What becomes more & more obvious is the priority list of interests that drive the Tories - national interest being at the bottom! #BrexitShambles 
NON BREXIT TWEET: the French poster for #TheLastJedi proves it’s multiple last Jedi not just one. Significant? 
Every time @SadiqKhan tweets something, he’s immediately trolled by right-wing, bigoted idiots.These bigoted idiots will, undoubtedly, have voted for Brexit. And that’s why I won’t shut up and ‘get over it’. I don’t want these idiots dictating the future of the UK.  
"If she can't get her Brexit Secretary to agree with her, how on Earth is she going to get a good deal?"A MUST-WATCH question from @MaryCreaghMP. Please RT: 
Friends! Hatred!Cliff-Edge Brexiters have no arguments, no rationality, no brief 250,000-word assessments of the disastrous impact of Brexit!All they have is pure emotion!Their vile, evil, hate-filled hatred of Our EU is - literally - hateful!And I - literally - hate it.  
Another #Labour MP who doesn't understand the concept of the Brexit vote.Said nobody voted to leave the Single Market or the Customs Union. Ignoring the fact BOTH campaigns outlined departure of both if the vote is Leave.  
Jeremy Corbyn: "18 months on from the referendum result, and the Prime Minister has scraped through phase 1 of the negotiations."This weekend, Tory Cabinet members have managed to contradict each other, and some have gone further and contradict themselves."  
Theresa May tells us that the Brexit deal is "good news for both Remain and Leave voters". Theresa, the only good news for Remain voters would be revoking Article 50. There is no good news in leaving the EU, however soft the landing.  
61% think MPs should get the final say on any Brexit deal, a new poll has found  
A succinct summary of the Government's approach to Brexit  
This is an outstanding thread on what is facing the UKGov in Brexit negotiations. Considered, realistic, grim.  
The #Brexit campaign deliberately didn't set out what leaving would look like. The people should have the #FinalSay once the facts become clear. #finalsaydebate 
The Tories are going on about a CETA+++ trade deal. But in the real world a trade deal requires a hard border in Ireland or the Irish Sea. The EU and Ireland are very unlikely to back down, so it will be Tories vs the DUP. Interesting times ahead. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
In Westminster taking part in the debate on a #FinalSay on #Brexit - the public should have the right to express a view once the facts are clear  
As MPs debate a petition asking for a #FinalSay on #Brexit, we renew our call for a ratification referendum on the final #BrexitDeal, with the option to stay in the EU. RT if you agree  
PM claimed to House earlier "significant savings" will be made by #Brexit but then couldn't tell me a) a £ amount for them or b) explain how she knows what they will be before she's even reached a deal? Absurd. Guess she won't be putting on a bus...? @Open_Britain 
Tory MP Michael Fabricant claims the UK Govt is representing the views of UK citizens in the EU. Govt had the chance before the EU Referendum to do exactly that. They chose not to and refused to give UK citizens the right to vote in the EU Referendum. 
.@NigelDoddsDUP question to the Prime Minister following the Brexit negotiation statement to Parliament. NI will not be separated from the rest of the UK.  
Polls don’t matter all that much. The most important things are to make sure you vote, to vote in your own interests, and to fight to keep the electoral process clean and unbiased. I didn’t vote in the Brexit referendum, and I regret it deeply. 
1.5 million people since 2010 and - thanks to May ignoring the number one issue in the referendum - another 1.5 million on the way before we maybe “take back control”.The British people voted to end mass migration 18 months ago, not in 5 years’ time!  
Stella Creasy attempt at a 'gotcha' question: Will the PM explain why N. Irish citizens can continue to enjoy free movement after we #brexit?May: They've had the right to travel freely to the South since 1923Creasy sits down. 
This is best hour or so in Commons @Number10gov has enjoyed since her ill-fated election. She has much stronger support than normal from her own side (!) and opposition pretty feeble. #brexit 
A Labour approach to Brexit would mean paying the EU billions of pounds every year, following EU rules with no say, no divergence from EU rules and zero control of immigration. That wouldn’t make a success of Brexit. “That would be no Brexit at all”, says @theresa_may 
PM says if we don’t get trade deal, the offer made in Phase 1 is off the table. Looks like EU citizens are still being used as pawns in this farcical game of Brexit. FFS.  
Just suggested to @theresa_may in the chamber that she might as well have Labour leadership with her at the #Brexit negotiations, since they seem to agree with her on leaving Single Market and Customs Union, no matter how disastrous that may be. 
Shocking DD: "I don't have to be very clever, I don't need to know very much.." If only he were right.   If he was clever and did know something, he would never of course, have advocated Brexit.  As it is, we and our country's future are his playthings.  
May suggests to HoC that paying UK's outstanding EU liabilities is conditional on a final Brexit deal: "This offer is on the table in the context of agreeing a partnership for the future, if we don't agree that partnership then the offer is off the table"So its a bribe then. 
I sense a big mood change.  Leavers feeling far less defensive.  Absolutist Remainers lookingly daft.  Sensible Brexit is in sight.  End game 
MAY: British taxpayers will soon see significant savings compared to remaining in the EU. What about the £35 billion+ Brexit bill? Outrageous!  
Ken Clarke - I've never previously known in the days following the British Government entering into a treaty like agreement with 27 friendly governments to be followed by ministers casting doubt on whether we've agreed to anything.  #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
NEWS | James McClean urges Taoiseach Leo Varadkar to stand-up to 'offensive' Brexit. Read more at:  
YES YES YES YES YES YES... Only with the referendum for Scot independence did I notice how much power devolved countries in UK have... It shocked me how little I understood about what governs my tax and life.  
Pleased to hear @theresa_may say courts in UK will pay “due regard” to “relevant” #ECJ case law re #EU citizens rights. This was the wording of my amendment 137 to clause 6 of #EUWithdrawalBill which Tories votes down in face of cross party support #Brexit  
Britain now has a politics in which Ministers bear absolutely no consequences for saying things that are false, for contradicting one another, or for contradicting themselves from day to day. #Brexit 
Stop Brexit protest outside the Houses of Parliament this afternoon. @mikegalsworthy 
Jeremy Corbyn suggests delaying Brexit date past March 29, 2019. Labour’s stance gets softer all the time. 
Labour's position on Brexit explained:  
Since the EU Referendum Labour have had 12 different plans for Brexit - they are so confused they couldn't deliver a single one #Brexit 
Theresa May repeatedly surprises. This time last week she was on the ropes, and there was talk of whether she would be gone by Christmas. Today, in the House of Commons, Mrs May is hailed as the Brexit Boudica by her adoring party. Extraordinary. #Brexit 
The days of paying "vast sums" to the EU are coming to an end - PM @Theresa_May briefs MPs on #Brexit deal  
Thread: Brexit ‘deal’ – The Rows to ComeThe EU-UK stage one deal contains multiple contradictions, allowing for plenty of rows in the first few months of 2018. 1/ 
Theresa May begs EU migrants to stay in Britain.Here's an idea dopey, why don't you just cancel the cancerous sore that is #Brexit and let us all get back to living our lives in harmony and peace. 
.@Number10gov: implies she agrees with @DavidDavisMP and not @PhilipHammondUK, that we only pay divorce bill of up to £39bn if we get acceptable trade deal and transition #Brexit 
In the House of Commons for #Brexit statement. Does the PM think that the job description for Brexit Secretary should include being clever or not? Is the Phase 1 agreement binding (Friday's position), non-binding (yesterday), or 'stronger' than legally binding (today)? 
Tory glum faces as prime minister admits the European court of justice will have role in uk law post Brexit under her plans … #brexithaos 
Nearly two-thirds of Brits believe MPs should be a given a meaningful vote on a final Brexit deal, a new poll has found. #YesTo7 
YOU GO, GIRL!: Theresa May, who has shown good old-fashioned British grit throughout the Brexit negotiations, heads to Church despite heavy snow.ALSO: What’s that? Jeremy Corbyn wins International Peace Price? No, sorry, that’s of no interest to us. Fake news. 
Fishermen understand the EU prison. Unshackle us now! Fishermen demand UK leaves EU WITHOUT full Brexit transition   
"Our #Brexit secretary has turned Brexit clown. Having juggled with 58 sectoral analyses for months, David Davis made them vanish in a puff of smoke." @MollyMEP 
Happy to say Leader of the Opposition Ken Clarke is in his seat for Theresa May’s Brexit statement 
In 2002, @DavidDavisMP said referendums should only happen when people know what they're getting. In 2017, he admits he doesn't know what Brexit Impact is. We deserve a #FinalSay 
Chaos reignsTheresa May's Brexit 'breakthrough' doesn't last, as her ministers fight like rats in a sack 
The three examples which show UK ministers are throwing away the credibility crucial for post-Brexit trade negotiations.By me, at @FT 
Theresa May launches humiliating Brexit climbdown on 'Henry VIII' powers  
David Davies says you don’t have to be clever to do brexit just do details If your not clever how do you understand details Where do Tories get these idiots Is there a special breeding program for the blatantly stupid or do they learn at Tory class 
Theresa May forced to accept a new Brexit scrutiny committee  
Unshackle us now! Fishermen demand UK leaves EU WITHOUT full Brexit transition  
Let's not forget the EU's new drive for military integration, and make sure the UK-EU trade deal does not compel us to take part in programmes that undermine #NATO and our existing security relationships. #pesco @VeteransBritain #brexit #BrexitDeal 
A bus for the people! #no10vigil's bus is the only one to tell the truth about #brexit. #StopBrexit #fbpe 
With @ct4europe, @grahambsi, @EK_EuropeanMove, and #stopBrexit volunteers outside Parliament - standing against #Brexit whatever the weather!  
On the train ready to kick the arse out of Brexit.#LondonProtest#BrusselsProtest#FinalSayForAll#StopBrexit 
Theresa May has given in to Brexit rebels and executed a major climbdown over Henry VIII powers  
.@zlando RTSkate boards can be dangerous.So is allowing people like this into your country!#Brexit #MAGA 1507359481 
On Brexit, the UK is throwing away its credibility as a negotiator.By me, at @FT 
'Senior Labour sources have told me how angry MPs are at Corbyn and McDonnell's Brexit stance. As a Lib Dem, I say it's time to take action'  
Theresa May’s Brexit ‘breakthrough’ doesn’t last as her ministers fight like rats in a sack  via @thecanarysays 
Nothing will stop the brave souls from fighting to #stopbrexit in #LondonProtest & #BrusselsProtest this afternoon. Go, patriots, Go! #FinalSay #brexit #brexitshambles 
Famous for its hostility to wealth and corporations, France is attempting a makeover to win post-Brexit jobs  
BBC 5live phone-in swamped with calls from Brexiteers raging at 'dogs dinner' Brexit deal   
Keith Chegwin has left us, very sad. Good old fashioned honest humour, no foul mouthed rubbish like you get with modern "comedians". No sick jokes, just a good laugh and naked jungles. Hard Brexit entertainer  
Do you want your MP to vote Yes on  Amendment 7, giving Parliament a meaningful say on the result of the brexit negotiations?#brexit 
Even Leeds came to Westminster to say no #Brexit. People should have #FinalSay #PeopleB4Politics stop @InLimboBrexit for millions of #citizens. Are you listening Parliament? @CarolineLucas @greenparty @LibDems @vincecable @WernerT_Man 
Much of the #MSM is culpable when it comes to the misinformation during Referendum campaign. Time to fulfil your purpose & reflect the real news about #BrexitDeal Please cover the #StopBrexit with #FinalSay protest @BBCNews @itvnews @Channel4News @MetroUK @SkyNewsBreak @mrjamesob 
An awful lot of effort is now going into rebuilding the exact same structures as benefited big global UK industries regulated pan-Europe, or finding way round ECJ - rebuilding same edifice - what I call Humpty Dumpty Brexit:  
As 1 of 2 journalists given the letter I know it’s been in the making 4 a while. Not just about Brexit. Was described 2 me as conceived across playgrounds, sports pitches, courtrooms & coffee shops in the North after a broad range of frustrating issues emerged in 2017 - & earlier  
This is the subject of my Sky Views - it isn’t just chemicals, it’s pharma, automotive, aeronautical, aviation, nuclear, big banks who are all asking for regulatory alignment - big car manufacturer laughed when I asked what post -Brexit UK regs he wants changing... 
FYI, you won't see this on the @BBCNews @bbclaurak but there are two anti-brexit pro EU protests today, one outside parliament and the other in Brussels.#LondonProtest #BrusselsProtest #YesTo7 #FinalSay #PointlessBrexit #StopBrexit 
WATCH | Former Trump strategist, @SebGorka: "What the left don't seem to understand is the Trump phenomenon isn't an isolated one. It's linked to other phenomena like Brexit. It's the reassertion of democracy in which the nation has sovereignty again."  
As I was saying earlier much of UK industry doesn't actually want to ditch EU industry regulations. The great "#brexit win" through a "bonfire of regulations" exists mostly in the minds of ex journalist MPs who've never actually worked in industry   
The key elements of a ‘meaningful’ vote on #Brexit which MPs across all parties are demanding:1. Must come before exit day;2. We shld be given comprehensive details of the agreement, not simple heads of terms;3. An Act of Parl approving terms before the PM signs any agreement.  
The #Brexit Withdrawal Bill gives the Government sweeping powers named after Henry VIII – who’s hardly remembered for his rational decision-making. It would hand Parliament to ministers on a silver platter and let them carve up and devour our rights.  
"Mastering another language introduces new perspectives and ways of thinking. Being stuck in your own language can leave you stuck in your own culture."Review of 'Languages After Brexit' edited by Michael Kelly. 
This is fmr Conservative Attorney-General Dominic Grieve’s all important Amendment 7 to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill providing for a ‘meaningful vote’ on #Brexit, which will be debated on Wednesday in the @HouseofCommons. 
#StopBrexit #FinalSay Braving the cold to call for a referendum on the final deal  
BETRAYAL: A Labour MP has put forward a bill for a second referendum. Ignoring the will of the people - unbelievable arrogance. Labour have gone full fat Remoaner!  
Brexit Secretary, @DavidDavisMP says he doesn't have to be clever, doesn't have to know very much. Explains why he didn't do any Brexit Impact Assessments. #DavisMustGo 
Handled properly, Brexit has the potential to raise the standard of living in the UK  
David Davis furiously backtracks on comments about Brexit deal In his latest LIES Davis claims his unambiguous comments have been misreported. He wriggles more than a worm on a hook. Come to think of it, a worm would probably do a better job. 
2/2 Whether on the Irish border or the divorce bill, the @Conservatives #Brexit cabinet are openly at war. I mean this to be helpful to David Davis: can someone please take away his shovel, because it is time he stopped digging. 
1/2 Another interview, another car crash from David Davis this morning. He tries to disown The Times report, but given his performance before both the #Brexit committee and his interview on @MarrShow , his acquaintance with the facts is clearly not as deep as it might be. 
By ‘poorer’ I hope you mean more than just financially. EU citizens enrich Britain’s culture; they bring diversity, creativity and new perspectives. I’m very sorry for how EU citizens (and other migrants) have been treated in the UK, esp since Brexit. 
I find your account intelligent and insightful, however I'm going to unfollow you now because Brexit is doing my head in. Thanks. 
Chaos reignsTheresa May's Brexit 'breakthrough' doesn't last, as her ministers fight like rats in a sack 
It will come as no surprise that, before the referendum ,@danieljhannan claimed that abolishing REACH would "revive" the UK chemicals industry.. 
On Sept. 15, I wrote this thread about why the merits of the military detention of an unnamed US citizen as an “enemy combatant” were potentially so important.But the case is an even bigger deal because it’s become a referendum on a citizen’s right to habeas in the first place.  
So, if the government doesn't have to honour deals it signs, why are they crashing on with a #Brexit nobody understood and that had a minority of adults vote for it? 
Morten Morland on Labour’s position on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
If the defining feature of Tory strategy was to polarise & divide people who otherwise have loads in common, especially their disdain for out of touch & cruel millionaires & the short-term profit-driven corporations who help keep them in power, how would they go about it?#Brexit 
Talking of Regulatory Alignment: full letter to Environment Secretary Gove from the Chemicals Industry Association saying that UK must remain part of REACH & European Chemicals Agency...Leaving “would make a mockery of regulatory simplification” post Brexit  
David Davis refused to meet with reps of UK citizens in Europe. I had no vote in referendum. This isn't #democracy - Nicola #FinalSayForAll 
What a great shame that some continue to use the ridiculous 'Bollox to Brexit' slogan/chant. It completely trivialises what is an extremely serious issue and means that the media cannot show images or use film of our protests. Please use #StopBrexit & #NoPointBrexit #FinalSay 
BREXIT: Experts confirm Britain is much better off out the EU and can handle anything thrown at us.Also:WEATHER: UK brought to a standstill by two inches of snow. Travel CHAOS! Schools CLOSED! BIG FREEZE! 
Lots of people have been asking what the benefit of Brexit is. Well it seems we finally have one. And one only. The Avoidance of EU tax evasion directive so our billionaires keep their ill gotten off shore funds. Well done us. We'll paying them for that "privilege" btw. 
European Commission says last week’s agreement between the Commission Task Force and the UK in the Brexit negotiations was not “formally speaking” legally binding, but was a “gentlemen’s agreement” which was “fully backed and endorsed by the UK government.” 
Brexit talks can still be a success if there is a change of negotiators argues Richard Tice of Leave Means Leave 
#FinalSayForAll - if #Brexit happens it will harm the poorest & most vulnerable most: @GuitarMoog #StopBrexit #ratificationreferendum 
Today's Brexit news. There have been three brief media storms, all fading away after lunch. David Davis making a self-deprecatory joke about not being clever. Something about David Davis and orange juice. And, a third storm lasting from 9am until 9.15am that no-one can remember. 
For those who don't yet know #FBPE stands for 'Follow Back Pro-EU'. So please follow as many pro-EU people as you can - there are many people posting really great tweets who deserve far more followers. #StopBrexit #Brexit #NoFacism #nonazis 
Outside parliament with Brits from all walks of life demanding voters get a #FinalSay on if we still want #Brexit or not.  
Brexit Explained  
Blair will be remembered for Iraq, Cameron for Brexit. History will be kinder to Gordon Brown. My review of his memoir  
INTHENEWS: #Brexit: #TheresaMay claims new sense of optimism in talks...oh Big T I don't think anybody cares anymore: you've made the whole notion worthless by attempting to make the whole nation worthless! 
It makes tragic reading now, but we can’t let these people off the hook. They misled the country, their failure to come clean on the cost of #Brexit should not be forgotten.  
Prime Minister @theresa_may will update MPs on the first stage of #Brexit talks at approximately 3.30pm  
Your colleagues are busy helping the Tories deliver Trident renewal and a hard Brexit along with all the austerity that's required to pay for it. Ordinary people suffering for British Nationalism isn't change, its more of the same. 
EU Commission says Brexit deal might not be formally legally binding, but they have a "gentleman's agreement" and a handshake with the PM - think, if this goes much further, we might get to a duel... 
“The fact the EU almost begged Theresa May to make an agreement, I think, shows what a strong position the UK is in, and that we should stick to our guns” @bernardjenkin #bbcdp #brexit  
There's a bus full of people driving round Parliament Square shouting "bollocks to Brexit" at everyone walking past  
.@ChukaUmunna – Sorry state of Brexit shows need for MPs to have a meaningful say  
Labour wants 2nd ref to remain on the table. Probably something like:Do you want to1. Remain in the EU2. Have another referendumThe Gov't will ignore your decision and implement whatever they like. 
EU Committee writes to @beisgovuk and @DHgovuk seeking clarification on the health implications of leaving Euratom after #Brexit:  
So; EU Commission confirm Brexit divorce deal "not legally binding", but "a deal between gentlemen". So David Davis is wrong to have slapped himself down on LBC today. Keep up. 
So you're attempting to form a pincer movement with the Tories against the SNP. Neat if it works. The very coalition we warned people about in the 2014 referendum. 
Brexit WARNING:Labour Brexiteer @GiselaStuart 'Norway-style deal means we're NOT leaving the EU'  Remain Dictators must not win. Britain will be destroyed by the EU and Angry Brexiteers. We will not be bullied into this @theresa_may  We Voted Leave the EU 
Brexit: City of London will lose 10,500 jobs on day one, says EY  
#Leavers - #Brexit is THE con of the century engineered by the #BrexitElite. THEY LIED. There are no unicorns, sunlit uplands or £ for the NHS. Time to stop the madness. Stand with us at the #LondonProtest or #BrusselsProtest  
Theresa May says there's a new sense of optimism after the Brexit deal. #bbcdp #BrexitShambes 
If the final deal does not live up to the vision of Brexit the British people were sold, they have the right to keep an open mind about whether it’s the right choice for the country. 
Last Friday I had the chance to turn the tables on @IainDale during a phone on @LBC by becoming the interviewer: As a Brexit voter, what does he think "alignment" means, and is it compatible with the vision of Brexit he was sold during the referendum?  
The law is important in understanding Brexit but it is a massive mistake to think that the only important obligations will be those which are legal(istic).The law matters, but it is not "anything goes" because you think the law does not apply.Ends/ 
This by @bbcnickrobinson helps explain why the BBC is so woefully failing to maintain balance between Remainers & Leavers. It's because the referendum is over & the BBC therefore believes it has no duty to maintain balance.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Investors that don’t want to invest in UK consider Corbyn greater problem than Brexit. Who can blame them? If handled right Brexit will be a major boost for UK economy while Corbyn as PM would be an unmitigated disaster.  
Some things are not "legally binding".Take, for example, the Brexit referendum result.The referendum was not legally binding on the government.  It was advisory.  No court would have provided a remedy had the government not made the A50 notification.6/ 
Theresa May said the Brexit deal was NOT "a legally enforceable thing".David Davis just said IT IS "more than legally enforceable".You might be fooled into thinking the govt is clueless and is just making it up as they're going along... 
Out in the rain to support the EU (referendum) bill which aims to provide a referendum on the negotiated EU exit package to give voters the final say on #Brexit. @GeraintDaviesMP 
Fuck it. Danny Drinkwater MUST play both legs. Brexit means Brexit tackles on Messi and Iniesta. Smash the twats to pieces. Gary Cahill going full twat mode and walloping these mongs. #CFC 
Stop Brexit in London  
FT: some of the City’s most influential bankers would halt or even reverse moves out of London if there was an 11th-hour deal to keep the UK in EU single market, in a significant departure from previous warnings of an imminent “point of no return.” #Brexit  
The EU Commission says they see the joint EU-UK Brexit report as "a deal between gentlemen" which was fully endorsed by the UK Government 
The “Bollocks to Brexit” bus is ready to roll through London   
Sir Keir Starmer says Labour wants full participation in the Single Market and “easy movement” of EU citizens after Brexit even though that’s not what people voted for. 
Tory MP @DavidJonesMP thinks it's 'outrageous' that Royal Mail won't print a Brexit stamp. Does this guy actually understand the word 'privatisation'?The Tories sold off Royal Mail pal. You don't call the shots anymore. Absolute eejit. 
I’m demanding the release of the hidden Brexit impact assessments in the High Court. Here’s why | @MollyMEP  
"What's the requirement of my job? I don't have to be very clever, I don't have to know that much" - the Brexit secretary, everybody  
"We'll negotiate a bespoke EU Trade Deal within 8 months", says man who lied about the existence of 58 Brexit Impact Assessments and the size of the Brexit Divorce Bill. 
John McDonnell explains that remaining in the single market "would not respect the referendum result" but staying in "a single market" would maybe be fine. 
RT @TheGreenParty With #Brexit looking more chaotic by the day, we're calling for a ratification referendum on the final #BrexitDeal, with an option to stay in the EU. RT if you agree 
Royal Mail Brexit stamps:1) Farage shouting about passports2) Katie Hopkins pushing a refugee into the water3) Theresa May hiding behind a sofa4) The international community laughing at the UK5) A new map of the UK without NI#Brexit #RoyailMail #Farage #UKIP #KatieHopkins 
The only constant is change. Change your mindset, embrace change. #YouIrish #quoteoftheday #Brexit  
The cost of David Cameron's decision to buy a few years' peace within his cabinet by promising a referendum on Europe will be very, very high. 
UUK has welcomed the initial Brexit agreement and stressed that phase two of the negotiations will be hugely important for universities. Our statement:  
"Those agitating for a second referendum – from Knightsbridge hotels and elsewhere – need to be called out. Their arguments are not only self-serving and anti-democratic, they’re also disastrous for Britain."  
Rather odd watching #Brexit'ers banging on about how great the UK is. All economic data points to a downturn & our world ranking is slipping, yet they keep pumping out the same old rubbish from sites & sources such as brexit central, westmonster, the express etc. 
Brexiteers have their referendum result and demand a Hard Brexit, but the Good Friday Agreement is even stronger. Like Aslan's deeper magic trumping the Witch's deep magic. 
EU and Japan finalise world’s largest free trade deal. Accord covers market of 600m people and 30 per cent of global GDP. Brexit Britain won't be a part of it. How long before Japanese car makers leave the UK? 
We know that he was lying, but it's still staggering to watch David Davis lying so blatantly and shamelessly to the Commons. #Brexit is built on lies. #JailTheLeaveLiars #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The British arriving at the Brexit talks to take back control like    
"Theresa May faces first Brexit bill defeat" - coverage of the @eurelationsappg's statement in support of Amendment 7, giving MPs a meaningful vote on the final EU deal. 
Brexit, a design for disaster. It has no benefit, it is intellectually moribund, mind numbingly stupid, driven only by a party’s desperation to placate a reactionary right wing and cling on to power - literally at whatever the cost. 
Great that David Davis knows his own limits, but he is in charge of Brexit and a little while ago he declared it was as complicated as the moon landing  
A brilliant cartoon from Steven Camley in @heraldscotland.Brexit means...turkeys voting for Christmas.  
Brexit is just a distraction to the real problem: the UK’s clapped-out economy | Austin Mitchell  
So far today we have learnt from Theresa May that Brexit will be neither soft nor hard, & from David Davis that the Irish border agreement is both not legally enforceable & more than legally enforceable. So that's all clear then. 
Except the Corbyn thing is all because of the Brexit thing, isn't it? It's because public faith in the idea that the centre-right are safe, sober stewards of the economy has evaporated. Because Brexit has show otherwise. Surely you see this. 
If our commentators weren't still locked in the referendum campaign of two years ago, this would be obvious to them.  
We never had weather like this before Brexit. 
I'm researching this sugar thing and the links with Brexit. It's jaw dropping to be honest and I'm reigning in myself lest I go full on conspiracy theorist. I'm not a trained journalist and am resisting the temptation to make massive assumptions. But - gee 
Brexit: MPs call for 'meaningful' Commons voteYes...but don't leave the Ppl out of it...we need a democratic #FinalSay too in 2018..same time as the EU get to...& it must have a #StopBrexit option. 
Everybody:David Davis is a thick, incompetent liar*Davis isn’t fired*David Davis:I made up the Brexit reports and I agree I’m pretty thick*Davis still isn’t fired* 
Sign your name below and retweet!I VOW TO VOTE YES IN NEXT INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUMI WISH  TO ALLOW THE PEOPLE OF SCOTLAND TO CHOOSE OUR OWN GOVERNMENTS, AND CONTROL OUR OWN AFFAIRS WHILE OFFERING A HAND OF FRIENDHSHIP TO THE WORLD. Signed Callim Mcswan 
“Of course it is legally enforceable under the withdrawal agreement... its more than legally enforceable” Brexit Secretary David Davis tells @LBC re Irish border phase 1 agreement 
*checks Twitter**sees ongoing speculation about Russian Brexit bots**recalls conversations with Leave-voting relatives*Guys - they really aren't all bots. It's perfectly possible for human beings to fail a Turing test. 
I want a divorce but I still want us to act like we're married and share everything, but we won't live together and I won't have to pay for anything and you can't ask me to do anything anymore, how about that. also I'm going to see other people.     #Brexit 
Reminder of my #Brexit position: people of Bristol W voted 4/5 to REMAIN & still say best relationship for UK to have with EU = full membrshp. I agree. If, reluctantly, we do leave, best 2nd best option is full membership of Single Market & A Customs Union & I argue for all this 
If the next phase of Brexit talks goes badly we must walk away without a deal  
Imran Khan lied through his teeth in PTI FATA Convention, he strongly backed General Musharraf's Role in War on Terror & Crackdown on Banned Islamic Jihadi Terror Outfits, also voted for Musharraf in his Fraudulent Referendum & demanded 100 seats from him #PTI #PTIFATAConvention 
David Davis says he doesn't have to be clever or 'know that much' to be Brexit secretary  
Brexit Secretary David Davis tells Nick: I don't have to be very clever to do my job  
A big week for Brexit. Amendment 7 of the EU Withdrawal Bill to ensure Parliament has the final say will be debated tomorrow and Weds. It's backed by 10 Tory rebels and many Lab MPs, but the Lab MPs who usually vote with the Government could defeat it. Vital for Corbyn to act. 
Theresa May: 'Yes, we did make a deal with the Irish and the EU. But - and I want to be very clear about this - we didn't mean it. At least, I think we didn't. Maybe we did? I'll ask around. In conclusion, Brexit means Brexit.' 
Those Brexit Divorce Bill negotiations.From Private Eye.  
Post coming up: How on Brexit the UK is throwing away its credibility as a serious negotiator1/3 
In the context of Brexit can someone explain what is the point of DDavis 
In case anyone is still interested @TodaySOR has just interviewed me about #Brexit for @rte radio. thanks for the chance to put the past week in context. 
I missed this. The Conservative Autumn Conference was sponsored by Tate and Lyle sugars - one of the few companies to benefit from Brexit and former employer of Brexit Secretary David Davis  
As discussed in my last @ft col. UK domestic stocks not cheap because of Brexit. But because of Corbyn.  
Two visions of Britain: 1) Snow sucks, Brexit rocks2) Snow rocks, Brexit sucks pic.twitter.com/QI3DWcVUwU 
18 months after the referendum, if you line up the Cabinet and the Shadow Cabinet and ask them what Brexit they want you will get a different answer from every single one of them. Knew what you were voting for? Ludicrous. 
Keir Starmer admits Labour's soft Brexit plan would see the UK tied forever to the single market with EU budget payments and 'very easy' movement of people continuing  
Utterly unfounded sense of upper-class superioritySelf-destructiveFurious responses to any form of criticismScrewing over anyone who could feasibly help, even long-term friendsInconsistent, drunken ramblingsBrexit Britain is basically Withnail  
When @jessicamauboy wins Eurovision the knock-on effect will be huge. Russia & Ukraine will have peace, Spain & Catalonia will figure it out, Brexit will get reversed and ABBA will reform to cover her winning song. 
In his #LBC interview David Davis spent nearly as much time laughing as he did talking. I'm beginning to wonder if he's the full shilling. @LBC #Brexit 
David Davis says 'I don't have to be very clever' to do his job as Brexit secretary. 
Stop seeing Brexit as just the medium term economic folly that it clearly is and make your pro-Europeanism passionate & emotionally grounded.Get properly behind the project from here on 
Brexit is just a distraction to the real problem: the UK’s clapped-out economy | Austin Mitchell  
// @carolynleckie: Is it time to set the date of a next referendum and get the independence movement back on the road? 
If the next phase of Brexit talks goes badly we must walk away without a deal - EFT's Roger Bootle in the @Telegraph  
‘We could leave EU on MONDAY!’ Wetherspoons boss says UK will THRIVE without Brexit deal  SOONER THE BETTER 
No funding available for mental health research and relief, but plenty of money to waste on Brexit. The heartless truth of the matter...  
David Davis already threatening to renege on Phase 1 of most important negotiation in modern times, yet result of Advisory Referendum won on lies is cast in stone ...  
#Brexit progress? 4.5 million people continue to live with deep uncertainty about their future  
Today is Brexit Protest Day. Come on guys, Bursting out into song is better than shouting, and if we don't know the lyrics, we can hum. And if we can't hum, we can whistle. #OdeToJoy #StopBrexitNow And for those of you who cannot attend, please tweet your heart out. 
BREAKING: two thirds of young people want to stop Brexit, new poll reveals  @Open_Britain @BestForBritain @ChukaUmunna @josiahmortimer 
UK Parliament: BREXIT - Walk Away NOW, or STEP DOWN IMMEDIATELY! - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange  PLEASE SIGN & RT....THANK YOU 
Brits living in other EU countries and EU citizens here not happy with the #Brexit deal which undermines their rights: 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar urged to help stop 'offensive and unacceptable' #Brexit.  More than 200 Northern Irish figures tell Leo Varadkar they "should not be forced out of the EU against our democratic will".  
Brits on the continent feel like 'bargaining chips' after Brexit deal doesn't guarantee rights  
Vince Cable showing a lack of understanding saying the majority of young people voted for Labour because they thought they would stop #BrexitVince, lts simple, we voted Labour because they addressed the monstrous inequality that you & Cameron purveyed. #r4today 
In today's Brexit news:- Sir Keir Starmer outlines Labour’s soft Brexit plan, refuses to rule out second referendum- Davis: Britain won't pay Brexit bill without trade deal- UK ranks top of all major developed economies for establishing new businesses 
Old hands joining PTI set sights on next election (Dawn Jan 30, 2015)Imran Khan not only voted for Musharraf in his sham referendum , demanded 100 National Assembly seats from him & allowed Corrupt Politicians from every party in #PTI #PTIFATAConvention 
Brilliant by @peterfrankopan...China's New Silk Roads...an antidote to our peripheral Brexit issues:  
Some of you English created this Brexit mess.  
Don’t want to spoil the party, but could someone remind me why it’s a good idea for #UK to model our future economic relationship with #EU on Canada, which accounts for under 2% of EU trade in goods & is the other side of the Atlantic? #Brexit 
Musharraf told a lie on drone attacks (The News Dec 2, 2014) Imran Khan not only voted for Musharraf in his sham referendum , demanded 100 National Assembly seats from him & allowed Corrupt Politicians from every party in #PTI #PTIFATAConvention 
An open letter to Taoiseach @campaignforleo Stand by your pledge to Irish citizens in the north.#Misefosta"Brexit now threatens to reinforce partition on this island and revisit a sense of abandonment as experienced by our parents and grandparents."I won't be abandoned again  
Pizzaface, "Here we see another multimillionaire complaining about Brexit. The electorate must have done something right judging by the type of people who don't like the idea of changing the status quo"  Steve Coogan 
So explain to me again how the loss of free market access, freedom of movement, free passporting rights, free roaming and free trade agreements with the rest of the world makes the UK free? #brexit 
As someone who worked promoting UK influence in the EU for a decade, I really can't tell you how sad and disappointed this tweet makes me. Brexit is an appalling error.  
Heseltine’s three fights against his party - on race relations, poll tax and now Brexit.“I think public opinion will change. There are signs that it is shifting already”  
This is something that @theSNP has called for for around two years. A new SDSR that takes Brexit and currency fluctuations into account is absolutely essential.  
David Davis’ glib statement that the agreement on Northern Ireland isn’t legally enforceable is another blow to the UK’s international standing as a trustworthy nation. Brexit is doing such damage to our reputation. 
Where to start this morning?So many different threads.Maybe just try to sum a few things up.Theresa May - undoubtedly the weakest PM ever.David Davis - sleekit's no' the word!Michael Gove - HaHaHa!Brexit - Help ma boab!Scotland - indyref2 please!#ScotRef2018 #Vote_YES 
Swansea West MP @GeraintDaviesMP wants the people to have the final say.#brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitDeal 
That Brexit breakthrough didn't last long, then - plus Monday's other headlines  
Davis also said he had 58 impact assessments that went into 'excruciating detail' - fool me once eh Faisal 
Friends! Good move!I, too, shall be commissioning my own papers to study the impact of Brexit!They will all be written by a totally impartial and objective expert, i.e. me!And they'll all, naturally, reach the same dispassionate conclusion:Brexit will be a total disaster.  
Website supported by UK Tories group in Euro Parliament (ECR group) calls for an 'Exit from Brexit'. The 'Conservative Party' is against Brexit.  
The unequivocal message and range of signatories to this open letter illustrates the profound impact Brexit & the collapse of Stormont has had on northern nationalism.  
As with all the hate Brexit has stirred, the world is also seeing this... who wants to sign new trade deal with country that behaves like this?  Theresa May to tell Ireland 'nothing is agreed' on terms of Brexit as row over deal intensifies'  
May and juncker say we can carry on as before - that’s “a bare faced lie”': Britons in Europe feel betrayed by Brexit deal  
Handled properly, Brexit has the potential to raise the standard of living in the UK  
Britons in Europe feel betrayed by Brexit deal. They fear they'll remain “landlocked” in the country in which they now live, unable to move across borders.  
UK Gvt will betray anyone, even British citizens to deliver a hard brexit that nobody voted for. #FinalSayForAll #LondonProtest#BrusselsProtest 
**Severe Tory Warning** across the Country.. NHS Crisis 128,000 homeless children this Xmas and Tories tweeting about Blue Planet FFS!!! Theyre the party of Fracking Fox hunting Kill all the badgers cut climate change/wildlife regs for Brexit trade deals  
Very surprised by this. Adam was in Belfast throughout Good Friday Agreement talks, and for years after. He had a nuanced understanding of all the cultural and political issues. I can only assume that Brexit has shifted everyone’s compass.  
The increasingly absurd Justin Welby (Etonian) doesn't like grammar schools. We now know his secular views on education, BREXIT, corporation tax, transgenders, housing etc I hear William Hill have offered 6:4 on his getting through Christmas without mentioning Jesus. 
“They are ignorant of their ignorance” - Michael Faraday. A phrase which characterises many who shout loud about climate change, Brexit etc.  
#DavidDavis: a man so untrustworthy he even breaks other peoples' promises!#Brexit #Brexitdeal #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #Marr #FBPE 
Another essential #Follow on Brexit is Barnier's advisor @StefaanDeRynck - timeline provides a useful steer on EU27's  approach to negotiation issues. 
May will tell MPs today that it's "not about a hard or a soft Brexit" and I'm thinking "al dente Brexit" 
Growing numbers of Labour MPs now concede they have a failure of leadership on Brexit, writes @Kevin_Maguire. 
'Sacrificed on the altar of trade': Britons in Europe feel betrayed by Brexit deal  
Bremain's @Suewilson91 quoted in the @guardian: "I can assure you that British citizens in the EU are not celebrating or grateful, but more fearful than ever of being thrown under the Brexit bus" #StopBrexit #CitizensRights 
Half-expect David Davis to announce today there are 57, possibly 58, global trade deals ready for UK to sign on Brexit, already in excruciating detail. 
Brexit must be stopped. Therefore it will be. 
Tweeted by @StefaanDeRynck and liked by @WeyandSabine - a tweet to be taken seriously about EU27's view on Irish issue and Brexit.  
Economic catastrophe has always been an inevitable aspect of Brexit: "European Union gets tough with Theresa May over trade deal, as officials insist bespoke arrangement more favourable to Britain is out of the question"  
With the May deal already splintering, Brexit could simply fall apart. Onus is now on Labour and @jeremycorbyn to offer the country a compelling alternative 
."It is what you might call Humpty Dumpty Brexit, expending a huge amount of effort merely to put back together the same edifice in a slightly different way"@faisalislam  has created a new hashtag  #HumptyDumptyBrexit . 
After Brexit day, assuming we leave the Customs Union, 130,000 British traders will be dealing with customs checks for the first time. #BrexitFactofTheDay 
Such an important point. Chief Brexit negotiator suggesting on TV that he reserves the right to renege on the deal agreed last week reduces likelihood deal will be agreed in Council, not to mention undermining good will for next stage  
Well Done, Mrs May. The terms of Friday’s heralded EU Brexit agreement and its non-binding nature have resulted in a brilliant Christmas fudge which has simultaneously allowed all sides to claim victory. Some feat. #TheresaMay #brexit #csm 
#bbcr4today . Are you going to mention the debate this afternoon in Parliament on this? 136,000 + have signed: Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
“We have effectively a tariff-free frictionless trade relationship right now and if the EU want to play hardball, it is them who will suffer” - @DominicRaab#Brexit #TeamTory 
The insanity is that there is no point to any form of Brexit; for a total break from the EU would cause massive net damage and no genuine benefits - while a 'soft' Brexit merely reduces our powers.It's a choice between cyanide and bleach.  
Even Leave voters now expect a bad deal from Brexit  
‘In our Brexit Forensics look at various industries - cars, aviation, nuclear few want regulatory divergence from the EU. The car industry have been openly contemptuous of the idea. The aviation industry wants to remain part of the European Aviation Safety Agency’ @faisalislam 
@piersmorgan It’s hell in central London. Managed to battle through this massive snow drift outside the Treasury to get to Downing Street for @GMB Brexit broadcasts.  
Which sector of British industry doesn’t? #Brexit makes no sense!  
Morning! Braved the ansence of snow & ice in London to make it to @GMB. Discussing Brexit & Max Clifford in a mo 
The pound could be affected by at least two things this week  
Roy Moore campaign casts Alabama race as referendum on Trump  
365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017  
David Davis clashes with the EU & Ireland over #Brexit deal - Downing Street advisers have told cabinet ministers who campaigned to leave the EU that promises around full regulatory alignment were “meaningless”  
Evil. It makes better sense now that we know what happened. It almost happened in France. It almost happened in the Netherlands. Too bad we were not aware enough and responsive enough to catch and fix it here and the UK #MAGA #Brexit #TrumpRussiaCollusion 
I knew this country had a few stupid people but I never realised until now that it is not the few, but the many. When you see them being interviewed in the street about brexit their lack of knowledge is incredible. What an isolated little island we are becoming! 
Not surprised by this #NorthernIreland poll. Said for 2 years #Brexit will see the end of UKUnion as it is now. Inevitable  
Yes, if we had a UK government that wasn't working for the EU, we WOULD leave without any deal - but instead, we have the EU puppet May & a Cabinet 100% full of Remainers, deliberately betraying Brexit. 
Our current trade deal is solid gold, not just gold-plated. We have the best deal of any EU member. We're incredibly foolish to throw it away. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
This deep & meaningful relationship our PM seeks from an EU doesn't or has it ever existed pure & simple gobbledygook, enabling her to stall & hold back #Brexit until a General Election to overturn. Backdoor FULL ALIGNMENT is rebranding Brexit as a satellite state not cooperating 
Great analysis by @MatthewdAncona. Brexit is not Jerusalem new or old. It’s a contradiction wrapped in hubris.   
The New Jerusalem of Brexit is revealing itself to be a mirage 
The only thing the Tories are doing seriously is trying to save their "Tax Haven Accounts" as they knew the E.U. was going to do something about them in 2018, Brexit is a bloody Farce.  
Key Brexit advocate says voters can change UK deal with EU  
A coalition of Remain, EU and Time Pressure has forced the UK government to accept that reality plays a role in Brexit.This is a massive victory for us!We haven't won yet, but we ARE winning!The ground rules have changed.The unicorns are dying.Let's #StopBrexit in 2018! 
This election is a referendum on Alabama’s history and whether they’re ready to change for the better. Alabama has a chance to turn its back on a legacy of racism and extremism. Will they take advantage of this chance? This may be the last one they get. 
Training a computer to write #Brexit impact reports.  
Prime Minister @Theresa_May will hail "a new sense of optimism" in #Brexit talks on Monday, telling parliament Britain and the European Union should sign off on a deal at a summit this week "to move forwards together" to discuss future trade ties:  
Labour leadership misjudging badly strength of anti-Brexit feeling in the UK. In the next general election a vote for any Brexit party IS a vote for Brexit.Tactical voting will then surely be diverted to parties such as LibDems, Greens, SNP, et al... or a Pro-EU alliance.  
The rights of EU scientists in the UK formed part of Friday's statement on Brexit.  
Roy Moore campaign casts Alabama race as referendum on Trump  
"Hours before our interview, Labour’s Treasury team had one of their regular meetings with the former head of the civil service, the crossbencher Lord Kerslake" << Kerslake's resignation is political. The establishment backs Labour to undo BRExit.  
Brexit: a phony deal - with excruciating slowness, the media is gradually getting the message – the "bad Friday" agreement is a crock – a phony deal ...  #Brexit.  
TBH no-one seems to know what Labour's Brexit will be. 'Brexit for jobs' is ridiculous and unachievable. Much better to stop it altogether 
Brexit: Theresa May claims new sense of optimism in talks  
Get your Brexit advent calendar while stocks last.  Its days are numbered. 
May: 'New sense of optimism' following Brexit deal  
FYI: Tomorrow begins a Tory civil war. A fight to the death. Where the nonsense of Legatum and the #Brexit taliban comes crashing into the wall of reality. 
Pharmaceutical industry now requesting ' special case ' status over Brexit. Looks like the Brexit Dept will have to open a dedicated section to deal with special case applications. So who's first, Grimsby ? 
Get yersel to the march tomorrow. There’s Brexit to be stopped. And cake.  
Hello pro-European #Labour voters (ie the majority of you): wake up & smell the #Brexit coffee. Supporting Lab = enabling #Tory #HardBrexit 
Good thread from @jonlis1. Will David Davis cause Brexit to collapse under its own contradictions?  
Monday’s @guardian front page: ‘Fresh doubts over Brexit deal’ as senior British govt ministers reveal they still haven’t completed negotiations amongst themselves.  
Over 14 hours on I still can't get over how blatantly biased towards Brexit #Marr was on his show this morning. Showing unrepresentative misleading clips then insisting voters knew they were voting to Leave the Single Market. Leave voters like @AndrewMarr9 are hard wired to lie. 
Steve Coogan wrestled with including Brexit in Alan Partridge's return  
Australia's Brexit vote.  
Brexit is the most important issue for decades, and this Tory minority Government's incompetence presents Labour with an open goal - so pull your finger out, Jeremy Corbyn: you risk being on the wrong side of history.  #StopBrexit #a50challenge 
Opinion: How can Scotland trust a government whose own ministers are willing to state in media that the terms of #brexit agreements might not be binding?  
Ireland, Ipsos poll:Abortion ReferendumRepeal Constitutional Ban: 62%Retain Constitutional Ban: 26%Undecided: 13% 
"An Englishman's word is his bond" they used to say.Well, at least it used to be until the Brexit referendum.All we here now across the seas shouted at us is: "Liar, liar, pants on fire".  
Dismayed by the unprecedented vote of 17.4million Britons to reject the EU, the political class has rallied to frustrate the popular will  #Brexit 
Does anyone else think the DExEU is massively overstaffed? I mean, 2 lever arch binders containing sod all in 18 months? Or do you, like me, think the assessments do actually exist, and in excruciating detail, detail how excruciatingly bad Brexit will be? 
'We WON'T PAY!' Davis promises UK will not stump up Brexit bill if no deal is agreed. Too Right!  
Re Labour policy on Brexit.I think they’ve finally fully embraced Marxism.Groucho rather than Karl.“These are my (Brexit) principles, and if you don’t like them, well I have others” 
David Davis has clashed with the Irish government after claiming that the Brexit divorce agreement between Britain and the EU was a “statement of intent” rather than something legally enforceable. Just like the Article 50 notification then? 
Watching this volatility is giving me flashbacks of FX clients trying to trade Brexit or a Fed Funds interest rate decision....lots of people @BitmexRekt -> 10% up in a few minutes followed by a 5% drop 1 minute laterAdd some leverage to this mix and things get ugly quick. 
May’s corker “Brexit means Brexit”  has today been matched by David Davis’s equally enlightening “No deal is no deal”. With reference to their government i’m tempted to add  “useless is useless”. 
#YouIrish had ancient Brehon Law pre-dating the British 1215 Magna Carta by a millennium and which accorded equal citizen rights to all e.g every citizen could sue their King etc, plus women had equal marriage and divorce rights.  #Brexit  
Yet David Davis said this without challenge on the BBC. It's a widespread view now in the UK that it's a "fee" rather than our legal liability. It's difficult to get the truth across as @RCorbettMEP does here with this & the Brexit press now saying literally whatever they want.  
Big trouble ahead if Govnt already rowing back on Friday’s deal on Phase 1 before the weekend is out. Govnt still looks as thought it is being driven by hard Brexit ideologues who want to leave without a deal  
I’m told that Toff is a Tory? If that is the case (and I’m not one to assume) then if I was them I’d get her in number 10 sharpish and she’d sort that #brexit doom out #ImACeleb2017  
I cannot vote Labour anymore after hearing Thornberry this morning. I have only ever voted Labour. I am done with their support of Brexit. 
Drive the value of the pound since Brexit. Very good, via @robmanuel 
Given that Global economic powers are lobbying the EU to stop special Brexit deal for UK the chances of Davis getting his special deal are almost zero. He can talk up Brexit all he likes but the writing is on the wall, "Brexit is bad for Britain." #StopBrexit 
Read it and weep-with laughter. Brexit and trump are the same movement. But brits will march against trump. He'll see huge anti demo's #FBPE  
Worst 3 things the British public has done:- Brexit- Tory government- Iain in 3rd place#ImACelebFinal 
#bbcnews EU “divorce bill” isn’t a #brexit fee. It’s a calculation of budgetary commitments Britain entered into while an EUmember. Britain liable whether or not there’s a trade deal.Defaulting wld damage UK credit rating &reputation. #DavidDavis wrong to claim we cld refuse 2pay 
British people believe government ignoring about other problems because of Brexit, poll reveals  
We decorated your office @LiamFox in Somerset. Hope you like it. Brexit will ultimately fail, but not before your party implodes. #FBPE 
10) finally, and this takes up the bulk of the 40 mins, watch this analysis of Brexit damage.It's strong stuff, but it's simple reality.  Brexit is deeply damaging & economically harmful. 
If the next phase of Brexit talks goes badly the UK must walk away without a deal  
tbh iain leaving 3rd is the third worst decision the british public has made, up there with brexit and voting a tory government #ImACelebfinal 
It’s parliament’s job to hold Brexit to scrutiny and to see if it lives up to its promises or if the people were misled. Tell your local MP to vote for Amendment 7 on Wednesday night. 
jesus the british public can't be trusted to vote for anything, first brexit now jamie in the final over iain #ImACelebFinal 
First Brexit, then Trump, and now @IainLee finishing third behind Jamie. Still, he did AMAZING. Well done pal. So proud. You may have lost the final, but you won a hell of a lot of people over. And did wonders for crying men everywhere. 
THE TIMES: Ireland warns May over Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
FULL STORY David Davis clashes with Ireland over Brexit deal after claiming it was just a statement of intend  
This is the real Tory party Theresa May’s vision one that will cut back on climate change regulations and illegal wildlife trading for post Brexit trade deals from April read this  
1) Thread: #Brexit supporters -40 minutes of your timeBrexit supporters out on Twitter, obviously many of us are now entrenched on either side, but perhaps, 40 minutes of your time will convince you that Brexit needs to be stopped.Here goes: 
To my fellow socialists:Please stop complaining that Brexit is disrupting the prevailing economic order.That's what we're in politics for. 
Roy Moore campaign casts Alabama race as referendum on Trump  
Labour need to set their own red lines on Brexit, says Kevin Maguire 
David Davis clashes with Ireland over Brexit deal  
And just wait to hear what they have to say when they come to Britain! US has the highest level of inequality, the highest prison population in the Western world - Britain is second. When Brexit poverty hits we could knock the US off top spot!  
Petition: Publish a breakdown of any Brexit money agreed after negotiations are complete  
Has Brexit ever been about anything other than harming others? Brexiters have given up even pretending it will make people's lives better, and now focus only on the irrational and spiteful objective of harming others, at any cost to ourselves.  
Last week's 'Brexit fudge' is going to be ripped apart in the next few days. When analysed it was a load of meaningless twaddle. Brexit is on its last legs despite a reluctant, gutless political class keeping it alive. The fight goes on - with increased vigour! #StopBrexit 
A #Brexit related story you can be sure the Mail & Express won’t report.  
Tommorrow, Monday. 12:00-17:00. Wrap up warm. Eat pasties. Stop Brexit.#BrusselsProtest 
Good for our chemicals & pharma industries - among Britain’s rare success stories - speaking out on #Brexit. Others should follow.  
Ireland's Foreign Minister seems to be disagreeing with Britain's Brexit Secretary about how binding Mrs May's Friday's deal might be.  
Tomorrow I ask the Govt in the @UKHouseofLords what they are doing to allow all Brits that want to to keep their EU citizenship after any #brexit  
Are we now the world's 6th biggest economy? Who knows? By 29 March 2019, we might be the 10th. Actually, there is no Brexit deal is as appropriate for our large economy mainly based on services as Remain. Why is that so hard to say? But wish you were Labour leader, @ChukaUmunna 
Tomorrow's front page ... Brexit: Not quite the real deal ... David Davis triggers new row by saying May’s proposals for Irish border are not legally binding  
Join us tomorrow from 10.30 until late at the big rally outside parliament.It's in support of the petition being debated calling for a vote on the Brexit deal, including an option to remain.Expect hundreds of people, flags, chanting, music, media, a battle bus, & more. #FBPE 
Thanks, Katy - much appreciated. The reaction of your Canadian colleagues is consistent with everything I've heard from people outside the UK: Brexit makes no sense. Not sure that Brexiters know (or even care) just how ludicrous they have made UK seem to the outside world. 
Tory Brexiteers may surely start to wonder what Brexit is really for  
On this day in 1991 The leaders of the 12 EC nations agreed on the treaty of Maastricht, pledging closer political and economic union which founded the EU.Why were we not given a referendum on such a crucial integration into this unelected club. 
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #1: The Absurdity of the "Vote" RT #StopBrexit 
Of course @KateHoeyMP will support Parliamentary sovereignty & the amendment for a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal:"The Supreme Court’s decision that Parliament must pass a law to trigger Article 50 reaffirms that Parliamentary sovereignty is at the heart of our democracy"  
SUGGESTION: If you think the way David Davis has behaved over Brexit Impact Assessments and planning is disgraceful then tell John Bercow. As Speaker, it's his job to make sure MPs behave properly and are seen to do so. They work for us.speakersoffice@parliament.uk Please RT. 
The most common -and telling- response to this thread from Brexiters is "well, it's too late now; people voted".There's real fear in that response. There's courage to be drawn from it, for those of us still fighting. There's panic that the tide is turning against #Brexit now.  
.@IanBlackfordMP marks #HumanRightsDay by calling on the UKGov to ensure that a post-Brexit Britain “upholds to the letter” the rights of every citizen in the UK  
'Brexit was the tipping point': EU nationals on why they left the UK  
#Brexit: 3 shocking things we learned this week - The U.K. doesn't yet know what Brexit means, what economic impact it will have or how to execute it.  
#YouIrish had the gumption to do serious Brexit planning, get every member of EU26 on your side, win over Michel Barnier, Juncker, Tusk, bring Barnier to the NI-ROI border, then gain veto over UK progress to phase 2.How very dare #YouIrish@adamboultonSKY 
If you cut police numbers people are not as safe How simple is thatMay u have cut the police to pieces and people will be injured and die as a result Even you vampires must see thatSafety before brexit please 
Those who who decry Tony Blair's attempts to influence Brexit overlook that, by having agreed the Good Friday Agreement, he probably will have more actual influence on the eventual shape of Brexit than any other UK politician. 
YOUR COMMENTS: An awful lot of citizens are very unhappy with Theresa May’s Brexit deal. I mean, they’re not UK citizens… but they’re still very unhappy.  
They’ll probably have Rees-Mogg and Gove on instead saying Brexit is going to be great.   
HELP!!! I have Brexit people in my house. As seems to be normal, they took no interest in what that meant before the referendum and have taken no interest since - just your basic xenophobic, “something had to be done about immigration...”. Eurghffff!! 
Why Michael Heseltine is still raging against Brexit. “The single best thing to advance the industrial and commercial interests of our country would be to abandon Brexit.”#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Brexit in one tweet  
Cabinet Brexit truce threatens to unravel as Leavers 'told concession to EU meaningless'' May and Davis even lie to their own Cabinet colleagues to get them on board. It took 48 hours for it to start unravelling. 
She could have said 'The United Kingdom has voted by a majority at a nation-wide Referendum to leave the European Union, and that's what my Government will now enable.' Instead, May spoke in double-speak, saying 'Brexit means Brexit'. It was then that I realised we had a problem. 
Is it just me or is that idiot @guyverhofstadt constantly hinting that the European Parliament will vote down any deal if they don’t get everything their own way? They never wanted a negotiation. They wanted the UK to agree to all their demands. #Brexit 
Brexit is so clear. It means freedom. To suggest anything other than that is NOT Brexit. 
British people believe government ignoring about other problems because of Brexit, poll reveals  
Cabinet #Brexit truce threatens to unravel. #Brexiters are only on board with #brexitdeal because they were told concession to EU "meaningless", “not binding” & "simply...to secure Ireland’s approval". #brexitchaos set to continue.... via @telegraphnews 
Just watched @Keir_Starmer on @MarrShow. He is clearly arguing for the softest possible #Brexit including continuing to pay a subscription. That’s an improvement on the original @UKLabour position. But why then leave the EU? What is the point of #Brexit? 
The UK must renegotiate 759 treaties with 168 countries after Brexit.David Davis thinks it a good idea to show the world how reliable his govt is to negotiate with by talking flippantly about breaking an agreement signed just this week. 
It is fortunate that we live in a democracy in which we who care about our country can campaign to reverse a foolish and self-destructive policy built on tax-dodging billionaire-owned press hate and lies and the cynical abuse of democratic norms. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
If some NI politicians on here put as much effort into developing their negotiating skills rather than spending time writing derogatory/inflammatory tweets re:Brexit, sure we might even have a functioning Executive 
Davis is slowly realising #Brexit is actually totally impossible to deliver. Why else would he have torpedoed the agreement signed on Friday, which will almost certainly lead to the EU27 walking away next week. 
Theresa May's Brexit Betrayal is now well underway. We did NOT vote for:A Ransom DemandAlignment with Single Market RulesA Transition PeriodWe voted for Brexit, not BrINO#ForTheNation#OutNow 
It should be a source of great shame for our nation that the man in charge of leading the Brexit negotiations, which will have a huge impact on our country for generations to come, is so obviously winging it every single day  
We could Leave EU on Monday! - Wetherspoons Tim Martin #Brexit 
I will be in Parliament calling for a meaningful vote on final Brexit deal (or no deal). That means all options on the table, not Parliament voting between a bad deal and leaving with no deal at all. If Govnt so sure of reaching a good deal they shouldn’t fear a meaningful vote..  
David Davis promises to fight for a "Canada Plus Plus Plus" deal - nobody knows what this means - but a model that matches the 17th ranked country on GDP (ppp) shows up the post-Brexit ambition of the Tories... #BrexitShambles 
North Antrim DUP MP Ian Paisley boasts that the DUP, Brussels & the British Government have "done over" Leo Varadkar on last week's deal & claims  WTO rules would "cripple" the Republic's economy #Brexit  
I hope you didn't vote in the EU referendum on the basis of such ignorance. The ECHR is nothing to do with the EU and the UK will remain part of it outside the EU. If I were you I'd delete the tweet. Sadly your vote cannot be changed.  
Brexit leaders seem to see the new agreement as binding and non-binding at the same time: just like the referendum. Take note @guyverhofstadt 
What almost all Brexiters seem incapable of understanding is that freedom from the constraints of cooperating with 27 other countries also means losing the power of a bloc of 28 nations.Will Britain learn the lesson before it is too late?#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
PS How many people voted for no-deal? 10%? Less than 48%, certainly. No deal has no mandate. Once again, we can translate Davis as clueless, cunning, or delaying the inevitable concession: Brexit is soft or it is dead. 
5/ This translates as 'if there is a no-deal Brexit, Ireland will be compelled under international law to collect tariffs and conduct regulation checks, but as a hard border is an economic disaster which breaches the GFA, no-deal Brexit actually means no Brexit'  
Former Brexit Minister Warns of 'EU Sellout', Predicts Divorce Bill Could Rise to £100 Billion  
Scotland is a Sovereign Nation.It doesn't need permission to have a referendum, it just needs the mandate.It already has that mandate.There will be another referendum.#ScotRef 
.Written by an Englishman in The IrishTimes ....."Irish unity is not such a fanciful idea any more; it wouldn’t be such a shock or even as daft an idea as Brexit."(A lovely Englishman, btw  - Ireland is very lucky to have him) 
Labour backs 'easy movement' of EU workers after Brexit, says Keir Starmer  
This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation.  Charles Moore is right, not that his chums in the Tory Party seem prepared to stand up and be counted  via @telegraphnews 
London is the best-performing city in Europe, @MilkenInstitute says  
#Brexit is laughing stock in pantos across UK  
Dear PM May, I am a British & EU citizen. You cannot take away my EU identity with your daft Brexit, no more than you can take away my British identity. You may try to take away my EU rights, my EU freedom, etc. -but you cannot take away my identity. I decide that... 
Irish government plans to hold UK to Brexit agreement after Brexit Minister indicates that it's not legally enforceable  
U.N. Secuity Council votes 41-1 against the US over Trump's Jerusalem decision plus, update on Brexit break...  
The whole EU referendum was based on lies; no wonder Davis, Green, Fox, Johnson and Gove feel they can carry on with  impunity.  
BREAKING NEWS: Irish Govt hits back at UK trying to play down agreement as meaningless: “Both Ireland & the EU will be holding the UK to the Phase 1 agreement”. Irish Govt confirms also that UK has signed up to paragraph 46 which binds them to the #brexit deal. 
The New Jerusalem of Brexit is revealing itself to be a mirage | Matthew d’Ancona  
"Deal Or No deal"THAT LAST WEEK OF #BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS EXPLAINED.Book now available! Order now, from  
7) in the final analysis in the years hence, Brexit will be seen as a folly by the UK, a pointless exercise carried out because the Government was hemmed in by a badly defined vote, zealots in Tory party, ineffectual media & a useless opposition 
May's Brexit betrayal is a treason too far. (A punchy piece from Reaction's Hardest Brexit commentator Gerald Warner)  
All those were actions perpetrated or forced by enemies. Brexit is mischief of our own making; self-harm that no enemy inflicted; our own determination to reduce opportunities for next generation; to reduce our influence; betray our friends; and give our enemies cause to cheer.  
To be fair, Brexit talks going better than I feared. We seem to have finally captured the spirit of Dunkirk: a hastily organised retreat from the continent that’ll we’ll then inexplicably celebrate. 
If #Brexit happens the UK will be damaged economically, politically, socially and in the eyes of the rest of the world. Result: we shall ask to rejoin but will only be allowed to do so on worse terms than we have now.SO #StopBrexit 
BREAKING: the Two Campaign Scam. Even without the DUP, the Leave campaigns would have broken their spending limit by £5m if the @ElectoralCommUK had viewed them as working together. #Brexit  
Former Brexit Minister Warns of ‘EU Sellout’, Predicts Divorce Bill Could Rise to £100 Billion  
Davis already trying to back out of what’s been agreed. Not smart.Brexit progress already to slow to handle all the issues. Going into reverse on issues agreed  now just makes it far worse... unless, of course, he wants go back on the whole Brexit. 
Fine @MarionVanR article in @TheNewEuropean on how the best known Brit in France @AlexTaylorNews has taken out French nationality in his despair Brexit removing right from Brits living on continent 
MPs did not properly approve Brexit—so the triggering of Article 50 was invalid  
Michael Heseltine: “Sadly, in the Brexit context, yesterday prevailed. But yesterday can’t stop tomorrow.” #exitfrombrexit  
This.  For those who think Ireland was make or break, I'm afraid it's just a massive cut. Just one large cut of the thousand cuts of different sizes that Brexit is facing.  
Um. A few things have changed since March 2017, not the least being Ruth’s position on Brexit. #flipflop  
BREXIT MESS: THE JUST DESSERT OF A FLAWED SYSTEMAnalysis of Leave donor and group spending shows co-operation worth millions and exposes a flaw in the rules which works against the public interest.Via @Byline_Media 
What makes brexit so sickening is that from the start of the refusal to sign article 50 we all knew May was bullshitting us and yet we allowed her to carry on and make us look such fools. From leaving to another 8 years with no say in the EU. A good result for May. 
Labour MP Shami Chakrabarti is “very disappointed” about killing Jihadi terrorists  via @Your Brexit 
David Davis bring chaos back into the Brexit breakthrough.  
Answer’s not Brexit, John. Germany has twice number of migrants than U.K. & is thriving, with high & rising pay scales & powerhouse productivity. As a Labour man you know it’s Tory underinvestment that is cause of public service issues - not immigrants  
Ink on the Brexit agreement not dry yet, and David Davis has managed to annoy the Irish Government.  
A year since Adrian Gill died. Miss him every day. Here are some of his best pieces: i. Against Brexit  
Unbelievable! They give Gina Miller an award for campaigner of the year just when they all but destroyed #Brexit These pricks have no shame, none at all and do whatever the hell they want. A referendum has the supremacy over parliament yet the Supreme Court ruled otherwise. 
An outright lie and an islamophobic dog whistle; Not only was Turkey not about to join the EU, but since the Brexit vote it has withdrawn its application, having lost the main big player pushing for it to get membership (which was, of course, the UK).  
Brexit must be defended. The UK is at a key point is history & we have the chance to take so many opportunities but they won’t happen if we allow our corrupt pro EU Parliament to ruin it by forcing us into a soft Brexit & restricting our opportunities to keep us under EU control  
The deal we agreed two days ago? We don’t have to honour it - David DavisSo about that advisory referendum with just 26% of people voting for a pack of lies being in some way binding...#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
A United States of Europe was always their plan. It’s worth any sum to avoid that:  #Brexit 
The Government has hit back at a British government suggestion that a deal reached on the post-Brexit Border was a “statement of intent” rathern than “a legally enforceable thing”  
Man who laughed at prospect of hefty EU divorce bill and misled Parliament on existence of Brexit impact assessments now promises a bespoke EU trade deal within eight months    
Easy movement means free movement with Belgian-style restrictions. If Labour is not yet admitting it it is only because they can't do so politically. Labour will not be dumb enough to rule out soft Brexit now Friday's agreement has effectively mandated it  
Italy's secret plan to leave the euro. Italy is secretly hatching a plans to sideline the euro + set up a parallel currency. If Italy can get out of the single currency, it is only a matter of time before Italy will go for #Brexit + leave the EU. Great news for #Italy . 
Heads-up for countries negotiating trade agreements with post-Brexit Britain - they don’t consider their deals ’binding’.  
On December 10,#Artsakh celebrates the Day of State Independence Referendum & Constitution.In 1991, the Referendum was held on #HumanRightsDay since our struggle is based on the idea of protecting human rights & fundamental freedoms as well as legitimate interests of our people. 
Spot on from Michael Heseltine "sadly in the Brexit context, yesterday prevailed. But yesterday can't stop tomorrow."He's right we can #ExitFromBrexit 
David Davis says the pre Brexit deal signed on Friday is not binding. To put that into context, the government thought Parliament’s instruction to hand over the Brexit papers to the select committee wasn’t binding. Even after Mr Speaker said it was. 
She campaigned in the election to be given a "strong hand" to impose what she set-out in her Lancaster House speech i.e. hard Brexit.There was no secret plan to soften anything IMO. 
Brexit breakthrough leaves thorniest problems for later - Talks on bigger issues must still take place and the economic consequences are hard to predict 
Brexit: Draft Nicola Sturgeon into trade talks, Theresa May told  
Why are the @Conservatives SO desperately keen?!This was June 2016 but the mood has changed towards Remain so why are they still carrying on with this absurd, embarrassing, dangerous, and exorbitant Brexit car crash?#FinalSay#NoPointBrexit#StopBrexit 
Has anyone in the history of humankind ever needed to get over themselves more than Brexit voters?  
From the EU's impact assessment of Brexit on Scotland, because at least SOMEBODY bothered to do one.  
On Friday, British government wanted us to cheer because phase one of Brexit was clear and trade talks could begin.Days later they tell us they won't be bound to the terms that allowed phase one clearance.Millions of British families livelihoods are threatened by gov posturing 
Sadly had to withdraw myself from BBC presenting duties. The price of not wanting to wind my neck in over Brexit &, to a lesser extent, Trump. 
You say “sectoral analysis”, I say “impact assessment”. You say “regulatory alignment” I say “staying in the Single Market”.  Leave, Remain, Brexit, Flexit? Let’s call the whole thing off. 
You know what, let's raise it to 45. It only makes sense. Anyone British who wants to stop Brexit, under the age of 45, message me. (Thanks to everyone who's reached out so far. )  
The question here is whether she would have used the expected enhanced majority to soften Brexit or harden it. If ‘soften’ then her success in spite of the result becomes even more impressive. 
Attacking me over a Brexit I campaigned against by lauding a Brexiteer and simultaneously championing the assault on comprehensive education is, I think, your worst take yet. Congratulations. 
On Monday afternoon (4.30pm), MPs will debate my HoC petition to 'hold a referendum on the final brexit deal', signed by 130k+ people. There is a #StopBrexit protest taking place outside parliament from 10am. The people deserve the #finalsay. Sign+RT! 
British workers should be at the heart of Brexit negotiations | John Mann  
We can't over-stress that the whole Leave campaign was (1) Brexit will be easy (2) it will boost our economy and gift us billions to spend eg on the NHS and (3) Europe will be queuing up to make trade deals with us.Literally millions of voters were swayed by this. 
“Hey George, we’ve created so many disasters. How do we hide them?”“Create a bigger disaster as a smokescreen Dave?”“Brilliant. Brexit!”  
Dear Denis Skinner MP @BolsoverBeast Although you usually back the Tory government on Brexit, please would you vote for Amendment 7 on Wednesday to ensure that Parliament has the final say on the deal?Whatever your view of Brexit, surely Parliamentary democracy is paramount?  
Southerners please note: the North doesn't want #Brexit either! @London4Europe @GreenwichInEU @BHforEU @_Britain4Europe @OxfordStays @cambridge_stays @spaceangel1964 @ChelsClive @EUflagmafia @SurreyForEurope 
You must think we’re idiots. Those that said that Brexit would mean leaving the SM were shouted down, called liars, and pedlars of project fear. The winners said Brexit didn’t mean leaving the SM, now deliver or Brexit’s off. pic.twitter.com/MttzdpLnuq 
Brexit. Anyone who says they know what's going to happen in the long term - or even next month - is mistaken. In chaotic and volatile times we can only estimate probabilities. Pretty much ANYTHING can still happen. Keep raging against the dying of the light. 
On this #HumanRightsDay, it is sad to realise that #PeopleB4Politics was a myth and the rights of 5m people (@The3Million + @BritishInEurope) have been thrown under the #Brexit bus to get deal talks.Our #citizensrights have an expiry date, and who will even get them? Unclear. 
.@DavidDavisMP : Keir Starmer could not have been clearer about what the consequences of Labour's chaotic approach to Brexit would be.  
Andrew Marr completely nails an arrogant SNP buffoon on one of the biggest Remoaner lies about the referendum - that a vote to leave the EU wasn’t a vote to leave the Single Market too.  
Whilst Gove & Davies try to wriggle out of the #Brexit agreement made on Friday , and to confuse people about the clear commitments made, Ireland ( and even more significantly the EU ) have no doubt about the matter .  
Oh Iain. There isn’t a soul alive who doesnt know that Brexit is a total car crash. No strategy. No plan. Nothing but hot air, empty threats and lies. The clocks ticking. 
I put a post up saying we've paid the Brexit bill by the lives of service personnel & people get angry, these are the same people who ignore homeless veterans & veterans suicide! They are called oxygen thieves  
Its unbelievable, so why did he say so many times there were assessments done!David Davis tries to explain those non-existent Brexit impact assessments  via @CityAM#StopBrexit #DDexit 
I must say I’m surprised you’re going out to bat for this crap, btw. Equating anti brexit with anti-British - as you’re suggesting @fotoole is doing - is a very dangerous road to go down 
In a normal democracy there is government & opposition, majority & minority - all part of the democratic community. But once politicians talk of the "Will of the People", then there are the people and their enemies and that is the opposite of democracy.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Brexit handicaps British business. The EU is flying. UK already falling behind  
Canada style FTA means a hard border in Northern Ireland and Dover. We will lose a third of our trade by leaving the EEA. #Brexit 
EU CRISIS: Italy plans to LEAVE euro – ECB 'APPROVES'3 political parties backing “Fiscal Credit Certificates” as alternative to euro.Plan approved by European Central Bank.'Highly likely that shops will accept CCFs as alternative to euro'#Brexit #EU 
On #HumanRightsDay we’re standing with 140+ groups asking the Prime Minister to safeguard human rights today, during & after Brexit. Read our letter here: 
Interesting email exchange with @timjn1 on Leave voters reflecting on new #Brexit facts emerging and it being essential for the British people to have the final say. @thomasbrake promoting @LibDems Referendum amendment next week in Commons 
Friends! Sad!Our Caitlin - the People's Moran - is asking for "good news" on Brexit!But as she must realise, even "good news" on Brexit is actually *bad* news!Especially anything that undermines Our EU's rule over Britain, or gives Brits the idea they can govern themselves.  
#Italexit Eurozone CRISISItaly hatches shocking plan to LEAVE euro & ECB 'APPROVES'!MEP Diane James “If Italy does manage to leave single currency it's only matter of time until it formally leaves #EU & whole house of cards comes crashing down”#Brexit 
BRITS BACK CONTROLS ON IMMIGRATION AS MORE IMPORTANT THAN EU TRADE - Which was the whole point of Brexit eh?       #fo2eu 
Britain's Brexit minister David Davis has described the UK government's pledge to prevent any return to a hard border with Ireland after Britain leaves the EU as "a statement of intent" rather than a legally binding move   
The further you go from Brussels, the likelier people are to think of Brexit in terms of opportunities rather than problems.  
Brexit made me realise how deeply we have maintained imperialist attitudes in our DNA. We are demanding other countries apologise for defending their own interests; and we are demanding we have a right to access everything in the EU while leaving. We need a real mental adjustment 
Like all the rest of the Brexit Taliban’s threats this is just hot air.  
Labour totally untrustworthy on Brexit: want to stay in SM & CU in all but name; & still pay = a Slave to EU Master  
Someone needs to tell @DavidDavisMP that while Del Boy might be a national treasure, channelling him in #Brexit discussions doesn’t do much to breed confidence…. #Marr 
#YouIrish took back control one hundred years ago and last week exercised that control by standing up to #Brexit Britain and causing its capitulation  #GreenBrexit 
Every Labour MP need back the amendment for a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal.Anything else would make a mockery of parliament and be an affront to representative democracy.  
Another day, another Labour Brexit position - now they want to continue to pay into the European Union after we leave, adopt rules that we haven’t had a say in and refuse to rule out a second referendum. 
The UK will not pay any money to the EU if it leaves without a trade deal, according to Brexit Secretary David Davis. 
Miss this week's post? The state of Albion Estate... More info:  (please don't make us have to clarify the map shape again) #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Michael Gove has accepted it's gonna be like being in the EU but with the UK having no say over how it's run but he doesn't care. Brexit was only ever a vehicle to further his career.  
Please @UKLabour - take a stand!  You could make such a huge difference to our future if you’d join us in urging a referendum on the final deal #Brexit #democracy 
“Ireland is proving what independence in Europe actually means – solidarity with 26 other member states against the UK” a good round the houses from @JamieRoss7 on Scotland and brexit.  
Rebecca Long-Bailey, the shadow business secretary, said Labour would pay a Brexit divorce bill even if the UK failed to strike a trade agreement with the EU. Hold on a minute. That is taxpayers' money you are proposing to fritter away!  
If you're under 35 and want to stop Brexit, please message me privately.I'm putting together a special Christmas video that needs your help. It's video-based of course, so it's not for the camera shy, but it will only take 5 minutes of your time. 
Veteran Canadian trade negotiator on R4 saying, “This isn’t a typical trade negotiation because Brexit was driven by emotion, not by a sober assessment of the facts.” #BrexitShambles #TWTW 
It looks like #Brexit is betrayed & that we’re staying in single market & customs union, by another name, paying the heating money of our pensioners & the school meals of our children forMandy’s pension & are still not in control of our borders or courts.Whats it all about Alfie? 
A request to my UK followers: please stop referring to the Brexit bill as a cost for Brexit. The name is a misnomer. It is simply making the payments that the UK agreed to make as a member and would come due as a member or a non-member. The cost of Brexit is in lower GDP and £ 
“The deal can be signed minutes after Brexit day” is the new “easiest deal in history”. 
The Tory insistence on an FTA rather than EEA is born of a desire to deregulate. It is pure ideology at work with no relevance to the world as we find it and it is completely intellectually bankrupt.  #Brexit 
Can you imagine in the 18 long months since the referendum vote, the government has never discussed the destination it is hurtling towards with Brexit? The energy and time it has given to this project with unknown consequences is huge. Personal financial advantage the reason? 
"Victorious warriors win first then go to war, while defeated warriors go to war then seek to win" - Sun Tzu.Brexit was lost before it began. No allies, no strategy, no goal. Nothing but a con to enrich its billionaire backers.  
Balance RTÉ style: yet again Marion Fuinucane has a panel that is 100% on the Establishment side with not a single dissenting voice to be heard.  Today it was Brexit; usually Sinn Féin. This is so regular that RTÉ management must know and approve it. 
Labour:> Won't rule out second referendum> Backs continued payments to EU> "Easy if not free" movement> EU regulations with no sayThat is not Brexit...  
*Brexit Deal Explained*  
"People are very welcome to come [after Brexit], but if they want to work, they will need a work permit. If they want to claim benefits, they will need to qualify"Conservative MP and eurosceptic John Redwood gives his predictions of what will happen after Brexit.  
Respected Irish economist Colm McCarthy on Gove’s assurance that the UK can reject Brexit: - what happens then? A resumption of negotiations... And Nick Timothy’s (37) attack on the “young and inexperienced” Taoiseach, (38) shows “Brexit not about the real world”  
Labours brexit plans confirmed:-Billions to the EU every year-Following EU law with no say-No control over immigration  
SNP: Brexit without single market 'unparalleled threat'  
When we talk about surviving times of crisis, we remember the heroes who led the way.But those brave souls weren't destined, they were just people like you and I who stood up to stop a problem.Brexit is wrecking Britain and it's down to each of us to lead the fight against it. 
And herelies the reason this fiasco is doomed to failure.Firstly, Brexit is - in and of itself - a damn stupid idea driven by the flawed ideology of #Brextremists based on a flawed vision of British exceptionalism and the false memory of global leadership in free trade .  
Get beyond the caricature, here’s some research on the referendum. The Leave vote is about more than conventional demographics. Leavers have a strong idea of their national identity, continuity with the past, and an optimism about the nation’s future.  
Turkeys secure deal to negotiate what’s for dessert after ‘winning’ non-binding Christmas Lunch Referendum 
Brexit transition period of two years will prove far too short (David Davis said to privately believe new EU-UK trade deal will take five). 
'The mayor of DENIAL' Sadiq Khan spends £42k on Brexit impact report by REMAINER-led group  
‘We now need to see meat on the bones – how is this going to work in practice? How effectively are we going to see no hard #border ? We will need to see a lot more deal – SF’s  @loreillysf tells #twip #brexit  
Anyone thinking that the Brexit deal is done and dusted and it's plain sailing from here is seriously deluded. Ministers suggesting this is the case are being criminally negligent. 
And here's the reason why #Brexit can't work.. a simple thing called trust..there ain't any; the EU27 can't trust the Govt to deliver there4 the ECJ must be long term to guarantee it..the ECJ is anathema to Brexiters..they won't be able to take away rights. #FinalSay #StopBrexit 
Brexit's 'snow joke'! #NoPointBrexit #StopBrexit #MakeMondayMassive #FBPE#uksnow #snow #marr @mrjamesob @emmyzen @campbellclaret 
This fudge is melting incredibly, incredibly quickly. #brexit  
Hope you handed over your analysis of the benefits of 'no deal' to the Brexit Select Committee @DavidDavisMP. You know, when you said earlier in the week there were no economic assessments, despite saying numerous times you'd done them.#StopBrexit 
You won't believe it, but @Nigel_Farage and @vincecable agree. The Brexit divorce bill is unacceptable  
Dear UK, Re #Brexit agreement of the 8th, inst.We not only speak English, we also get your TV channels.Yours sincerely, Ireland. 
The OECD says that if Britain were to abandon Brexit it would see a significant rise in growth. Meanwhile in the board room of Britain plc, chair May decides that it's in the country's best interests to ignore this and go for broke - literally. 
 Read @DerekMackaySNP on how faced with more austerity and a damaging Brexit, he will deliver a budget for a fairer Scotland this week. #ScotBudget 
2) it will be clear to most of us that the Unicorn #Brexit promised by Leave (no cost Free Trade deal on our terms, no negative impacts) was always impossible & simply a ruse to get votes.Leavers have to accept that they fell for it to a greater or lesser degree 
1) #Brexit & Futility, threadIf there's one thing that we know, it's that no majority voted for the kind of Brexit we're heading for.Some of us can breath a sigh of relief, but it's tinged with frustration - there's no point to this #Brexit, but it's the only one possible 
This is so true. It's still very instructive to read Ivan Rogers' evidence to the Brexit Select Committee:  
The vital Amendment 7 to the EU Withdrawal Bill, demanding that Parliament must have the final say, will be debated and voted on this week.It is supported by 10 Tory MPs, but may be defeated by 7 Labour MPs who always back the Tories on Brexit.  
The Brexit fantasists really don't get it. The EU holds all the cards during the discussions to leave the EU. We are subservient in the negations. We aren't equals any more. Britain will soon be just another third nation state wanting a trade deal unless we #StopBrexit 
Famously (infamously?) May said 'Brexit means Brexit'. Now we know her Cabinet has no idea what Brexit even looks like, let alone what it means.The charge of the light brigade, all over again? But with far more serious consequences.All to assuage 50 or so ToryKip headcases. 
As the Brexit talks move on to phase two, here are the results from phase one:Negotiation Schedule   Citizens' Rights   The Exit Bill   Northern Ireland   Total:  4   0In other words, Remainers were right. #StopBrexit 
Watching Westminster MP @MarkFieldUK stumble being asked why London’s financial services will be more successful post-Brexit. Says we have to be “bold, positive & bucaneering.” Not an answer because he can’t answer. Then he suggests alignment may be the answer. 
Part Three“minutes after” March 2019 Brexit day 
If @DavidDavisMP thinks the deal struck in Part 1 is "not binding"how does he expect anyone to deal with the UK post-#brexit ?Comments like this makes the UK a pariah state - #dishonest #untrustworthy#StopBrexit + #ToriesOut 
Oh Keir ... When will you stop supporting this delusional Tory Brexit and embrace Remain?  
Which the 'free trade' enthusiasts leading the Brexit junta want us not to join. We are beyond stupidity now, straying instead into full-on conspiracy to defraud.  If the cabinet were a company board they'd be in a court facing prison by now.  
"We have to leave the EU" but "we don't have to go a long way" @BBCsarahsmith questions @EmilyThornberry on Labour's Brexit position #bbcsp 
Broadcasters may need to think over next year about how little the format of interview with a politician does anything to clarify or illuminate the politics/content of Brexit negotiations for general reasonably informed viewer 
Keir Starmer chasing Brexit unicorns on Marr  
Emily Thornberry now on #BBCSP, laying out yet another Labour Brexit position. They have literally no idea what they're talking about. 
Brexit Explained  
To those Remainers who have felt a bit down this week: fear not. It would appear that the lunatic Tory Brextremists are still determined to force a ‘no deal’ hard Brexit, which would surely result in the whole thing collapsing.  
Moreover, an individual's EU citizenship is not within the gift of the UK govt, and the EU alone has the power to remove or continue it after Brexit.I argue that the EU has a duty to preserve it for all those UK nationals who do not consent to it being terminated by Brexit. 2/2 
Extending Brexit date for two or so years: easy.Creating elaborate arrangements to continue FTAs, Single Market, Customs Union, ECJ jurisdiction, citizens rights etc for very same effect: expensive, time-consuming, resource-wasting, difficult.EU and UK will do the latter. 
Come on Alba!!! We've still got letters to deliver to #Europe!  There's no time for dilly dallying in the snow! We've got a #Brexit to shmexit and a #europe to apologise to!!!   
On #HumanRightsDay today, Garden Court Chambers is supporting 140+ groups asking @theresa_may to safeguard human rights today, during & after Brexit  @BIHRhumanrights 
Confused about para 49 of joint #Brexit report?@hayward_katy says our 3 layered Irish coffee is "entirely unambiguous" 
Labour's Brexit plan would see UK forever tied to single market and keep making payments into the EU's budget, Sir Keir Starmer admits  
Also Davis probably COULD sign an ICeland-style deal with the EU minutes* after Brexit Day... and ICeland also famously had freedom to sign its own trade deal with China...(*NB thats because its in Efta & the EEA) 
Normal people: *tweets* hey look it’s sno…Tedious people: DON’T YOU THINK WE CAN SEE THAT IT’S SNOWING. We have WINDOWS. In my day we didn’t need social media to tell us the weather outside. Why don’t you tweet about something IMPORTANT like Jeremy Corbyn’s SILENCE on Brexit. 
It's "not binding" you say?Reminds me of a certain referendum held not too long ago...  
Hate crime is an unpleasant daily reality for many but there is no evidence of a persistent post-Brexit surge. Contrary to the damaging "xenophobic Brexit Britain" narrative evidence suggests overall trend is more likely down than up. See SundayTimes today  
Words of my old man, 75, hardened Leave supporter, Sun-reader, poet: "If there was a second ref, I'd vote Remain, cos those cunts all said Brexit would be easy but it's a fucking shitty mess and I'm sick of it." 
Why Michael Heseltine still believes Brexit can be stopped - my interview from the NS Christmas issue.  
Tory Brexiteer Peter Bone says he expects there will be no proper trade deal and the UK should be ready to say "we're going to come out... we're not going to give you that £39bn and we're going to spend it on the NHS and social care" #Brexit #Paterson 
So Peter Bone tells @RidgeOnSunday he would be complaining, but has talked to “a lot” of the people involved in negotiation who say full alignment is “absolutely” not the situation, and we won’t end up paying £39bn because there’ll be No Deal & “clean Brexit”  
After watching David Davis on #marr now I know why Brexit negotiations are in a such a mess. Can’t believe he’s still in post! 
Brexit means BrexitLeave means LeaveNo Deal means No DealImpact Assessments do NOT mean Assessments of Impact@DavidDavisMP 
Brexit: May's EU deal not binding, says David Davis - Nor is the referendum @DavidDavisMP 
Indeed it did. I think the most pernicious thing about #brexit is not its fascist roots, it's not its inherent racism, although these are very, very bad things, it is its anti-intellectualism, its irrationality and its failure to distinguish between fact and fiction  
This #HumanRightsDay, BIHR & 145 other organisations have joined together writing to the @theresa_may, published in @Telegraph asking her to ensure that our #HumanRights are secured here at home, today & after Brexit 
Remember @DavidDavisMP assertion that a #Brexit deal  can deliver the "exact same benefits as EU membership" another example of his terminological inexactitude #marr 
Brexit has a breakthrough but now comes the hard part, writes @richardbarley1 
Plus plus plus you say? My confidence in David Davis and Brexit is restored. Everything is going to be ok, folks. No, better than that: plus plus plus not fucked at all  
.@VinceCable dares #FarageonLBC to back referendum on any Brexit deal. Recent polls show public backing for @LibDems policy 
UK government and Brexit spokespersons are engaging in multiple, contradictory car crash interviews all over UK media. Sometimes contradicting themselves within seconds. Gobsmacking incompetent as a policy 
Leaving the EU will cost a LOT more than that when all the other costs are added in.The BBC need to start telling people the truth about all the other hidden knock on effects & costs of the upheaval of Brexit.People don’t seem to be thinking through the true costs.#Marr 
13/ Monday will be when Parliament debates whether there should be a referendum on the final deal. It will be interesting to see which form of word.s Government use to say the people cannot challenge the will of the people 
Imagine if Ant and Dec had a massive argument and everyone was picking sides, the country would be divided would be worse than brexit 
Having completed Phase One, Johnny Bull was hoping that someone had packed a parachute for Phase Two#Brexit#JohnnyBull#TheBrexit@Trump_ton 
Davis (deliberately?) misrepresenting Hammond: Brexit bill conditional on divorce deal, not FTA which could be years away. Hammond correct.  
Andrew Marr puts it to @Keir_Starmer that @UKLabour's Brexit stance would see the UK become a “vassal state”, accepting the “worst of all worlds”  
Keir Starmer effectively confirming on #Marr that Labour's (latest) policy on Brexit is to leave the EU in name only.If it sticks to this, the party will deserve to be wiped out in all those working-class constituencies that voted Leave. 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP confirms it will cost around £35-£39 billion to leave the EU and says it was only confirmed "about a week ago" #marr 
So tired from fighting #Brexit... I just want my country back!Pls just #stopbrexit now so I can have a good long nap! 
The BBC and the Government fear @thatginamiller on Brexit for one simple reason. She knows what she’s talking about. They seldom if ever do. 
Ambiguity is now the default position of every govt Brexit statement. So too @UKLabour. We can’t keep burying our heads in the sand. Time has already slipped too far in the toxic haze of avoiding hard truths. 
We have witnessed the greatest capitulation since Singapore February 1942.25 years of my life devoted to BREXIT & a large slice of my life savings.To secure the biggest electoral mandate in our history.Only to be betrayed by the same rancid political party that took us in.  
I’m married to an EU Citizen and her experience of discrimination & racism is mirrored time & again. I’ll always stand with my European brothers & sisters, I’ll always challenge racism when I encounter it, and I’ll never forgive the Brexit cheerleaders who made this all happen.  
If you’re not convinced by @DavidDavisMP’s nice distinction between studies assessing impact of #Brexit and Brexit impact assessments then keep watching the judicial review from myself and @JolyonMaugham launched this week. Should provide legal clarity #Marr 
When the British people voted for Brexit they voted to take back control. They knew exactly what they wanted. The official Leave campaign stuck to the same vision throughout. We want control of our laws, our money and our borders.  
David Davis smirks and chuckles as Andrew Marr points out he misled the public about the existence of government Brexit impact assessments. 
In 1988 I came to the UK as a fellow European. Now, thanks to Brexit, I am treated as a barely tolerated 'migrant'. Fuck you very much, Britain!  
The Brexit press and politicians have played the classic trick of accusing Remainers of their own misdeeds. The real 'Project Fear' has been the cynical orchestrated whipping up of fear and hate against the EU, immigrants, refugees & Muslims.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Single Market remains pretty popular in polls. This is what happens when the anti-Single Marketers argue we “have to” because of referendum & media soundbites around it rather than actually make & win argument for this position... 
The reality is Labour's position hasn't changed since the election. Still want Remainers to think they're committed to status quo. Want Leavers to think they're committed to Brexit. 
Keir Starmer making it very clear that Labour is pushing for Soft Brexit - staying in Single Market & Customs Union, retaining rights & standards. #Marr clearly hates what he’s hearing but most people will be hugely relieved. Debate must focus now on whether it’s worth it 
"I think that's the right thing" - shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer says UK must stay close to EU's single market after #Brexit  #marr 
.@IanBlackfordMP says both sides in the referendum campaign did not say Britain will be leaving the single market after Brexit...but big names from both sides did #marr 
I don’t remember Leave at the referendum saying “Ignore the Remain campaign! It's all Project Fear! Apart from what they say about leaving the Single Market” #marr 
Those who say UK cannot change its mind on referendum or Article 50 now say that UK can change its mind on Brexit deal.  
#marr Kier Stammer patronising git, 'I don't want to get too technical' get to technical Keir we're watching politics progs first thing on a Sunday believe me we can understand technical #Brexit 
Don’t envy @Keir_Starmer on #Marr. He knows what needs to be done on Brexit. He has a boss who doesn’t. Lawyerly ambiguity his only option. 
To be clear, the Eggheads are available for the next stage of #Brexit negotiations although @EggheadBarry says the last two weeks in February are difficult because of a family commitment #SendInTheEggheads 
.@IanBlackfordMP: “The question for Labour is - are they going to come with us and work to protect jobs and living standards?” #Marr #Brexit 
#marr I am a GP. Patients have told me they voted to Leave 'to help the NHS ' . I believe Brexit will instead result in a US style health system. It has already started. 
People are still claiming “Nobody voted to be poorer when they voted for Brexit.”It’s bollocks. They literally did. They were told repeatedly that’s what would happen and they made their choice. #Marr 
As 'Brexit Boom' Continues, Leavers Want to Know Why Appeaser @theresa_may  Is Surrendering Across the Board - Breitbart 
Today's Hard Brexit spin that UK can perhaps renege on its promises in the "Sufficient Progress" report now makes phase 2 negotiations more difficult.Essentially telling EU27 that UK cannot be trusted on its word.Not all binding obligations are legal(istic) ones. 
OPTIMISM: Number of Brits who believe Brexit will have positive economic impact surges by 9% in one month!  
Cornish caller can't stop laughing at the "idiots" still supporting Brexit  
Not one mention of Rupert Murdoch anywhere in this thread. This guy rules the free world and hardly anyone talks about it. He owns The Sun in the UK and has been responsible for every election win since 1978. He’s behind Fox and Trump and Brexit; a true enemy of the people! 
This is the best example of English arrogance I’ve seen in a long time. I’m a Protestant in NI and this whole #Brexit and @duponline  would make me vote for united  English only care about English - they don’t want NI burden. Why can’t @duponline see that? 
UK will be the same country after Brexit. Just poorer, with less influence and more isolated.UK will be the same country after Brexit. Just more divided, unequal and intolerant.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
a day like this shall be the day for Zanzibaris to talk amongst each other and reflect. We shall start conversations about a referendum on Union between Tanganyika and Zanzibar. I will campaign for Union but I will accept and respect results if people vote against it. 
"#HumanRights are not bargaining chips that can be traded in political negotiations". The latest @OxHRH podcast episode: The Impact of #Brexit on Human Rights in Northern Ireland:  #HumanRightsDay 
The Tories either fail to see the deep divisions that their stances on Brexit are generating OR this is their plan - Divide & Conquer, rule for a generation... We must stop them... !!! #Marr Peston #Paterson 
Here’s the second of my two part analysis of Friday’s agreement: “The contradictions that will plague the #Brexit deal” via @RTENewsNow  
Phase 2 of the UK brexit humiliation has begun.No cherry picking. No bespoke deals.  Canada (which ruins economy) or Norway (which leaves us a vassal state) only. May as well just stay in the EU.  
Translation: IDS is desperate. He can see hard Brexit becoming about as likely as the Dalia Lama inviting him round for Christmas, so he’s shouting like a demented bully that nobody is scared of any more because they can see he's just a sad, lonely, angry old man.  
"Red, white and blue Brexit" finally revealed.  
Khan to use Londoner’s council tax money - meant for schools & hospitals - to fund his own Brexit impact assessment. The assessment will be carried out by pro-Corbyn remainers... So not a hope of being unbiased.Isn’t that misappropriation of funds? 
Global powers lobby to stop special Brexit deal for UK   
Theresa May faces first Brexit bill defeat, say Commons rebels   
BREXIT:If the Non-EU Norwegians & the EU Swedes can manage an open border, then it should never have been beyond the wit & wisdom of the UK & Ireland Governments to work out a border that suits everyone.  
Trying to shut down an ‘unnecessary kerfuffle’ over the use of language with an old colonial #YouIrish put down. #Brexit Britain, eh?  
BREXIT:The British people either get the (real) Brexit they voted for or receive the message from our politicians that their vote means nothing & democracy no longer matters in this country.  
Hey Brexiters, please remind us: what’s the point of Brexit?  
F.A.O the Tories. 17.4 million people less Gove are waiting for you to sack Mrs May. Or would you prefer to get hammered at the next election. How do you intend to go to the people after doing this with brexit ? Its a complete betrayal. Fishing grounds next ??????? 
Former Conservative Attorney-General Dominic Grieve’s all important Amendment 7 to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill providing for a ‘meaningful vote’ on #Brexit  
Brexit Minister David Davis lied to Parliament & the British public over the Brexit Impact assessments - AND alongside Theresa May failed to secure a single significant concession from the EU. Total #BrexitShambles #Marr  #Paterson 
Brexit ‘breakthrough’ draws praise...But does the 'right to remain' pledge go far enough to soothe the anxieties of scientists about their post-Brexit future? 
Regardless of what they say, the latest #Brexit agreement does not guarantee full citizens' rights & it is not binding.Contact your MP & demand support of Amendment 7 & to #StopBrexit .I am NOT a bargaining chip! How about you?#MakeMondayMassive #citizensrights 
Britain before 2010 was not as unequal as now, did not demonise the ill, poor and disabled. The referendum campaign added the icing on the cake and made it ok to be openly racist with our PM at the time daring to be indulge in dog whistle racism in the HOC  
Speaking Brexit with @MollyMEP on the rights of EU citizens and the @The3Million it’s appalling how EU citizens have been treated by this govt people in real distress 
Not so much crossing May's red lines as erasing them. Post Brexit life will be much the same as before with ECJ rulings and market rules  
Brexit seems to be taking the exact shape ex mandarin and Brussels expert Ivan Rogers advised the PM it would - before he was booted out 
There are lots of troubles ahead, some Tories want to sabotage Theresa May, cabinet doesn’t know what kind of trading relationship we want to have, we need a vote at the end to see if Brexit is best for us  @MollyMEP 
You'd never guess that Corbyn has voted with the Tories all the way on Brexit. In his world of magical thinking, Brexit would be a success with absolutely no damage to our economy.We need Brexit to be stopped. Corbyn is not going to even attempt to do that.  
From 9am: As the Brexit talks move onto phase two, @AndrewMarr9 will be speaking to the Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP and Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer #marr 
Simply dreadful when us Irish don’t know our place and point out problems with the otherwise smoothly running Brexit process. 
#TheresaMay is facing her first defeat on her Brexit bill within days, amid a last-minute plea to pro-European Tories to force a “truly meaningful vote” on Britain’s final EU deal.Contact your MPs & make sure they support Amendment 7 for a #FinalSay 
£300 million a week: The output cost of Brexit voteClever bit of work shows how just decision to leave has impacted on our economy in conventional growth termsNote also: incredible and destructive growth trajectory and massive impact of 2008 crisis 
Brexit talks begin: Morten Morland sums it up perfectly, as always, in his Sunday Times illustration  
Brendan O’Neill "Destroying the nation to preserve their powerNow we know: there’s nothing the EU class won’t do to kill Brexit."  
Absolutely. After the Brexit shambles, UK needs to shift away from 2 party politics (red/blue) and yo-yo governments. We need 4-6 credible parties to choose from. Get rid of FPTP and opt for PR. Coalition governments will keep up centred on policies not egos. 
Charles Moore has become detached from reality. None of the promises of the Leave campaign can be delivered, and the costs will be colossal.  Brexit is a failed policy, and Parliament has failed the electorate. #StopBrexit 
Never mind early morning Brexit flights to Brussels, here’s what the @scotgov looks like at 5am after #SleepinthePark - full marks @JohnSwinney @KevinStewartSNP & @AConstanceSNP @BenMacpherson 
Brexit:  Surely we all have the right to reparation?   Nothing in my lifetime, will diminish my human rights more than this excercise in futility.   #finalsay #stopbrexit #FBPE #Remain 
It’s reassuring that so many of those getting hysterical over #Trump and #Jerusalem are the same progressive bubble-dwellers who were wrong about him winning the presidency and wrong about #Brexit. The “Palestinian” Arabs have had... by #LiveEUDebate 
Two ex-London brokers are hedging against Brexit by selling Marmite in Luxembourg  
Brexit: MPs call for 'meaningful' Commons vote  
Perfect summary of #Brexit & UK's Foreign Policy by Sir Humphrey.   
He forced it confident he cld defeat it as he did w republic referendum. He fought for amendments til bitter end, determined to drag it out. Then abstained thus avoiding optics of being so demonstrably on wrong side of history while almost entire parliament sat on the other side 
Optimistic but I won't breathe easy until #Brexit is dead & buried with a stake through its dark heart!#StopBrexit #SaveOurRights & #Remain  
Harsh lessons for the next phase of Brexit  via @FT 
#Brexit In my short lifetime I have never seen my country exercise its sovereignty before. This week has been a defining moment in our countries short history. Our government has stood up to the bullies and has done what is right by our islands people. 
So their proposals are "meaningless"?Why should the EU trust anything the UK says anymore?Why should our NATO allies not suspect the UK will let them down too?Why should anyone trust them to sign a trade deal?Why should the people? Sack the Brexit liars! 
Quite right - the EU Referendum was not close - it was a 1.27 million marginOn a constituency basis, Leave won in 421 seats out of 650Remain won in 229 seats A landslide majority of 22950 more than Blair's 1997 landslide  
We would also pay £13bn a year to stay in the EU.Funny he never mentioned that. 
brilliant piece of writing on the grotesque #brexit panto  @BrexitBin @jphcoleman @Wok_Chi_Steve @prutske_uk @emmyzen @Bregretears @spaceangel1964 @ThinkAgainForEU 
LibDems cannot say Brexit voters have the right to change their mind but #indyref voters do not. Why the intellectual incoherence? 
Normally I would have described myself as a Unionist but reading the thinly veiled anti-Irish racism coming from GB over Brexit has me like  
‘There’s no gentle way of fighting back against Brexit’People have been sold a pack of lies on Brexit. Either we end up with a rotten deal - or we fight for the option to #ExitFromBrexit. Good interview with @nick_clegg. #FBPE.   
If a bunch of bigoted #Brexit bastards from Ulster automatically get EU citizenship I want it as well. North London was 80% Remain. #StopBrexit #FBPE #DUP #brexitshambles 
‘After May’s triumph (triumph?!) in Brussels, we’ve got EU over a barrel (WTF?!)’Is it any wonder we ended up with Brexit when the British public is spoon-fed diarrhoea like this?I hope these ‘journalists’ don’t have children; imagine having to explain what Mummy/Daddy does.  
Stopping Brexit isn't about my future, it's about my kids' future. It's about their ability to hold their heads up high, not being ashamed to say they are British. My kids deserve the right to move freely around Europe, my kids deserve a future. Stopping Brexit assures that. 
Nick Clegg: “There’s no gentle way of fighting back against Brexit.”  “We’ve been lied to. There are some very powerful vested interests in Britain…pumping out all this anti-European propaganda.  
Sick of this now.  @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer  what is the official @UKLabour position on Brexit? What is your policy? We have a right to know what the official "Opposition" would do. 
Pundit is oafish to Irish Minister (and gets shown up).Tries getting stroppy with those pointing out oafishness. Uses wrong flag.Attempts to call those pointing this out pedantic. Gets French wrong.It’s like a freewheeling Brexit parable.  
.I am NOT happy with ANY kind of Brexit..... #NoBrexit is the ONLY type of Brexit I accept. 
The @LibDems are unequivocally against #BrexitLabour have been taken over by the far left who hate the EU.Time for progressive people to coalesce around the @LibDems 
How's this going to work in a post-Brexit UK where chicken tikka masala is one of England's national dishes? Imagine being this spiteful about your food being so woefully bland. 
Have signed this cross party statement along with other MPs - if taking back control means anything it is a ‘meaningful’ not ‘meaningless’ vote on the terms of #Brexit  
100% agree.  When it comes to Republic of Ireland and Northern Ireland border in terms of #Brexit, above all peace in Northern Ireland has to come first. 
Good blog post on where regulatory decisions get made after Brexit.  
Post-Brexit the UK must not remain chained to the EU: Global Britain should aim to be like Mexico, whose big exporters simply make different batches of products to satisfy different regulatory regimes.Great piece by the @LegatumInst's @mollykiniry 
'as a dyed-in-the-wool democrat, @nick_clegg chose to come out fighting – and it will come as no surprise to those familiar with the passionate europhile that he has set his sights on Brexit.'  
1. Global powers 2 stop spec Brexit deal 4 UKOnce the UK's out of the SM & CU in Mar 2019...no replication of the terms of the current trading relationship or anything close to it & no spec treatmentTory & Labour #Brexit plans crash & burn  
At least, Dr Lynne, @billshortenmp has committed to a referendum on the republic in the next electoral term, if the ALP wins, and at @AusRepublic we live in hope that @TurnbullMalcolm might make the same commitment if LNP wins! 
“Let us stand up for the sovereignty of Parliament and the people we were sent here to represent” | statement by @eurelationsappg officers from across the @HouseofCommons in the Observer on the importance of a ‘meaningful vote’ on #Brexit in Parliament   
During the referendum did you challange the leave campaign about the potential EU exit bill? 
Global powers lobby to stop special Brexit deal for UK.Having our cake and eating it is pure Brexiter fantasy. Every day, we discover we are weaker outside the EU. The best option is to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Now the pain starts. Global powers lobby to stop special Brexit deal for UK  
Brexit:Returning Britain to the days of Babycham, Bernie Inns and Cracker Barrel cheese.Looking forward to the commercial when Farge drags on a Hamlet and Johnson and May star in a reprise of the Cointreau ads. Thems was the days. 
Cabinet Brexit truce threatens to unravel as Leavers 'told concession to EU meaningless' 
Some of the British media questioning Ireland’s stance on Brexit are about as subtle as a fart in mass. It’s clear that by attempting to make British public Angry with Irish, it will utterly distract them from their shambolic leadership and government 
Brexit: there is no regulatory sovereignty 
Tories deliberately keeping Brexit on the table until the next election so they can pull the "if you want Brexit you gotta vote Tory" stunt for the third election running.I am bloody sick of these games which only go to destablise our country for the Tories benefit.#VoteUKIP 
A must watch video by Mark, who lifts the veil of secrecy off the so called Brexit victory, and lays bare the right wing media spin! Added weight by tonight;s revelations that Theresa May had to separate two of her Ministers!  
Surely the Japanese will  come to their senses and ditch this deal in favour of an exclusive deal with buccaneering Britain after Brexit?  
This is why Brexit is so singularly unimportant to the EU but an absolute disaster for us.   
Gave my 82 year old mum a copy of @InLimboBrexit to read today.20 minutes in, she looked up & said 'Every single MP should be made to read this. And then be made to stop brexit.'*My mum should probably run the country  
The way May and her cabal simply cancelled #Brexit is amazing. And the way mainstream media colluded to present this betrayal as some 'triumph' is absolutely remarkable. Not one hack had the decency to point out that the result of the EU referendum has been reversed. 
In tomorrow's Observer, cross-party MPs @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry @joswinson @CarolineLucas @StephenGethins & @JonathanPlaid call on Parliament to back Amendment 7 to the EU Withdrawal Bill and give MPs a meaningful vote on #Brexit  
As much as #Conservatives & #Labour don't want you to know, Britain does have a credible alternative, anti-establishment, third party leader.@_HenryBolton has a history in the British army & police force.Support your troops? Then support our leader!#Brexit #BrexitDeal #UKIP 
Breakthrough deal? It feels more like an EU sell-out is in the offing  #Brexit 
If people on eggheads are so clever why aren’t they sorting out brexit Frauds 
The Brexit Club: @iainmacwhirter's brilliant analysis of a tumultuous week in Westminster 
So much misinformation around about the joint #Brexit statement. It does NOT guarantee full citizens' rights. It is NOT binding. It's NOT a Brexit "deal". Read it yourself here, and then continue the fight for #CitizensRights and to #StopBrexit: . Retweet! 
This week's @newsundayherald: Warnings as May's Brexit deal begins to unravel @suttonnick @MsHelicat #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Gloating EU politician HAILS Brexit deal success for Brussels after last-minute agreement. May won nothing, she is an absolute disaster Remoaner!  
How many will die on our streets tomorrow as our politicians in centrally heated rooms keep fretting about Brexit until the early hours?  
"But we didn't vote for a 'very, very soft brexit'. We voted for the full Brexit the government told us it would be in the referendum booklet they sent to every household in the country" — @@ Rebel  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Wonder if Britain's Brexit press will report this - it's how the rest of the world sees Brexit - Global powers lobby to stop special Brexit deal for UK  
Who's @Jeremy_Hunt trying to kid? - in recent days he pretends that EU staff aren't leaving NHS, that Brexit deal is brilliant and that he's a patient safety champion - comedy gold 
It’s ironic that the press bill Brexit as U.K. vs EU, but actually it’s a Tory Civil War with the EU trying to avoid collateral damage. 
A day after the Phase1 deal is done the anti-Brexit lobby's Phase2 propaganda begins  
Brexit: The gift that keeps on giving  Global powers lobby to stop special Brexit deal for UK  
SUNDAY TELEGRAPH FRONT PAGE: 'Cabinet Brexit deal threatens to unravel' #SkyPapers 
Things the UK has done wrong:-Brexit-Theresa May becoming prime minister- losing Stanley -making Jamie get into the final #imaceleb #imacelebrity 
The Brexit breakthrough risks leaving 1.5 million British people "landlocked" in the EU  
I’ve made this clear repeatedly over the past days, but to repeat: 2001 law was intended to apply to NGOs influencing referenda and elections outcomes, but not when simply calling for a referendum. We are happy to comply with that, and have done. #BraveIreland 
Nothing more than a dead woman walking and leading a zombie government off of the Brexit cliff and taking the rest of the country with it. The Brexit fanatics are ready destroy her premiership and take a jump into the unknown. It is time to turn this country round and #StopBrexit 
Read how a #DUP attempt to play an 'orange card' veto in EU #Brexit negotiations backfired on them & the Tory Gov't. 
Can I just say that, for all of the dreadfulness of Brexit, being retweeted by all-time great guitarist @Bernie_Torme makes me feel extremely, extremely chuffed. Not fit to change his strings and balance his much abused trem! 
As Balkan influence spreads, the U.K. is following Bosnia. With Brexit citizens in Northern Ireland will be like Bosnian Croats who have Croatian/EU passports. In NI everyone has access to Irish/EU passports. So, after Brexit, like Bosnia, we will have 1st and 2nd class citizens. 
The prospect of a government in Ireland—a long-time British colony—stymying Brexit has inflamed sections of U.K. politics and media.  
All those countries we are going to get super trade deals with are currently complaining to the EU that we must not get special terms in our trade deal.Brexit..piece of cake  
Michael Gove thinks the Brexit deal can be changed by a future vote. So why does everyone say the referendum was binding? By definition democracy is reversible 
If we had a referendum in 1975 to have a single market with the US, then signed a series of treaties allowing US citizens to move here in good faith, with reciprocal rights, then 42 years later suddenly decided to remove those rights but retain other benefits, then yes.  
Fintan O’Toole: Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard Brexit  
INDEPENDENT ON SUNDAY: Vital issues neglected due to Brexit, public say #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Reminder that People Before Profit campaigned for #Brexit in Northern Ireland  
"When Brussels decided stop tax avoiding practices within its member states, Britain decided to leave the EU"Brexit is bugger all to do with immigrants, sovereignty or any other BSIts a tax dodge pure and simple!#FBPE #StopBrexit #ExitBrexit #Remain 
Walked into M&S in Crow Rd.. and the newspaperstand had EXPRESS MAIL TELEGRAPH SUN all at eyelevel... all shouting "BREXIT DEAL IS DONE AND ALL IS GOOD" or words to that effect. U.K.--Propaganda-- is -- real 
Only One Side Compromised for This Brexit Breakthrough.  And Dublin called the shots.  
Brexit News was willing to give May & the Tory Party the benefit of the doubt. We trusted the Tories and their leader to deliver Brexit as voted for by the British people. Brexit News has now withdrawn it's support for Theresa May & we will no longer hesitate to expose her  
I very much appreciate @PeterKGeoghegan's Brexit/Irish commentary. Before the Shereen show today, the general consensus was: thank fuck for Peter Geoghegan. 
Flight spent sitting next to a really amiable English man. Very briefly conversation turned to Brexit. ‘I don’t underrated this Ireland thing. Seems any fucker could just go there and get into Britain’. Cue awkward silence 
A Democrat winning in Alabama would be a big victory. The state is largely Republican. So, I would never be discouraged because even the fact that the polls are so close is incredible! Not a referendum on the future of the Blue Wav coming next fall. We will #RememberInNovember 
If you get a chance watch BBC #DatelineLondon, foreign correspondents taking apart #Brexit and the Brexiteers. Encapsulates how the world sees us, warning, it’s not pretty! 
Brexit has damaged the fabric of Britain and created a wound that will fester and never heal while the Brexit fanatics continue to run the show. It is time to get rid of the Brexit Tories. With people changing their minds on Brexit their time has come and gone. #StopBrexit 
My Twitter feed is basically a mixture of how shit Brexit is and pantomimes. 
As the saying goes, if you think education is expensive, count the cost of ignorance. If you think EU membership is expensive, count the cost of Brexit. 
“Sceptical MPs – frightened of seeming disloyal – are pretending to be happy. I know they are not – and the same applies to millions of people across the country.”Not good enough! Brexit MPs must put country before party for once and call on May to go! 
The reality is that May will not bow out until the ink is dry on the final Brexit deal. People must be realistic. It's what happens thereafter that's important. 
Britain before the EU Referendum now seems like another country. We did things differently there. And we were a lot kinder. 
The main benefit of Brexit is liberation from EU red tape and bureaucracy - and that would be undermined by 'regulatory alignment'  
Sadiq Khan to commission his OWN papers to study impact of Brexit  
“Theresa May's Historic Brexit Deal Should Be Welcomed Whether You Back Leave Or Remain”“Despite Labour claiming at every opportunity a deal couldn’t be done, our Prime Minister has delivered on her promises.”#BecauseOfTories #Brexit 
Brilliant thread. Undermines all the Brexit “will of the people” bullshit from Corbyn supporters.  
A Romanian caller tells @mattfrei that this Brexit deal is unfair on the British  
Wouldn’t it be better if Labour just rejected Brexit, full stop? Save billions for NHS, secure 1,000’s jobs, and so doing make the country better for the many, not the few? 
Labour Mayor Sadiq Khan to use London residents’ Council Tax to commission his own experts to study impact of Brexit and produce an “independent report”  
Finally, it is becoming clear why the self-labelled Brexiteers are all so bloody angry: they've lost. Brilliant piece by @fleetstreetfox on how Brexit is collapsing under the weight of its own contradictions.   
'Theresa May should try a new approach to Brexit - be honest about it' 
From the voters who brought you Brexit...  
Opinion: If the Tories want to avoid electoral annihilation they should try for the best possible Brexit deal, then put it to a vote.  
Eastern Europe's corporate elite is suddenly pushing hard for euro membership  
Our leader @_Nikkyo and @Niniola_Scott sat with @EmilyThornberry to discuss how Elite can support the borough of Islington by tackling three crucial issues! The meeting ended with #brexit talks, a laugh and a follow up meeting!Thank you, we look forward to working with the team  
A summary of #Brexit impact assessments undertaken by the Government.  
Brexit might happen; but after yesterday's agreement, the trade deals won't. My piece for @prospect_uk:  
Labour support for a Referendum on the withdrawal deal - on grounds that the facts have changed as @ChukaUmunna says - would be even better 
When you can't tell the difference between a star & a shoe but you are being trusted with the Brexit negotiations...  
On board with this unfashionable push for moderation in Brexit analysis, You don't need to think  it's all going brilliantly to conclude that not everything is the worst of all possible worlds.  
"There’s no gentle way of fighting back against Brexit" - Nick Clegg  
Thank you! #IRELAND you have hopefully saved my country from the lunacy of a hard #brexit 
Exactly the same in this household. We're voting for a #StopBrexit party or at least a party that supports a #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
I voted Labour last time. Next time, I’m only voting for it if it’s unequivocally against Brexit. What we are becoming now is repulsive. 
It is not too late. We can stop Brexit.  
Brexit is absolutely pointless. There are no benefits. It will permanently damage and isolate Britain. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Ex-Labour MP and hardline Brexiter @GiselaStuart now writing for the Conservative Home, not happy with ‘Regulatory Alignment’ and wants hard Brexit. Makes no mention of Ireland though. Not once. Typical  
Brexit bill is a lot of money to pay for higher inflation, higher debt, less influence and less investment. 
Yep, It was never about making life better, safer or more prosperous for ordinary people. Brexit was always a scam... & if the downward slide into squalor is slow enough there might not even be a reaction.  
Strange how the Brexiteers are gloating on May's agreement with the EU as a success. It is the final nail in the coffin of their hard Brexit and the notion of taking back control. We will be subservient to the EU and their regulations and we won't even have a say. #StopBrexit 
I’ve a confession to make. Post-referendum I didn’t care that much if we left the EU - it’s nowhere near perfect. Now I realise the damage it will cause. Some will be short-term, hitting the poorest hardest, some, in terms of global status, we will never completely recover from. 
Britain has nothing to fear from the EU.We get huge benefits for less than one hundredth of the money Parliament has to spend.#brexit is to distract you from Tory incompetence and greed.#stopbrexit 
“So that’s it Molly it’s over Brexit is happening the Tories have won”“Well I don’t see it like that Theresa May is really weak and the Europeans are just trying to keep her in place” chatting with @MollyMEP on her way to Brussels 
Well, that's politics. Everyone agrees that topic has been discussed for long enough, let's just sell a half baked agreement as success. The punters won't know any better.Or as @BorisJohnson said in Oct:"it's time to begin the serious Brexit talks"We feel sold down the river  
."Brexit is looking more & more like a poker game in which one side holds most of the cards, and the other has given up bluffing.". via @FT 
Farage moaning about brexit is like the devil moaning about people’s bad behaviour He is going on about something he wanted but only as long as he kept his nice fat EU pension Arse 
A second referendum is in the Tory party’s interests  
Brexit Music (for a film) 
If we allow the Brexiters to rob us of the Right to Freedom of Movement, we will have set the precedent that Britons can be robbed of their rights with impunity.Is that the message we want to send!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Scotland's excellent exports are growing faster than the UK's. The last thing we need is to lose or damage our access to vital European markets on which so many jobs depend. #Brexit  
Brexiters tend to look down on Eastern Europeans as migratory hordes, but if #Brexit goes through, they will have the right to live & work in 31 countries, a right we will have lost. The Eastern Europeans will be laughing at the Brits with their 2nd class passports.#StopBrexit 
So we’re debating Brexit & the difficult issues with the Irish border and instead I get racism (about Africans not being able to swim), disgusting homophobia & accused of being stupid, with no argument or explanation. What sort of country are we living in? 
David Davis Oct 2017. - "We are conducting a broad range of analysis at the macroeconomic and sectoral level to understand the impact of leaving the EU on all aspects of the UK, including the agriculture sector." David Davis Dec 2017 - I have nothing, zilch nada! 
The EU and Japan deal covers 60% of world GDP and 600m people. This should be a huge deal for the UK. But we can't celebrate it, nor highlight the benefits to UK consumers, because we are losing it as part of f*cking @Conservatives plans to tear us out of the SM/CU. #Brexit 
Along the border between Ireland and Northern Ireland, lives and livelihoods hinge on how Brexit plays out. READ MORE:  
Matt on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Tory one nation politics died on 8th December 2017. Time to demand that the people of mainland Britain have the same rights as the People of Northern Ireland. Why should Brexit make the Mainlanders second class citizens  #StopBrexit 
Don't waste time arguing with unionists on twitter. It'll wear you down. Keep it positive. Concentrate on the benefits of independence. Spread the word. Get out there! Be happy! #indyref2 #ScotRef #brexit 
'The mayor of DENIAL' @SadiqKhan spends £42k on Brexit impact report by REMAINER-led group  
This as well as missing out on £3B in DUP deal consequentials plus upwards of £4B share of EU exit bill - Tory Brexit is costing Scotland a fortune  
Good to see the Telegraph has learned so much about the boundaries of Ireland during the recent Brexit chaos.  
Brexit bill could rise beyond estimate of €40bn-€45bn as Guarantees included in EU deal could ramp up total in decades to come to €100bn. Thats over 100 new state of the art NHS hospitals + thousands of new doctors + nurses to work in them, it's definitely no small sum  
Nigel Farage is nobodies fool, if he with 23 years as an MEP was given the option, but no the Vicars   Daughter thinks she can do it alone? Farage & Jacob Rees-Mogg would make a formidable Brexit team!  
Both @Arron_banks (Patriotic Alliance - defunct) and @Hugodixon (Moonbat Stop Brexit popular front) are furious about the brexit phase one deal. This is good, and v funny to watch. 
Low skills, low pay: that’s really why Brexit campaigners want to be out  
Unlike the #EU who are self-elected neo-communists creating federal control throughout #Europe It's time Europeans woke up to what is really going on and follow the #UK #Brexit to ensure their freedom liberty and laws are sovereign for their nation where taxes are proportionate. 
Theresa May has done an incredible job.Incredibly she’s managed to piss of Brexiters and Remainers at the same time.Brexit is a shambles, it can never lead to any benefits except to a few tax dodgers hiding their money away. Stop it before the damage is irreparable. 
I feel a court case coming @NicolaSturgeon Northern Irish will be able to remain EU citizens under Brexit deal but Scots will not.  
Except remainers don't need to win anyone over. Leavers won the referendum and now need to demonstrate how leaving will bring economic and social benefits to the UK. Can't keep blaming remainers, you own the result so take responsibility  
And we wonder why Brussels seems so decidedly unbothered about Brexit.                   EU and Japan finalise world’s largest free trade deal  
So, Labour’s borrowing would cost £230,000,000,000 where as the Brexit divorce bill is £35B. Nothing compares to Corbyn’s disastrous plans!  #CorbynCon | #FitForTheFuture  | #TeamTory  
Never forget that Britain tried to placate "economically anxious" racists by giving ear to them, and ended up with Brexit which threatens that nation's economic future  
#Brexit: What still needs to be worked out?  
.@Patrick4Dales: Theresa May’s historic Brexit deal should be welcomed whether you voted Leave or Remain  
It's official on our Saturday front page ... the Unionist border scare story is no more. After the Brexit divorce deal, never again can the UK say Scottish independence = hard border. Let's get this shared everyone #Referendum2018 
There is absolutely no intellectual rationale for Brexit. It is a lunacy dreamt up by lunatics. The world is incredulous at our blind stupidity. I fear we may have to turn up the anger in January ...after the hugely expensive Xmas courtesy of Brexit morons. 
Freezing cold in #Stratford today but lots of warm conversations & signatures for our petition asking MPs to back Amendment 7 (meaningful vote on terms of Brexit in Parliament) @FRANCE24 even came along to film our campaign We can still #StopBrexit 
this is fucking horrendous. donald trump, brexit, n aw the xenophobic bigots wae massive platforms normalise n fuel this sorta insane behaviour. cunts actual wonder why folk condemn n oppose hate speech when it leads tae attacks like this  
Theresa May please ensure you look out for the good people of N. Ireland during #Brexit talks.Their loyalty towards the UK  has never wavered!      Time to repay that loyalty  
Michael Gove has waved the white flag, defeated by the reality of Brexit: my comment for @IndyVoices 
Brexit seems largely dead now as the Brexiteers become mugged by reality right?  
Yes. The voters can stop it altogether. (Not what Gove means though: he means that they can give him the Hard Brexit he and his chums want.) BBC News - Brexit: Michael Gove says UK voters can change final deal  
We’ve been out across Sussex today calling for a #FinalSay on any Brexit deal. In Brussels the can just got kicked down the road - still so many issues, the economy’s taking a hit @euromove #ProEuropeansTogether 
Michael Gove is trying to make fools of the British people when he says we can change the final deal - after it's been made. Tory Brexiters claim that #Brexit is democratic, but they are mocking democracy at every turn. Fight for democracy! #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Britons can change terms of Brexit to diverge from EU: pro-Brexit mini  
BREAKINGNEWS; SF are calling off all their white line protests reference No Border & Remaining in EU for NI , they are now moving them to Catalonia & will be protesting for a Border & Leaving the EU #brexit 
Is this a metaphor for Brexit?  
Great afternoon campaigning in Market Square, lots of cards heading to our local MPs - All we want for Christmas is a #FinalSay on #Brexit! #proeuropeanstogether 
Sneak peak at UK future:- Brexit happens (worst averted: damaging but not catastrophic)- economy pootles along, everything a bit shit- Remainers blame those who let it happen- many Brexiters cling to belief it would have been fab if done properly - everybody blames Tories// 
This is one of the strangest impacts of Brexit... by dropping Free Movement, we’re limiting our own citizens more than anyone else in the world.  
Unlike the rather sad #CBI, the more professional and dynamic  Bundesverband der Deutschen Industrie in Germany is calling on Merkel to speed up a Free Trade Agreement between the #EU and the #UK following #Brexit 
Looks like we are getting out just in time!  #Brexit #UnitedStatesofEurope 
The President of the CBI says Brexit is the “most serious issue any country in the world has ever had to face”.What a fool!Bigger than the Evacuation of Dunkirk, Hitler elected to power in Germany, or the Japanese invasion of China?The man's an #Idiot! 
As ‘Brexit Boom’ Continues, Leavers Want to Know Why Appeaser Theresa Is Surrendering Across the Board!  What’s with HER?      #fo2eu 
Opinion: More and more Brits expect Brexit to hurt the economy, says @josephsternberg 
If (and when) we get a 2nd referendum, the pro-EU campaign slogan should definitely be "Take Back Control".  
"Brexit, in the terms that you bought it, is not achievable at the moment." That's what Labour MP Chuka Ummuna said just hours after the government announced that it had reached a deal with the EU on the Irish border, citizens' rights and the divorce bill.  
Many leavers seem to find it incomprehensible & utterly infuriating that we Remainers won't just lie down and let ourselves be walked over. They will learn painfully that we will fight fiercely for the liberal, tolerant and open-spirited Britain we love.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
pleasing to see so many #leave voters putting the pro-Europe tag on their tweets; nice to see they want to hear the voice of the #remain camp & also are fighting for a democratically conducted referendum. A #finalsay with no foreign money will give us that. #FBPE #Stopbrexit 
Britain will be paying nearly £40bn to make the country worse off by leaving the EU. It's all an expensive waste of time that is damaging the economy and our place in the world for nothing at all. We are all going to be worse off because of Brexit. Time to #StopBrexit 
"it is clear it [citizens' rights agreement] needs to go a long way to make up for the damage caused in the first year after the referendum" says @theRCN spokesperson 
Straight in at #1 in the best of vacuous Brexit jinglez!:1. Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed 2. For the many, not the few 3. Deep and special relationship 4. I never said there were  
Jean-Claude Juncker started demanding a £50 billion Brexit settlement 'only after lunching with the Financial Times'   
End of hard Brexit? Theresa May orders Cabinet to come up with plan – and 15 Traitors voted Remain  
A good Brexit deal for the UK. Now for the trade deal! Barnier must remember that nothing’s agreed til everything’s agreed. Can we please have some balanced reporting & comment from the BBC & the FT? 
In case anyone was wondering how long Cabinet unity on #Brexit would last... Precisely 24 hours until Michael, 'I don't believe in experts', Gove claimed that if #Brexit isn't hard enough, people can vote for a catastrophic No Deal in the next General Election. #FBPE 
REVEALED: The two Brexit deal 'bear traps' which could see UK tied to EU FOREVER  
Gove admits voters can change their mind on Brexit.And the Remain movement keeps getting stronger. So keep making the case to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Confused about Brexit? Follow  for UK Government news on Brexit negotiations.  
No matter how #Brexit turns out, the #EU ; or anything else: #Germany will win. Because they're not going backwards.And.. the UK has left the field.#EuropeMy piece in @TheNewEuropean. 
So @Jacob_Rees_Mogg is another paper tiger. This entire Conservative party at Westminster is intent to make #Brexit worthless.  
Delighted to be with the wonderful people of @InLimboBrexit in Cardiff about the impact of Brexit on EU citizens in their daily lives   
46% of Britons now believe the UK economically will be better off post-Brexit, up 9pts on November. via @ORB_Int,  01 - 03 Dec 
Great irony here: “The problem that the Brexiteers most relentlessly ignored has come to determine the entire shape of their project. By standing firm against their attempts to bully, cajole and blame it, Ireland has shifted Brexit towards a soft outcome”  
.Indeed."Brexit is not a negotiation, but a slow march towards British acceptance of the weakness of its OWN negotiating position.". 
Lot of Labour supporters not getting this thread.I fully understand that the Corbyn #Brexit strategy was quietly support & stand on sidelines, to hold onto Leave votesBut I'm saying the net result is he may as well have not been here - zero impact 
Spot the odd one out... millions spent on Westminster refurb..millions spent on Buckingham Palace refurb...millions spent on HS2... millions spent on Brexit negotiations...millions of children living in poverty 
So Remainers' focus has to be on the message that a soft (or hard CETA) Brexit is still damaging, and that attempting to build a poor version of membership is simply silly when compared to Remaining. 11/ 
While we agree EEA/CU is the least harmful version of Brexit, it is still harmful 8/ 
So Remainers now need to haul the window back to the point where the choice is between soft Brexit and no Brexit 6/ 
Nationality rights don't just cover how you're treated by your own country. They cover how you're treated abroad.Post-Brexit, Northern Irish people will have a fundamentally different nationality to the rest of the UK. 
Before we all get carried away with Leo's 'bullet proof' Brexit deal let's remember that the devil is in the phase 2 detail.  
Interesting that the people who use the phrase 'will of the people' to describe Brexit in NI are the same ones who would like to tear up the GFA ! 
Many thanks to Bill Grant MP for meeting with fishermen at Troon. Glad to have had an insightful chat that things need to change with Brexit to realise success on Fishing asap. 
Can pro-EU fanatics not see that every time they argue Brexit is impossible because our laws, economy, political structures etc are too deeply entwined with the EU, they are validating the concerns about EU interference/hegemony which led so many to vote Leave in the first place? 
Don’t worry about BBCNews or Sky get your spot on Brexit analysis your Paper Review here  
"To railroad the PESCO vote through in two hours in the Dáil when everybody was distracted by Brexit was a disgrace" - @LNBDublin on @SaturdayRTE 
Idea for a film: A Very Brexit Christmas.A town votes to take back control and get rid of the foreigner who comes each Christmas Eve to make a net contribution to their possessions. They strike a deal to get gifts they can't choose and pay extra for the privilege. 
AfD: ‘Brexit could open the door for other countries to leave the EU’  
BloggedCitizens' rights and the Brexit talksThe end of the beginning?My detailed analysis:  
The Telegraph story and now the Daily Mail follow-up are utter nonsense.Juncker brought up the 60bn cost of the Brexit divorce bill - not me. We’ve asked for a correction. The FT is happy to publish a transcript of the conversation to prove the point.  
'Brexit inspires staggering displays of ignorance about Ireland from our MPs'  
One day, I'll write about it.  A phone call at 3am, a two-hour drive in a blizzard and an interview with a party leader who'd been negotiating with the PM... in her slippers. #Brexit  
Diane Abbott cannot say one thing to constituents in Hackney, claiming to support a second referendum, and do another in Westminster, supporting the govt’s hard-Brexit. Which is it? 
Brighty on moving to phase 2:  “It's beginning to look a bit like Brexit...” political cartoon gallery in Putney  
BREXIT: "There’s no gentle way of fighting back against Brexit" - Nick Clegg / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
It's not unfair for Northern Irish people to get 'special rights' in the Brexit deal, merely a reflexion of what we've been through- My column for @prospect_uk 
More people voted for Brexit then have ever voted for anything in Britain, and STILL neither of the two main parties will back it. Our political class is the enemy. 
If the people can force changes on the final deal then they can also #StopBrexit. The fight isn't over yet to stop this Brexit madness that will see us paying the EU to be worse off. #StopBrexit 
Read the latest opinion piece from @moneillsf on yesterday's Brexit agreement in @An_Phoblacht 
You say Brexit and I say Wrecks-it!You say Leaver and I say Loser!Brexit, Wrecks-it, Leaver, Loser!Let's call the whole thing off!You like WTO and I love Free Movement!You like the Empire and I love the EU!WTO, Freedom, Empire, EU!Let's call the whole thing off!  
Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard BrexitBy @fotoole 
The agreement on the Brexit divorce kills stone dead the Unionist argument that Scottish independence would mean a hard border between Scotland and England.  
Republicans protesting against Brexit and for special status at the Derry Donegal border this morning  
This sums up what has always been our relationship with the #EU We give, they take and that will continue after #Brexit  
Mystery to many here in UK too!Theory is Tories - who stand for the rich - wanted out before EU tightens up on tax avoidance. Explains the timing of the referendum and  the rush to invoke Article 50.  Madness. 
So, no; not every Brexit voter or Trump voter was a thick racist. But every Brexit voter or Trump voter *put up* with thick racists to get their side over the line. And that, in my opinion, is a factually accurate, starkly notable and entirely valid complaint they should address. 
Well Soft Brexit is not a @LibDems 'preference' of any kind, simply a 'least worst'. The reason there are few pro-SM Brexiteers is because they realise it makes absolutely no sense to accept rules with no say 
One in three voters believed Brexit would mean £350m extra per week for the NHS. It was an awful lie, HM Treasury say the public finances will be £711m per week worse off.  We're in London on Monday campaigning for a 'final deal' vote based on truth and fact. Join us:  
Charles Moore: This #Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation  
Read @moneillsf's views on the Brexit agreement reached yesterday - The Devil's in the Detail  
Still a mystery to me why the U.K. Government went for #Brexit after a non binding referendum with the slightest possible majority. Crazy!! 
We should start a campaign  to get the Royal Mail to issue commemorative stamps to celebrate #Brexit on 29/3/19.@ForBritainParty#ForBritain@AMDWaters 
If I were a Brextremist, & I stopped to think about the anger & bitterness that’ll come my way in the future, I’d ask for a 2nd referendum. 
From the moment Cameron stood down and May was anointed, the great #Brexit betrayal was underway. This was NEVER a 'negotiation" - it was just a ruse to give us the pretence they want to Leave when the real game is to make us Remain. 
I'm a bit surprised the Brexiteers haven't sussed yet that they really should campaign for Irish reunification (and possibly Scottish independence, too) if they ever want to achieve a hard Brexit. 
Remember when they called us #BREXITEERS "conspiracy #theorists" for daring to  suggest that the #EU was a plot to impose a #globalist federal #superstate....?? #BBC #SKY @BBC #UK #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @ConHome @CCHQPress @UKLabour #Labour #UKIP #BREXIT #Libdems 
Great turnout this morning in Bridgend for a protest about no borders or brexit in Ireland , Respect the Remain vote! No Borders in Ireland! Protect people’s rights! #remain @sinnfeinireland @DerrySinnFein @M_AndersonSF @mattcarthy @JohnODowdSF @conorhdfm 
The Government’s mantra is ‘who cares about people when we have this thing called Brexit to obsess about 24/7?’  
For all my friends from the #UK, #Christmas is coming soon! #brexit cc: @jonworth 
This might be the only way to Guarantee Brexit  
Just a recap of yesterday's 'deal' put in to context...May has committed one of the greatest act's of treason against her country! #BrexitDeal #Brexit #EU #UKIP #Labour #Conservatives #Swindon #EU #BBC #MayMustGo #MBGA @Nigel_Farage @UKIP @realDonaldTrump 
."Before long the Conservative govt will have to decide which of the lies told during the Brexit campaign it will abandon first." By @CliffTaylorIT 
Every day this Pathetic #PM @theresa_may remains in office brings us closer to a @jeremycorbyn government & a betrayal of #Brexit. For the sake of the country, the #Tories must ditch #TheresaMay – before it's too late' #MayMustGo!   #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #TORY 
Yesterday outside the Brexit for Business meeting in High Wycombe. Different groups in attendence incl from #EUflagmafia - many worried remain and leaver business people there. Nice to meet #JohnBurcow + his team there who were chuffed to see so many EU flags. #FBPE 
Pleased to join @leweast4europe @martin_mckee in Catford for @Open_Britain campaigning on Brexit & the NHS  
We oppose the lies that brought us here & the liars who continue to deceive. Like the vast majority of Labour people, we oppose the austerity & division Brexit creates. For the good of the country Jeremy, and for Labour people, we ask you to oppose  
Now Gove concedes voters can change mind on #Brexit - if so - public should be able to change minds *before* any deal finalised @Open_Britain 
The best Brexit journalism I've seen: @fotoole and @tconnellyRTE 
Gavels aren't used in British courts you dimwits. They are used in auction houses however - when you're selling off your family silver to the highest bidder #ToryFail #Brexit  
Now is the time to organise and campaign for a clean Brexit#Brexit #EU@The_Bat_Gotham @brexit4life @montie @CalgacusEd @oflynnmep @afneil @AndrewRosindell @darshnasoni @johnredwood @GerardBattenMEP @DVATW @BelTel 
BBC News - Brexit: Michael Gove says UK voters can change final deal  UK unable to commit to anything long term. This is not a good starting point for trade negotiations 
Hey @MichelBarnier! Here’s our little gift to you to celebrate Sufficient Progress Day in the #Brexit talks  
BMG poll for @LeftFootFwd finds 54% wanting new Brexit referendum if  TMay doesn't secure a post-Brexit deal,  46% said they didn't want one 
Some very senior Lib Dems tell me they are already getting frustrated with the party’s quietude under Vince. Brexit and Corbynism offer their biggest political opening since the Iraq War. Yet little sign of breakthrough  
Sufficient progress has been made on #Article50 negotiations with the #UK. Legal certainty has now been provided to the #science community on #h2020. #Brexit.  
Government should not get carried away with hype and spin in Brexit talks - David Cullinane TD  #Brexit @davidcullinane 
Remember: Brexit is now, always was, and always will be all about this hateful man and his hateful wife trying to manoeuvre themselves into Number 10.  
So now Brexit is responsible for women being domestically abused. *sighs*  
So @AmnestyIreland want u 2 believe they are 'brave' for pocketing huge funds from a US billionaire to buy the referendum. Get off the stage. Women who love their babies are brave, giving every person a chance at life is brave, paying your CEO 100K to push abortion is not brave.  
All Uk papers May needs on side (Mail, Sun, Express) are all fully behind #brexit deal today. None seem to have fully realised how much it curtails UK post Brexit but such positive media will l make it much harder for Brexiters to rebel’s 
Not a petty conflict. Just having fun with headlines that proved to less than prescient. But you’re right re divorce bill. I don’t remember Leavers or Remainers raising it during referendum.  
.@ChukaUmunna: “Brexit is not inevitable and Article 50 is revocable, so this poll is significant. Brexit, in the terms it was sold to the British people, is proving undeliverable"  
There are so many military fitness groups in London parks - reckon we have enough troops to take down Brexit, lads 
This is the Hard Brexit weather we voted for when we voted Leave, sorts the men from the nancyboys. Any player who wears gloves today should be walloped by their manager. Cold doesn't compare to serving in the forces though, only toughest men survive. God Save The Queen! 
Large crowd at Brexit protest on the Derry/Donegal border  
#saturdaymood We are ALLin the gutter But SOME OF USare looking UP,at the STARS God bless you all #Jerusalem #Brexit #Bitcoin 
There was a Brexit deal. Now what? Here's what you need to know:  
Apparently these clueless, chaotic Brexit crusaders are master negotiators now..... 
Worth understanding that this deal took four years to conclude - which gives weight to the principle, those that can, do; those that can't, become lunatic fringe Brexiteer tv pundits claiming everything is easy. 
What is Michael Gove on about?Says voters can change the EU deal if they don’t like it… at a 2021 general election. When it’s too late.If he’s OK with the principle of the voters expressing their view on #Brexit, why not a second referendum in 2019? 
The House of Lords have handed in their homework on the impact of a No Deal / hard Brexit:Ruinous to the economy; hazardous to our security.Any politician who tries to sell this as an option does not have your interests at heart.Best option remains: #StopBrexit. 
For months Michael Gove has pillioried anyone questioning the 'will of the people'.  Now he is seemingly coming out in favour of a second referendum. Bring it on. Can we have it in the Spring? before it is too late... #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Don't let #Brexit make it worse. Some women's services get 40% of their income from EU funding- and they face losing it. Gvmt must pledge to support refuges, not shut them. Tweet your MP to ask if they'll support #EUWithdrawalBill amends 385 & NC77 if you agree! #FaceHerFuture 
Despite the clusterfuck of Brexit it still has the capacity to shock me. For all their talk about how powerful we would be out of the EU, they have given away an obscene amount of British power and for what? Fish? Blue passports? Pure, distilled hate? 
When the history books are written, people will see that Brexit stage 1 was the hard part, but once that political and psychological hurdle had been jumped, stage 2 was relatively straightforward. 
A week is a long time in politics. As is a day. So much phoney jubilation & false praise for @theresa_may. She better enjoy it while it lasts because things are going to get a whole lot harder for her. The best option, still, is to stop #Brexit. #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles 
There is a reason why there are ‘border counties’ on the island of Ireland. A refusal to accept the reality of a border is a refusal to deal with the consequences of it. #brexit 
Cannot be said better. After the Brexit referendum, what was signed yesterday feels like Bre-entry. The UK is back in the EU - except now they have no say.  
Fintan O’Toole: Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard Brexit  
.@Patrick4Dales for @HuffPostUK "Theresa May's historic Brexit deal should be welcomed whether you backed Leave or Remain...our Prime Minister has delivered on her promises"  
BREXIT: Mail readers are *really* ramping up the traitor / treachery / betrayal / commie / anti-democracy / evil EU / criminal behaviour rhetoric following news of Theresa May’s deal…  
It's people with views similar to this that's forcing #Scotland into a future it keeps voting against. It really is time to go & leave them to eat their #Brexit in peace. #Referendum2018 #ScotRef 
As you can have either a Hard Brexit or the Good Friday Agreement but not both, and as a Soft Brexit is more trouble and money than it is worth, and as regulatory alignment and the transition period is Brexit in name only......there's not a lot of point in any of this, really. 
Oh MY FUCKING GOD!!... LISTEN to this ECCONOMIST ex BankofEngland Describe to an American conference BREXIT and it's economic reality... I dare ANYONE to watch and not be utterly terrified and utterly CERTAIN that #Brexit is  #SUICIDalMadness 
You got what you wanted Brexit bunnies. You took back control by giving Brussels total control with no say at all from the mighty UK. Nice one. Now try stamping on your own bollocks.  
The referendum was advisory, the Minister for Europe David Lidington used its advisory status as a reason to reject an SNP amendment to the referendum bill (2nd graphic). MPs knew this, but they and the government have pretended otherwise.#StopBrexit #Brexit #LeaveLies #FBPE 
But also as I heard yesterday £40Bn Brexit bill is far higher. This is just the money we pay direct. The loss of investment, trade and damage to key economic sectors etc etc means a bill running into the hundreds of billions..wow!!! 
Without a hard border between Northern Ireland and the Irish Republic what is to stop a massive flow of those with EU passports flooding into the U.K. post Brexit? 
Wow the real Brexit bill could be £100bn no one knows there is no limit  
Only one side compromised for the Brexit breakthrough  
In pursuance of a worthless Brexit the only thing that @theresa_may will provide as her legacy is a Labour Government. You don’t alienate 17.4m voters without consequences. 
Today is our national action day with over 50 local groups across the UK, pressing for a proper vote on the final Brexit deal, which leaves open the option to remain in the EU. This is why we support Amendment 7 to the European Union (Withdrawal) Bill! #ProEuropeansTogether 
The Brexit debate is far from over. There are so many paradoxes in what Leavers want that we'll still ultimately end up with either Remain, or No Deal and a Breakup of the UK.One thing is certain though: Leavers were forced this week to accept that reality isn't on their side. 
It’s not that the UK government couldn’t deliver an effective and complete #Brexit, its that the UK government doesn’t want to. This ‘negotiation’ is a sham, a political farce. 
Don't forget;  brexit will only benefit the very wealthy. The rest of us will be poorer culturally as well as financially. #StopBrexit 
This from the 25th October this year is interesting. @joannaccherry asks David Davis about sharing Brexit impact assessments specifically for Scotland, he says if Mundell says they'll be shared with Scot gov, then they'll be shared. Now we know they weren't ever done.  
I don't disagree Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, but because of your support of Brexit, where we are now is as much your responsibility as that of our pathetic weak & unstable government. Brexit WILL cause serious harm to our economy & you know it. #StopBrexit for the many, not the few. 
Though 22 years old, Umberto Eco's essay on the abiding principles of 'Ur Fascism' is very timely of #Trump and #Brexit (HT @Harkaway  
Michael Gove says if we don't like the Brexit deal and the way they're handling things we can tell them that in the next general election. Gladly. Just give me a date.  
May now going for a soft #brexit because hard brexit was a terrible option. Let’s hope she realizes soon that being in without a say compared to remaining is also a shit idea. 
#brexit breakthrough . 3millions of individuals & families will be comforted to know that  all EU citizen, including  moi ,may remain in UK 
Gove claims voters can use next general election to have say on  final Brexit deal. But by then it will be too late. Only way to give people control is through a vote on the terms of the deal, with the option of an Exit from Brexit  
The price of our Brexit.  
Brilliant explanation of why yesterday provided the best Brexit news since June 2016:  
GERMANY: 'Brexit has shown other countries there's a way out of the EU, every nation should decide its own immigration laws' - AfD Deputy Leader. 
May’s two year transition period will take us close to next GE or beyond. New Govnt can then overturn Referendum decision. That’s intention. 
Voters can reject Brexit deal at next election if they do not like it, vows Michael Gove. What bullshit. So they vote labour who says we`re staying in.  
And Right Brexit is the British Exit not from the EU, or our trade agreements, but Brexit from populism, bigotry, and the lazy democracy which led us to the darkest days of modern history. 
The attitude of Brexit fanatic Dominic Raab on C4 News last night was interesting. Listening to him it felt as though it could have been 1930s Germany. All that was missing was his brown shirt. We have some VERY dangerous people in the Tory party. We need them OUT! @krishgm 
Can I just propose a less economically and morally costly version of Brexit?It’s called Right Brexit in which we simply dismiss all MEPs representing Britain and hold a better quality election to make sure our voice is properly represented in the EU, and not obstructed by Nazis 
The Brexit Secretary didnae have a scooby about the impact of Brexit, so @ScotNational invited its readers to help out with their suggestions.Here are the top 25... 
This is by far the best critique I’ve read of yesterday’s Brexit deal. Martin Howe focusses on trade & explains why the EU’s offer is bound to be a *really bad* deal.  
The problem when you have a simplistic referendum about complicated issues. Also, I apologise for my family being in the supermarket that day.  We were stocking up for a do @mrjamesob 
So: Brexit has emerged as a Fascist project. Support for it is not compatible with Labour, the left, or anti-Fascism. [/thread] 
Nail on the head article on Northern Ireland / Brexit by Fintan O'Toole.Brexit will force the UK government to decide between one Union or the other. I have yet to hear any intellectually credible response from a Brexiter on this issue.  
Daily Mail front page. Can only assume the journalists didn’t actually read the #brexit deal yesterday  
Q: What's the lowest common denominator in the world's woes: China + Fizza  Jerusalem + @realDonaldTrump #Brexit + MayA: #rwnj's#AUSpol #resist 
Bizarre as it may seem, the DUP’s tackety-boot intervention earlier this week may inadvertently have delivered a soft Brexit for the whole of the UK.  What a turnaround. 
Man voted Brexit because of ‘too many brown faces’ in the supermarket and it explains a lot, sadly  
NO HARD BREXIT, Nicola Sturgeon grievance has died, the SNP are finished #SNPblameGAMEdies 
I addressed this tweet to all members of the House of Commons Petitions Committee who will be debating a #FinalSay referendum on Monday afternoon.Please RT it, and if you recognise your MP here, contact them directly by email, letter, tweet, Facebook.  
This by @fotoole is excellent. Argues that Brexit now has to be super-soft, and that UK likely to stay in single market/customs union, because of guarantee to avoid hard border  
The fact that more voters still see weak and wobbly, walking-dead Theresa May as a better PM than Jeremy Corbyn belies all the claims about his popular appeal. Diminished threat of chaotic no-deal Brexit also makes Labour victory less likely  
What Corbyn’s stance on Brexit fails to acknowledge is that it only works if the government in power has the highest of principles and values. As soon as another comes in, they can have a deregulated Tax haven which exploits people unchecked. We need the EU to protect people.  
Labour’s continued posture of support is not a necessary consequence of the referendum. It is a judgement. 
#recap This Brexit Bus game allows you to drive the Brexit Bus off the cliff of the falling pound and it’s brilliant 
Raab said same on C4 news - wilfully dissembling is clearly an agreed strategy. Intention is to bamboozle & pacify Brexit voters. They won referendum on lies & won’t stop now. Sadly our best hope is that EU’s transparency will save us from dishonesty & stupidity of our own govt  
A new #Brexit position #cartoon 
This is a significant read for all students of politics. EMBrexit and the Irish border: How the Deal was Salvaged  
May faces Cabinet battle over Britain’s future after deal leads to “very soft” Brexit claims    
Although uneasy about aspects of the Irish border deal, the DUP believes it has secured a strategic victory in the first round #Brexit talks. But if parts of the text ever enter legislation, their ambiguity & sweeping nature are risks for the DUP.  
We should not assume that yesterday's (mainly welcome) Brexit agreement cuts the overall chances of no deal much below 50%. (Indeed, in a few respects they increase it.) Hammond's £3.7bn no-deal contingency fund remaims too small & we also need to start spending on it now. 
Betrayal of Britain 
Fintan O’Toole: Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard Brexit  
Brexit and the Irish border: How the Deal was Salvaged via @RTENewsNow  
I’m not quite sure why the @michaelgove piece is so controversial. He has merely pointed out that there will be democratic elections to a sovereign parliament in #Brexit Britain 
One of the most moving articles on the experiences & fears of EU nationals in the UK since the referendum we have read in a long time.  
Please explain. EU citizens cannot be stopped from entering Ireland (free movement of people) & if no border, they can then go to Northern Ireland & from there to the rest of the UK. So how do we stop uncontrolled EU immigration through Ireland after Brexit? Asking for a friend. 
#brexit progress being made  
But actually #Brexit is proof if it was ever needed that for @DavidMundellDCT everything, no matter how damaging for Scotland and its citizens, is about preserving the Union. ..... 
How many people voted Brexit because there are too many brown people despite fact no EU country is brown? James O’Brien has his suspicions.  
Look at this. The despicable behaviour and the despicable people that the Brexit horrorshow has enabled.  
On #TheresaMay's momentous triumph in the #Brexit negotiations ...#StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #BrexitDeal #FBPE 
It is time for Labour to say UK must stay in Customs Union and single market for good - not just for transition. That is the only real alternative to a Tory Brexit 
Brexit is a racist policy. There's no way around it.Cut it whichever way you like, it still has racism running right through the middle. 
Two important things to remember:1. The deal isn’t done 2. #Brexit hasn’t happenedAll this jubilation surrounding @theresa_may today will be irrelevant tomorrow. 
Great to see Michael Gove coming out in favour of a second referendum.  
The great economic wisdom of Andrea Leadsom:"“But as I say, sterling has really not moved since the prime minister announced the starting gun for the referendum. So my best expectation, with my 30 years of financial experience, is that there will not be an economic impact.”  
Things which are not humiliating: finally being vaguely sensible about Brexit discussions.Things which definitely are humiliating: even the vague notion that Nigel Farage in any way represents this country. 
In cold light of this morning feels like #brexit will be constitutional fissure in UK for decades to come, increasing tensions in N Ireland but also scotland. Genie is out of bottle  
“What Brexiteers want is terrible!” Then “Brexit is all so impractical”. Followed by “what the bad sort of Brexiteers want is bad. This softer version is good”.  Finally ”it was my idea all along”. How pundits are coming to terms with leaving the EU 
Look at the body language in this pic from yesterday mornings #Brexit breakfast where the deal was struck. Look at the relaxed body language on the British side and the agitation on the EU side. The EU have conceded a lot, make no mistake.  
Radio 4 segues seamlessly from Andrea Leadsom’s views on the Brexit deal to a discussion of otter shit. Very little difference. 
Scotland doesn't deserve to be dragged out of EU because of racists like this. How long will we let English majority force things like #Brexit on us. We can end that by voting Yes at #indyref2. Wake up Scotland!  
This interview by Andrea Leadsom MP on @BBCr4today #r4today is an utter car crash. Seems to be interpreting “full alignment” in a way which ignores the word “full,” for starters. Has she any idea what the deal actually says on Northern Ireland? #Brexit 
#r4today If Andrea Leadsom’s brains were gunpowder there wouldn’t be enough to blow her hat off. Support Brexit to be nice to puppies. 
Theresa May is saying, in effect: “We’re leaving the Single Market. We’re taking back control. But we’re probably remaining subject to EU regs indefinitely”. Brexit means Brexit? 
A rational, calm and thoughtful @simoncoveney who has been exactly that throughout our #Brexit negotiations.  
PovertyFood banksNHSBrexit Homelessness Surely can’t be that bad or Bono and his celebrity chums would be doing a record and a concert to helpThere’s me worried for nothing 
"As *No Deal* moves further away we feel as sense of relief. As *No Leave* moves further away, we feel a sense of disappointment" @mrjamesob understatement. We're heading for Pay & Obey w/out Say, UK poorer & diminished for no good reasonNot *Brexit or Bust* but *Brexit & Bust*  
Tories climb up their magic money tree and find £1 billion to bribe the DUP and £40 billion for the Brexit divorce bill. Yet they can't find the money to give shelter to 128,000 homeless children.#BrexitDeal 
#BrexitDeal Hopeless Theresa Maybe and The Brexit Deal !!! Has Theresa stopped waving the white flag yet. Theresa a Remainer she never wanted to leave the EU. Today’s politicians no backbone who are they fighting for  or EU pathetic all our politicians.    
Another delusion is the idea that Britain will be open, fair and tolerant after Brexit.  Given Brexit was driven to a large extent by xenophobia towards immigrants, it leaves little to no room for openness. 2 
Nick Clegg : «Nous sommes libres de changer d'avis sur le Brexit»  
Clear confirmation from the US of May's sell-out yesterday, and this is by the anti-Brexit, pro-EU Washington Post.  Says it all.  
#Brexit FreedomI used to be able to freely travel, live and work in 28 different countries. Now I can live and work in one.Apparently that's freedom.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
UK will have say on May's Brexit deal at next election, says Michael Gove. The Environment Secretary suggests if the Brussels deal leads to a soft Brexit, voters can demand a hard Brexit instead.A government that's still not on the same page 
Interesting piece on Brexit & tax-avoidance.Could be developed more. Interesting to know whether this was also part of why Brexit leaders switched from championing EFTA/Norway model to hard Brexit in 2016. Wanted full de-reg & escape tax agreements? 
This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation 
Three Brexitters walk into a bar.And the Wetherspoons manager says, thank God, some customers at last.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #FBPE 
My bit on the Brexit divorce, which yer da's taking well   
On this ‘cost of #Brexit’ business: I still can’t see any ‘benefits’ of Brexit. Not one. 
OK, so now at least we know what @theresa_may meant by a red, white and blue Brexit:RED for the colour of the DUP logo.WHITE for the colour of the flag she's waving.BLUE for the colour of the air now everyone realises just how f*cked over we all are by it.#BrexitDeal 
Today’s Brexit Deal leaves the UK a vassal state subject to EU regulation.  
#Brexit: Michael Gove says UK voters can change final deal - Don’t get too excited everyone, he’s saying once we’ve left any softer aspects of the deal can be ditched. It’s a sop to the hard Brexiteers who hate comprise and the concessions May has made.  
Brits are sitting back weakly whimpering whilst they are being totally betrayed over BREXIT, takes stronger action than that, take to the streets demand UK walk away no deal, you are being robbed and belittled by your own government. 
Gove and his ilk will burn the country to ashes before they concede that voters might have the right to decide to halt Brexit. 
A ridiculous headline from an increasingly ridiculous newspaper. The EU benefits us economically, politically and culturally. Leaving limits our freedom in so many ways. Stop #Brexit!  
Forget the World Cup, Trump and Brexit. #Yemen’s man-made starvation, silently taking hold in the midst of crossfire, will be the world’s biggest news story in 2018 @NRC_Egeland@NRC_Norway  
No. This is The Price of Brexit.You can add ‘freedom’ (personal & national) to the list of costs.  
Is it fair that EU Citizens in the UK will retain full freedom of movement rights after Brexit, but Brits living in Europe won't?  
The second phase of Brexit negotiations will be tougher than the first, and that has not gone to plan  
Read my full statement on #Brexit, #citizensrights and Ireland  
Boy, the latest Brexit news is nuts. I have zero idea what's going on, but it sounds like I'm not alone in that. 
Your problem, @jeremycorbyn, is that you've been supporting the Tories' Brexit so consistently and voting with them for so long that you are now unable to take any credible anti-Brexit position. You have made yourself irrelevant.  
British Prime Minister Theresa May said the key part of an historic deal with the EU on Brexit was to ensure no return of checkpoints on the border between British-ruled Northern Ireland and EU member Ireland  
Rejoice! Theresa May is a Jellyfish‘We’re on our way’We are not going anywhere!!!!Now we know they don’t need a Brexit Impact Study we’re not actually leaving..... #MrsSoftee 
Grimsby - A prima facie case of a town wanting to have their fish and eat it. 
Theresa May will be hoping this disappears under the cover of a Brexit smokescreen. Do Tory voters really know what they're voting for? #ToryWinterCrisis 
Just as the UK walks out of the EU, Japan is welcomed in with the world's largest free trade deal. So that'll be Nissan, Honda and Toyota off to the continent then. Brexit - the gift that keeps on taking 
When the hell is @DavidDavisMP going to found to be in contempt of parliament.Have you seen this @DavidLammy @ChukaUmunna  ?#FBPE #Brexit  
So let's get this straight. There are now pro-Brexit unionists and anti-Brexit unionists (which only independence can guarantee) and they've split? This means we're winning.  
James O'Brien takes down Brexit voter who complained about lack of 'white faces' at his local hospital  
So far, those Brexit idiots are paying 50 billion not to have a seat at a table, remain part of the ECJ jurisdiction, leave a massive trading bloc with no guarantee of an immediate trade deal, and sectoral losses in employment in key sectors. 
The untold numbers who naively trusted May & her Tories after swallowing their Rhetoric over Brexit have been shown in no uncertain terms the absolute Contempt they're held in!!! May or Corbyn as PM?? Vote 4 either of these Traitors? I would rather stick pins in my eyes!! 
So, let's have an informed second referendum on it, where the choice is 'Pay more for less' or 'Stay in the EU' Better still just scrap whole idea and waste no more money... @kmqkatie @TheGreatRemain @EuEthnic @SheronWilkie @helenyg @Hil67 @VeroVero777 @grrrahh @JoRichardsKent 
So sad that our Brit cousins were brave enough to vote for Brexit yet are still stuck with May. Things once seemed equally hopeless here in the US with the numbingly stupid and corrupt Globalist two-party monopoly. Hang on--someday you will win!  
Brexit: Michael Gove says UK voters can change final deal  
A new YouGov poll finds that public confidence in the govt’s handling of Brexit has tumbled to a new low of just 1/5 believing it is doing a good job. Next question: “Why still so high?” What does the govt have to do to lose the confidence of this rose-tinted 20%? #StopBrexit 
This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP  via @telegraphnews 
"Ireland has just done Britain a favour of historic dimensions. It has saved it from the madness of a hard Brexit."  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Pidis are hailing Gujarat election as Rahul Gandhi coming of age but the man himself says it is not a referendum on his leadership. Has the Congress given up on Gujarat already? #GujaratVotesBJP 
Woke up in a bad mood over the Brexit stitch up. As a negotiator, May makes Chamberlain look like Attila the Hun. 
The DUP acts as if Brexit is everyone else’s problem  
#UKIP: British people unhappy with first phase of #Brexit deal 
Ruth Davidson tells Nicola Sturgeon to 'give it a rest' after claim Brexit deal helps Scottish independence  
The biggest money laundering capitalists on the Planet have purchased removal of UK from the EU so that they can avoid Tax Scrutiny and Fairness. #Brexit was never about taking back anything but removing everything they do from oversight. 
The best bit about Brexit is watching the remoaners have a breakdown and pretend to understand what’s going on. While the rest of us just get on with our lives #brexit #we’reLeaving #UKnotEU  
Looks like Moore's gunna win Alabama so Trump marks the election as a referendum on him 
So “Brexit means Brexit” could mean “no Brexit” if public reject future deal. But what would count — public opinion poll, second referendum or new election? Tories couldn’t be more incompetent about something so important.  
As expected, Saturday papers keen to insist Brexit is now a done deal.Clock is still ticking on Article 50. If you're a Remainer or even a Leaver unhappy with the terms May has negotiated, there's still everything to fight for.  
The amount of praise flooding out for @theresa_may feels like she’s getting sacked in a matter of days #BREXIT 
This!An absolute #MustRead interview/article/opinion/educational piece by @NewStatesman editor @JasonCowleyNS on Nigel Farage:"Nigel Farage: the arsonist in exile"Why and how did he take Britain to the path of #Brexit? 
The Brexit process is clearly being dictated by EU officials and received with approval by our supine leaders. 
Amen to this. I’m losing my FoM passport literally over my dead body. It’s not happening. Brexit-confused people will just have to put up with it. 
Worth watching Guru-Murthy nail Dominic Raab on Brexit deal.  via @krishgm 
I heard on Radio 4 a lady lawyer called Rutter explaining extension of EU citizens rights and settlement entitlement of unborn children for another 10 years. Regardless of any trade deal, any extension of EU citizen rights in the UK is inconsistent with Brexit. 
Nicola Sturgeon welcomes 'step forward' on Brexit  
Opinion: More and more Brits expect Brexit to hurt the economy, says @josephsternberg 
Together with colleagues from @DurhamLawSchool @NCLLawSchool, our @btcwarwick has produced a rapid response Commentary on the Joint Report on Phase 1 of the UK/EU Negotiations #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Watch Brexiter justice minister Dominic Raab spit his dummy as @krishgm demolishes his claims about the Brexit deal. Would people ever have voted for this expensive mess?The choice now is between soft Brexit and #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Brexit is an empty rotten shellAll the promises All the dreamsBrokenGoneNothing left but that which the elite craveAnd the xenophobes covetBrexit never was for you, it was ever for the fewTime to change your mindTime to stop Brexit 
At the heart of BrexitAre those who think it is only the little people pay taxes  
It is wrong for Britain to be excluded form the top table. It is wrong to have to renegotiate countless laws, regulations and standards to end up worse off. It is wrong to strip millions of their fundamental rights. Brexit is wrong so let's #StopBrexit 
Things just got real interesting. #bizhumanrights #BindingTreaty #UNForumBHR #corporateaccountability #Humanrightsday2017 #humanrights #corporateresponsibility #responsibleinvestment #ESG #SRI #ImpInv #Brexit #leadership #sustainability #sustbiz #susty 
Scores of #Portsmouth @LibDems @Libdem13 @havantlibdems @FarehamLibDems @ChichLibDems members and guests enjoyed #Christmas dinner with hardworking @catherinemep this evening hearing about her animal welfare work, #LibDems by-election gains and #Brexit latest news.  
Theresa May joked ‘shall I sing Come On Arlene’ as No10 staff belted out karaoke while she called DUP boss to rescue Brexit deal:  
The UK leaving the EU is Brexit. While Americans leaving government for E Ewww behavior should be called Sexit. 
#Brexit is what many Married folks do, get a divorce before doing the maths then realise they can’t afford to sell the House as its not cost effective and so decide to live together and have the occasional shag. #BrexitInANutshell 
Using a Commonwealth allowance for personal profit negatively gearing Canberra property. Increased equity reduced taxation & capital gain. (LAFHA) they never had a referendum.s44 bandits. 
‘Britain will remain’Summed up in 3 words, more than you might believe. Or more clearly:1 Remain v Brexit 0  
I don’t really know what’s going on with #Brexit but it’s pissing off a bunch of people I dislike which is always a plus  
They're not unravelling the agreement, they're trying to convince their electorate that they will be able to magical harder Brexit solution by 2019. The agreement still defaults to "Full Alignment" in the absence of such a solution. 
What a week this has been:Lies, damn lies, and non-existent sectoral assessments (yeah right Dave). DUP taking control of the government.Bloody difficult woman revealed as weak and pathetic.Yeah, I can hardly wait for next week.Brexit means the fuck Brexit.Fuck Brexit 
Howard-Suamico School Board considers future referendum.  
Corbyn actually has a vision of Britain, for Britain, that most people can get behind. I don't recognise the mealy-mouthed one the Tories have promoted with their 'brexit' & austerity. The time of fox hunting & doffing our caps to our betters is over & I refuse to return to it.  
Inside May’s race to a late-night Brexit deal  
'May’s divided cabinet will have its first formal discussion on 'end state' of UK trade relationship with EU before Christmas'. A full 18 mths after the Referendum. So today's fine words were meaningless.  
You've taken our Freedom of Movement away you IMBECILE, or had you not noticed that???@a50challengeThe UK is being taken over by lunatics!!Donate 2 stop the illegal BREXIT Article 50 trigger in Court?#stopbrexit #a50challenge #FBPECLICK HERE: 
Can anyone recall a UK government spending SO much time, resource & multi-billions of hard (borrowed) cash to buy an inferior deal to the one we already have? - with zero guarantee of even getting 'that' by the end of this Brexit process? 
.... And So The Fight Continues!! #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Tragic that the UK is in the clutches of a clique of Tory Brexiteers trying to implement the bigoted and intolerant views of Nigel Farage. Think about that for a moment...#Brexit will be a disaster.Call for an #ExitFromBrexit 
Mayor De Blasio, you've been an inspiration to me ever since you turned the 2013 race into a referendum on stop-and-frisk and paid sick days. Thank you for standing with @LocalProgress and the progressive movement all these years. 
Dear hard-right idiots crying because we won't allow a flounce away hard Brexit, we are brighter than you,  you lost!  Get over it!cc @Nigel_Farage and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Rather a good article, from a man who knows his stuff.#quote : "We have not escaped a 'hard Brexit' – we have made it more or less a certainty. Even collapse is still a possibility, which makes transition academic. On present form, we'll be long gone before it can take effect."  
Geez, I wish I knew!! Mind you, 'No' voters phoning old people to say they'd lose their pensions didn't help. And lying about EU ("Vote no to stay in EU") etc... fear makes some people scared to go for change. Brexit changes EVERYTHING. No holds barred now. 
In order to avoid the kind of contention shown by Remainers towards #Brexit most democracies require super-majorities for constitutional changes. In democratically defective Britain an advisory referendum is sold as mandatory.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
OK so we know their tactic: Spin like crazy, lie, dissemble & obfuscate, with aim of bamboozling enough of the public so there’ll be insufficient opposition in coming months. Response has to be relentless counter-spin & a referendum on terms of the deal  
This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation #Premium  
UK (Northern Ireland): Majority of voters would vote for joining the Republic of Ireland in case of hard Brexit (LucidTalk poll). #Brexit #Ireland #HardBrexit 
UK (Northern Ireland), LucidTalk poll:Border Poll Referendum (in the event of a 'Hard Brexit')Remain in the EU by joining the Irish Republic: 51%Leave the EU by staying in the UK: 49%#Brexit 
And now, ironically, I’m being retweeted by accounts that appear to be anti-Brexit bots. This is all so creepy. Seems like what happens in Russia, funding left and right wing protest to create confusion. I don’t normally tweet about these things, but I find it all unsettling. 
Look at what just passed the UK by, thanks to #Brexit and the idiocy of the UK government. How are our interests served by such ineptitude?  
My phonecall on #LBC earlier with Andrew Pierce about Theresa May's #Brexit Betrayal on the Single Market and Customs Union.  
Northern Ireland Brexit deal proves independence would not result in hard border, says Nicola Sturgeon 
EU and Japan finalise world’s largest free trade deal  
Brexit does not belong to the Tories. We, the British people, need to reclaim our freedom, sovereignty and democracy ourselves. 
Theresa May joked ‘Shall I sing Come On Arlene’ as No10 staff belted out karaoke while she called DUP boss to rescue Brexit deal.Video, @Number10gov, or it didn’t happen  
Let’s pop over to #Brexit and see what’s happening...  
A great front page of the @irishexaminer on an historic day by my colleagues @Elaine_Loughlin and @Junomaco - our production team deserve a lot of praise for allowing the picture to tell the story as well #saturdaypapers #brexit  
The lies of the Brexit campaign exposed, as explained by @scmallaby. 
."The populist Brexit promises have proved empty. And there is MORE humble pie to come.". 
Whichever way you look at it, and believe me, I have, in excruciating detail over the last year or so, Brexit is a crock of shit. To be precise 50 to 60 different crocks of shit. Wrap it up in gold foil and it will still be shit. No I haven’t forgotten you lied @DavidDavisMP 
If Corbyn had fought #Brexit he could have at least made a mark, but now history will see him as the guy who stood by, didn't take any public stand of any kind, privately supported Brexit and thus, thru inaction, missed his chance 
Remoaners were never going to stop (hard) Brexit: reality was. The Northern Ireland border was Brexit's first encounter with cold hard reality. Brexit crumbled. Now it faces a year of unrelenting reality from the City, manufacturers and universities. 
Exactly, I'm musing over a scenario where we muddle through to a soft/pointless Brexit (least worst outcome), the Tories hang onto power & regroup, and Corbyn just fades away, peaking in mid 2017 but then becoming irrelevant as semi-brexit unfolds. 
Festive surroundings in Letterkenny this evening but clear message that vigilance still required on Brexit negotiations in time ahead  Thanks to all who attended our public meeting. 
ok sorry I know I'm now going on about this but did they realise that the subtext here is that the Telegraph's perfect Brexit would have meant kicking out EU citizens living in the UK?  
Around half a million people die in the UK each year. The average age of death is 81. The EU referendum was 18 months ago. Stop saying 17.4m people. 
A fun thought-piece:David Cameron promised a referendum before the end of 2017... We could’ve been coming up to one now — after a longer, better structured, more informative campaign that reflects the education needed to tackle such a multifaceted question. 
As Brexit is ground down by the realities of geopolitics into a fudge far from the Leave campaign's utopia, watch the main priority of the UK right wing press shift from promoting Brexit to preventing Corbyn. Soft Brexit will be sold as a means to save Britain from Socialism 
Ooof! Charles Moore pulling no punches."This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation"Scant comfort from the fact he's absolutely right. #MayMustGo 
Yes it feels like an awful deja vu from the Referendum campaign. This article, written just a few days before 23 June, says it perfectly. Working-class people have been duped into voting Leave to help their elite overlords. And Labour just let it happen   
So basically with #Brexit it’s like we’ve cancelled our gym membership but we still want to use the machines and the pool and the classes, and we have to pay a shit ton of money back to the gym and all the other members will laugh at us and think we’re a dick. 
Does anyone care what Sturgeon thinks about the Brexit deal? No-one I know does. She's desperate for publicity, but she's been sidelined. 
Brexit inspires staggering displays of ignorance about Ireland from our MPs  
1) Just sinking in that, based on how things are going, the entire #Brexit process may get to completion, and @jeremycorbyn will have had virtually no influence on the outcome, other than passively supporting Government votes 
Never forget: no Brexit without the Left. Not those left nationalists who *always* believed in it, but those left careerists who wanted to get on telly. 
37% of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum mis-sold as mandatory for a 4 word hand-waving catch-all slogan, narrowly won by a tidal-wave of #Brexit billionaire press hate and lies. Less an exercise in democracy, than an exercise in its abuse.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Postponing the pain of Brexit. My column  
I am impressed with Varadkar's work on Brexit. There, I said it. Now I'll return my usual twitter habit of bashing his attitudes to women and the working class. 
David, just wondering if you knew how many times negative comments left on your feed are from accounts that just retweet and appear to be bots. Maybe something you could look into? I notice it a lot on anti-Brexit people’s accounts. The problem seems bigger than people realise. 
A #Brexit fudge that will unravel...  
Majority in Northern Ireland now want a united Ireland in the EU. Scots will vote for EU at the next independence referendum. The UK is dead.  
Some of the best stuff I've seen on Ireland and Brexit regularly by @fotoole 
EU wanted up to €75bn in Brexit divorce bill - sources  
I’m tired of hearing about a ‘populist movement’. Firstly, Hillary won the popular vote, (and most people, although they didn’t vote, opposed Brexit). Secondy, it’s not one movement, but a coalition of racists, habitual conservative voters, gun nuts, and opportunistic rich turds. 
Bizarre by @Peston - Gove says what he has consistently said about taking control. Apparently this means voters deciding if Brexit a mistake.  V odd  
So the Daily Mail and loads of Tories are celebrating because we just agreed to pay £39,000,000,000 for the pleasure of abiding by the same rules and regulations we have done for decades, except we can’t now influence them in any way whatsoever.Yay.Bargain.#Brexit  
New rule: Anyone who wants to go on the radio to say what sort of Brexit the British people will or will not accept should be forced to spend two weeks vox popping them first. 
In case anyone thinks @michaelgove off message in his @Telegraph article saying voters can reject May’s future Brexit settlement with EU if they don’t like it, his colleagues say article was approved by Downing Street 
On @skynews next with @DPJHodges explaining why Brexit ain’t never happening, regardless of what the newspapers tell you. 
The only Brexit analysis worth anything at all  
Looking on from Ireland we never understand why you are not independent. Lots of resources and exports, good education - and all so some Brexit liars can decide for you in London?  #copout what do they have to do to humiliate you further?   
Week Long PollAs we learn more about #brexit has your view changedPlease vote and retweet 
This from @michaelgove seems surprisingly close to him saying if voters decide Brexit is a mistake, they can and should change their minds  
.@Tom_Slater_ on the betrayal of Brexit:  
47. And even if you don’t agree with me that a referendum is the solution, I would hope that anyone who cherished democracy would make a stand against what is happening 
46. I don’t like living in a hypocrisy, I don’t respect hypocrisy, and personally, I'd like a referendum to overturn hypocrisy 
Who knew?! The Stage 2 #Brexit button has been activated! Merry Christmas! #TheLastLeg 
Polls show that Theresa May is FINISHED, with Jacob Rees-Mogg set to lead Britain into Brexit  via @Your Brexit 
Listening to some Brexit Tories today talking up ‘great trade deals’ after May’s deal feels like Matthew Parris is on the money. Can has been kicked but will still hit the road eventually  
What is utterly frightening are some of the 'man in the street' interviews. The general ignorance about the EU, & the effect that Brexiteer lies have had is criminal, but perhaps not as criminal as Cameron agreeing to a simple majority referendum for a vital constitutional issue 
Wow!!! Unfucknbelievable ..Michael Gove gone from “We won” in the morning to “move away from Theresa May’s Brexit” pic.twitter.com/XvZi4Gibze 
We need an opposition party which is going to call #Brexit out for what it is - a grotesque abuse of democracy that will hurt most Britons.Thus far @jeremycorbyn you have been part of the problem, not part of the solution. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
GIVE IT A REST:Queen of Scots, Nicola Sturgeon, insists that the Brexit "breakthrough" and the agreement reached on the Irish border has "implications" for an independent Scotland.  
In a last-minute act of desperation, Theresa May has abandoned every red line on Brexit  
David Davis made repeated claims to have Brexit impact assessments never actually done - and only exposed when forced to publish them. Who can have trust in such an incompetent sec of state? Time for Davis to go. A daily reminder. 
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
One thing that has become clear throughout the Brexit process is that most media pundits (and some senior politicians) seem to have absolutely no idea how negotiations work. Not even clued-up on the basics. Most trade unions, such as my own, wouldn't touch them with a barge pole. 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: So, 18 months after the Brexit vote.... #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Tomorrow's front page: It's official ... the Unionist border scare story is no more. After the Brexit divorce deal, never again can the UK say Scottish independence = hard border  
13. A time that could see a major party passing a resolution calling to reverse a referendum at a party conference, after five years of internal debate  
This Brexit deal is no 'breakthrough'. It is a complete capitulation.  
10. A time when to suggest a referendum settled things was only made out of vested interest  
9. And when MPs could argue that the referendum decision could be overturned in parliament, without cries of “Will of the people”, or “You lost, get over it!”  
Delusional: the world according to Dacre’s Daily Mail in London - if that’s what you think happened today you’re living in the clouds #brexit  
Tory deceit re EU citizens post Brexit:●For 8 years (prob 10+ with transition period) the ECJ will rule on UK cases.●In perpetuity citizens rights will be defined by ECJ & British courts will have to implement them.  
Tusk can cross my boarder anytime !  #Brexit #BrexitDeal @campaignforleo #DaLeoLama #Divorce 
I think it's time to recognise @Number10gov has delivered a good deal to take us into trade talks. All credit to PM. Path of Brexit smoothed 
Well done Ireland. While Scotland is powerless in the Brexit negotiations independent Ireland has the support of 26 EU friends and allies.  
Instead of paying £350 million a week to the NHS, let's pay Farage his £73,000 annual EU pension.Brexit: Shafting British taxpayers since June 2016 
You won't want to miss this epic Tory tantrum as Dominic Raab is held to account on Brexit deal by @krishgm #ToryBrexitShambles 
Hey Brexiters, please remind us: if this is the deal, what’s the point of Brexit? The phrase “take back control” is becoming a bad joke.Let’s stop the madness. It’s not too late to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. @InFactsOrg.   
The barefaced cheek of the Conservative party to say that they secured citizens rights. It is them who put the rights at risk by pursuing the madness of Brexit!  
Brexit deal doesn't clarify whether British citizens can move freely between EU countries  
The FT several months ago: “EU raises UK Brexit bill to €100 billion as Paris and Berlin harden stance”The reality:It's about £40bn, over many years. You might think still too much. But it's not €100bn. Or even close. By the way, Berlin/Paris softened stance. 
When talks resume after Christmas the real damage of Brexit will be exposed sector by sector. That's when the majority of people will learn what Brexit means for them personally.So relax, enjoy Christmas and come back in 2018 refreshed & ready to finish the fight!#StopBrexit 
Right, you’re the “real deal”.Is that why you’re backing a total sellout Prime Minister who has sabotaged any kind of “real deal” on Brexit for the British people while attacking @Nigel_Farage - the man who made it possible in the first place.  
I’d really not be bothered with Farage’s salary & pension if he’d put in anything like the work of these superb MEPs:@ClareMoodyMEP@MollyMEP@RCorbettMEP@GlenisWillmottBut he didn’t. He just TV couch-surfed, pushing for Brexit but without even a plan of how to make it work 
Watching #HIGNFY take the rip out of brexit makes me feel all warm and cosy.#Remain#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Peter Brookes’s Nature Notes on Theresa May’s breakthrough Brexit deal – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Media & Tories.... #BrexitDistractionNHS collapsingDistractionSchools underfundedDistractionTuition fees trebledDistractionGP surgeries closingDistractionPatients in pain in A&E corridorsDistractionFood banks everywhereDistractionMore street sleeping#Brexit 
We've examined the 15-page Brexit breakthrough. Here's what it says (and what it means)  
I want a 'Great' Britain that is:- Compassionate- Outward looking - Positive- Inclusive - Welcoming - Visionary - Progressive - Enlightened - Modern- Fair- PrincipledBrexit is diametrically opposite to these values. Let's stop it. Let's Make 'Great' Britain Again. 
I feel a legal challenge coming on. It cannot be right that some UK citizens have more freedom of movement than others. Brexit: Northern Irish will be able to remain EU citizens under deal  
Now we know. When YOU said "Brexit means Brexit" you MEANT "Brexit means keep paying them our taxes, keep aligning with their regulations, and keep paying tribute to YOUR EU masters". Resign.  
Ruth Davidson slams Nicola Sturgeon’s Brexit deal response  
Hard Brexit STILL ON: Kate Hoey tells PM to 'beef up' negotiation team to fight off EU  
Those who LOST the Referendum on whether the UK should Leave the EU are now chuckling that the will of the majority is subverted by May and her Remainer pals. A price will be paid for this. 
#BREXIT : The 16-page agreement between the EU and the UK, which was published this morning, reads like a prelude to surrender.  It’s MAY’S doing and she has to go!   #fo2eu 
Madness. Just stop Brexit.  
Chuka Ummuna: Brexit ‘is simply proving to be undeliverable’ 
I'm just staggered by the arrogance of Guy Verhofstadt. He wants easy passage for migrants into the UK after "Brexit" and EU law courts ruling over UK courts. Does this sound ANYTHING like leaving the EU to you? This is EU membership, with zero power. 
Thanks to @yvonne_rogers7 for sending me the link. Must watch interview demolishing govt claims of Brexit success  
Sadiq Khan to commission his own Brexit impact assessments, after David Davis admitted that the Government’s did not exist.Nice one Sadiq. Let’s share the facts and #StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
Ben Jennings on the breakthrough Brexit deal – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
This week's events have shown that even red lines like the Irish border can't be taken for granted as we leave the EU - the only way to ensure Brexit causes no disruption to our United Kingdom is to have no Brexit: 
This was me reacting to a sound sync test before recording Chopper's Brexit Bonus Podcast at lunchtime today. It had been a long morning! @Telegraph 
Henry Bolton - "What this is is a total surrender to the European Commission and in fact, having worked in Brussels for three years, I recognise the style of the document that has been produced. I would say 80-90% of it was actually drafted in Brussels." #Brexit  
The Brexit deal is a massacre, not a compromise  
Popcorn sales skyrocket as Remainers settle in to watch Nigel Farage and Arron Banks explode over Brexit deal 
Nigel Farage - "We have wasted months and months and in the end we’ve agreed to all the things the European Commission insisted upon in the first place." #Brexit  
The inside story of Theresa May’s midnight Brexit deal: samosas, karaoke and two hours’ sleep  
Perhaps a good thing about Brexit is that it has brought forward the day when we learned that Parliament is broken. That's a bigger issue than Brexit itself. If Parliament does not represent the people then worse than Brexit is to come. Let's fix it before that happens. 
At last, someone too stupid to keep it in: SO many people voted  erroneously for Brexit as a meaningless kick at the establishment to satisfy their own racism. And all of us have to suffer for it.  
What Brexit elite want:1. UK Tax haven2. No regulations on exploitation of employees3. No ECJ to restrain themThey don’t like today’s deal because:1. Will have to implement EU tax avoidance laws during transition2. Might not get all of above.It’s all about their money. 
Brexit agreement enables Northern Irish citizens to have EU passports. They can retain EU Citizenship and enjoy the benefits of 27 other countries when mainland UK citizens can’t! A chink of light for the rest of us, maybe? #ExitFromBrexit 
‘Trusting the people on Brexit is preferable to trusting the politicians,’ says @thatginamiller calling for a second referendum on #bbcaq 
PM's Brexit fudge recipe might yet leave bad taste  
Vigilance required on Brexit negotiations in time ahead - Carthy 
SALE OF THE CENTURY Your Sovereignty Given away to Brussels By Successive Governments The LIBLABCONS Can No longer be trusted 
I’m heartily sick of well-off privileged men lecturing about Brexit being so great for us all. What makes us a great nation is our diversity and welcoming people from all over the world, especially our EU friends. I’m fed up of this isolationist rubbish #bbcaq 
Nigel Farage - "We do not need to be paying anything like this sum of money. The only reason the EU want this exorbitant sum is because they have refused to cut any of their future spending programmes despite the fact the UK is leaving." #Brexit  
Gloating EU politician HAILS Brexit deal success for Brussels after last-minute agreement  
Coming next, a Brexit divorce: the kind that involves the police| Marina Hyde  
As a Remain voter, I hope to god that Brexit is a disaster. It's the only way the Right will learn. 
#Brexit isn't about migration, or helping British people, or 'EU bureaucrats' or 'taking back control'. It's about rich, powerful interests finding innovative ways to blame others for problems arising directly from their greed, while simultaeneously consolidating their power. 
Hugh, JOB does a massive job on a daily basis on the radio (LBC) fighting the madness of Brexit. Listen to him on YouTube. He is across the small print and the details. He also has Irish roots. He is simply pointing out the unfairness of it all. 
."The UK government’s failures and incompetence on Brexit are a threat to this nation’s future prospects.". 
Khan Gets Brexit-Bashing Corbynistas To Write His ‘Independent’ Impact Papers ttps://order-order.com/2017/12/08/khan-asks-brexit-bashing-corbynistas-write-independent-impact-papers/  
This is what’s at the heart of the Brexit problem. Half of Britain feels like we’re all Europeans, of course we should all live and love wherever we want in our Europe. A significant part of the other half - on average,older - hate or fear or simply can’t comprehend this idea.  
James O'Brien had the perfect response to this caller who told him he voted Brexit because there are "too many brown faces" in his supermarket and hospital  
So apparently Kitchen Queen, Endemol ki Ladli & @colorstv ki Beti, Shilpa Shinde is more popular than WORLD ISSUES LIKE BREXIT Nice work PR! Truly fab trending but next tym tryna keep it bit realistic #BB11 #HinaKhan @jjrockxx 
Senior members of Theresa May's government have backed her breakthrough deal in the Brexit talks, which includes paying more than £30bn to Brussels  
The media are ignoring Amnesty brag that they will break the law and take money from George Soros to fight the referendum on the 8th. Help us break the silence. #DirtyMoney 
Brexit voter calls James O'Brien to tell him he voted to leave the EU because there are too many "brown faces" at his local hospital but says he's not racist 
We shouldn't be calling today's arrangement a #BrexitDeal. It's not. It's just a step on the UK's way to getting a Brexit deal. The hard work lies before us. Coz this is where it gets specific. Get ready to hear sector specific bad news every day when talks resume.#StopBrexit 
Beware pundits who, having called stage one of Brexit talks wrong, now say stage two will be much more difficult. Could be. But not if:i) The UK could actually make up its mind what it reasonably wants.ii) There is goodwill on EU's part (and there could well be). 
So, most read on Irish Times is my piece on Brexit deal. This is second most read. "Homer made the Iliad from such a local row as this." (Patrick Kavanagh)Woman (82) found with ‘bucket of excrement’ on neighbour’s land  via @IrishTimes 
online poll shows the british people think @theresa_may is hopeless and most prefer @DUPleader to lead #BrexitDeal #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Opinion: The truth about the 'Brexit deal'? The problem of the border is not resolved at all – just left hanging.  
The 8th of December 2017: The day hard Brexit died.From today, Britain is heading for soft Brexit or no Brexit.Here’s to the day we #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Theresa May has my support for having managed to convince Hard Brexiteers to accept an EU deal which is exactly the opposite of what they promised in the Referendum 
Jacob Rees Mogg on Brexit breakthrough: "I can live with it." It what was the most guarded of welcomes 
@theresa_may has achieved what many thought was impossible. She has delivered an agreement to move onto the next phase of negotiations whilst keeping all sides of the party onside. She deserves huge credit and has shown she has what it takes to deliver Brexit. 
This is why I now rely on social media for #RealNews and not #MSM #FakeNews Tory propaganda! #JeremyCorbyn #BrexitDeal #Brexit #Brexitshambles 
We're virtually stuck in the EU for at least 8 years and paying a huge sum right NOW for the privilege! How on earth is this leaving the EU? Treachery of the highest order!#Brexit #UKIP #Labour #Conservatives #Swindon #EU #BBC #snow #ImACeleb@Nigel_Farage @_HenryBolton 
Theresa May’s EU deal will postpone the pain of Brexit, but won’t prevent it | Jonathan Freedland  
I like @ChukaUmunna's "We just need to keep an open mind, because there are new facts emerging all the time that may change how people feel about Brexit." It's elegant, sensible, non-antagonistic and very, very difficult to argue against. 
- There is only 1 way to stop Theresa May’s brexit deal & prevent the remainers from destroying Brexit & that is for someone to make a leadership challenge. Boris & Gove have double crossed Brexit. Jacob Rees Mogg has to stand up for his beliefs & force out May  
'Now it gets tough' Tusk warns May 'most difficult challenge is ahead' for Brexit talksNow our ridiculous excuse for a Prime Minister has shown her hand, the EU knows it is on to a winner!  
17.4m people did not vote for a transition period. They voted to leave the EU.RT if you agree.#Brexit #Conservatives #BrexitDeal 
Bob Moran on the Brexit breakthrough and on to phase two – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The #Brexit divorce deal is no big success for May and the Tories. Here’s why not... 
Regardless of whether or not you support Brexit, how confident are you that the British government will reach a favourable deal on #Brexit before March 2019?RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Wouldn’t it be great if they manage to come up with a Brexit deal that actually satisfies nobody? It’s what I am now gunning for. An entire disappointed nation. 
I know in a sea of lies it's difficult to notice every droplet, but @DominicRaab's current (correct) interpretation of ECJ role is an admission that when he toured news studios before the referendum saying "why should our courts be ruled by the ECJ" he deliberately misled voters.  
Brexit looks a smarter move each day.  
Brexit is absolutely, undeniably cretinous on every single measurable level. Still, at least it'll be the end of the Tories. 
HI EVERYONE THIS IS NO BLOODY DEAL THIS IS A 40 TO 50 BILLION SELL OUT EUROPE HAD THEM IN THEIR POCKETS IRELAND AND DUP THE SAME THE ONLY ONE'S WHO HAVE GOT NOTHING IS THE MUGS THAT LIVE AND WORK IN THIS COUNTRY EVEN THE FOREIGNERS GOT SOMETHING NOT THE BREXIT I VOTED FOR 
If Guy Verhofstadt is gloating about Theresa May's Brexit sellout, you know it's a terrible deal.  
Good to see such incisive analysis of the considerable shortcomings of today’s #EU #brexit negotations phase one deal from @krishgm on @Channel4News & @Peston on @itn. Neither having wool pulled over their eyes 
Follow everyone who likes and retweet this #loyaltywithkevote #gainwithxtiandela #TrapaDrive #FridayBriefing#KlubH2O#TujiaminiTalent#LaydbackLounge#PDWikendi AG Githu Muigai Brexit Ecobank Kenya State House Willy Paul 
Here’s why “Take Back Control” slogan was so devastatingly effective. Literally everybody who had any grievance about modern life (i.e. something they felt was outside their control) could believe - if they followed their guts rather than their brain - that Brexit would solve it.  
Confused by the Brexit deal? Here’s what you should know  
Dominic Raab doing a  job showing the ignorance of the average Tory Brexiter about, well, everything to do with the EU and Brexit  #c4news 
Well he would have to have won a UK seat and not buggered off as soon as it came to actually doing the hard yards to deliver Brexit.  
Persevere in selling out our country? What a load of bollocks, Katie.May has capitulated on everything.This is not what the British people voted for.Stick to spinning car accidents as terror attacks because you appear to know little about Brexit.  
George’s opening statement on the Mother of All Talkshows Every Friday on @talkradio#Trump #Jerusalem #Brexit  
In a last-minute act of desperation, Theresa May has abandoned every red line on Brexit  via @thecanarysays 
Updated: The full FT inside story of a Brexit deal cooked up over canapes, croissants and the dull thud of a Downing St disco   
Taoiseach says after today's Brexit deal, he believes the next stage in negotiations is leading UK towards alignment with the EU  
The 2019 presidential elections isn't about Atiku, Sule Lamido, Kwankwaso or any other candidate.It's a referendum on Buhari. Simple as APC Everything else is a distraction.- ICHAKA  
Nice one Sadiq, respect “It is outrageous that the Government either failed to properly consider the impact of Brexit on Britain’s economy, or are refusing to release their analysis." 
The lighter side of Brexit.Trying to do Vox Pops in Banbridge in December ...  
Delivering Brexit? Delivering a dogs dinner more like. People respected you more when you said the EU should 'sod off'. You've certainly changed your tune since then.  
3. But auctioneers do. Perhaps they intend to auction off employment rights post-Brexit 
Opponents of Brexit mocked May and her government for dragging out negotiations for so long before finally accepting the reality that the U.K. had no leverage over the EU  
Get used to it. Further capitulation to come showing Brexit for what it is. Less sovereignty, less control, less money for the NHS, less wealth, more austerity. Then we will Remain.  
@theresa_may and @DavidDavisMP have made a disaster out of Brexit and @BorisJohnson and @michaelgove should both hang their heads in shame because they have let the 17.4 million Leave voters down! It has been a utter shambles! The @Conservatives won’t get in again after this!!! 
DUP position becomes more ludicrous. Selling “unfettered access” to “Northern Ireland’s biggest market” as success, when #Brexit by definition means the UK as a whole *loses* “unfettered access” to its biggest market. Totally, totally bonkers. 
Glad the penny's dropped, Nigel. Given people didn't vote for this Brexit, no doubt you'll welcome Britain adopting the alternative that 16.1m people did vote for?  
More invaluable digging on the true story behind Brexit - Today what you should know about VeteransForBritain @AdamRamsay @PeterKGeoghegan  
Hello to everyone out there who is #FBPE . We are stronger together and can bring about a Vote on the Deal and an Exit from #Brexit . 
The Government would be wise to remember why 17.4 million people backed #Brexit last year.  
Little girl on the tube (reading a newspaper headline): That says 'breakfast before breakfast'.Her mum: The first word is 'brexit'.Little girl: What does brexit mean?Her mum: (sighs) 
Trump is beefing North Korea, China, Russia, and every muslim country on the planet. Theresa May better remember he dissed her on twitter and tell him she’s busy with Brexit when he asks for help in world war 3.  
."Ireland has just done Britain a favour of historic dimensions. It has saved it from the madness of a hard Brexit." 
#Brexit #Ireland 1) No hardening of the border 2) Regulatory alignment on the whole island 3) Respect #GoodFridayAgreement in all its parts. However, EP will only give green light if these commitments are fully enforceable. 
Theresa May's Brexit deal will dumbfound her critics. She is more resilient than they bargained for, writes @JamesKirkup 
I'm arguing against a decision which I believe was a mistake and seek an opportunity to overturn it democratically, by convincing others.Your screech SHUT UP WITH YOUR WORDS, YOU, YOU, YOU... REMOANER TRAITOR!And you think I'm the one who doesn't understand democracy? #Brexit 
The Brexitidiots are really, really angry.With a bit of luck they might call for a second referendum. 
Theresa tell us there’s been a lot of give and take in the Brexit negotiations so far. We give. They take. 
has @theresa_may bounced back with a clever deal on Brexit. Or dop you think she's sold out. I don't. do you? join me on @lbc from 7 
Brexit in the terms that it was sold is proving impossible to deliver. Whether it's on the NHS, Northern Ireland, or the "exact same economic benefits", Leave campaign promises have been dismantled.  
A slightly longer piece from me on the joint report and where it leaves us. Brexit deal allows for three different types of Irish Border. via @IrishTimes 
Corbyn is so anti European, he doesn’t even question the validity of challenging and stopping #Brexit He plods on issuing pitiful criticism’s of Tory delay in pushing it through. He wanted it faster  I don’t think he has the brains to realise how crass his comments are   
My bit on today in the Brexit divorce. Which yer da's taking well  
Signing trade deals with countries around the world has been called the great prize of Brexit.  
These clowns. Two days ago they told us they had no idea how Brexit impacted our jobs and the economy. Today they're blowing their own trumpet.We already have the best deal.#StopBrexit 
BREXIT: So the news is a 100% betrayal of what 52% voted for; more delays, ECJ rules for EU citizens in UK & a massive shakedown payment = this whole saga looks like a Buggers muddle & looks nothing like proper Brexit = Q. - what have indigenous Brits got in return ? ZILCH 
Theresa May's Brexit Breakthrough boils down to this:  If Britain can't negotiate a way back into the Customs Union and Single Market, we'll remain fully aligned with it anyway...er.  
Going on @rtesixone shortly to talk about Ireland and Brexit 
May agrees EU judges will keep powers for YEARS after BrexitWho agreed she could do this? Not me & 17.4m!  
French blue-eyed boy in village nr Nice allows a post-Brexit deal ear tickle from kindly English lady. An innocent gesture you’d think, but Gove, Johnson and DUP have already been on the blower accusing my missus of cosying up to them Europeans. @thecatreviewer 
"They want to make the election about Atiku, it's a referendum on Buhari's poor performance. Leave Atiku alone" 
May’s Brexit deal: Nigel belatedly feels humiliated ( and about time too!). But never fear. Viagra is now available over the counter for men his age ( so I read) 
Sadiq Khan has commissioned his own Brexit impact report for London because the Government didn't  
Lord Nigel Lawson tells @IainDale Brexit deal is "just about acceptable" and had a warning for the Prime Minister on “obstacles” ahead  
In a last-minute act of desperation, Theresa May has abandoned every red line on Brexit  
Very honoured to be asked to make a short video on a topic of my choice for a prominent and cutting edge US digital channel. Details to follow. My selection? Brexit. 
I defy anyone to read "Harry's Last Stand" & still argue for austerity, #brexit or nationalism. A searing & detailed read by @Harryslaststand 
Now time to stop the undemocratic attempt to rob Britons of our right to Freedom of Movement in 31 countries.#Brexit is theft.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Making our sign now @marcthevet .... all dog owners take a photo, contact your MP.... let everyone know that WE ALL support #LucysLaw - let's make politicians huggable again. Help your MP become popular again - we might forget Brexit if they make puppy farming misery history!  
"Britain simply will not get the right Brexit deal if we have the drift and division of a hung parliament" - It’s been six months since the general election. Here’s our look back at 'May's election gamble’ (with a little help from Johnny Cash) #NewsnightAdventCalendar 
When Cameron lost the Referendum, the Conservative Party installed Theresa May, a known Remainer. Ever since, we see why. Parliament has become toxic, the enemy of the people. Brexit means Brexit was subterfuge, she meant Brexit means Remain. 
In the race for "Biggest Own-Goal In Human History," Brexit is edging past Trump's election by a hair.   
So let me get this straight. We’re staying in the customs union and single market, we’re allowing free movement, we will continue to pay into the EU budget but we don’t get to help decide any of the rules anymore? But I’m not allowed to call Brexit voters idiots, apparently. 
Right. May "triumph" allows us to pay a shedload of money to scrabble around for a worse deal than we already enjoyed. Remainer lions sold out by Brexit donkeys. 
Last set of RTs"2015 election is a referendum on GEJ's performance" ~ Rosanwo, Doubleph et alBut 2019 is not a referendum on Buhari performance?You people need to see a shrink... 
An actual image of Brexit negotiations. #BrexitDeal 
NEW: Theresa May's Brexit deal is more generous on benefits for EU citizens than the one David Cameron secured two years ago   via @jamesrbuk 
•BBC: “Why isn’t Corbyn saying anything about Brexit?•Labour: “Today Corbyn gave a speech at the United Nations that talked about Brexit”.•BBC: “Meh!” 
The EU and Japan have struck the world’s largest free trade deal; an agreement that Britain will try to replicate after Brexit  
Hard Brexit STILL ON: Labour Brexiteer @KateHoeyMP tells PM @theresa_may to 'beef up' negotiation team to fight off EU 
You got the Brexit result wrong. You got the election result wrong. And on this, the biggest issue of all, you’re wrong. Die Hard is a Christmas movie and everyone knows it.  
It is now five months since “right to Leave” had lead in YouGov’s Brexit tracker  
There is no Brexit 'deal' that fixes the Union. The only relationship with the EU which can possibly be acceptable to the people of Scotland is a deal freely negotiated by the democratically elected representatives of an independent Scotland. #Referendum2018 
It's no longer looking less like hard or soft Brexit - more like "Pointless Brexit" 
And......here we go. Right on time Ruth Davidson uses any Brexit development to bang the union drum. Could set your watch by it. Give it a rest.  
Amnesty say they will break the law and take funds from George Soros to push abortion referendum. #CriminalAmnesty #ObeyTheLaw #DirtyMoney #savethe8th 
I’m trying to follow the latest on #Brexit, apparently we are going to follow all the EU laws, pay the EU lots of money, but not be in it... 
Still best depiction of #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Comment: Confused on what #brexit means?Ultimately and soon the uk gov needs to confirm (as it maintains) that Scotland will not get what n.ireland will get.For Scotland that is incomprehensible economically, legally and socially & will require a new independence referendum?  
It wasn’t at all clear in Brexit referendum we’d be leaving single market. Before pulling out of our biggest market the public should be given a vote. 
Matt on the Brexit breakthrough – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
In celebration of our likely movement towards the Norway model, here’s a Norwegian Forest Cat. #Brexit  
Nigel Farage: Everything that’s been agreed today, everything, is against what 17.4 million people said on June 23, 2016British PM had to fly through middle of night to meet 3 unelected people who condescendingly now say ’Jolly well done, May'#Brexit #EU 
As I board flight from Manchester one of the ground staff says “thank Ireland from all of us for the soft Brexit”. A message that I have heard several versions of during the day.  
Great work from the Mayor of London.How's about doing the same for those of us who live in the Manchester area @AndyBurnhamGM? It would be much appreciated.@Mcr4EU @Labour4EU @JeffSmithetc #Brexit 
Brexit deal shows that transparency seems to work better than secrecy in negotiations: EU embraced it and got nearly everything it wanted. 
Have a read. The DUP position is much closer to the Brexit position than that of the Prime Minister.  
Nah. This actually makes ditching Brexit more likely. The hardliners have been sidelined and we're moving onto discussion of what we can gain from relationship with EU. That discussion leads logically forward to the advantages of full membership for a country of our size. 
@Eileen43Eileen @Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery In the bleak midwinter, homeless folk did groan, Theresa blessed some Food Banks, heart just like a stone, Brexit made her skin turn blue, Arelene turned the screw, Gove unsheathed his dagger, and the price will be paid by YOU  
You're absolutely RIGHT!With an open border in Ireland, people from all EU countries can just flood into Northern Ireland!! Nobody voted Brexit so we could have open borders! Stop this madness!!!(Love, a concerned Remainer ) #ISayItBecauseICare 
The media are hyping up May’s big #Brexit “achievement”. Let’s be clear, she’s wasted 18 months squabbling with the EU and her Cabinet to agree with pretty much what the EU put on the table at the start. In doing so, she’s left too little time for the trade and transition deal.  
Lots of conversations taking place at our #BrexitCafe  in Bristol. From NHS to freedom of movement, young people want to have a say on Brexit   
"Nigel speaks the truth""I think Andrea Leadsom should have been Prime Minister & not Theresa May.I don’t think she’s any good.She was a Remainer & it should have been a Brexiteer that should have been the Prime Minister”#Brexit #EU 
The electorate gave you an INSTRUCTION to withdraw from the EU. In that instruction was an order to control our borders; instead you allow more immigrants & families to further degrade our public services. RESIGN and get a Brexit supporter to do your job. 
If there can be no hard border between Newry and Dundalk, and no hard border between Larne and Stranraer, nor between Cork and Cherbourg, how can there be a hard border between Dover and Calais?  Hard Brexit seems to be toast. 
Coming next, a Brexit divorce: the kind that involves the police| Marina Hyde  
Fudge, fudge, fudge. One step forward, two steps back. When will the pro-EU MPs in all UK parties show some courage and call for a second referendum? 
Brexit supporter tells James O'Brien he voted to leave EU over lack of 'white faces' at his local hospital.  All this chaos for this sort of bigoted, uneducated f*****g nonsense.  
Today, add the word 'contradictory' to chaotic, clueless and disastrous to the Brexit lexicon. The sheer absurdity of this endeavour is simply breathtaking. 
Same invoiceSame lawsSame customsSame bordersLess influenceSame trade dealsMore FarageMore BorisMore MoggMore CorbynMore McDonellMore AbbottMore divisionMore DUPPolitical turmoilGlobal ridiculeRemoanersBrexitersWas it worth it? #brexit 
Don’t worry about the BBC SKY or the Times and the Torygraph get your expert analysis on today’s Brexit news here>>   
When you hear tonight on the BBC of the wondrous Brexit deal done in extra time by our glorious PM, burning the midnight oil for us, remember it is the state broadcaster telling you that, and it might not be quite so true. 
My column for Prospect on today's developments in EU talks- It's not unfair for Northern Irish people to get 'special rights' after Brexit, merely a recognition of what we've been through  
The UK government said there would be a red line on money and EU courts when it comes to #Brexit - but what happened to it?  
"If Scotland becomes independent before Brexit takes effect – and there’s still plenty of time for that – it can quickly secure unbroken EU membership from within and enjoy the same leverage as Ireland has deftly deployed with the EU behind it."   
The hard-right want a 12 pints of Stella,  fight outside the kebab shop, blood down your shirt and vomit over your own shoes Brexit  
Quite concerned at the greeting of #Brexit news as good. It is, depending on the breaks, possibly better than it might have been. But it's vital to remember that Brexit remains an absolute 100% disaster, even if Irish border issues are solved. 
Corbyn reiterated his desire today to leave the EU.☞ BBC News - Corbyn on UK relationship with EU after Brexit  
The rights of EU scientists in the UK formed part of this morning's statement on Brexit.  
NEWS! Popcorn sales skyrocket as Remainers settle in to watch Nigel Farage and Arron Banks explode over Brexit deal  
Brexit update: thanks to the growing realism forced on the deluded shower of twats in the govt & thanks to the skill of the civil servants negotiating the detail, UK now has a real chance of deal which is only slightly worse than the status quo - rather than an utter catastrophe. 
The idea that the EU respects Ireland’s national integrity or popular sovereignty is a sick joke  #Brexit 
.@IainDale gives his view on Brexit deal and thinks it’s “probably the best Theresa May could have got” after she was humiliated on Monday  
Hard Brexit is dead. It is no more. It has ceased to be. It is an ex-hard Brexit. It's just that the government doesn't necessarily know it yet.My take on today's common-sense revolution:  
Never ceases to amaze me, when (as I did today) I talk to a Tory audience about #Brexit, what a bunch of ersatz-marxists they all become: suddenly, politics means nothing and the EU is bound to give us a brilliant trade deal because of the economy, stupid. 
Very significant day/week for Ireland, arguably most significant since #independence. First time in our history Ireland had power over Britain which was used effectively & magnanimously. Bigger UK conceded to smaller BUT independent neighbour  Over to you Scotland #Brexit  
@OfficeOfRG / these elections are not a referendum on my leadership .. I am 100% confident we winning .. pm only thinks about himself 
So we have a Brexit deal.It is exactly what the EU said it would have to be at the beginning of the talks. 
At what stage of the Brexit negotiations do they decide which cheeses we’re still allowed to eat? 
8th December, 2017: the day Hard Brexit died  
Life moves fast #Brexit  
From today's @FinancialTimes #Brexit #impactassessments 
Me for @NewStatesman - a belligerent British bloc is emerging to take on weak Westminster  #brexit 
I've read the full Brexit deal so you don't have to — and even made notes to translate the gobbledygook into English (I take cash or bank transfers as thank yous):  
This is good from @katyballs who crunched the numbers on which MPs want what from Brexit:  
We've examined the 15-page Brexit breakthrough. Here's what it says (and what it means)  
Oh Dear, you just don't know when to keep quiet, do you?Britain is going to pay the EU a £40 billion Brexit bill just to keep things that they already have while having absolutely no say in how those things are run. Sounds like a very good reason for #indyref2 
Yoohoo, journalists - you’ll be saying ‘Labour has no vision post-Brexit’ - here’s proof of a rather attractive vision we can all appreciate! Have a look. Perhaps even write about it? (Accurately, natch!) :-  
Like millions in the UK, I feel badly let down by Parliament.Half of the UK clearly wanted nothing to do with Brexit, and believe that this island is being unfairly separated and excluded from our EU family; as a result our EU citizenship is being forcibly removed. We should: 
The question that BBC Laura, Sky Faisal or ITV Peston dare not ask Theresa May about how she concluded the #Brexit divorce deal..  
Our Brexit negotiating team were meant to be negotiating on behalf of UK. They have been clearly negotiating on behalf of the EU. Sack the lot and start again. 
So @jeremycorbyn, leaving the EU and being isolated will really help us tackle tax-dodging international capital! Stop trying to deceive us!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
I genuinely don't get this guy. The biggest issue facing the UK right now is Brexit & he seems to avoid discussing it at every opportunity.  
While we have our battles with the Establishment SWAMP, the British are waging their own brutal war in having their will be done with Brexit.The big difference is that we have a true transformational leader in Donald J. TRUMP! While they have an Appeaser!  
Definitely had something in my eye when Leo spoke about birthright of Irish citizens in 6C and assurance of never again being left behind by an Irish government.Any chance of bar of "On the One Road" or am I just being greedy? #Brexit 
Theresa May refuses too disclose the final exit fee You can bet it’s a lot more than there willing to admit Politicians forget they are working for us 
The EU is using Ireland to batter Brexit and weaken British democracy. Politics doesn't get more ugly and cynical than this. By Brendan O'Neill in the Irish Times.? 
Following last year's EU referendum, Britain is at a crossroads where we have to rethink our role in the world. Labour rejects those who want to use Brexit to turn Britain in on itself and exacerbate our current economic system’s insecurities and inequalities.  
Jingo Rees-Mogg still hasn't come out with high praise for the Brexit deal. Must be busy sawing off a leg to relieve the pain. #stopbrexit #BrexitDeal 
Cabinet Remainers ‘Delighted’ with Brexit Deal, EU Prez Brags UK Will Be Powerless During ‘Transition Period’   
Sorry, to brag but I'm living in Vienna (until Brexit drags me back for good next month) so just an hour's drive outside the city... this is the #Snow we have.... 
#Brexit #citizensrights 1)All rights & benefits covered 2) No more"settled status"3)Direct effect in UK law 4)ECJ binding. But withdrawal agreement for EP only if 1)Also for future partners covered 2)One cost-free declaration per family 3)Free movement of UKresidents in whole EU 
Remainers, regretters, soft Brexiters - given what transpired today, lets lobby our MPs to stay in the single market. EFTA Brexit (the only workable version of brexit) would honour the ref, save an enormous amount of trouble, and keep our right to study/work/retire in EU/EEA. 
Sadiq Khan has commissioned his own Brexit impact reports because the Government didn't  
James O'Brien takes down Brexit voter who complained about lack of 'white faces' at his local hospital  
The astonishing call from a man who voted Brexit because he saw “too many brown faces” in his hospital and supermarket  
Can you say something, literally anything, on Brexit please? You were guilty of a dereliction of duty during the Referendum campaign and you're doing the same now. The silence is deafening. 
Telling comment from #EU chief #Brexit negotiator:  "I have never quoted any figures and will not start today, because they can change," Barnier told reporters. 
Robert J Somynne: Brexit, Irish Borders and the Scottish Question  
Our statement of today on the EU/UK negotiators confirming “sufficient progress” allowing #Brexit negotiations to proceed to next level. Our views are subject to confirmation of agreement of the people of #NorthernIreland @DUPleader @J_Donaldson_MP @ianpaisleymp @NigelDoddsDUP 
Jaysus. Whatever side of the #BrexitDeal you lie on, you should probably check out the #Brexit Christmas song  
More time to sabotage#brexit  
Friends! Some highly original thoughts here!What Christmas will mean to them:1. No Brexit.2. Trump's resignation.3. Support for #WeHateHate, i.e. smash the Fascist Daily Heil, etc.4. Jeremy as Our PM.5. No Christmas, as clearly it's a Hate Festival.6. That's all, folks! 
It's a capitulation because you promised something that could not be delivered. You told people they could vote to abolish gravity and the reality is that you can't. Your whole Brexit vanity project has been a monumental waste of time, energy and goodwill. 
Sadiq Khan to commission his OWN papers to study impact of Brexit . Well if Davis won't do it.....  
So we’ll pay BIG Divorce Bill for less advantageous deal, little change & NO SAY at  EU top tableThen along comes DickShite, Dominic Raab, repeating same gobbledygook &lies told during Referendum to justify adherence to £40bn that could’ve been invested in ‘the ppl’@SkyNews 
Selling us a pup: Theresa May's non-deal with the EU on Brexit  via @MidWalesMike 
Universities UK has welcomed the initial Brexit agreement, but stressed that phase two of the negotiations will be hugely important for universities. Our statement:  #brightestminds 
"Sufficient progress" ≠ done deal(1) Irish border q to be solved.(2) Brexit € to be finalised - not clear EU shares €40-45bn Brit estimate.(3) Citizens' rights needs to be turned into legal text. MEPs think more work to do.(4) + Euratom + governance ++ etc 
I'm opening a virtual Brexit pardoning service, in the great British tradition established by the middle age pardoners. In exchange for a large sum of money, I will offer forgiveness to Brexholes for their gross stupidity. I expect to be swamped. 
Royal Mail have just told me they WON'T be issuing a special set of stamps to mark Brexit Day on 29 March 2019, despite issuing these commemorative stamps when Britain joined the European Economic Community in 1973.  
The UK is paying 40 Billion Pounds to divorce the EU, but keeping the exact same relationship but with no say or control in them.Brexit will be the defining moment of British stupidity for generations. 
Me and @MichelBarnier getting the banter in on a momentous day in the #Brexit process  
Brexit is now a bit like trading in your car for a new car, only to discover that you've just paid a fortune to buy back the same car but with slashed tyres and no steering wheel.#BrexitDeal 
The Irish have saved us from a hard Brexit. Let's face it. They've saved us from ourselves  
This is *very* important.The EP has to approve the Brexit deal, and EP’s Brexit rapporteur @guyverhofstadt’s point 4 here is VITAL.Good work Guy! 
Would be really interesting to be a fly on the wall at the #Brexit cabinet meeting, where Hammond turns to Johnson and Gove and says 'You lost, get over it!'  
Tory Brexiteers defending the £40 billion Brexit divorce bill as a price worth paying to 'take back control' are the same ones who defended £28.3 billion of cuts affecting disabled people as necessary because 'austerity'. #BrexitDeal 
Unfortunately all the other issues fail with Brexit too. How much “austerity” will be needed to a) pay off our EU agreement.b) duplicate every process & EU admin body with a UK flag.c) lose in Brexit related lost trade.d) additional biz costs? e) lost tax revenue?  
The open goal Corbyn missed the other day now bites him on the arse because he didn’t condemn the mess of Brexit, he went after the Gov mess...well May just brought home the bacon.He is so bad at this it’s embarrassing 
Funny how Tories can find £40 billion for Brexit divorce bill but can't find the money to give 128,000 homeless children a home for Christmas #Brexitdeal 
So Britain is going to pay the EU a £40 billion Brexit bill just to keep things that they already have, while having absolutely no say in how those things are run. Well done Brexiters, you've cost us a fortune and lost us sovereignty and control. #BrexitDeal 
Blog: The message from the EU to the UK is very clear: it’s ‘We don’t trust you’ - These are the terms of the agreement reached  this morning between the EU and the UK as they relate to EU citizens making application to stay in the UK after Brexit: I ...  
Yous can send me as many graphic pictures, prayers, made up stories, misogynistic rants and false facts as yous want. It does not change a thing. It will never change my view and I will always be prochoice. Roll on #repealthe8th referendum. Roll on Repeal. Role on agency. 
Finally, we know why the Brexit monkeys are all so angry: it’s because this is what they won.  #BrexitDeal 
Brexit Britain: 'Out of Europe but Run by Europe' Could be worse, I suppose. 
They are just self serving thieves, no interest in the country .. Brexit was built on lies, could so easily ruled null & void. Then we could have started all over again, but NO, they had created a clear path to keeping their beloved tax avoidance.. so obvious when you think..  
Michel Barnier (narrating): She waltzed into my office and as soon as I laid eyes on her I knew she was trouble."You are Barnier, of the EU?" she said."What's it to you, toots? What's your business?""Brexit," she said. Her voice could curdle milk. "Brexit is my business." 
Ever heard of the ‘withdrawal method’ Theresa? That’s what you need to do now. BBC 5live phone-in swamped with calls from Brexiteers raging at 'dogs dinner' Brexit deal   @theresa_may 
Mr Farage is not happy with mays brexit talksEvery cloud Trumps little helper Don’t like EU but keeps his EU pensionUKIP more-like u knob 
This is the reason I drank no champagne on the night of the referendum, nor have I celebrated since in any way.I have been tweeting & broadcasting for eighteen months that we would not really leave.Nor are we so doing.Munich 1938 was a British diplomatic triumph in comparison.  
The DUP, Brexit and the on-off deal. While the communiqué recognises the unique and special circumstances surrounding the issue of the Irish peace process, the Good Friday Agreement and the border it does not address key areas of concern for many citizens.. 
*The Irish Bind*UK is staying inside Single Market & Customs Union til it can untie the Irish border Gordian knot.a) If UK hacks through the knot to get hard Brexit, most NI residents wld rather join IE than stay with GBb) UK can unbind NI-GB - also moving to united Ireland 
This is exactly why we need to stand and be heard, most of these people were given no voice in the referendum even though they’re the ones directly affected, don’t talk to me about democracy #MakeMondayMassive #FinalSayForAll #BrusselsProtest @nickynoo007 
Amnesty is spinning a yarn here to cover the fact that its pro-abortion campaign is paid for by foreign money inc George Soros. Are they getting millions from Soros to push abortion in referendum 2018?  
EU citizens in UK also need freedom of movement. It's not about travelling in Europe freely but about having access, AS NOW, to EU funded opportunities (education, jobs, research etc.). This will be taken away from us post Brexit. UK citizens will lose out just the same. 
'No-Deal' after the Final Brexit negotiations would be a nightmare scenario, but the chaotic Tories would be happy with it.#BrexitShambles #BrexitDeal 
Suspect most voters will not be bothered if there are no material effects, and few indeed will want to hear the word "Brexit" ever ever again.  
We welcome the agreement between EU/UK today and commend the Irish Government for their work. Proud that a united Dáil Éireann and European solidarity helped our negotiating position. #brexit #iveaghhouse  
Brexit moves closer to reality, world stocks cheer 
Hooray! Real independence! We get to choose how we obey EU instructions!And lose our say in making those instructions!Rule Britannia! #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
BBC 5live phone-in swamped with calls from Brexiteers raging at 'dogs dinner' Brexit deal   
And as long as UK technically leaves the EU (with a long transition period leading to Norway or Canada type agreement), then the mandate of referendum (on the actual question asked) is fulfilled. 
#BREAKING Britain to pay £35-39bn in Brexit divorce deal: Downing Street 
Brexit as sold to the British people is proving impossible to deliver. This is why May has backtracked on so many of her red lines in this morning's deal.  
Today's #Brexit deal guarantees the rights of 32,000 EU nationals at UK universities and means the UK will keep its #H2020 membership until the programme ends:  
This was @Nigel_Farage’s reaction to the Brexit divorce deal a short while after it was announced this morning  
Some Sullivan that didn't make the article: "I think the old hard-core supporters, the 55-70 year olds, miss Upton Park. Large chunks of the supporters love the new stadium, particularly the young ones. There’s a big age split. It’s a bit like Brexit." #whufc 
Watch as Tory 'Greg Hands' tries to gaslight Andrew Neil in order to cover for David Davis' lies on the Brexit papers. What a bunch of chancers we have running the country.#BrexitShambles #BrexitDeal 
Today’s Brexit deal will be welcome news for hundreds of thousands of EU nationals across London.  
So we've taken back control and can set whatever policy we want regarding money, laws, and borders, as long as what we want fully aligns with EU law, which we now have no say in. Great job Boris!#Brexit #BrexitDeal #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Watch this 2min spot on Brexit analysis of today’s historic dealHard brexiteer Tories completely capitulate along with their shambles of a Govt ceding to the will of the EU!!! Wait for Daily Hate and Scum newspapers in the morning ‘duping’ their readers   
Parliament is debating the #FinalSay referendum petition on December 11. If you can, join the protest in Parliament Square running through the day and on into the evening. Help make our voice heard loud and clear!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
The final para in @davidallengreen's piece on this morning's #Brexit deal is vital & points to the Good Friday Agreement/Belfast Agreement being potentially one of the key pieces of legislation in the modern western world  
Sinn Féin has concerns about Brexit deal - Gerry Adams TD  #brexit  
Britain and the EU cleared the way to start a crucial new round of talks on Brexit  
Things that are impossible to do.Hold in a fart whilst working outThinking brexit is a good idea Taking only one Pringle Like Donald TrumpNot feel anxious when you see Attenborough trending 
The problem with such an outcome is that it is difficult to see the point of the cost and trouble and years (and years) of Brexit just to end up with a Norway-type relationship.But hey-ho. 
Ireland's Taoiseach welcomes progress over Irish border issue #Brexit 
6/ Those with an interest will note that if you happen to be born in Belfast you will be able to continue being an EU citizen, those born in  will not. A curious outcome for those who took the referendum to apply  to the entire UK  
Leaked text of proposed EU27 negotiation guidelines on Brexit transition and future relationship, via @politicoeurope (ht @rafaelbehr)See also my earlier blog post on "transition law":  
And The #Winning Continues...Not Tired Yet!!Strong US jobs figures, Brexit hopes, lift global stocks - Breitbart  
The more the #Eurocrats praise @theresa_may's 'determination' the more uneasy we should feel! #TheresaMay is not telling YOU the truth about the #EUDeal she is seeking with the #GANGSTERS in #BRUSSELS, UTTER #TREACHERY! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #UK #EU #BREXIT  
We always knew that if we gave the EU a finger, they would take both hands. Welcome to day 1 of phase 2 of the Brexit talks.  
As someone not that bothered about whether UK technically stays a member state of the EU but wanting for UK to stay part of the Single Market, today is the best day since the referendum. 
Maybe @theresa_may has found a #Brexit formula, to leave #EU in theory but not in practice. 
In your heart of hearts you must know what the answer is : Stop Brexit 
European parliament's chief Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt says MEPs' recommendation to the European Council is to move forward with the second phase of negotiations which must address five outstanding issues regarding citizens' rights 
Ireland is the Remainer Trojan Horse. And maybe the Leave campaign and Brexiteers have to accept blame for that. They gave next to no thought to Ireland and the Irish border in the campaign and had no answers to the questions brexit posed. So fallback position is soft brexit.  
Shame the government didn't buy bitcoins a year ago, we'd have paid the Brexit bill already and cleared the national debt by now 
Of course the #NHS is up for grabs In post #Brexit economic chaos. That's why we can never stop fighting  
Brexit is basically going to be nothing changing except the EU (quite rightly) punishing the UK in the region of £40bn for kicking up a fuss a year ago. Well done, dickheads. 
Really, he can't believe his luck.In order to keep her job she has betrayed the entire country #BrexitDeal #Brexitshame @theresa_may #Brexit @Nigel_Farage 
All #Conservative #Voters, #Members & #Activists who support #BREXIT need to now call for the purging of the #SPINELESS #PATHETIC #COWARD @theresa_may from the #ConservativeParty! GET RID SOON AS! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #Conservatives #NEWS 
#Brexit: 'Breakthrough' deal paves way for future trade talks  
Staggering, news outlets running an unchallenged clip of Michael Gove saying Brexit deal would mean "more money for the NHS and Schools"TORIES HAVE CUT REAL TERMS BUDGETS OF BOTH NHS AND SCHOOLS OVER THE LAST SEVEN AND A HALF YEARS.#BrexitDeal #ToriesOut 
LIVE from the European Parliament with the #Brexit Steering Group  
When the UK thought it could take no more resources from New ZealandIt let it go without a referendumWhile Scotland has resources valuable to England, they will never let us goWe have to take that into our own hands 
Here's what you need to know about what's been agreed on Brexit from the @BBCRealityCheck team 
Eighteen months on from the referendum, @Theresa_May has scraped through phase one. Tory chaos and posturing has caused damaging delay and risked serious harm to our economy. We need a much stronger and more constructive approach in crucial phase two. 
If the Americans come out now and say, "sorry, we said we'd only do a deal with you if you went down the deregulation route, and you haven't," then sweet holy Christmas it's gonna kick off in Brexit Britain 8/ 
Great news about Brexit. Does anyone know when we should start feeling financially and spiritually better off? Dead looking forward to this brighter future. Cheers everyone and well done. 
In light of Brexit Irish Border & Budget concessions by UK, this is also worth Yes/Leavers bearing in mind . . #NowIsTheTime  
Is Theresa May learning from Donald Trump? All she needs to do is *say* it’s a Brexit, and have her party nod sagely in assent. Even if everything in reality stays the same. 
.@GerryAdamsSF says there are some positive elements in the #Brexit doc but says there are issues re rights @rtenews 
Not to mention those ever-so-clever folk who told you Brexit would be the fatal blow that caused an exodus and meant the EU would unravel within months. *cough*  
Not sure what to make of the UK-EU deal on Brexit yet? Looking for a quick guide to help you decide?Simple. Nigel Farage hates it. It must be good.   
SO AN INDY SCOTLAND WOULDN'T NEED A HARD BORDER WITH ENGLAND!!!Sturgeon: Brexit shows independence means no hard border  
The UK Prime Minister Theresa May evidently brushed aside the DUP's huffing and buffing, warning: either agree to my proposal to the EU or I'll be forced to resign and you'll get a Jeremy Corbyn. #Brexit @sinnfeinireland @GerryAdamsSF @JohnODowdSF @DeclanKearneySF @An_Phoblacht 
LATEST: Anti #BREXIT #REMOANER @vincecable #LibDems #MP & Leader has welcomed @theresa_may's #EUdeal! Now 17,410,742 #Brexit #voters should start getting very CONCERNED! @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #UK #EU #NEWS #BBC #SKY #TORY #UKIP #LABOUR #UKIP @ConHome 
#British anti- #Brexit activist Madeleina Kay, who calls herself 'EU Supergirl', pretends to punch Boris Johnson lookalike Drew Galdron outside the #European Commission headquarters in #Brussels , #Belgium@albawhitewolf @Letters2EU 
Ruth Davidson on today’s #Brexit news ; “Throughout this process, my overriding priority has been toensure we act as one United Kingdom.”    Sounds like the words of someone whose eyes and ambitions are focussed outwith the place she was elected to serve. 
Brexit The undefined being negotiated by the unprepared in order to get the unspecified for the uninformed 
That phase 1 agreement points the way to BINO - Brexit In Name Only. (Or Britain Is Norway, OK?)  
Just at Arthur's house having a ham sandwich and a pint of Proper Black. We are planning an anti-Soft Brexit stunt. We have settled on unfurling a banner over the M1 at the Narborough bridge that says 'NO SOFT BREXIT MAY OUT!' 
Today @theresa_may put party before country.17.4m people did not vote for today's botched #BrexitRT if you agree@Nigel_Farage is right to attack this sellout of our country.#LBCLIVE #skynews #Conservatives 
How is it possible that the Minister for Brexit can lie to Parliament on at least 9 occasions about impact reports & the BBC runs it as 3rd or 4th on their news bulletin running order, then forgets about it altogether within 24 hours?  
Au contraire. Today’s ‘Brexit Deal’ delivers:- the threat of us staying in SM and Customs Union unless we accommodate the Irish.-£35-39bn taken off British taxpayers.-Enshrined the right of the ECJ to interfere in our affairs.  
Today’s deal brings Britain closer to a soft Brexit, which is a good thing. The danger now is becoming tied to the EEA with *literally* no say in it. Pursuit of EFTA would give us stability and some say in those rules. 
Bravo @SadiqKhan. Facts & evidence matter, not blind faith in the cult of Brexit.  
Be in no doubt Dublin see this as leading to a soft #Brexit - either a trade deal which ensures no hard border, so close trading relationship or a fall back agreement meaning "full regulatory alignment" for U.K. 
In response to a gibe from @Jo_Coburn about Corbyn not speaking on #Brexit today, @Keir_Starmer said he was speaking to the UN in Geneva. The @BBC later rewarded us with a 3 second clip of Corbyn's speech. The rest of the world is listening to him. 
Brexit deal: 'I believe we have now made the breakthrough we needed' says Jean-Claude Juncker  
Dublin react to Brexit deal  
A Brexit existing in name only?By me, at FT. 
.@mrjamesob perfectly handles caller who voted Brexit because he saw "too many brown faces" in his hospital and supermarket  
Can Leavers please give CONCRETE answers to these serious Brexit questions.If not, then surely it's time to #StopBrexit 
How David Davis Said The Brexit Talks Would Go Versus How The Brexit Talks Went  
Thanks. I think that was the bit when Jo questioned why Jeremy Corbyn wasn't making any comments about Brexit Deal... then cut to Jeremy Corbyn in Geneva making comments about Brexit Deal. Will you be tweeting any clips please? 
BREXIT: Let’s check in with Daily Mail readers to see how news of Theresa May’s deal has gone down, shall we?  
If the craziness of hard Brexit is off the table (watch the wreckers try to put it back on) we have choice of two options worse than now: Norway or Canada. Former offers no control; latter doesn’t cover services, which is most of our economy. 
Let that last paragraph sink in. They have agreed to pay £50 billion to get an inferior trade deal than the one we already have. The absurdity of Brexit.  
Yes, and they are all predicated on one fundamental truth: a democratic vote in a national referendum decides our future not Eurocrats, civil servants or politicians who all “know better”.  
Superb analysis of where we are with the Brexit negotiations by @martinmckee Highlighting the "divorce bill", EU citizen rights (note the health deal for EU-UK residents, not tourists) and what can only be described as the 'Irish bind' to Single Market: 
The more the #Eurocrats praise @theresa_may's 'determination' the more uneasy we should feel! #TheresaMay is not telling YOU the truth about the #EUDeal she is seeking with the #GANGSTERS in #BRUSSELS, UTTER #TREACHERY! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #UK #EU #BREXIT  
FM @NicolaSturgeon: 'A UK government that is able to say that come what may, it will avoid hard borders with Ireland/NI after Brexit can never again tell Scotland that independence would mean a hard border between Scotland and rUK'.  
Seriously? Did you win your job in a raffle? Full time, highly remunerated MP doesn’t understand the basic principles of Good Friday AgreementIf I was a constituent of yours I’d be worried about lack of knowledge #brexit If 
“Cynical” “aggressive” “green” and “partisan” - DUP’s Sammy Wilson MP criticises the diplomatic approach of Taoiseach and Tánaiste to #Brexit talks and Northern Ireland #newsatone @rtenews @eastantrimmp 
Great analysis of the constructive ambiguity in the language of the final text of the Brexit deal by @BBCChrisMorris 
How does @theresa_may getting 2 hrs sleep warrant a breaking news story?! I'll tell you what's bloody newsworthy: the scandal of NHS nurses working relentless night shifts, only to have to go to the food bank at the week's end due to 7 years of real-terms pay cuts. #Brexit 
Regardless of whether or not you support Brexit, how confident are you that the British government and the rest of the EU will be able to reach a deal on Brexit before March 2019?RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Brexit negotiations, to date:• Same regulations• Same open borders• Same European courts• Same single market• Same payments to EUBut:• Lost all say in EU rules• Squandered 1000s of jobs• Knocked 18% off the pound• Risked the Union• Spent £50 billion 
Hard Brexit has been lost, get over it.  
Nigel Farage blasts Theresa May's Brexit deal as 'pathetic'  
More expensive fish & chips with #Brexit  
First Minister comments on Brexit developments - more info  
.@ShelaghFogarty Everyone is talking about the rights of people from N.Ireland, the rights of EU citizens etc.Whilst these things are incredibly important, what about the rights of millions of other people in UK who didn’t vote for this Brexit BS? What do we get? Sweet FA. 
Brexit has confirmed for me (and many more) that the EU is far more organised, logical, fair and effective than Westminster ever was or is ever likely to be. The UK is now totally dysfunctional. Scotland is far better directly within the EU. #Brexit #indyfer2 #IamYES 
That’s correct. The Brits are doing this because they are idiots and Brexit is crap. 
Today we discovered that Brexit doesn't mean Brexit.The UK government basically wants a Brexit deal that is a poundland version of EU membership deal, but one that will cost £billions to secure.Any deal is worse than the current deal. #BrexitDeal 
The biggest Brexit battles are yet to come  
Larry David was once fired from Saturday Night Live and just showed up to work the next day pretending nothing had happened. That's exactly what the UK needs to do now with Brexit. 
.@theresa_may has totally caved on our rights. It is a shameful day for Brexit. We were encouraged to be European in our outlook, we have built our lives around this idea. It will be a shameful day for the @Europarl_EN if it accepts this. 
How humiliating for a British PM to go to Brussels like a thief in the night to kowtow before unelected commissioners & concede to all their demands, she has sold Brexit & her country out. 
#OldLabour’s comments regarding the #Brexit deal are hypocritical and ludicrous. REMEMBER: They wanted to secure the rights of #EU nats in the #UK without securing equal rights for UK citizens in the EU. #Betrayal = #Labour 
The reason the UKs position on brexit was such a shambles was because everyone had different ideas about what 'brexit' was. What did u expect to happen? #Brexit #DestinedToFail #BrexitDeal 
Given this morning's news, what type of #Brexit will we get?RT for pretend accuracy 
BREXIT DEAL - it is worth you knowing that the proposed "deal" directly affects our family. We now have nowhere where our family's right to stay together as a family is guaranteed. In the UK my wife is not fully eligible for permanent residency because (thread)  
As #Brexit moves one stage closer, is the humiliation over for PM May or is it just beginning? Well... #MirrorInsid… 
#Brexit breakthrough: Here’s what it all means  
Everything is about Brexit today, so Jeremy Corbyn is in Geneva talking about the 2003 Iraq War 
Theresa May's Brexit deal - 14 of our favourite responses to help take the edge off it  #Brexit #BrexitDeal #TheresaMay 
The way these (so-called) negotiations are going, UK won't see benefits of Brexit for many years, Theresa May will be long gone by then. It's a sell out, not just the payments, but our ability to get going with new trade deals. #Brexitdeal 
Not sure what is different between today and Monday on the UK-EU agreement on Ireland, other than a DUP cave-in? #brexit #BrexitDeal 
#NigelFarage: The #British #PM flying through the night to meet 3 unelected men and agree to every single one of their demands is humiliating for our country!  #Brexit #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #EU #TORY #LABOUR #RT 
So Brexitears, if Brexit is going to be so great, show us the impact papers and let them vindicate you....  #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Having worked through the night on the Brexit deal and flow to Brussels and back, May honours a constituency engagement this morning and then gets abused by cretins in the replies. Why would anyone want to be a politician?  
#Brexit : les amples concessions de Theresa May | par @canalbernard 
Maire Coleman notes someone discussing #Brexit deal today referenced Seamus Mallon’s famous “slow learners” comment  when they said: “Friday’s deal was Monday’s deal for slow learners”. 
Well this is very interesting: If you look at the clock in the background, assuming it is showing the correct time, this photo with Boris Johnson was taken at 4.30am - just before Theresa May left for Brussels. Getting her Brexit ducks in a row...  
We now go live to the UK Brexit negotiating team  
One of the benefits of Brexit is that it puts a certain sort of Eurosceptic out of business 
People saying today kills off Remain are underestimating the power of 'what's the point of this #Brexit'. 
BREXIT BILL £35BN+  
I will give my opinion on the Brexit deal soon. Right now, I'm just learning the basics of it.  
I really do hope history books of the future will contain a few pages praising @Keir_Starmer for single-handedly, inch by inch, while being heckled from every side, dragged Labour -and by extension the country- to a reasonable position on #Brexit.They certainly ought to. #bbcdp 
My View on Theresa May’s Resistance To BREXIT: Anyone Resisting Implementation of BREXIT - Which Was a Referendum Approved by The British People, is  Totalitarianistic  
Graat @mrjamesob @LBC Show challenging racism + fighting Brexit myths. Bloke has the patience of a saint 
#bbcdp ....**FREEDOM OF MOVEMENT PROTECTED**Funny thing is, MOST brexit voters voted to leave the EU on one issue only.AN END TO IMMIGRATIONLittle Englandshire shall be a ticking time-bombSit back Scotland....Hold steady, steady, steady  
The @Conservatives are trying to sell today's #Brexit agreement as some sort of triumph. 1. UK should have been in this position months ago.2. Theresa May has conceded to #EU on very issues she said she would not.3. Most difficult decisions have been left for second phase. 
She pulls an all nighter negotiating Brexit and then still finds the time in the morning to visit constituents for such an important cause as dementia? Admirable. The woman is made of steel.  
#Corbyn makes impassioned speech about tax avoidance. Good. Now waiting for him to make an impassioned speech about Brexit avoidance! @acgrayling @Keir_Starmer 
'Detailed Brexit Reports' David Davis lied about?Guess what friends, little, tiny @YesCymru published 'independence in your pocket' - more & detail than UK govt has published. And now free for public to read. Nothing to hide.  UK is a Con. #BrexitDeal 
Treason May has completely sold the UK down the river with Brexit. The British public voted to leave. What do you get? You get remain (you only leave in name).So much for democracy. It doesn't exist.RETWEET if you think Theresa May has to LEAVE! 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says his party wants a "close and co-operative relationship" with Europe after Brexit 
Promises made during and after the referendum have now collided with the legal and economic consequences of leaving the EU. #Brexit makes no sense!  
Of all the commentary around #Brexit today this little nugget is worth genuine consideration - will Dublin Govt now stand up for the rights of citizens in north?  
OK, "Steve" from "brexit central" getting angrier and angrier with @mrjamesob on LBC just now is one of the funniest bits of talk radio I've heard in a long time. I suspect we'll be seeing more and more of his kind in the coming weeks... 
There’s a hole in my Brexit, dear Liza. 
Shameless Michael Gove claims Theresa May 'won' Brexit talks and 'the final whistle has blown' even though they're just getting started 
When will @M_AndersonSF get the credit she so rightly deserves for placing #Brexit #Border & special status high on the agenda of the #EU ? She has done magnificent work for #Ireland  @FineGael @campaignforleo 
"To get the exact same economic benefits that we enjoy at the moment in the EU, once we have left, we need to say in the single market and the customs union permanently" @ChukaUmunna #Brexit #bbcdp 
Sadly UK won't automatically benefit post Brexit & will have to negotiate bilaterally from scratch with JP as well as Anglosphere Commonwealth countries like AUS, NZ & CAN who are HardBrexiteers promised prosperity sunlit upland FTA hopes for UK  
Maybe some of the Leavers whining about today's agreement will finally grasp that they were lied to by those claiming Britain held all the cards in the negotiations.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Today’s #BritNat Tory  #Brexit  agreement re IrelandTells us that there would be no Hard Border between an independent Scotland and the rUK Another Unionist project fear lie debunked  
"We are 18 months into this process, half-way through the whole process. and very little progress in the overall scheme of things has been made" @ChukaUmunna #Brexit #bbcdp 
 “@theresa_may is a Weak & Pathetic #PM! #BRITAIN deserves BETTER! This #COWARDLY #PM #Theresamay is humiliating our Great Nation on a daily basis! She MUST GO for the sake of #BREXIT!  #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty 
Thanks to Con/DUP/Brexit:Pregnant women will travel from Belfast to Bristol for abortions.Pregnant women will travel from Bristol to Belfast to give birth to EU citizens.What a world... @karinsmyth @MollyMEP @ThangamMP @KerryMP @darrenpjones @JolyonMaugham 
Rare good news. Remarkable turn of events in Ireland/Brexit talks - effectively requiring UK to maintain alignment w/EU rules & customs union so as to protect Good Friday Agreement & NI peace. If NI tail wags Brexit dog, could this make Brexit less likely?  
Maybe now is the time for those of us who don’t want Brexit at all and those who want a hard Brexit to compromise over a soft Brexit? 
I agree with this. UK may not stay in customs union but two key prizes of FTAs - agricultural tariffs and standards - are no longer UK's to decide. So forget about trade deals with Aus, NZ & US. Those were the only real things they wanted from us. It's soft Brexit or no Brexit.  
"The most difficult challenge is still ahead," Donald Tusk said after the #Brexit talks were given the green light to move to the next stage  
‘Pathetic’ – Appeaser @theresa_may Makes Heavy Concessions on Money, #RegulatoryAlignment, and the #EU #Court as #Brexit Deal Struck  #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #EU #TORY #Labour #LabourParty #UKIP #NEWS #Tories #RT 
Pro-EU fanatics: 'We demand a soft Brexit!'UK government shifts towards a soft Brexit.Pro-EU fanatics: 'Capitulation!' 
"Eighteen months of bluster, of "Brexit means Brexit", of "red, white and blue Brexit", of "no deal is better than a bad deal". And for what? Brexit, it turns out, means whatever the EU27 want it to mean." #ToryBrexitShambles #BrexitDeal 
Brexit Minister just said the UK won't be implementing new trade deals during the transition period (which he's hinted could be longer than 2 years). Remain by the back door continues. #bbcdp 
Post May's Brexit, a Romanian working in McD can STILL bring over his wife,4 kids AND parents to live in Britain with BETTER rights than us Brits. AND they can take their case all the way to the ECJ. How is this fair? #Brexit #NoDeal #LeaveEU Pls RT and like if you agree 
The folks who demanded this, are very quiet on NO BREXIT ANALYSIS  
Wish she’d give the ‘Scotland has to go down with the UK Brexit ship’ a rest....  
Khan is such a talented politician. He'd make a great Prime Minister, if we could get him past the haters. #brexit  
I think #TheresaMay has made an early get away but we decided to add a bit of colour to the #Brexit proceedings. #EUsupergirl #StopBrexit been giving out letters too! @Letters2EU  
EU citizens living in the UK and vice versa will have their rights to live, work and study guaranteed, says @jo_coburn #bbcdp #Brexit  
Notes on May's Brexit surrender:1. We don't need to take what we're given; we're not in the gutter. England exports up 14.1%, Scotland 19.9%, Wales 18.9%, NI 13.3%.2. MPs just chose Clegg's ‘How To Stop Brexit’ as book of the year. They WANT to fail.   
Northern Ireland 'prefers joining Republic' in event of hard Brexit  
In the opinion of @fotoole "Ireland has just done Britain a favour of historic dimensions. It has saved it from the madness of a hard #Brexit." 
UK-EU joint report: "In the absence of agreed solutions, the United Kingdom will maintain FULL ALIGNMENT with those rules of the Internal Market and the Customs Union which, now or in the future, support North-South cooperation."  What part of that sounds like Brexit?  
The Brexit breakthrough is a rare moment in the sun for Theresa May  
Theresa May might be smiling but Brits living in France and the EU certainly aren't. Brexit deal has been described as a "double disaster" and "worse than we expected". @BritishInEurope 
Don't forget a Tory Brexit will mean-NHS & public services sale of the century - private profiteer heaven-Removal of all democracy-Removal of human & animal rights-Removal of workers rights - even lower wage no right economy-Offshore tax haven heaven #BrexitDeal 
A Brexit deal is reached:• EU hails this "compromise"• May: In our best interests• Promises no hard Irish border• EU ready to turn to transition• Guarantees for EU citizens• Britain commits financially 
To be fair I think it’s going to be the Leavers with the massive chips on their shoulders.  They were warned, over and over, that Brexit would NOT get us a better deal.Well done for screwing the UK. As predicted - we will be WORSE off. It’s on *your* shoulders. 
Do you think Theresa May has sold out on Brexit? Join us live:  
The #BadDeal in #Brussels today is good #news for the #TRAITOR & #COWARDLY #PM @theresa_may as we can now move on to the next stage of the Total humiliation of #BRITAIN & the 17,410,742 #Brexit #voters! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #EU #TORY 
Stop talking Brexit down.  
David Davis said claims UK would pay a £40 billion Brexit bill were "made up". Downing Street just confirmed they'll pay £39 billion.  
This is a truth every TV reporter should repeat so that folk understand #Brexit  
#Brexit deal reduces risk of crashing out. Good. Amazing of @theresa_may to tie UK leaving #SingleMarket to Irish border. Will last decades 
Labour has capitulated its responsibility as official opposition.  It’s clear now, that when it comes to #Brexit, only @theSNP are the REAL opposition.  Not even a mention from Labour of economic cost! 
Among #AP10ThingstoKnow: Homes, horses burn in newest California wildfire; Israel beefs up Jerusalem police force ahead of protests; UK, EU claim Brexit breakthrough.  
Well done May, Boris & Gove the #BrexitDeal means it's gonna be soft Brexit... You have tanked the economy but you haven't taken back any control. 
Ah, a deal on Brexit. >“Capitulation!” say some. >“Huge win for UK”, say others. Good day to remind you that the secret engine of human history, and indeed Twitter, is confirmation bias.The point of journalism, by the way, is to exercise the opposite: i.e. scepticism. 
Regulatory alignment with the EU is completely unacceptable and doesn't respect the referendum result  #Brexit 
The British taxpayer won’t be happy that T. May has agreed to pay a Brexit bill of £35-£39bn. We’re effectively going to be paying the EU membership fee for 4yrs after we leave. Didn’t need to be paid. Shouldn’t have been paid. The EU were greedy & we buckled. 
Brexit is on the road to betrayal. We need to take back control from the Tory Brexiteers, writes @Tom_Slater_  
A very tough statement by @BritishInEurope who represent interests of UK citizens living in EU. Very disappointed with deal; no reassurances. @skynews #Brexit  
Sadiq Khan to commission his OWN papers to study impact of Brexit  
Saw one snowflake fall in Dublin 3 just now. CLOSE THE SCHOOLS/ROADS/AIRPORTS! CANCEL THE BREXIT DEAL! 
Brexit talks progress.Live with yer da...  
5 things for Friday:- Brexit- Russia investigation- Sexual harassment and Congress- California wildfires- School shooting 
“It’s the Jim Bowen of national diplomacy. Look what you could have won!” #Brexit@mrjamesob @LBC 
Britain and EU clinch divorce deal to move Brexit talks onto trade  
Watch this 2min spot on Brexit analysis of today’s historic deal...  
The only way to stop May's traitorous Brexit deal is a leadership challenge. Her deal effectively overturns the Brexit vote. It was her plan from the very beginning to undermine Brexit & we must get rid of her. Corbyn may as well be in power May is no different to Labour! #Brexit  
#Brexit Fact:EU demand: Permanent ECJ oversight in the UK for EU citizensUK demand: No ECJ oversight in the UK post-brexitDeal: Time-limited ECJ input *IF* referred to by a UK court. IE if a UK Court decides. After time limit, no ECJ oversight #BecauseOfTories 
The UK government has agreed a 2 year transition period which takes us up to just before a general election, without sorting the Irish Border issue, just kicking it down the road to sort out later. We’re living the Garbage Men episode of the Simpsons.PS Brexit isn’t happening  
Let's remember on Ireland, three weeks ago Dublin demanded written guarantees on a hard border. Whatever the detail they have achieved that. Like so much of #Brexit so far, from original starting point it is the U.K. that has moved not the EU.  
Britain and the EU have reached a preliminary agreement on the terms of a "Brexit" divorce  
Our editorial @EveningStandard today: EU deal is a victory for a softer Brexit - and points to the shape of things to come   
You have completely killed off the Tory party, you should resign and make way for someone who understands what Brexit meant to the 17.4 million people that voted for it. 
EU: This costs £100David Davis: I’ll give you £20EU: £100DD: £50?EU: £100DD: £80? That’s my final offerEU: £100DD: £90 or I walk away.EU: £100DD: £95?EU: OK £95DD: YESEU: Plus a £5 handling fee.DD: Sure whatevs#Brexit 
This is absolutely brilliant! The perfect christmas song for Brexit  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard as there’s white smoke over the Brexit negotiations  
No, the Brexit deal hasn't just 'sold the country down the river'  
People like you told many lies to Scotland in 2014 one of them was there would be a hard border after independence which after today proves you lied. We are entitled to another referendum because you lied your way to a No vote! 
There's no good reason for Britain to pay the bill for the EU's pension Ponzi scheme  #Brexit 
Don’t miss this tonight @talkRADIO #Moats #Trump #Jerusalem #Brexit #Ireland #Tory #Labour 
Extraordinary thing is the agreement takes a problem (Ireland) which was ignored during the referendum and for most of the negotiations and crafts the entire nature of Brexit around it. Consequently it’s looking like a v different deal to the one we were expecting only recently. 
Brexit It’s a deal!!!! Christian Adams - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
German politicians calling for a United States of Europe.  UK govt moving towards a Brexit trade deal.  Voting to leave the EU looks like a smarter move with each day 
I was going to make a Brexit joke, but I'm still negotiating with the DUP about the punch line. 
The dogs in the street maybe. The leading Brexit campaigners, not so much.  
10 key sentences from the Brexit document and what they really mean: my analysis for @IndyVoices 
Two of the world’s largest economies firging ahead with an FTA, whilst UK still unclear about what it actually wants #brexit everybody has the right to change their minds  
Not much remains of Theresa May's red lines after Brexit deal  
As #BrexitDeal is in the news, here’s Brexit explained by Sir Humphrey.  
True. But of course there is no legal requirement to pay anything, which is why no one was told by either side in the referendum.Some believed, I warned time & again, the negotiations would be carried out by a Remain civil service & government who would sabotage itWith BBC help  
Those #Brexit Negotiations in full  
The Tories’ pointless Brexit theatrics wasted months. Now for the hard part | Owen Jones  
A Brexit deal is struck:• Breakthrough in Brussels• Talks can move on to trade• Progress on citizens and bill• But Irish border unresolved• Hardest part "still to come"• Pound rises then weakens 
That #brexit negotiation in full  
Re Phase 1 agreement all the right people are furious. Brexit purist hardliners and deluded ultra-Remainers. 
Leaked EU doc reveals Britain will remain in Customs Union and Single Market for two years after Brexit officially happens - a total Establishment shafting.  
More added to the Brexit headbangers' “traitor” list: First it was remainers, then journalists, academics, experts, judges, MPs, Lords, the Queen, bregretters, the Irish, Muslims & various random others. Now they've added the UK gov't to their listMaybe LeaveEU are the traitors  
One thing that's very clear from today's agreement is that the Irish will get a vastly better settlement than the British. They keep their right to Freedom of Movement in 32 countries, we lose ours. We are the idiots!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Theresa May's concessions confirm the Tories are a Soft Brexit party. Keir Starmer made it clear this week that Labour is Soft Brexit. Big business remains devoted to softening Brexit. This is a good time to remind ourselves what Soft Brexit means - it means Not Brexit. 
A leading Brexit and trade commentator comments.  
The UK has played into the EU’s hands in every step of these talks  #Brexit 
EU Supergirl and 'Faux BoJo' explain why they are in Brussels today. #Brexit  
#Brexit is an attempt to rob the British people to the Right of Freedom of Movement in 31 countries. There was no vote on that! There is no mandate!We must tell our MPs we regard this as a crime, and the perpetrators as criminals!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I have long held the belief that, if Brexit happens, it will be done in such a way that, in reality, very little changes. Today’s events have done nothing to make me change my mind. 
Gove talking about rights of EU citizens here and British citizens in the EU being protected. But the right to Freedom of Movement for British citizens in Britain is being taken away. Unacceptable for a 37% vote which didn't ask the question to do that!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
"Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard Brexit... It is potentially the beginning of the end of Brexit itself."   
#Lunch #LifeStories @ElliePalmaCass gives some great advice for #BrexitDeal Michael Gove European Commission #TheresaMay  and dealing with the #snow Don’t miss the 12 LifeStories of #Christmas starting on the 11th#FridayFeeling #FridayMotivation #Brexit #wigan  
#Brexit deal was all about give and take.The UK gave and the EU were on the take, as usual.We should walk away nowto give UK commerce time to prepare for WTO tariffsWith WTO tariffs UK will be £7bn a yr BETTER offWe can spend that on the NHS etc@ForBritainParty@AMDWaters 
Amazing that the #brexit solution after all this seems basically to be the UK staying in the EU but being allowed to tell people it has left, and they in turn agreeing to nod sympathetically. 
SF talking to Taoiseach, Tánaiste and British Prime Minister on this mornings Joint report on protection of whole of Ireland’s interests in Brexit negotiations 
Brexit Bill- will be £35-39 billion NET 
TOMORROW!! SATURDAY 9th DECEMBER@Open_Britain's partner organisation in Wales, @WalesForEurope, will have volunteers out across the country engaging with local residents about #Brexit and the #NHS. Join them in #Newport #Cowbridge #TheMumbles #Llandudno 
You would need a heart of stone not to laugh like a drain.(A soft Brexit is still in accordance with he referendum result, as long as UK leaves the EU.)  
OK, so Brexit is cancelled and a Corbyn government looks like a dead cert. @theresa_may must be the most ineffective PM in living memory. 
The fact the EU, remainers and the cabinet are all spouting self-congratulations today, is evidence enough we've been stitched up into their pathetically named 'soft-Brexit'. 
Thread on education system / my speech in the Lords: 1. We are in the grip of a national and social crisis (not just Brexit). @sarahoconnor_'s Shit Life Syndrome not just in Blackpool - across many 'left behind' communities. Poor education is at the heart of this. 
Fintan O'Toole: Ireland has just saved the UK from the madness of a hard Brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May agrees breakthrough Irish border deal with EU leaders Prime Minister and European Commission President announce that 'sufficient progress' has been made to unlock the negotiations  
she is a remainer, shes appeased the remainers. no courage to explore the world no negotaiation took placeno back boneno choice for the public to choose a party that'll follow Brexit all parties are remainers 
Is that the way to frame it? EU has not won - Brexit is a lose-lose game. Brexiter dreams are melting away in the face of practical realities they have always refused to engage with. EU trying to save us from worst of self-harm. 
'We are picking up the tab and we look like mugs,' Nigel Farage on the #Brexit deal.  
#Brexit - Let' be clear what happened today, the EU has given the UK the green light to start trade talks. That is all, Brexit has not been settled. The most contentious issues in the divorce HAVE NOT been settled, their remain as time bombs waiting go off. (1/3) 
I get securing rights of EU citizens who were here before the referendum. But not those After who knew what the situation would be. And definitely not their mothers, fathers, children, partners, aunties, uncles, cousins. And if they are not in UK no child benefit 
'The whole thing is humiliating, we've collapsed on every level,' says Nigel Farage on #Brexit deal.  
EU demand: Permanent ECJ oversight in the UK for EU citizensUK demand: No ECJ oversight in the UK post-brexitDeal: Time-limited ECJ input if referred to by a UK court. After time limit, no ECJ oversight.And people say May capitulated to the EU  
Nigel Farage popped round last night and wouldn't stop crying about not getting the Brexit he wanted. At least I think that's what he was on about - I was too busy waiting to see if he noticed that I'd served him up a glass of Beast Man's piss.  
Seeking clarity on Brexit phase 1 report: I meet Tánaiste @simoncoveney shortly.Michelle @moneillsf talking to T May later this morning. 
Today’s EU/UK deal means Tories & DUP conceding #Brexit on the terms they promised is undeliverable. Open Irish Border = staying in #CU #SM in all but name so why leave these for inferior deal? @Open_Britain @OwenSmith_MP @ChukaUmunna @Keir_Starmer @RCorbettMEP @SKinnock 
As Mayor, I’ve commissioned independent economic analysis of the impact of different Brexit scenarios on Londoners’ jobs and prosperity. https://t.co/k8KurcGAIS?amp=1 
Spare thought for what must be a very tough time for @Nigel_Farage as he performs the mental gymnastics required to believe no one told him this would happen before the referendum. #BrexitDeal 
Theresa May has basically just scrolled straight to the end of the document and ticked the box saying she has read the Brexit Terms and Conditions. 
He spins this by implying Brexiteers accept the idea of ANY ‘Brexit bill’ - more reasons to despise the bbc  
Just in case people wondered about my stance on Brexit, since I'm British - I did vote Remain. Leave was the right decision.Shame that the British Government hates their people. 
A price well worth paying for Brexit  
The very word #Brexit has been highjacked, we voted for independence from the European Union not a Brexit of EU sorts. 
Looks like Fianna Fáil's entire #Brexit position was to try and pin blame on Sinn Féin if no deal reached. Michéal Martin's claim in Dáil on Tues that Martin McGuinness "contrived reasons" for collapsing Assembly were truly disgusting given his patience in working with DUP. 
This Brexit capitulation is virtually the opposite of what I voted for. Voting counts for nothing. Our democracy is a total sham. 
The ‘Br’ in #Brexit signifies ‘Britain’ i.e excluding NI. If we were to be included then technically it should’ve been ‘UKexit’. So I guess Theresa May has been telling the truth all along when she’s been saying ‘Brexit means Brexit’ 
The UK electorate voted for Brexit.The UK electorate then voted for Brexit to be done by means of a hung parliament.A two-stage mandate.This is the result. 
We started on 27% for yes in 2014. New poll is 47% and that’s without the 16-17 year olds( who btw are majority yes!)  No Appetite? Sorry, folk are becoming hungrier for independence, as Westminster incompetence plays out Another vote is on its way -Thanks to Brexit  
You cannot really accuse her of selling you out, since she has never been in favour of leaving the EU.  The sellouts are (or will be) those Tories who used the referendum to advance their careers.  
Brexit Bill will come to £35-£39 billion says government. Less, Brexiteers will say, than the £40-£50 billon of conventional wisdom. Much more, Remainers will point out, than any voter was ever told 
BBC think everything is wonderful with Brexit today and yet not one single detail has been announced. A whole string of congratulations to Mrs May for treating the British people with utter contempt.#FBPE 
“If Scotland becomes independent before Brexit takes effect – and there’s still plenty of time for that – it can quickly secure unbroken EU membership from within and enjoy the same leverage as Ireland has deftly deployed with the EU behind it.” 
Brexit Impact Studies discovered on display in the bottom of a locked filing cabinet stuck in a disused lavatory with a sign on the door saying ‘Beware of the Leopard’#BrexitImpactReports #H2G2Brexit 
No one should be under any illusions: the terms of any Brexit deal will represent the greatest act of protectionism by any developed economy since the 1930s. Inescapable consequence of ruling out “Norway option”. Today’s deal changes nothing. 2/2 
I wish there was no Brexit, nothing good has ever come from it.. all about power all about fear hate and prejudice, just so divisive and intentionally so 
My reaction to the Brexit deal developments this morning:  
Not much remains of Theresa May's red lines after the Brexit deal | Politics | The Guardian  
#BrexitDeal belated progress leaves many questions unresolved - and poses new ones about what#brexit we might be heading for: 
Today’s Brexit deal delivers:- No hard border in Northern Ireland- Secures a good financial deal for British taxpayers meaning more money for our priorities like housing, schools, and the NHS- Secured the rights of EU citizens living here, and UK citizens living in the EU  
Retweet if you think Theresa the Appeaser needs to go now before Brexit is completely sabotaged by her relentless caving & cowardice. 
The consequence of a Remainer as PM. She wants to concede, to appease, to keep as much of the EU as possible entwined in the UK’s affairs. Now we know ‘Brexit means Remain’  
Mr Mayor has also commissioned independent analysis of the impact of Brexit on Trumpton. They'll be on display in the bottom of a locked filing cabinet stuck in a disused lavatory with a sign on the door saying ‘Beware of the Leopard'  
#Brexit Phase 2:The UK qualify from the group stages for the knockout round. They will now play:The CabinetThe DUPJacob Rees Mogg 
The UK and the European Union reached a significant milestone in their pursuit of a Brexit deal, breaking a deadlock that allows talks to move on to a crucial second phase   
Our fatberg Foreign Secretary now little more than a Speak Your Weight machine robotically reiterating all the old 2016 Brexiter cliches. Brexit is in retreat. None of this is relevant any more. Neither is he.  
It is outrageous that the Govt either failed to properly consider the impact of Brexit on Britain’s economy, or are refusing to release their analysis. We need to know the impact of different scenarios on our economy in order to deliver a Brexit deal that protects jobs & growth. 
I've commissioned independent economic analysis of the impact of different Brexit scenarios on Londoners’ jobs and prosperity - they'll be published in January. 
Impressive, We weren't dictated to by the EU before, but because of Brexit we now literally will be for two years. Well done brexiteers you've finally manufactured the thing you were complaining about.  
Perhaps you've missed the big news, alignment means we'll have to comply with EU law on Tax Havens. That's no good for the sponsors of Brexit, it's actually funny. Everyone gets screwed, except the EU. #stopbrexit 
Taking back control postponed to 2021 #Brexit 
WATCH: our chairman, @RolandRudd, on how the facts that have come to light today are quite different from what was promised by Leavers during the referendum campaign. Please RT:  
Britain and EU effectively park the Irish border issue until later in Brexit process  
In non #brexit news, Ireland is criminalising campaigning organisations for their work on human rights and equality. Irish law is being weaponised by those opposed to our work.  
How shameful that May lives in the same building that Churchill and Thatcher did. I will never vote tory again.  Now the damage is done it matters not where the cross goes because we are once again under the jackboot of the EU. Brexit means brexit. Bollox you idiot. 
Brexit negotiations have revealed a lot of Remainers' true colours, with them actively willing the EU to punish Britain. Do they identify with these unelected pencil pushers? What kind of person looks at the EU and sees a reflection of themselves? 
Brexit deal in the minds of Brexiters versus reality.  
All you need to know about today's Brexit deal.  
'Pathetic' – Appeaser @theresa_may  Makes Heavy Concessions on Money, Regulatory Alignment, and the EU Court as Brexit Deal Struck  
Anyone heard from @UKLabour about #Brexit today? Will @jeremycorbyn acknowledge that he was wrong and acknowledge a deal has been struck in line with the original table? I suspect they will continue to talk down the whole country again  
So basically Brexit has been cancelled but we're still going to spend loads of money lose all influence over eu law lose lots of business through uncertainty lose the EMA and EBA create vast new UK-only bureaucracies foment social division and lose status. Well done Brexiteers. 
Good Friday Agreement may end up giving us soft Brexit, keeping UK in single market & customs union. Not what DUP intended.  
Intriguing, not to say funny, to wonder if a DUP cheered on by Tory Brextremists may unwittingly deliver soft Brexit for the whole of the UK 
"Citizens first. EU citizens' rights will be protected, especially the right to live, work and study and family reunification." @JunckerEU's full speech at press conference with @theresa_may after sufficient progress in #Brexit negotiations →  
We now go live to Lord Petyr Baelish with the latest #Brexit impact assessment.  
Despite scraping past the first stage of negotiations, the Government is still in chaos over Brexit. The people must have the final say on any final deal. My thoughts via @LeftFootFwd  
"Did the British people vote for a #BrexitShambles? For a coalition of chaos where a party which represents less than 1% of voters has the final say on any #Brexit deal?" @GreenKeithMEP asks. 
If it’s proving difficult to remove ourselves from a 40 yr old economic union, how much harder would it be to leave a 310 yr old economic, social & political Union? #Brexit 
Fintan O’Toole: This could be the begining of the end for Brexit  
I keep being asked if today's Brexit deal includes UK citizens' rights to move between EU27 states - if resident before Brexit day. The answer again: the issue has been deferred to the next stage of talks   
Obviously unfair. Another reason to fight to have a #FinalSay referendum and to #StopBrexit 
Theresa May pulled an all-nighter to progress with Brexit talks. Similar to that time I stayed up for 24 hours to finish my 'history of commerce' essay at college, except there wasn't the future of 65 million people at stake. 
No you didn't. I voted in the 2014 Scottish referendum & #Brexit wasn't more than murmurings from conservative backbenchers at Westminster 
Brexit deal has more fudge than Cornwall #kickingcandowntheroad 
A nice calm response to tentative Brexit deal from @Arron_banks 
Good news from @theresa_may that we will now move forward to vital Brexit trade negotiations & that this agreement secures rights of 3m EU citizens living here & million British citizens living in EU.  
READ | @Arron_Banks calls on any Tory backbencher “with any integrity or sense of duty left” to trigger a leadership contest and help save the Brexit 17.4 million people voted for!  
Who is this Nicola Sturgeon person I see mentioned less and less following the Brexit deal this morning? 
The Brexit text agreed this morning does NOT guarantee right of onward movement for UK citizens living in EU, but negotiators may return to this issue. 
Leaked EU doc obtained by BuzzFeed: Britain will remain in customs union and single market for two years after Brexit officially happens.   
Here is a look at the first draft of the phase 2 guidelines for a two-year transitional period after Brexit:  
I expected nothing from @theresa_may and she has delivered. The “breakthrough” with the EU is a breakdown for the Brexit we voted for. She is atrocious. 
Brexit has already destroyed NHS funding, NHS purchasing prices and EU nurse recruitment & retention. It's taken the EMA from our shores, jeopardised medicines... and is setting up a UK-US trade deal for American corps to privatise the NHS.  
I'm just waiting for Brexiters to entirely absorb the sentence “in the absence of agreed solutions, the United Kingdom will maintain full alignment with the rules of the Internal Market and the Customs Union".You really stuck it to those meddling Eurocrats, didn't you.#Brexit 
Bernard Jenkin on #BBCRadio4Today: “The Irish Government is being played like a harp by the European Commission.” The insulting, ignorant and embarrassing (for the rest of us) arrogance of the Tory Brexiters. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
NOTE: for Brits whose first Anmeldung in Germany more than 6 years ago, apply for German citizenship NOW.Because as German law is currently you will have to give up a UK passport to get the DE one after Brexit, but NOT if you apply now.DE passport = EU FoM rights guaranteed  
Listening to the backward thinking, mostly aged, mostly inward looking, mostly conservative with a small c people talking Brexit on radio is truly depressing.Small minds who've never ever stopped believing in inherent, God given British exceptionalism.Cringeworthy. 
So we're about to go in for a Brexit that UKIP hates, with, from what I can work out, Northern Ireland becoming a sort of Hong Kong where UK companies can deal freely with the EU across a non-existent border that's nevertheless still there.  Phew. 
May’s need to keep N Ireland close to Republic of Ireland keeps GB close to N Ireland which equals soft Brexit for England,Wales & Scotland too. Voila! 
Johnson and Gove both praising the PM and seemingly accepting the £50bn bill, 8 years of "due regard" to the ECJ and possible compliance with customs union regs if no other solution found on the NI border. Quite a shift. #Brexit  
As Brexit talks now move on, PM must reflect on her approach. Another year of chaos & confusion not acceptable. Or farcical scenes that put jobs & economy at risk. 
My take on the deal for the @Telegraph:  "Today is a moment to savour. We are now set to make an important step on the path to Brexit. So well done, Prime Minister. Thank you to the British negotiating team. And keep up the good work." #GlobalBritain 
July 16 - Scotland must remain in the EUSept 16 - SM and CU membership for ScotlandJan 17 - Norway style deal for ScotlandMarch 17 - Indyref2 (that went went well)Nov 17 - Whole UK in SM and CUAnd Nicola Sturgeon accuses others of being all over the place on Brexit... 
This is why a strong @UKIP with a strong leader like @_HenryBolton is needed as brexit is being failed by a Tory government and would not even be happening under labour. If you want to see brexit succeed vote UKIP when you can #ForTheNation 
The ignorance and arrogance of the Tory elite about Ireland:Where does it comes from - A small self-enclosed elite? Interest only in getting themselves a tax haven? English nationalism?#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Today we can all celebrate the neutering of Brexit, now it's just a question of how we kill it off altogether.  #BrexitDeal #stopbrexit 
Seems #BrexitDeal is Brexit compromised to the point it's become meaningless.... a non-Brexit. A betrayal of Brexit. A betrayal of democracy. 
Sadiq Khan calls for "unambiguous reassurance" on citizens' rights in Brexit deal  
Gina Miller, Alistair Campbell, Tony Blair, Richard Branson, Paloma Faith etc this morning ..... #Brexit  
Guess who are the biggest all-time recipients of European Horizon2020 funds? And guess which universities are now losing ground. Excellent analysis from @higherbaker #brexit  
Congratulations to PM for her determination in getting today's deal. We now aim to forge a deep and special partnership with our European friends and allies while remaining true to the referendum result - taking back control of our laws, money and borders for the whole of the UK. 
DUP are now claiming to have saved NI from a threat to UK market access that didn't really exist or only arguably exist because of the hard Brexit posture they have been pushing. 
All things to all people. UK commits to leaving the single market, but also commits to maintaining an open border. How? By copy and pasting almost all of the rules of the single market and taking them as its own. Out of EU, but destined to copy its rules. Schrödinger's Brexit. 
The UK and EU have secured a breakthrough in Brexit negotiations. Here are the key points of the deal:  
Stopping Brexit is the best deal. And we’re going to. One very big spoke in the wheel: #article50challenge. Support it: 
Hot take on #brexit deal: overall a good  day for Dublin (and EU) but massively increases chances of no deal. Interesting to see Gove go out to defend it this morning 
Britain, EU reach crucial deal to open next phase of #Brexit talks  
Disadvantage of Brexit: Government could have been using the time on new domestic legislation. Advantage of Brexit: Government could have been using the time on new domestic legislation.  
[Deep breath] No fan of #Brexit, TMay or this gov, but given configuration of forces in HoC and the country, she's done as well as she possibly could have done here. 
And, here we go: Ruth Davidson doesn't dare point out what a disaster #Brexit is, so instead of critiquing the UK government she turns around and kicks at Nicola Sturgeon. Grow a backbone, Ruth: being a vertebrate is an acceptable evolutionary position.  
When is David Davis resigning? The 'Brexit Bulldog' has achieved precisely nothing in 8 months of "negotiations". We have just agreed something that was the EU position from the start.  He is also in contempt of Parliament. 
Brexit latest  
A curious statistic ATM is that the number of voters who have died since the referendum plus the number of new voters >18 is equal to the referendum margin = 1.269 million - so the referendum loses it’s validity 
So, that bit was meant to be easy. Now we move on to what @DavidDavisMP says will be “a cinch” – just 9 months to come up with actual solutions, not fudges, and conclude a #Brexit deal that protects jobs, rights, the environment, and the GFA. What could possibly go wrong?  
Today was the day (in all probability) that both "No Brexit" and "No Deal Brexit" died.Now just which form of a deal-based Brexit: Norway or Canada.And the scope of length of the transition: Brexit in name only for a while after Brexit day. 
"The breakthrough that we needed." Britain and the E.U. have agreed on key Brexit terms  
#Ireland has so far managed the unwanted #Brexit process with commitment, nerve & skill. Getting Ireland on the agenda a major achievement, forcing the UK to take the border seriously a major achievement- chapeau to all- just keep it up  
I understand why a load of Brits are angry today - esp. Brits living in rest of the EU.But this is ultimately what Brexit means: it means rights people have enjoyed are shredded. It’s shit. That’s why #Brexit is shit.Protecting yourself as well as you can is the only option. 
Democracy, Tory style. Keep moaning despite Scotland voting for a party that promised another referendum. 
For anyone who has followed closely the EU negotiations with Greece over the last few years, the choreography today in Brussels is eerily familiar. It's like watching a Hitchcock film. Everyone but the victim-to-be knows what's about to happen when she gets in the shower. #Brexit 
The cleverest experts from 27 countries versus the biggest twats from ours…. another victory for Brexit 
Look I had to blog about this because it was making me angry and I am meant to be doing other things and I couldn't until I'd got this off my chest.Its about the uni 'mis-selling' story, and you probably dont care because brexit but if you do here you go: 
Progress on #Brexit talks ... but how? #Brexit #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #EU #BrexitDeal #FBPE 
James, it might be the #Brexit you voted for but it certainly wasn't the one I voted for. And many others like me. #LeaveMeansLeave 
'Ireland, it isn't Brexit that threatens your nationhood; it's the EU, which time and again has shown utter contempt for your institutions and your voters. Don't side with this oligarchy - join us Brits in opposing it'Brendan O'Neill in the Irish Times? 
The Prime Minister has done what is necessary to get Brexit talks on to the next stage - but we should have got to this point many months ago. Businesses need greater clarity on an interim deal if we are to protect investment and jobs.  
Britain’s crack negotiating team were through the first hurdle ...#Brexit  
‘Pathetic’ – Appeaser Theresa Makes Heavy Concessions on Money, Regulatory Alignment, and the EU Court as Brexit Deal Struck  
Good to see that sufficient progress has been made in Brexit negotiations in the areas of citizens’ rights, the financial aspects and the (Northern) Irish border. Told @theresa_may I am happy that we can proceed to the next phase in which we can discuss our future relationship. 
Big take away fm Brexit Phase 1 is that far from ‘no deal’ being preferable to a bad one, Irish border Q commits UK to a deal - & likely a soft Brexit 
The whole UK (Eng, Scot, Wales & NI) are leaving the EU (single market & customs union), we are controlling our laws, borders and money. Ongoing EU payments and legal control will ends ,and trade talks are about to begin. This is the #Brexit we voted for. 
Now UK locked into phase 2 of the Brexit process, now would be the best time (on any view) for May to (ahem) refresh the relevant ministerial teams.A natural pause.  
A deal is done - nowt to do with Sturgeon: Nicola Sturgeon loses all influence over Brexit  via @Telegraph 
Kudos to @theresa_may on a  breakthrough Brexit deal: keeping the UK united and delivering certainty for business. Especially pleased that all EU nationals that call the UK home & UK nationals living in the EU, don't have to worry anymore. 
*This issue is the biggest headache for people who need to be mobile for work.*Thx for saying that, Jon. I think it's the first time I've seen that acknowledged by any commentator of note. #Brexit already means, being #British, I'm less likely to be chosen for work assignments. 
On an initial reading (repeat, initial reading) it makes you wonder WTF was last Monday's DUP shenanigans all about? Seems also Britain is buying into full alignment with EU in event of no final trade deal.Softly, Softly Brexit. 
What makes me so livid is the total waste of resources in connection with #Brexit. Instead of addressing our real problems, all the money and effort is channelled into cushioning this self-inflicted blow. #StopBrexit 
Sometimes I wonder what would be in the news if Brexit wasn't a thing. The end of our comprehensive, universal NHS perhaps?  
Well, I’m sure this Brexit shambles will make SOMEBODY a few billion!  That’s usually how these political cluster-fucks work... 
I’m already hearing the Brexit doom-merchants saying “but you had to make concessions!!!” yes, as did the EU. That’s how negotiations work.  #BrexitBreakthrough 
Attention Mark Carney: Time to start hiking interest rates...very quickly. #Brexit  
Music to my ears as raging mad Brexiters call in to @bbc5live phone-in. The over-sold chickens are finally coming home to roost. You Brexit guys should direct your ire at Gove, Farage, Johnson et al who sold you a pup 
Brexiteers allergic to the ECJ & wanting to take the sovereignty backHow about this "regulatory alignment" ?"UK will be subject to all EU law & supervision, without vote or exemption!"#BREXIT #FBPE 
If I am reading the #BrexitDeal correctly, Theresa May has used the Irish border crisis as an excuse to slip a soft Brexit under the table. If so, well played Theresa. 
A £50 billion Christmas price tag for less than what we have already.  That takes a really clever kind of stupid Tory Govt to negotiate that one. #brexit  
For the next Brexit phase each side will now have a team of seasoned negotiators. That in itself is progress. 
All those nae sayers should be feeling pretty embarrassed this morning  @theresa_may has shown herself to be a tough negotiator. We are leaving the single market and the customs union. Now we move on to talk about our ambitious new free trade relationship with the EU. #Brexit  
Arlene Foster has captured the essence of the Brexit deal - "We ran out of time". This is what happens when you start the timer(Article 50) and enter negotiations without planning or researching anything. If you voted Leave were you expecting they would just wing it?  
In very straight terms the UK is straight swapping a porsche 911 for a beige 1998 Ford Mondeo that smells faintly of sick. That's your deal. #Brexit 
These are passages which I think assure a soft Brexit. Ireland will not be a back door to compromise EU's SM/CU; UK's SM/CU will be fully preserved; will be no hard border.Only line which doesn't stand up to scrutiny - and may yet break the whole thing - is 'UK leaving SM/CU'. pic.twitter.com/4wneqs7gFk 
The First Minister is right though... shes outed a lie that was peddled by your side throughout the 2014 referendum. But of course, instead of responding intelligently to political debate, you do your usual whining.  
Please do not mix up FoM and right to residence on the Brexit citizens rights issue!As a Brit resident in  I can still go and take a day trip to , or go on holiday to , unrestricted, after Brexit day.But I could not move to LIVE in  or  w/o restriction 
Having scanned through a number of twitter threads this morning I will be offering my now #expert opinion on the #Brexit deal on Funk FM at 10:15. 
A decent Budget that didn't unravel. A Brexit phase 1 deal that is welcomed on both sides. Almost like we have a functional government! 
Now is not the time for gloating. Long roads etc.. and the peace process is just that: a process. The Agreed Island John Hume speaks of requires constant vigilance and understanding #BREXIT 
If you have appreciated all the free content on this account on Brexit then please consider pre-ordering my Brexit book out next year: Published by Oxford University Press. 
So UK government insists Brexit deal will guarantee soft border and free moving trade with independent neighbour in European single market. Surely what’s good for the goose is good for the gander. #Scotland 
Mary Lou McDonald expresses concerns about the customs union and single market #Brexit  
Here's the real breaking news on Brexit - my column's out, let's see the news channels interrupt everything for THAT  
On the 8th day of Christmas my true love sent to me 8 kilos of fudge fresh from the Brussels departure lounge #Brexit 
This is blueprint for Crap Brexit - long transition, no nuclear winter and no land of milk and honey either, as you were but a bit more remote, having lost a decade. Just a vast waste of everyone's time and money. 
The only Brexit breakthrough Britain needs is a second referendum. 
Brexiters, if you love this country, and you support Brexit, you should be crystal clear on what a 'good' #BrexitDeal would look like. So watch this:"Phase 2". 
A statement from Pundit Central: when we said stage one agreement on Brexit talks was mission impossible, obviously we meant stage two. 
You know Brexit is going to harm Scotland immensely, yet you and your colleagues have done nothing to try to protect Scotland. It's shameful that the only time you surface is to make another meaningless anti-indy pop. What are your policies? Are there any? 
How long will this deal last before it's torn apart by Theresa May's own MPs? And what will happen next, seeing as Cabinet hasn't even discussed what final Brexit outcome should look like? Vital we keep fighting to give people the final say with chance to #ExitFromBrexit 
Brexit has already made Britain more outward looking. We can now name at least one Irish politician. 
As talks move on to phase 2, remember that the deal we have now IS the best possible deal.MPs must be granted a binding #voteonthedeal ahead of March 2019.The fight to stop #brexit continues. 
Today is an important step forward in delivering Brexit. With political will & vision, the next chapter we write in our history should be a positive one to secure our future success. Let's talk trade. 
So, today we learned that Brexit means the UK:* obeys all rules of single market * obeys all rules of customs union* pays £50bn divorce bill* loses all influence in EU but must follow all rules* (Freedom of movement as yet undecided)Anyone vote for any of that? 
“It’s just not good enough!” @Nigel_Farage gives his reaction to the "pathetic" Brexit agreement reached this morning  
I’m pretty sure in a decade’s time hard Brexit believers will be talking about this in the same way some Communists talk about the failure of the USSR. The government didn’t do it “properly”. 
My Brexit book can be pre-ordered here: (Sorry for the plug, forgive me.) 
Ersatz Brexit. Blue passports. No MEPs. No influence. Everything else continues as normal. A mass surrendering of power and influence to placate a few million racists and Peter Bone. #FaxDemocracy 
No longer talking hard Brexit are negotiations imperceptibly begiinning to edge towards eventually accepting the customs union and the single market? 
When Farage is apoplectic you know things can’t all be bad. #Brexit 
*And* now I can (finally) finish my Brexit book for it to be published in the spring.So even if Remainers and Leavers are unhappy with "sufficient progress" on these terms, I am certainly not unhappy.A Brexit book before this point would be more speculative than concrete. 
NEW: Statement from @Keir_Starmer responding to the @EU_Commission's announcement that sufficient progress has been made in the Brexit talks.  
Sufficient progress in #Brexit negotiations: watch LIVE press conference by @MichelBarnier on the details of the agreement reached on 3 priority areas: - citizens' rights, - Ireland- financial settlement 
#Brexit has now reached that part of the process where the UK are still living in the box room and have to listen to the sound of the EU and Northern Ireland riding next door. 
Brexit deal: everyone born in N Ireland will retain EU citizenship after May agrees no hard border – live  
Personal note on the citizens rights thing: when Brexit vote happened I knew I had to bide my time and apply for a German passport (I can apply in 2019).For Brits in the rest of the EU that cannot do that they’ve got good reason to be v annoyed today. 
I think the UK has been bullied into this bad #Brexit deal by Brussels   
Fundamentals in all of this.....Northern Ireland will not be separated in any way from the rest of the UK after Brexit. Unfettered access to the UK market. No borders in the Irish Sea. Positive day for the Union. Now to the next stage and getting the best UK/EU trade deal. 
We seem to have achieved a non-mad first stage of Brexit deal. Which presumably means Brexiters will hate it once they realise. 
1/ Some first thoughts on the agreed Brexit report.It's not the withdrawal agreement as such, and the text may be adjusted to take account of transition and future relationship points.  
She should never give it a rest. She's fighting for Scotland and ensuring we are aware of the decisions we can make to ensure we protect ourselves from this farce that is brexit. Whether we choose Indy or not I'm glad someone is giving us the choice.What are you doing? 
Quite.No Deal vs No Brexit is now yesterday's debate.Now it is, in effect, Norway or Canada.  
Faced with these new facts people will understandably want to keep an open mind as to whether the costs of Brexit are worth it. 7/7 
I've now read the EU Brexit paper in full.  Seems to me it's about as positive as it could be in the circs. Nigel F may fulminate, but he was always going to. Compromises on both sides, but nothing in this to frighten the Brexit horses.  
Still no solution over how to prevent a border between Ireland and Northern Ireland. The biggest obstacle to the government's Brexit plans is being kicked into the long grass. 
British PM Theresa May spoke of her six #Brexit commitments to Northern Ireland  
It's worth reminding MPs that the only party to support Brexit prior to the referendum were UKIP. Now it seems Labour and the Tories do. Those MPs need to know that in a mere 18 months they've become UKIP lackeys without UKIP having a single MP. They’re doing UKIPs work for them 
It's not that now. People have changed their minds in light of Brexit and the damage it will do to Scotland. 
UK will obey EU regulations without any say in them, European Court supremacy in some areas and EU payments continue for years, no border checks in Ireland, EU Citizens rights in UK guaranteed. This, apparently, is what ‘Brexit means Brexit’ means - for now? 
Today's agreement welcome as reduces risk of catastrophic No Deal Brexit. But still a long way from a final deal, and even further from delivering on what Brexiters promised. British people, not Tory MPs and the DUP, should get final say on whether that deal is good enough 
Have you actually read the text?Clearly NOT.The rights are NOT the same. Brits in other EU states cannot move their permanent residence to another EU state after Brexit. Right removed.  
Leo Varadkar says you can’t have unfettered free trade (ie a future FTA between EU-UK) unless you have alignment on standards and regulations in the area of health, environment, labour standards. That is going to surely limit Brexit dreams of FTAs around the world. 
Full alignment with EU rules is not Brexit. I thought you were a genuine Brexiteer. This is probably the biggest sell out of the UK in our entire history! 
Plenty of EU flags in high Wycombe for the brexit conference. Expecting many remainers. #FBPE 
Taoiseach says Brexit is a British policy that the Irish Government never wanted to happen, and so it is in our interest that the Brexit that does happen is as soft as possible 
Quick thoughts on #EU deal; as I predicted red line on #ECJ has gone with continuing jurisdiction in transition period & beyond. Towel thrown in on the money. Detail re border with Ireland still to be worked out but big climbdown by @theresa_may & DUP #brexit 
Varadkar oh irish radio saying changes since Monday are ‘stylistic’ and only major new development was paragraph 50. Dublin will be delighted w/no prospect of problems at Holyhead #brexit 
"We want to build bridges, not borders" - Irish PM Leo Varadkar says the deal has "achieved all we set out to achieve" #Brexit  
Brexit is like the disastrous wedding in a romantic movie and you are waiting for Richard Gere or Hugh Grant to burst in and call the whole thing off but they never do and then you realise it isn't a romantic movie but a really long tragic arthouse movie and you can't escape. 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 8: the car industry has been plunged into uncertainty since the referendum. Pls RT:  
BREXIT BREAKTHROUGH! U.K. ALLOWED TO SELL "AS MANY TURNIPS TO THE E.U. AS WE CAN CARRY IN A WHEELBARROW": JUNCKER. 
We have achieved all we set out to achieve in Phase 1. This is not the end but it is the end of the beginning. The Good Friday Agreement is fully protected & the Common Travel Area will continue. The UK is committed to avoiding a hard border. #Brexit  
Gove on @BBCr4today:  'As a result of leaving the EU, there will be more money for the NHS'. I refer you to forecasts by OECD and @OBR_UK on the dire economic and fiscal damage of #Brexit 
This is not a #Brexit deal. This is simply a list of principles @theresa_may has conceded so the EU agreed to TALK about a deal. 
Taoiseach offers assurances to Irish citizens in Northern Ireland. “You will never again be left behind by an Irish government.” #Brexit  
Am enjoying listening to Mickey Gove defending Mrs May’s orchestrated Brexit triumph. Remain voters should savour the moment but keep quiet in the public interest. Retune your radio to Mogg FM  for further announcements. Will he take to the Quantocks with his AK47? 
Significant that Brexiteer shop steward @michaelgove chosen as official spokesman on Brexit deal. In return he lavishes praise on @theresa_may on @BBCr4today 
Reports of "Breakthrough" over #Brexit common in media today. However analysis of the "deal" suggests nothing has been resolved and major decisions are simply delayed. Further humiliation for May anticipated. 
Leo Varadkar delivers a message to the nationalist community, saying: "You will never again be left behind by an Irish government." #Brexit 
EU on Monday: NI will receive special status post #BrexitDUP: Unacceptable! We must not be treated any differently than the rest of the UK or we’ll collapse the govtEU this morning: Ok, so you’re cool with the same deal as long as we don’t call it ‘special status’?DUP:  
Theresa May should not even be allowed to agree to a transition deal, Brits voted for Brexit not to effectively remain in the EU for years longer rt @DavidJoBrexit 
Taoiseach making it clear that children born in Northern Ireland will remain Irish and therefore EU citizens after #Brexit  
This is the first Brexit thing that has made me laugh in ages. And has the right answer at the end.   
It’s such a relief to know that the oleaginous, duplicitous, Murdoch-representative-on-Earth, bastard, Michael Gove is feeling sanguine about the ‘progress’ of #Brexit negotiations #r4Today 
The UK making it to the second stage of the Brexit negotiations.  
WATCH: @Nigel_Farage’s blistering reaction to Theresa May’s “pathetic” Brexit agreement  
And......here we go. Right on time Nicola Sturgeon uses any Brexit development to bang the indy drum. Could set your watch by it. Give it a rest.  
Unless something currently not in view happens, UK is out of the EU by automatic operation of law on 29 March 2019.And today, EU27 has "sufficient progress" in protecting its own back: ie "an orderly Brexit".3/ 
Arlene Foster says she secured "6 substantive changes" to the Government's EU text. Good to see the leader of Britain getting significant compromises during the Brexit negotiations. 
And this is the opposition party  - when most UK citizens want to remain! And also want a second referendum. Giving this appalling government more support. You are betraying working people and their interests. Shame on you. Shame on Corbyn 
Good news for Scotland and the UK that we can move on to next stage of #Brexit negotiations. As ever @theresa_may puts the national interest first securing a deal that protects the integrity of  UK but acknowledges existing North-South  Irish arrangements 
JUST IN: EU draft guidelines for next #Brexit negotiations phase envisage transition period of around 2 years  
Brexit is not going to be avoided - like magic - because of the sheer accumulation of pratfalls and untruths of Brexiteers.The Article 50 notification changed everything.(That is why I once doubted it would happen, such was its gravity.)2/ 
Brexit breakthrough after “compromise on both sides” - cos both the DUP and the UK folded like an accordion on the Twelfth. #fullalignment #softBrexit 
To the amazing civil servants who have worked tirelessly to help the Prime Minister achieve progress in the Brexit negotiations, thank you 
Absolutely astonished by @afneil & guests on #bbctw last night who were actually discussing whether David Davis could be PM after his deceit and lies to the #Brexit select committee. #Outoftouch 
Good that Brexit talks can move on. Need to know political price of compromise. Need to agree transitional arrangements on same terms ASAP. 
Beginning to think if the British had had a negotiating team of this ability in 1922 we’d never have had a border and we’d probably have got Wales. #Brexit 
And this is critical. Full credit to @Number10gov for securing this.#Brexit  
Final preparations with Minister @HMcEntee and Tánaiste @simoncoveney ahead of speaking to the press re agreement on #Brexit Phase 1 negotiations.  
I’ve sent #Brexit guidelines for 2nd phase to EU27 leaders. While being satisfied with today's agreement, let's remember that the most difficult challenge still ahead.  Breaking up is hard. But breaking up and building a new relationship is much harder. 
This tweet alone says the Remainers are chuffed they have stopped effectively stopped a true #Brexit and laid ground for staying in under different language or ways  
Brexit Irish border deal possible within hours  
I just spoke to Prime Minister @theresa_may to discuss Brexit. Let’s continue to move forward in a constructive spirit, working for our common future. The European Parliament will present its views in a resolution next Wednesday ahead of the Council meeting. 
The latest joint technical note on UK/EU citizens' rights post Brexit is now 100% green (ie agreed).However in some cases that means issues are deferred for now - including resident UK citizens' continued free movement to other Member States.  
An aside - a UK government that is able to say that come what may, it will avoid hard borders with Ireland/NI after Brexit can never again tell Scotland that independence would mean a hard border between Scotland and rUK 
Gisela Stuart: Regulatory alignment "completely unacceptable", doesn't respect Referendum.  
Perhaps you agree that we now might as well Remain. Soft Brexit is costly, pointless & removes all our power. 
Huge progress towards a successful #Brexit!  
At the core of the Brexit deal are three commitments. First we’ll replicate EU rules. Second we’ll pay for a long time to come. Third, the UK will do whatever keeps Ireland, north and south, happy. I can’t see this working much beyond the weekend. 
Linked to the Brexit bill, Britain will keep its full participation in EU programmes it is funding up to 2020 even though it will have left the bloc. Chalk that up as a win.  
This deal is an important step forward! An intelligent #Brexit deal is in interest of our citizens and companies. #UK is and forever will be our neighbor. But our job is not done yet! 
EU communication on Brexit Agreement for sufficient progress, states 1. EU citizens are a super class in the U.K. a with U.K. citizens rights second class. 2. We pay EU in full 2019 & 2020 and after we pay an average sum until when? Are we leaving?  
Brexit summary: Any deal is better than no deal. 
I'm not even bothering to read about the "Brexit deal" because you can't make the deal necessary by "pulling an all nighter" it's obvious bollocks. 
National debate must turn now to referendum on terms - because today has brought some clarity: Effectively it’s Soft Brexit. So we need to ask: Why waste £50bn & why accept all loss of influence? All being done to save face. But costing us tens of billions to do so 
Checking in on deal, bleary eyed as a bastard, from Argentina. Looks good to me. Shift towards soft Brexit as default position. 
THERESA MAY: “I can confirm we have agreed a deal on Brexit with the DUP and Phase 1 of our withdrawal is now complete. I look forward to moving on to Phase 2; spiting our face.” 
Nothing has changed 1) Reasons for Brexit are spurious 2) Any Brexit deal will be worse than the one we have now 3) There is a huge majority against hard Brexit 4) Polls suggest the mood is turning against any Brexit. That's why we must #StopBrexit 
Beautiful scene at government buildings for #Brexit presser which is due to start shortly @rtenews 
Brexit: 'Breakthrough' deal paves way for future trade talks. What has been agreed though? Devil is in the detail.   
May has reached an entirely sensible agreement that is q close to what public wanted out of referendum and  ought to guarantee high standaed of market access. 
The moment the UK slides into Brexit transition any decision to return to the EU as member will involve a full accession process with all that implies in terms of the euro, Schengen and defence coordination. Remainers need to be willing to make arguments for deeper integration 
When you spend your evening editing a podcast about #Brexit and then the EU announces “sufficient progress” has been made overnight. #brexitcast. 
Does this mean that the default option is now soft Brexit?  
Today’s agreement between the EU and the UK marks the start of a process, not an end. The devil will be very much in the details of discussions ahead. #Brexit 
I strongly suspect that nothing would thrill Nigel more than if Brexit was cancelled. He'd be back in the limelight, relevant again, as he rails against it.That's the key to owning a one trick pony that Nigel never got: Don't kill the pony. 
Britain and the European Commission reach deal to move #Brexit talks forward  
Today is a big step forward in delivering Brexit. Been a lot of work but glad the Commission have now recommended that sufficient progress has been reached.  
Loud voice: "OH WOE IS ME. THOSE PESKY LEAVERS HAVE OUTWITTED THE EU AND BREXIT IS DEFINITELY HAPPENING" 
"The most difficult challenge is still ahead," says European Council President @eucopresident. "Breaking up is hard, but breaking up and building up a new relation is much harder." #Brexit  
Three takeaways from phase 1 #Brexit "agreement": 1. Kicking the truth down the road. Reconciling Brexiteers and Irish demands still impossible. 2. Face-saving successful, all sides have bought some time. 3. Think this was hard? It will get much harder. #May #Juncker 
Ireland, the EU & British Remainers are happy today. Brexit has been betrayed by Theresa May.  
So effectively, whether or not the UK gets it's hard Brexit is now in the hands of Northern Ireland.Either special arrangements are agreed for it, or the whole UK stays in alignment with the Single Market and Customs Union. 
You've misspelled 'I lied about the realities of Brexit and now am scared that people see me for the fraud i am' 
"We all know breaking up is hard, but breaking up and building a new relationship is harder" - Donald Tusk, European Council President on #Brexit progress  
So, some thoughts on a very quick read of the #Brexit agreement. /1 
European Council president Donald Tusk says the UK must respect all EU law including new law during the Brexit transition period but it will not participate in EU decisions 
Phase 1 agreement is a total fudge. Resolution of Irish border issue is no nearer. Arguments about UK staying in Single Market & Customs Union will continue into phase 2. Government’s position remains as before - an utter shambles. #Brexit  
Ironic that the hard-right knives are out for Theresa May, who has managed to move the UK closer to a Brexit deal. It's almost as though they thrive on chaos, division and xenophobia 
4. UK accepts free movement of EU citizens to Ireland AND open border between Ireland and UK. Can somebody remind me what the purpose of Brexit was supposed to be? #StopBrexit 
It’s beginning to look as if the simple concept of Brexit conceals a myriad of more complex issues critical to our country’s economic and political well-being. 
As we go into next phase of #brexit negotiations more than ever we need a vision for the future of the UK - what will we be famous for? What will we value? We have to find shared purpose to move beyond divisions 
Best pie chart on #Brexitvia @spaceangel1964 
Delighted #Brexit talks are progressing onto 2nd phase. Now we can get on to agreeing our future relationship with the EU 
BREXIT IRISH BORDER: This is more a series of contradictory assurances than an agreement with clarity. It punts those contradictions into the next stage of the negotiations.  
Donald Tusk: so much time has been devoted to the easier part of Brexit and now less than a year to do trade and transition. 
BREAKING: We should start negotiating a Brexit transition period immediately, Donald Tusk says  
This mornings phase 1 agreement gets a warm welcome from me. PM is representing UK Biz needs & healing dreadful #Brexit divide 
The really great news is that Brexit is killing the Tory Party. Please do bring in JRM. A Lord Snooty look-alike tax avoider who thinks we should be living in the 1950s will complete the process. Hillarious you think otherwise. 
Have either Jacob Rees-Mogg or John Redwood objected to the Brexit deal as yet? If not, what inducements have been offered at cost to us all? 
Scottish First Minister Nicola Sturgeon says any special arrangement for NI must be available to other UK nations and if Brexit is happening staying in the single market and customs union is the only sensible option 
And we surely don't need lessons of democracy from a country with an offshore royal house, where the future of people is shaped by the blatant lies of xenophobes like Mr Farage, who should pay from his own pocket the money he promised to NHS as a result of brexit. Good bye! 
We're all over the moon Julia. may has completely caved in and agreed a soft brexit. Full EU citizen rights and trade mean freedom of movement and soft borders. It's like they've decided to pinch Keir Strammers not cos David D realised he didn't have any! 
In essence, EU27 now well placed to "get on with the job of Brexit" - as Theresa May once would have put in happier days. 
I welcome sufficient progress on Phase 1 of #Brexit negotiations, including the key Irish issues. Huge thanks to all involved in the process @campaignforleo @simoncoveney @dfatirl Important that we move to phase 2 & establish future relationships #progress 
What this all highlights now is the £50bn divorce bill is a complete waste of money. Scandalous and hopefully will trigger huge national debate if not 2nd referendum - we’re doing Brexit in Name Only BUT will lose all representation in EU. It’s basically Soft Brexit w/o influence 
Move to phase 2 of talks good - but devil is in the detail and things now get really tough. If #Brexit is happening (wish it wasn’t) staying in single market & customs union is only sensible option. And any special arrangements for NI must be available to other UK nations. 
Also now online - a) Commission paper on the state of play of the Brexit talks and b) a technical note on UK/EU27 citizens' rights -  
I warmly welcome the announcement this morning by UK PM @theresa_may and @EU_Commission President @JunckerEU on #Brexit, as it guarantees that there will be no hard border on island of #Ireland and no disruption to trade post-Brexit  
Family rights of EU citizens in UK seems to have been fudged. Right to bring spouse/children in who are born before Brexit day but after subject to UK law, ie £18,600 minimum income threshold plus English language test for not yet born children. But this is only on first glance.  
DUP leader Arlene Foster says there have been "substantial changes" made to the Irish border paper since Monday #Brexit  
Text of May's deal with Europe seems to suggest she believes eventual deal will be soft Brexit. I can't interpret it any other way. Need to hear from Irish govt what they've been told. 
I’m very confused. It seems we are going to leave the single market but remain in it at the same time. A quantum Brexit?  
William Golding explains Brexit...  
News reaches RT that Theresa May has reached a UK wide Brexit deal..  
Brexit will be constrained and limited by the Good Friday Agreement rather than the other way around.  That really was the hand of history in 1998. 
No hard border and the Good Friday Agreement will be upheld - UK PM Theresa May says #Brexit  
A cobbled together fudged deal. Typical May. 10 MP's from Northern Ireland are calling all the shots. A #Brexit breakthrough has been reached  
#Brexit #EUCO Read Joint report from the negotiators of the European Union and the United Kingdom Government on progress during phase 1 of negotiations under Article 50 TEU on the United Kingdom's orderly withdrawal from the European Union https://t.co/RMKRtFwL5x?amp=1 
Britain and the European Union on Friday cleared the way to start a crucial new round of Brexit talks  
A Brexit deal is reached:• EU hails this "compromise"• In our best interests, May says• Promises no hard Irish border• EU ready to turn to transition• Guarantees for EU citizens• Britain commits financially• Pound is little changed 
Breaking - a deal on #citizensrights and Ireland has been made between the EU and the UK and the Brexit negotiations are moving to phase 2. We'll update you today with reactions and information  
Striking distinction between what Irish Government & DUP are saying in response to the #Brexit  deal. Dublin, categorically: "We have achieved all of our goals".Arlene Foster: "There are still matters we would have liked to see clarified; we ran out of time essentially". 
ECJ to have oversight for eight years on citizens' rights after Brexit - that will thereby be for (at least) nine-ten years after Brexit vote. 
Brexit agreement is a good news for citizens. The Parliament will give its views next week. I will hold press conferences in Cyprus at 9:50 and 11:00 Brussels time in which I will make statements on the latest Brexit developments. 
Still no solution over how to prevent a hard border between Northern Ireland and Ireland. Huge obstacle to Govt's Brexit plans is being kicked into the long grass  
There will be a specific Irish chapter in phase two of the Brexit negotiations, so Irish issues from a trading perspective don’t get lumped in with all other trading issues, Simon Coveney says 
"In best interest for whole of UK" - PM Theresa May on Brexit breakthrough   
#Brexit "breakthrough" as deal agreed with no Irish hard border  
Iain Duncan Smith: The British people want Theresa May to tell the EU 'enough is enough'Chopper's Brexit Podcast Episode 31:  
Great news, EU & UK have agreed to move on to second stage of #Brexit negotiations. Pragmatism & flexibility lead to win-win outcomes. #negotiation101 
#Brexit She's to Brexit as you're to the NHS I'm afraid 
What does Britain's deal with the EU actually mean? Follow the best @Brexit coverage here  
So the past four days were all about this sentence: "In all circumstances, the United Kingdom will continue to ensure the same unfettered access for Northern Ireland's businesses to the whole of the United Kingdom internal market."#DUP #Brexit 
Britain and the European Union reach divorce deal to move on to new phase in Brexit talks  
BREAKING Nigel Farage aka "Mr Brexit" is not happy. The former @Ukip leader tells me: “The European Court of Justice will be the ultimate arbiter of EU citizens’ rights. This is not acceptable.” #Brexit 
UK soft not hard Brexit is the logical extension of no Irish hard border. May’s Tory Brextremists are a bigger threat to her than the DUP  
I very much welcome the prospect of moving ahead to the next phase of the #Brexit talks on trade and security, and to discuss the positive and ambitious future relationship that is in all of our interests:  
Tánaiste @simoncoveney tells @morningireland ‘we have a good outcome’ #brexit  
We want to assure people, north and south, that there will not be the re-emergence of border on the island of Ireland as an unintended consequence of Brexit, Tánaiste Simon Coveney says 
Extraordinary achievement by @theresa_may today. Against all odds a deal delivered that confirms she is probably the only person in Britain able to deliver a good & clean Brexit 
'Sufficient progress' in Brexit talks announced after May's dash to Brussels  
U.K., European Union reach deal on Brexit divorce terms   
So @theresa_may and @DavidDavisMP did it Both deserve credit. They have got the EU to discuss, negotiate and both sides have moved to reach a compromise. #Brexit is moving to the second phase folks, and importantly, in line with the original timetable.  
The first question to Theresa May at the EU press conference came from a non-Brit journalist who asked if she now realised Brexit was a "very bad idea". It's almost as if they don't understand what democracy is. 
Brexit agreement text says the UK will maintain "full alignment" with rules of the EU single market and customs union which support cross-border co-operation and create "no new regulatory barriers" 
The Latest: European Commission president lauds a breakthrough in Brexit talks and says he will recommend expanding negotiations.  
No doubt hard negotiations ahead on #Brexit trade talks but significant progress to get on to phase 2 - testament to huge determination shown by @theresa_may & her team to keep talking 
It's a DEAL! Theresa May has finally won a dawn breakthrough in Brexit talks  
On my initial reading this implies situations where Northern Ireland still has quite a lot of EU after Brexit. 
A score draw here on Citizens Rights. EU gets automatic roll over of permanent residence, UK get's its criminal records checks. #Brexit  
Brief summary 1) DUP gets commitment there won’t be a Customs border in Irish Sea (para 45)2) Regulatory alignment not explicitly mentioned, but essentially still there in para 48, 493) There’s plenty of kicking the can into the second phase (para 56)#brexit  
On the eigth day of christmas my true love sent to me...Eight Maids a Milking...It looks more organised than #Brexit though.  
The UK and EU have reached a deal on Brexit, clearing the way for trade talks next year  
There will be no barriers or a "hard" Irish border, Theresa May says after Brexit deal reached  
Never forget: people notice what we do, not what we say. The PM’s determination, working all hours and knocking heads together, is the behaviour of a dedicated public servant committed to honouring the people’s decision. #impressive #brexit 
Here’s the text on the Irish border from the Brexit divorce deal. Key points: -no new regulatory barriers between Northern Ireland and rest of UK-continued unfettered access to UK for NI-UK committed to guarantee to avoid hard border  
"It doesn't mean that the UK will stay in the Single Market" says Prime Minister on #Brexit negotiations  
Good news Brexit talks are progressing. Now let’s get the EU Withdrawal Bill through the House of Commons. Then in 2018 we get down to brass tacks. As EU says: no deal until we do the whole deal.  
Finally! At last, there is real progress on #Brexit. The @EPPGroup will look closely at the agreement and continue to defend the rights of EU citizens and the interests of #Ireland. 
BREXIT DEAL DETAIL : Irish govt has maintained    commitment to “full alignment”  if no full trade deal secured BUT DUP has new agreement that NI Exec & Assembly required if new “regulatory borders” established between NI & UK 
BREAK: Spokesman for Irish PM: "We achieved all our goals in phase 1 of the negotiations, including preserving the CTA, protecting the GFA and, crucially, obtaining a guarantee that there will be no hard border." #Taoiseach #Brexit 
Paragraphs 49 & 50 from Brexit Deal are key for NI  
Will be on @morningireland shortly to explain and outline detail of Irish assurances on Brexit deal - very good outcome for everyone on the island of Ireland - no Hard Border guaranteed! 
Theresa May says the £50bn Brexit divorce bill will mean we can invest more in priorities at home. Erm how does that work exactly? 
European Commission says "sufficient progress" has been made to move to crucial next phase of Brexit talks  
Deal agreed in Brexit talks - Juncker  
Here are 2 crucial paragraphs on Brexit deal on “no new barriers” N/S or E/W in Ireland  
JUST IN: EU's Juncker on Brexit talks: We have made the breakthrough we needed and deal with UK is a compromise  
I will be joined by the Tánaiste @simoncoveney and Minister for European Affairs @HMcEntee at a press conference in Govt Bldgs later this morning to discuss the progress made. #Brexit  
Britain has agreed a historic Brexit divorce deal. Here are the key points:- EU-UK trade talks to begin next year;- Enshrining special rights for 4m citizens;- A €40bn-€60bn divorce settlement. 
Sufficient progress made in Brexit talks - Jean-Claude Juncker; paving way for talks on future UK-EU relationship  
.@JunckerEU "All EU27 stand firmly behind #Ireland. EU has made it a priority to protect #GoodFriday agreement and peace process on the island. UK has made commitments to that end." #Brexit  
Welcome news that sufficient progress has been made with EU as reduces risk of catastrophic No Deal #Brexit .  But remains the case that UK cannot secure a better deal than staying in the EU. 
Smacks of another Brexit short-term fix which will cause larger problems later.But well done to the UK for getting a way forward - a delay to March would have been almost catastrophic with A50 clock ticking.  
BREAKING: Brexit deal is a "compromise" between EU and Britain, Jean-Claude Juncker says  
Good news that the trade talks can now begin #Brexit 
.@JunckerEU "Citizens first. EU citizens' rights will be protected, especially the right to live, work and study and family reunification." #Brexit  
Painful reading on British delusion and #Brexit negotiations  via @FT 
.@JunckerEU @theresa_may "Sufficient progress has been made on the divorce terms." #Brexit  
And here is the link to the joint report #Brexit  
European Commission president Jean-Claude Juncker: "I believe we now have the breakthrough we needed." #Brexit 
BREAKING - EU Commission agrees to Brexit talks moving to phase 2. Tune in to @BBCr4today now 
European Commission says "sufficient progress" has been made in Brexit talks to move on to the second phase of negotiations 
European Commission recommends that "sufficient progress" has been achieved to move to next phase of Brexit talks: the future EU-UK relationship and trade  
The European commission has recommended Brexit 'sufficient progress' to EU leaders. Deal done. 
Brexit success! UK will be RICHER once it leaves the EU reveals economist on Question Time  
UK reaches historic Brexit divorce deal  
.@DUPleader Arlene Foster says there have been "substantial changes" made to the text after she and Prime Minister Theresa May spoke several times overnight #Brexit  
A deal stitched up overnight between May and the DUP. The DUP represents 35% of Northern Ireland. What about the rest of the community? What about the British Parliament? #Brexit, for the few, not the many. 
In your discussions today, please remember Theresa May has two counts of contempt of court and David Davis has misled @UKParliament. Please remember there are 45 million people in the UK who do not want #Brexit. @eucopresident @guyverhofstadt 
Let’s do this again when Brexit is consigned to the trash can of history >>The Complete London 2012 Opening Ceremony | London 2012 Olympic Games  
Brexit means breakfast...  
Not so subtle hint of a #Brexit breakthrough from the @JunckerEU head of cabinet. 
LATEST: DUP leader Arlene Foster tells @SkyNews "six substantive changes to text", "still some concern" re. alignment but PM "made judgment call to proceed in the national interest." #Brexit 
Head of Cabinet of @EU_Commission believes a deal has been struck on the first stage of the Brexit negotiations.  
DUP says all of the UK is coming out of the Customs Union and Single Market. Absolutely not good news this morning. #Brexit, the ruin of Britain. 
#Brexit: working breakfast in our headquarters in Brussels with President @JunckerEU, Commission's negotiator @MichelBarnier, PM @theresa_may and UK's negotiator @DavidDavisMP 
White smoke gag from Jean-Claude Juncker.. Brexit deal on  
DUP leader Arlene Foster says the whole of the UK is leaving the single market and customs union and there are still matters on Brexit border deal which need to be clarified 
#BREAKING British PM Theresa May meets European Commission chief Jean-Claude Juncker in Brussels for crunch talks to seal a deal on Brexit divorce terms 
Theresa May has arrived. #Brexit  
‘Irish Times’ poll: Voters back Government’s strong approach to Brexit  
EU-UK close in on Irish border deal as late night talks progress #Brexit  
The lights are on already in the Brexit divorce deal room. (I have a handy view from my desk)  
Irish border: May set for crucial Brexit deal meeting  
Theresa May on her way to Brussels to meet Juncker on Brexit border deal – live  
#Breaking Prime Minister Theresa May and Brexit Secretary David Davis are travelling to Brussels to meet with European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker and the European Union's chief Brexit negotiator, Michel Barnier, on Friday morning, Downing Street confirmed. 
The Brexit monomania built on blind faith  
#Brexit deal seems done between Theresa May and #DUP: May on her way to Brussels. Meeting with @JunckerEU at the Berlaymont planned for 7 am CET, press conference 7.30 to 8. Good morning! 
Morning! Just got up for @BBCBreakfast, @bbc5live and @BBCr4today & and it's been a busy Brexit night. All the latest from 6am...plus there'll be *another* #Brexitcast later today 
There is no Brexit deal that does not give a worse outlook for Britain's economy & people's jobs, rights and living standards than remaining in the EU. It is impossible to have Brexit and protect those things.  
Brexit Irish border deal possible within hours  
Juan Orlando lies when he says he had a referendum to ask citizens if they agreed with reelections THIS NEVER HAPPENED he just went on with it ignoring the citizens opinions, those signatures he talks about are completely fake #ConcluHernandez 
The government says Brexit will succeed if everyone just gets behind it.Because that always works with the England football team. 
Hi @mirandadevineYour good friend @LyleShelton said the postal survey was a referendum on Safe Schools. Was he mistaken? Or lying?Kenny x  
Come on Brexit-Wankers!You voted to 'Take back control'.Turns out, you have absolutely no control.Well done.  
3am update: understand Theresa May will get her day trip to Brussels. The needle has been threaded. For now, at least. #brexit 
Any "Free Trade" Deal With China Must Be Decided By A National Referendum.  
Scotland's nationalist leader accused the British government of being "totally and utterly incompetent" on #Brexit, saying the current situation showed that Scotland should be independent.  
MPs did not properly approve Brexit — so the triggering of Article 50 was invalid. Our MPs have not assented to Britain leaving the European Union. That leaves the UK in dodgy legal territory, says @acgrayling.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Nick Clegg is right: we need a second Brexit referendum.Now even writers for the Spectator are calling for a second referendum.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
I am for #Brexit.I have been for #Brexit since I was at college. I am for #Brexit today.That said, this man is a Russian asset, paid to make the EU look ridiculous, and if you don’t see that, I can’t help you.  
Still not quite grasped how backing Brexit undermines pretty much everything he says, does he?   
Brexit Voters. Is it true that Remain voters did so because they did not understand the benefits of leaving? Or that they did understand the benefits of leaving but had ulterior motives to stick with a failing bloc? 
We need a revolution to sort out #Brexit because this bunch won't!!  
Brexit is miserable, but American politics is a whole other echelon of bizarro shark-jumpery  
Brexit is the proxy war between the centre and right wings of the Tory Party. We are the collateral. 
Brexiteers kept being accused of telling lies during EU referendum! Hang on what about claims from some Remainers there would be a recession, huge rises in unemployment, no European Army & no federal Europe? Out of touch EU bureaucrats want united states of Europe! #bbcqt #Brexit 
In anticipation of an early morning announcement, my response: Fuck Brexit. After 17 months of this BS, my tolerance is shattered. #StopBrexit #FBPE @nickynoo007 @Rowland72James @BrexitBin @RemainingKind @LoubinWally @Emma_Forage  
Brexit negotiations are a shambles, as Brexit is a shambles.Labour should stop Brexit to protect economy, jobs, rights & living standards.  
"We are with Europe but not of it; we are linked but not compromised. We are associated but not absorbed. If Britain must choose between Europe and the open sea, she must always choose the open sea." Winston Churchill. 
Arlene Foster In Fermanagh and South Tyrone (Assembly constituency) the #DUP got 16,000 votes (2seats)SINN FEIN got 26,000 votes  (3seats)SO SHE IS NOT EVEN THE TOP PARTY IN HER OWN SEAT #dupbribe #FBPE #brexit #NorthernIreland 
Emergency Brexit talks about the Irish border are taking place through the night - as any student will tell you, your best work is always done hours before a deadline without sleep for no good reason. 
The Brexit advertisements write themselves - Martin Schulz looking over a map of a federated Europe...."we could call this...an Anschluss?" 
Clear support from many in the #Swansea @bbcqt audience tonight for the idea of a referendum on the Brexit final deal. The people want their say it seems. Are you listening @theresa_may ? 
I have been banging on about this from the start - places close to my heart like Cornwall and Wales will suffer the MOST post Brexit, there will be but a trickle of cash from this government compared to the previous EU grants. Tragic. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Grazie to @LuigiVignali for visit to Italian Cloister Garden today and informative and much appreciated meeting with Italian citizens anxious about #Brexit  
I was on @BBCNews paper review more than a year ago and was talking about the Irish border and Brexit. Got looked at (and tweeted at) as if I was mad 
"When we wake up it could be that Brexit does means Breakfast, after all in Brussels" @afneil"Theresa May is the author of her own problems" says Alan "And now she is running into reality" #bbctw 
"It's pretty chaotic but actually I think Brexit is advancing very well" says Michael who says there will be a deal"The deal that was scuppered last week was scuppered by the DUP, not by the Conservative Party" #bbctw 
For the sake of the country, the #Tories must ditch @theresa_may – before it's too late, writes #NigelFarage!  #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #NEWS #TORY #TORIES #Conservatives 
Utter contempt from a Tory born into privilege. Today I spoke with people who are feeding and clothing children who are hungry and cold. Austerity and Brexit are the political choices of a right wing elite. #bbccqt 
Some epitaph for Brexit, this would be:An idea so bad, it united Ireland 
PUNDIT: Corbynites need to get realistic. He can't do everything. How exactly is he going to cancel tuiti---- JEREMY CORBYN COULD STOP BREXIT IF HE WANTED TO. HE COULD STOP IT [offers no further argument] 
Steve Bell on Brexit and 'regulatory alignment' – cartoon  
I have a suggestion for #Repealthe8th referendum. And I’ve waited for so long to say this: Mind your own fucking business. It’s simple and to the point. No one gets to tell any woman what to do. It’s between her doctor and herself. 
Bernard Jenkin is one of the loudest Tory voices in favour of a hard #Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I am very comfortable with a referendum on repeal simpliciter. "Should the unborn child have any constitutional rights?" is an easy question for most people to answer. #repealthe8th 
It’s actually the Council of Europe flag, and was so for three decades before it was then also the EEC then EU flag... Technically we have every right to it even after Brexit  
UKGov continues to plead with DUP to be permitted to save the GFA from Brexit, while the Ultras continue to stamp their little grumpy feet and force no deal. Meanwhile, Brussels awaits a UK policy.  
So Abbott, like Farage on Brexit, threw the grenade, then walked away. #MarriageEquality 
The government's latest Brexit reassurances are just another punch in the face for EU scholars, writes  @cliodiaspora 
March 2019 - We regain our title of the 'Sick man of Europe', and the Tories idea of 'Trading with the World' fails cos it turns out Senegal doesn't want 4 container-loads of Mrs Browns Boys DVD's.Thats Brexit, folks. #BBCQT 
Let us never forget nor forgive the relentless campaign of hate and lies against the EU, and immigrants and refugees conducted by the tax-dodging-billionaire-owned #Brexit press. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
.@KateAndrs says ordinary people have found the immediate financial results of voting for Brexit to be less severe than they were predicted to be #bbcqt 
Brexit bashing. Check. Trump bashing check. 2nd referendum. Check. BBC bias. Check.  #bbcqt 
#BBCQT has debated #Brexit beyond the extreme.How much time has been devoted to debating number of deaths in UK under #Tory austerity agenda? Are poorer people so worthless that no one cares? 
For those watching #bbcqt here are two occasions when @DavidDavisMP gave MPs to understand economic impact assessments existed. Hansard 20.10.16 and @CommonsEUexit 25.10.17  #brexit  
I think the country will be poorer following Brexit and it makes me sad for those who will find life harder.. #mycountry #bbcqt 
Bernard Jenkin nails Brexit, saying: “We will have our democracy back again, we’ll be in control of our immigration, we’ll be able to do those trade deals with other countries which is what the future of this country is about.”  That’s why people voted Leave. #bbcqt 
Did the general public (I.e. 90% of population) really understand fully what they were voting for in the #brexit referendum? #bbcqt 
.@bernardjenkin says we're seeing a degree of disarray about Brexit because 'The Establishment' suffered a defeat over Brexit #bbcqt 
Bless the little lad on #bbcqt...'why aren't they showing us any of the good stuff on Brexit?'...because there isn't any, pet. 
I love the 'Lets be positive' negotiating strategy.No, I won't be fucking positive.  You Brexit-Arseholes have had 30+ years to prepare a full exit strategy.  You couldn't.If it all goes to shit, it's on you. #BBCQT 
This excellent article written by @IanDunt in 2013 reminds of us how sustained and sinister has been the right-wing press hate campaign against immigrants."This is how the press breeds hatred for immigrants"#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
The DUP want something in the text saying the Brexit deal on border issues won't "undermine the integrity of the UK". I tell ya what'll undermine the integrity of the UK: Brexit. 
Only one other referendum required and that is in Scotland!!  #bbcqt #indyref2 
Aston Martin said that it may have to halt production if the UK fails to strike a Brexit deal with the EU #bbcqt  
Hearing reports of complete stalmate on the Brexit deal. The substance of the text has been agreed but talks have broken down on font selection. 
On #BBCQT Dimbleby says a no deal Brexit would be ‘basically free trade then’  Seriously, @bbcquestiontime ? 
Man in audience: "Now that we've got the truth, we would like another referendum."<LOUD CHEERS>The national mood is changing - and it's not too late to stop this disaster.#bbcqt 
There is no consistent evidence that the balance of opinion has shifted towards a softer Brexit, let alone becoming more inclined to favour staying in the EU...  
It sickens me when hard #Brexit leaders say “oh, I personally never said leaving the EU would mean £350m extra per week for the NHS”. You were more than happy to perpetuate the lie. #bbcqt 
“Theresa May is a much weaker Prime Minister thanks to the DUP and how they’ve handled this situation.” #Brexit @bbctheview 
Another referendum getting an applause... didn’t think I’d hear that #bbcqt 
Alliance Leader @naomi_long on @bbctheview “On Monday the DUP didn’t just look a gift horse in the mouth, they shot it in the head.” #Brexit 
Dear gawd, 5 mins in & already we’re being re-fed the con “take back control.” Believe me, they ALL know that this is NOT A GOOD IDEA BATMAN! #brexit 
Latest on that developing Brexit 'deal' story from the BBC's @bbclaurak 
If them idiots off the apprentice negotiated brexitThey would come back with a box of tampax and a Trifle Still better than we got now 
An American woman from the “Institute of Economic Affairs” has a platform on BBC Question Time telling us there are great benefits of Brexit, but #bbcqt hasn’t told us what the “Institute” is, or who it represents. 
Clear message from Remainers on the panel. UK is so useless and incompetent. We must give up on Brexit, it's just too difficult.#bbcqt 
Is this really what Remainers want for the United Kingdom ??#Brexit  
Stone face Hammond give people in Work with disabilities stick about productivity yetDavid Davies has done fuck all and brexit stalled Who’s more productive Not you Tories 
New poll from @LucidTalk has found 47.9% of people in Northern Ireland would vote for a United Ireland in order to stay in the EU in the event of a hard Brexit  
Why “frantic talks” the day before the deadline? May has been the Prime Minister for 18 months (EIGHTEEN MONTHS).Surely the most useless PM ever making a total mess of #Brexit#ToryBrexitShambles 
Ugh.This is @YouTube's top (non-news) search results on "Brexit" right now:1)  @Jacob_Rees_Mogg2) @RT_com 3) Some UKIP-affiliiated site with no views & no followers. Hat tip @youtube's algorithm: totally dysfunctional. Gamed by bots. Denied by @google 
I can confirm that @HamiltonWestEnd is a roaring, soaring, thrilling, moving masterpiece, its cast STUNNING & its creator @Lin_Manuel a magic-spinning genie (Spoiler: Brexit of 1776 ends in disastrous humiliation for )  
UK public is still set on Brexit despite growing pessimism on exit deal, research shows.  
Tory MP Ben Bradley tells the Nolan show  in terms of a solution to Brexit , the government is “making it up as they go along “ 
FARAGE: Every day the Prime Minister remains in office brings us closer to a Corbyn government and a betrayal of Brexit.For the sake of the country, the Tories must ditch Theresa May – before it's too late'  
Brexit will be done stupidly, because it's a stupid idea, therefore only stupid people will work on it.  
In my list of people responsible for Brexit Osborne is pretty near the top, tbh. 
EU reveals its true colours: United States of Europe within 8 years. Thank God for #Brexit.  
Excl: PM wins divorce deal fight with EU to time limit ECJ’s role - but will still run for 10 more years after Brexit;  
Hedge funds whose multimillionaire founders backed the campaign to leave the EU will not think twice about abandoning Britain and picking off businesses damaged by #Brexit, a leading investment manager has claimed.  
I challenge the pro-Brexit papers to try at some point over the next year to use the words 'triumph' and 'Brexit' in a headline - and, to make it harder still, the triumph has to be ours, not the EU's. 
Wolverhampton voted for Brexit 63%-37%.  
Just seen this circulating, is it legit? If the 58 Brexit studies don't exist how come a FOI was met with this??  
In tomorrow's paper we've also got our top 25 reader suggestions for our Brexit impact front page. And they're all brilliant!  
Well that's odd. Brexit & the apparently imminent deal doesn't feature in the BBC Ten O'Clock news headlines at all. Top story is on domestic violence. 
There goes any prospect of a second referendum on Brexit...  
doing an early morning TV thing tomorrow about this week's Brexit shitshow and let me tell you: I'm thrilled about going to bed without having any idea what I'll wake up to then have to explain to viewers 
"Leave campaigners warn May against 'regulatory alignment' with EU"“regulatory alignment” means adopting the 2019 anti-tax avoidance rules, thats the brextiers whole reason for brexit.#FBPE #StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit #remain 
Brexit supporters are going to inflict mountains of expensive, tedious, time-consuming beaureacracy on all of us. Needlessly. Thanks.  
'If Lab were really making an issue of Brexit in the right way… you could then lead the people who were Labour people that voted for Brexit to an understanding that Brexit’s not the answer to their problems.' Sticking my neck out here, but Blair's right  
It is very, very important that an idea as obviously stupid as Brexit is implemented, exclusively, by the full-throated Brexiteers who promoted it. Let everyone watch them do it.Let everyone see.  
It's going to be a very early morning tomorrow for Brexit watchers like me. Theresa May is about to get the deal she wanted on Monday signed in Brussels tomorrow morning after all. 
Retweet if you believe Theresa May must go to save Brexit!   
Gisela: Regulatory Alignment “Completely Unacceptable”, Doesn’t Respect Referendum  
EXCLUSIVE: David Miliband tells me Northern Ireland border chaos is product of Tory governments ‘incompetence and arrogance’ AND says it is possible that Moscow was 'significantly involved' in the Brexit referendum: 
What a Brexit deal on the Irish border, Customs Union and Single Market should look like.  
DUP approach to Brexit seems to be responsible for what must be first ever reputable poll finding supporting united Ireland. Does this explain SF low profile? It's job is being done by DUP. 
Letter from @DavidDavisMP to @Baroness_Verma dated 30th October outlining detail of analysis & listing 58 #BrexitImpactReports It is a very detailed letter & references approaches to the analysis of the data.Don't believe these don't exist. #Brexit 
I’ve said it once and I will say it again: no rich person ever managed not to get a lot richer backing Brexit  
UK’s Brexit secretary at Brexit hearing.Looks about right.  
Worth remembering that the “Brexit deal”, which will happen over the next 24 hours, is just the agreement of a fudged form of words that doesn’t terminally annoy all of the parties. The real practical stuff hasn’t started yet. 
I keep seeing tweets and articles about Brexit and Northern Ireland and Scotland and the Tories and Trump and Russia and everything else. Lots of excitement.I'll tell you what will happen.You'll get what you're given and there's fuck all you can do.The end. 
Seven times David Davis boasted about the Brexit reports that he now admits don't exist... How the f**k is he still in his job?  
i in tomorrow’s i: the Conservative Brexit problem is that unlike the DUP, Labour, Liberal Democrats, SNP et. al it’s not clear what they want from it:  
A united Ireland is now a live political issue.Sinn Féin must continue to argue the case for a referendum on Irish unity as contained in the Good Friday agreement.That position should also be supported by the Irish government.  
To be specific, and it is important to be specific, the @LucidTalk poll shows 48% support for a united Ireland *in the event of Hard Brexit*.This is something specific for Unionists to ponder and act upon. But they probably won’t... 
MASSIVE reaction to this! This is what happens when you take the iconic 'Do They Know It's Christmas' number 1 and give it the Brexit treatment - Gift Grub style   
Kate Hoey MP - "I’m all for keeping our country’s legal responsibilities but I want to see dot and comma of exactly why they are asking us for all this money." #Brexit  
Brexit deal done? EU’s Donald Tusk to make surprise early morning announcement TOMORROW  
Peter Bone MP - "Walk away, tell industry that we’re going to come out on March 29, 2019 on WTO rules and therefore you can prepare for that."We won’t, by the way, pay billions of pounds to the EU, so within a few days I think the EU will be rushing back to talk to us.” #Brexit  
Peter Brookes on Theresa May’s Brexit woes and the launch of aircraft carrier HMS Elizabeth - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Philip Stephens: Harsh lessons for the next phase of Brexit  
Steve Bell on Brexit and 'regulatory alignment' – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Just watched incredible pro Brexit Tory Party political broadcast instructing us “ignore the doom mongers “.  Guess they are getting worried 
So, we have a Trade Secretary who can't make trade deals and a Brexit Secretary who doesn't bother to prepare for Brexit. Oh, and a Prime Minister who gets ordered around by almost anyone else and a Foreign Secretary that we tell other countries to ignore. #BrexitShambles 
Brexit - update on the impact assessments. [More of this kind of thing: ] 
'Brexit was the tipping point': EU nationals on why they left the UK:‘I can plan my life as a person – not as a bargaining chip’: Miguel Lopes, 24, PortugueseReturned in 2017 
James O’Brien’s stinging analysis on what has been a very, very turbulent week for Brexit  
FT BREXIT LEAD: May forced into frantic talks with DUP #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I discovered today that some generally well informed anti-#Brexit #Labour voters were unaware that even in #Leave voting Lab seats, majority of Lab voters chose #Remain (I shared this: ). 
CBI: Brexit the Worst Thing to Happen In Any Country in the World Ever  
WINNER: Coventry named UK City of Culture 2021. The judges were impressed by the optimism of the application which included the belief the UK would still exist in 2021 and that there’d be some money left over for this shit. #Brexit 
There are currently 10 DUP MPs strong arming the UK gov on brexit. You have 13 MPs so why are the Scottish Tory contingent not using their numbers to work in Scotlands best interests by forcing the gov to keep the UK in the single market & customs union? 
Brexit: 'The DUP’s hardline policies could be the quickest road to a united Ireland'  
#Brexit means the breakup of the UK.We need to #ExitFromBrexit 
90% of the Tory front bench are Leavers.90% of the Labour front bench are Leavers.Is there any wonder there's no parliamentary damage being done on Brexit?#StopBrexit 
This is sensational: Northern Irish public opinion favours a united Ireland in EU (47.9%) to remaining in the UK outside EU (45.4%). #DUP dont speak for N Ireland & hard #Brexit unionism is undermining UK. Watch this space with big consequences for Scotland.  
Brexit Roadmap cc @J_amesp @PeterKGeoghegan @peterjukes @jonworth @gavinsblog @carolecadwalla in case it's any use to youNot really my area and not sure how it will display for size on here, but I knocked this up as I was starting to get confused with it all 
James O’Brien tries to help out this Brexit voter with some facts about fishing and the EU in his town…  
Why we voted to leave the EU, why we were right to do so & why we must hard Brexit now.  
Again Home Office tightening the screws on immigration rules.With record numbers of EU nationals detained for deportation, they seem to increase detention powers.We need international safeguards to protect us against post Brexit rule changes.  
'What is Brexit?' asks David Davis 
Let’s remind to @FranzTimmermans that in France, it’s constitution does not allow a referendum of self-determination but the have agreed with New Caledonia to do so...  
The Spanish Government also said, after more than 2 million people braved the blows of the Spanish police in order to vote, that "there had been no referendum".They're not real strong on truth. #WakeUpEurope 
Just caught Conservative Party political broadcast on C4 - focused only on Brexit & stupidly perpetuates the filthy lie that Brexit will be win-win. Almost Goebbelsesque in extent of their lies. All about deluding a certain section of the public. Dastardly, really 
Boris Johnson fires warning shot at Theresa May as he says 'whole of UK must take back control' after Brexit' | via @telegraph 
The problem with Brexit is not that it's a great idea being carried out by an incompetent team - it's that it's a bad idea being carried out by an incompetent team#ThePledge @MichelleDewbs 
#FBPE To ensure no ulterior motives for Brexit, let’s adopt EU Anti-Tax Avoidance Directive whatever happens.  
Just a quick reminder the government has done an impact assessment on the noise from ice cream vans.  But not Brexit.    
A government spokesperson said the Taoiseach @campaignforleo and British Prime minister @theresa_may had a 15 minute telephone conversation today re #brexit. @rtenews 
Brexit: Watch the Swiss border for a warning on trade via @FT 
After the announcement by former European commission President, Martin Schulz that the EU is to become the United States of Europe by 2025, how would you have voted in the EU referendum had you been armed with this knowledge? Please RT to widen sample. #Brexit 
Hans-Erik is absolutely right, millions in the UK feel badly let down by Parliament; around half the UK want nothing to do with Brexit, this island is being unfairly separated and isolated from our EU family.  
Leave campaigners said that this was the EU aim during the Referendum & were derided.  
Soviet government recognizes right of all nations, Ukrainian included, to self-determination and splitting from Russia - only if it comes through referendum and reflects popular opinion #1917LIVE 
The Remain campaign never told their supporters they were voting for a United States of Europe.Slightly more serious than a number on a bus.#Brexit 
Either the #Brexit impact assessments were done and they make horror reading, or they never did them and they're crashing on blindly. Either way the entire government is behaving like peoples lives and futures are party political toys of no value. How is this happening? 
Oh Gisela. Shut up. Were you in favour of Hard Brexit before the referendum? Have you got a solution to the Irish border issue? Pffff.  
Government scandals and rocky Brexit negotiations dog the Conservative Party. Why is Labour not doing better?  
Britain doubles the number of "exceptional talent" visas available to non-EU residents  
55,318 results found when searching for impact assessment on HMG website... but we did not prepare any for Brexit?  
Chuffed to be elected Chair of the @EuroMoveNI tonight. If you think I talk a lot about Brexit already, you ain't seen nothing yet!  
Unlike the slothful David Davis, the House of Lords EU Committee has published its Brexit impact report. Cutting to the chase, a 'no deal' Brexit outcome would have disastrous consequences for the UK economy and create logistical chaos.Worth reading. 
The EU cares about just ONE thing in Brexit talks – BRITAIN’S MONEY, IDS rages  
When you're done screeching OH EM GEE UNITED STATES OF EUROPE, consider:A federalised structure can better stabilise the Eurozone, will be more democratic than current halfway house, and more accepting of an outer EEA ring.All of this is very good for a (sane) UK post-Brexit. 
At Frankfurt Airport we are having a ball.. Brexit is cancelled. That's the word on the street. Must take care or we won't get on the flight. 
And by the same token, Tory Remainers will have to accept that that continuing to support and sustain the Tory government is directly enabling all harm that Brexit brings. 2/ 
Mateusz Morawiecki is the likely next PM of Poland - this is what he thinks about Brexit (from my Sept 2016 interview):  
From now on, I’m not using the phrase Brexit Referendum, instead I am using The Event.  
From ACOs and Brexit to Tax Avoidance and Universal Credit, what this Government will avoid at all costs is scrutiny. As if, somehow, if you can bury your mistakes, they’ll disappear by magic. We need this bumbling mess of a Government out asap. pic.twitter.com/N9tVMcRG3I 
Shoutout to the Leavers who were quite convinced that #Brexit was the fatal blow that would cause the EU to fall apart.How's that working out for you fellas? 
Philip Hammond: Cabinet hasn't discussed our #Brexit "end state" yet.Let that sink in. 
‘One Week to Stop a Soft Brexit’, Barwell Failing to Hold it Together  
Stay angry, fight Brexit! Get 26 issues of The New European for just £30 plus a free pack of our exclusive Christmas cards:  
First Brexit, then Trump. The latest shock is that humanities are useful, writes @Sathnam  
Irish border: New draft Brexit agreement proposed  
Sturgeon tells Labour: Get your act together and help us fight hard Brexit  Problem is #JeremyCorbyn is more #Brexit than #TheresaMay & look at the damage he is creating 
So today Hammond blames disabled people for his failure on productivity rates,Davis blames his own incompetency for no brexit impact assessments and May, who has no idea on Brexit is given 48 hours to come up with one which will decide the fate of the nation, did I miss anything? 
We're at the point where so many things people insisted would stop Brexit haven't.There are people of high status & low morals pushing it onwards.Time for those of us of low status and higher morals to push back. 
The Labour Party’s evasiveness and policy confusion on Brexit have gone far beyond the cut and thrust of normal politics, says the @Telegraph 
Please RT if you are fed up with the #Brexit madness.#StopBrexit 
Brexit whack-a-mole:  
Absolutely.That is why the road to Brexit probably started at Maastricht.On anything other than Single Market matters (eg Justice and Home Affairs, foreign policy), not persuaded that UK needs to be part of EU to have a close relationship.  
Things this government has done impact assessments on: Songs from ice cream vans Drain standards ComedyThings they haven't done impact assessments on: BrexitRead more here:  
Last @Eurostar to #Brussels leaves in 30mins. Hurry up, @theresa_may! #Brexit  
Tony Blair in @NewStatesman: “If Labour were really making an issue of Brexit in the right way… you could then lead the people who were Labour people that voted for Brexit to an understanding that Brexit’s not the answer to their problems.”  
2008: Banks cause global financial crash.2010-2017: Austerity/drop in living standards - to pay for financial crash. 2010-2017: Right-wing media deflect blame towards immigrants & EU instead of governments & banks.2017: And this is how we end up with Trump &amp; Brexit. 
You really have to think about it: A Govt that's pushing a Referendum to enable"Kill by Choice"--but will not even contemplate a Referendum to affirm Irish #Neutrality in a world close to "Kill by War"--it would upset "our friends" in @EUPol Parties will roll over#PESCO#PANA 
My View on Theresa May’s Resistance To BREXIT: Anyone Resisting Implementation of BREXIT - Which Was a Referendum Approved by The British People, is  Totalitarianistic  
My colleague @Rory_Palmer argues for keeping #Britain in the @EUErasmusPlus scheme, even if we go ahead with #Brexit via @LabourList 
England flags in the Ev away end. Brexit Tory away days ay lads  
House of Lords declares 'no deal' Brexit a disaster:  
Brexit talks@LibertyHouseGrp exec chair Sanjeev Gupta explains why he sees #Brexit offering "opportunities"  
Big setback for the 'Stop Brexit' campaign.  
Should @UKLabour use it’s power to stop #Brexit? Jeremy Corbyn's Labour must use its power to stop Brexit – now  @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
Brexit Britain will head out into the world having already demonstrated that its leaders are profoundly incompetent and easily outmanoeuvred. What could possibly go wrong?  
#Brexit EU source tells me a deal is "done", but both UK and IE sources will NOT confirm this.Given recent events, everyone should exercise caution.But wheels are in motion.Tusk is a red herring, am told. 
."Brexit has for the first time in hundreds of years made Ireland, once a colonised subordinate, far more powerful than its British neighbour.". 
If the @duponline stopped #Brexit from going forward, what would be the next best move?RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
This Government has done impact assessments on everything from ice cream vans, to drains to comedy. But it's done none on Brexit. This is quite literally beyond parody. Read more here:  
Brexit illustrates a stark fact about the UK Parliament: it is a hollowed out shell of a former seat of democracy, dominated by a deranged ToryDUP majority, enfeebled by a Labour party which does not oppose. But some MPs are better than this. They should work together - soon. 
Total Capitulation by May in Leaked paper from BrusselsUK to AUTOMATICALLY adopt EU rules AFTER #BrexitBritish courts FORCED to abide by the European human rights convention.EU 'citizens' living in UK able to “export all exportable benefits”etc#EU 
JUST IN: Ireland and Britain are 'very close' and seemingly a matter of hours away from a Brexit deal - Irish official  
The two-faced #Tories now ruining the #UK. All except one of @Theresa_May’s first #Brexit Cabinet were in favour of the #EU or its #SingleMarket prior to last year’s #EUReferendum. Please read and re-Tweet @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
All of this thread so true. Perhaps I am being an over sensitive soul and alone in feeling this so strongly, but I could almost weep at the damage being done by these Brexit supporting charlatans to our country. They lie and we take it. The world watches.What’s happened to us?  
UK charities will lose £258m of EU money after Brexit. Where's the government plan to compensate them?  
So now even the pro-#Brexit Spectator is advocating for #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option. MPs need to take note of the shift in public and media opinion in the debates next week. #FinalSayForAll  
Brexit: Understand there are 2 speeches being prepared. There is optimism. 
#Brexit: Britain must stay in the wholly independent European Court of Human Rights if it wants a trade deal, Brussels to insist  
Am told that @eucopresident Tusk will be leaving for Hungary tomorrow at 8h15. Source says “Less than a week to go to EUCO, so he will deliver an update of the Brexit situation in that context, whatever it is tomorrow morning.” So stand down everyone. Probs. 
So, #EU has put Hungary and Poland on the naughty step, it's forging ahead with greater financial and fiscal integration, Greece is still bust, Italy has a banking crisis, Schultz wants a United States of Europe, the migrant crisis is stil a total mess. Viva #Brexit 
Soubry's an absolute fraud. Whilst Corbyn can't stop this shambolic, executive power grab Brexit, 20-30 odd pro-Remain/ soft Brexit Tory MPs could by collapsing the government. 
The EU and UK were always on divergent paths. Brexit will allow us to pursue our respective priorities but still be friends and economic partners.  
100% right Sinn Fein didn’t even register to campaign against Brexit in the Referendum. But posters and protests now ...  
The Brexit Select Committee has been in Armagh today. Here's my take on the Northern Ireland border with the Republic.  
I have a feeling this may be a tad more controversial than my usual offering! The Leave case for a second referendum - RSA  
Sounds like a market mover ---> European Council president Donald Tusk will make a statement on Brexit at 0750/0650UK 
If Corbyn backs a ‘No Brexit’ then Labour would have my vote. Let’s put the economy first. Let’s mend this broken country.   
This should be an absolute scandal - David Davis admits to lying to the nation for a year over Brexit Impact reports and nothing in the press. Where are the headlines? Where is the outrage? We're not being informed, we're being misled. #SpeakTruthToPower #BrexitShambles #bbcqt 
So it's easier to get access to Nadine Dorries' work PC than it is to see some copied & pasted nonsense about #Brexit?Figures. 
Who knew - "The report states that 'no deal' would not only be economically damaging, but would bring an abrupt end to cooperation between the UK and EU on issues such as counter terrorism, police and security and nuclear safeguards." 
Lib Dems are pointing out that government won't produce impact assessment on Brexit but has produced impact assessments on: the copyright exception For Parody comedythe Small Business Appeals championbus passenger rightsgravity foul sewers and lateral drains 
Matt on Brexit and Irish border issue - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
.@sinnfeinireland South Belfast MLA @newbelfast will be appearing on @bbctheview tonight at 10.40pm to discuss Brexit and it’s disastrous impact on Ireland.  
.@eucopresident Tusk will make a press statement on #Brexit tomorrow at 7:50 in the Europa building. Further details will follow. 
We have been in Armagh and at the #IrishBorder today hearing what #Brexit means for border communities  
Tusk will make a statement on Brexit early tomorrow morning says Reuters 
BREAKING: @eucopresident Donald Tusk will give a statement on Brexit at 0750 CET tomorrow morning. 
"The harder the Brexit, the harder the Irish border." Excellent briefing from the always clear and useful @uk_tpo :  
DUP hit back at Sinn Féin in the Brexit border argument.  
Other Northern Ireland parties are now demanding that they too are consulted on the wording of the Brexit border agreement as well as the DUP  
Our South Belfast MLA Máirtin Ó Muilleoir will be discussing Brexit on 'The View' tonight BBC One at 10:40pm .@newbelfast .@bbctheview 
Many Brexiters have a real problem with Germany. They link their self-esteem with the nation. Sadly since beating Germany in 1945, Britain has been declining, so they cling to that victory & rage & fume because Germany has failed to stay crushed & beaten.#StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
Cue Brexiters going blue in the face !!!Brexit: Britain must stay in European Court of Human Rights if it wants a trade deal, Brussels to insist.ps. The ECHR is NOT run by the EU.  
We all know about this speech. Have a read of it again. Then stop Brexit.  
Gisela: Regulatory Alignment "Completely Unacceptable", Doesn't Respect Referendum  via @GuidoFawkes 
Hammond: "There are no unemployed" Davis "I know, it's brilliant. I didn't bother to do a Brexit impact assessment". "But the disabled are slowing us down." "Oh, I did one for them." "Can I see it?" "No" 
At least it stopped people talking about Brexit for a bit  #ThisMorning 
Here we see a classic Brexit authoritarian mentality at work, only able to view the EU in terms of domination; incapable of comprehending cooperation and pooling of sovereignty for the common good. #StopBrexit #Remain #FBPE  
 With the latest deadline for #Brexit talks fast approaching, here's why it's so vital for jobs and our economy that we stay in the Single Market.  
There are warnings that May's government could fall next week if a Brexit deal isn't achieved. If this happens, what next?  
All hail Brexit.  
Where "odd" = absolutely consistent with a press owned by unaccountable billionaires who firmly support both Brexit & the Conservative party.  
Brexit: What yesterday revealed was appalling but, in a way, today is more so because nothing is done in media or politics about yesterday... and so it goes on. Every day since the Ref. 
'Brexit was the tipping point': EU nationals on why they left the UK  
 #EU MUST BECOME A UNITED STATES OF EUROPE BY 2025With 1 leader #Juncker And an Islamic population?  NO WAY Countries that do not adopt new treaty should be kicked out of EUMany countries would like to, yet hesitate after #Brexit #BordersClosed 
Which bit of: no single market, no ECJ influence, no holding back from Art 50, no understanding of detail, and potentially no deal....would a Hard Brexit leader have done differently?  
More likely to give Remainers trying to reverse Brexit a heart attack 
Martin Schulz, former President of Euro Parl calls for a United States of Europe. This is what the Remainers want if they can betray Brexit. 
David Davis's impact assessments don't exist because Govt doesn't want to know Brexit's economic cost, and it doesn't care. And that's the most damning assessment of all. My piece today:  
This poor child. Has to learn that the Brexit papers, like Santa, didn’t actually exist  
Mundell, what are your red lines for protecting Scotland during brexit?Mundell: "MY RED LINES IS SCOTLAND SAID NO "  
I’m saying it again. Brexit deal should be negotiated cross-party, not by David Daftface  
His name was David           (David) and he drove the worstest Brexit in the West  
Sinn Féin reps @MickeyBradySF @gildernewm @cathalboylansf & @GildernewColm all raising the impact of Brexit on border communities today in Armagh with British Brexit Committee.  
MU-backed MPs @Anna_Soubry & @ChukaUmunna in @thetimes today: if the government is serious about reasserting parliamentary sovereignty, MPs need a meaningful vote on the #brexit deal >>  
No further mention of Brexit, missing Impact Reports or David Davis lying to Parliament on the @BBC homepage. Instead we're given vital, hard hitting nuggets such as 'Queen Looks at Boat'.Good to see the Beeb has its priorities in order. 
The UK will get a Brexit deal but it will be "ugly and damaging", Tony Blair tells @helenlewis in fascinating interview. 
I have no idea how reliable any poll is, and this one is well within the margin of error. But it may be the first time any poll in NI has found a majority for a United Ireland in any circumstances. Hard Brexit is weakening the UK.  
‘They're playing games with the constitution. They're playing games with the devolution settlement.’Shadow Scottish Secretary @LesleyLaird exposes the real reason @ScottishTories voted down Labour's Brexit amendments this week - to spare @theresa_may's blushes. 
Thousands of pro-independence Catalans rally in BrusselsTens of thousands of people from Catalonia are rallying in Brussels to complain about what they see as the EU's failure to help them following a failed independence referendum in the Spanish region. 
The Great Brescape! CBI boss warns 60% of firms will enact Brexit escape plans if #NoProgress continues next week: 
Disingenuous or delusional Remainers laughed at the very suggestion. This from Schulz who was recently President of the European Parliament. The direction of travel has never been in doubt. The UK made the right choice to Brexit.  
Food will be CHEAPER after Brexit, says Wetherspoons chief Tim Martin  
52 per cent of people believe they will have less rights as a result of the Tory Brexit agenda  
UK would be £156,000,000,000 a year better off after Brexit WITHOUT a deal with EUSo why is our stupid Gov offering £40,000,000,000 to get a deal?It makes no senseIt's perverse beyond beliefIt's almost as if the Tory Gov is in cahoots with EUWhat other explanation is there?  
NEW @GiselaStuart: Regulatory Alignment "Completely Unacceptable", Doesn't Respect Referendum Result  
@KateHoeyMP I know you are desperate but this is ridiculous. Care to mention the fact this would require a treaty change, or unanimous agreement from EU28 to give up sovereignty? or is this is just bollocks and propoganda #Brexit #MartinSchulz 
‘We'll be somebody again!' Proud fisherman says fishing industry will THRIVE after Brexit  
So Brussels, the capital of failed state Belgium, have LOST their Euro 2020 matches. And UEFA has given them to London! #Brexit #Euro2020  
My take on the David Davis' Houdini act with the #impactassessments, the state of play in the Brexit negotiations, and the great unravelling of the government’s Brexit promises:  
Taking back control from Brussels. Proper Hard Brexit reaction  
My article for @politicshome: "This week has proven to be the great unravelling of the government’s Brexit promises, when fantasy met reality & they were left stuck between a rock and a hard border."  
Labour are intent on bashing business while the Conservatives are pursuing a damaging hard Brexit. Lib Dems are now the natural home for businesses  
Read Tony Blair’s wide-ranging interview with @NewStatesman’s @HelenLewis, covering the work of our Institute, the Middle East, the distraction of Brexit and more  
A majority are now in favour of holding a referendum on Irish unity in the event of a 'hard' Brexit, a major new opinion poll carried out by Lucidtalk has shown  
She’s damn right. Draw your own conclusions about why (large parts of) media in full fingers in ears la-la-la mode. #brexit 
Brussels Official: UK Will Be ‘Protectorate’ of EU Under Appeaser Theresa’s Brexit Plan  
Even The Telegraph warns it’s game over for Theresa May, unless she delivers on Brexit now [TWEETS]  
David Davis tells Select Committee the dog ate his Brexit Impact Assessment 
It is neither the government nor the electorate which has the final authority to decide over matters of state, but parliament alone. This has been largely missed regarding #Brexit.  
Breaking: @MollyMEP & @JolyonMaugham have launched judicial review against govt to get them to publish #Brexit impact studies  
Philip Hammond revealed yesterday that Cabinet has not even decided what kind of Brexit it wants. Hold government to account, and share this. #LeaveWatch 
David Davis lies again and again as the country prepares for a Brexit collapse, Theresa May is disintegrating and the twisted evil Tory chancellor Phillip Hammond shockingly blames everything on disabled people... what sick times we are living in  
Dear Media can you please stop aiding and abetting #georgeosborne's political rehabilitation b/c when it comes to austerity, he ravaged ordinary Britain and made Brexit possible. 
There goes any chance of a second referendum  
Britain has its own Foreign Policy; Economic Policy; Social Policy; Arts Policy; National & Regional Government. But we’re in the EU. Who knew? Stop #Brexit! 
Fascinating @george_osborne speech. Door open to tilt at City Hall or return to Parliament and no regrets for lack of Brexit planning in run up to 23 June. Not sure history will see it that way. 
More than 40,000 people marched through Brussels to support Catalan independence.They were led by ousted leader Carles Puigdemont. He's wanted in Spain for organizing an illegal referendum.  
VICTORY: Wembley replaces Brussels Eurostadium as venue for Euro 2020. Nice to see an early Brexit win! 
Actually Osborne and Cameron deliberately and repeatedly used migrants as convenient punching bag, fuelling popular anger leading to Brexit.  
Britain fought hard over the Brexit bill. So why is Philip Hammond rushing to pay it? 
Brexiters always knew we’d have to honour our EU commitments, but they just didn’t bother to tell anyone.  Long term economic hit of Brexit likely to dwarf £45bn 
All sections of society should oppose Brexit border – @ChrisHazzardSF  
Now, which is worse for #Brexit?Schulz giving a political speech to his party conference, with a far fetched plan for a United States of Europe?Davis, the Brexit Minister, having said for a year there are Brexit IAs and then admitting there aren’t, and UK govt having no plan? 
James O’Brien tries to help out this Brexit voter with some facts about the fishing industry in his town, but ends up with his head in his hands  
I will continue to remind Europe and The World that, while Britain accuses Ireland of blocking its trade deal with The EU, it continues to block disclosure of the files on those who murdered my band. #Brexit  
One of the best things to read on the current position of the Brexit talks.  
If every time Schulz opens his mouth it’s somehow *massively* important for Brexiteers……how can it be that every time a UK politician spouts inaccurate or irrelevant crap about Brexit that should be discounted by the rest of the EU? 
In CityAM, Brian Monteith, Director of Communications at Global Britain, says he no longer believes Theresa May is the right person to deliver Brexit. 
Fleeced: Scottish farmers to lose £2 billion in EU funding after Brexit  Voting Tory went well then.... Should have voted Indy when you had the chance 
Denmark isn't participating in #PESCO because it held a referendum in 1992 which means it cannot participate in the "elaboration and the implementation of decisions and actions of the Union which have defence implications”. The Danes say Lisbon doesn't change that.  
Retweet if you’d feel happier if my aunt’s budgie Ronnie O’Sullivan was negotiating #Brexit than David Davis 
I asked Osborne which he believes would be worse: a Corbyn government or hard Brexit? He replies that Theresa May "doesn't have the votes" for hard Brexit in parliament. 
Having continuously told readers that #Brexit would make Britain better, I'm sure #TheSun #DailyExpress & #DailyMail today put @DavidDavisMP @DExEUgov admission absolutely no financial risk assessments had been done up on the front page-...oh. Oh dear.#Crooks #Liars #PoisonPress 
READ | @JLongworthLML blasts May’s incompetence re: Brexit, says she must “grasp the nettle, or alternatively the Conservative party must grasp the leadership challenge before it is too late.”  
Today's @ScotNational #Brexit comp. Here's my inky offering...  
.@ChrisHazzardSF - “I would encourage everyone to stand against a DUP-Tory Brexit Border at the ‘No Border No Brexit’ demonstration at the Pier at Greencastle Ferry Crossing, on Saturday 9th December at 2pm.”  
CBI: Brexit is the Worst Thing to Happen in Any Country in the World Ever  
.@MickeyBradySF & @cathalboylansf welcome the British Brexit committee to Armagh to discuss the impact a DUP-Tory Brexit border in Ireland will have on: communities families citizens and their rights & livelihoods  
Labour three-line whip to force MPs to back unamended Brexit bill  
Could Jeremy Corbyn deliver a better Brexit than Theresa May? 
Theresa May's brexit deal is the worst in UK history.EU leak details of the agreement so far & it's terrible.May agreed to keep the UK in the European Court of Human rights,let immigrants keep claiming UK benefits & EU immigrants get more rights than Brits  
This should do the trickvia @TheCanaryOTPThe government just hired Mystic Meg, Russell Grant and Derek Acorah to advise David Davis on Brexit 
Ed Miliband found an old paper by Theresa May which skewers her Brexit strategy  
I am a great fan of fantasy, I love fantasy, but I don't want to live in a fantasy, especially one with an inevitably sad, miserable ending. In the real world, Brexit is a disaster on a collision course to catastrophe.I will never get behind Brexit.  
I remember being called a conspiracy theorist for pointing this out before the Brexit referendum.  
So 1) How did Louise Mensch know Putinbots were trying to influence Brexit? 2) Why was she using them to help the Brexit cause by RT and amplifying their messaging.?  
Sorry but that is bullshit. The British people were lectured for 3 months that the referendum was to stay in or to leave fully - ie what is now called ‘Hard Brexit’.  No reference was ever made to soft Brexit or any other fudge.  
If this was to be a binary choice - a 'united states of Europe', or 'leave the EU', for which would Sinn Féin campaign in the Republic of Ireland? If history is a guide, it would be the latter - despite Sinn Féin fervently arguing against Brexit for Northern Ireland.  
Mensch admitted she knew that Putin Bots pushed Brexit.  Chose to stay mum because she was afraid it would "endanger the result" of the vote  
The Tories we see stumbling through Brexit have done worse to their country. Heartbreaking stuff from Frank Field MP.  
In today’s edition of ‘stupid things my bigoted teacher said’: ‘everyone that voted for Brexit is stupid’ and ‘Farage should be locked up for hate crime’. The joys of our education system. 
Philip Hammond was rebuked by Downing Street last night after suggesting Gov could still pay a multi-billion Brexit fee even if we quit without a trade deal, he is a wolf in sheeps clothing. 
Stand by my comments on Ireland and the border issue. It is not being used as a EU-Trojan Horse to 'undermine' #Brexit (get real). It's more a case of negligence and UK-centric naval-gazing. #AllOutPolitics 
Funny that. On Tuesday I spoke to a salamander with a PhD in both Economics and Chaos Theory and he seemed certain that Brexit was an unmitigated disaster promoted only by shysters and the genitally challenged.  
Some Tories want to make him Prime Minister but the country wants his head. The lying scum bag that leading the Brexit negations is a lame duck politician who lives in a Brexit fantasy world. It is time to #StopBrexit #DavidDavisResign 
Even The Telegraph warns it’s game over for Theresa May, unless she delivers on Brexit now [TWEETS]  
If brexit is such a wonderful idea why the fuck do we need to find solutions for it, solutions are the answers to problems, ergo brexit must be a problem! Here’s a solution, don’t do it you f*****g idiots! #StopBrexit 
BBC too busy reporting on enquiry into Momentum rather than the Incompetence of the #Brexit government negotiators Typical BBC & MSM #ToryBias 
Here you go Remoaners, here's the true face of your European Union. A full United States of Europe by 2025 and if member states don't agree, they're automatically booted out. Now tell me you'd win a second referendum. 
A €12 billion deal with Qatar? But how can France trade with the world? Why doesn’t the EU stop them? Who knew? Stop #Brexit!  
Downing Street has slapped down Philip Hammond for suggesting that the UK would pay the Brexit bill even without a trade deal  
Send an e-mail to John Bercow to remind him that he threatened David Davies with contempt of Parliament if he failed to deliver the Brexit Reports. Not only did he not produce them but they now appear not to exist.  e-mail. speakersoffice@parliament.uk 
If you were wondering, Brexiteers, your 'analysis' of Irish politics sounds like this: Neil Canuck of the Liberal party is terrified of Nigel Farage's Labour, and fears he won't be able to deliver Brexit before the election of the new King. 
Brexit select committee toeing the Irish border - the change in road surface is only marker if border  
The Sun wants us to help clear up their Brexit shambles.Sorry Sun, but you campaigned for this for decades.You own it, you sort it out.  
At FMQ Today Shifty Willie Rennie asked the FM to support a Second Referendum on #Brexit However he is standing fast against a Second Referendum on Independence as he says folk are Sick oh Referendums! Oh Aye Willie if you say so  
Even Brexiteers now expect a bad deal from Brexit, but they still think that leaving the EU is a good idea—it is just being done badly 
.@MESandbu's Free Lunch: To Brexit, give up on magical thinking and accept the stubborn facts of cross-border trade  #ftfreelunch via @FT @FTEconomics 
Theresa May must not allow the UK to be 'bullied' into bad Brexit deal, leading Brexiteer warns  #premium 
On behalf of #Remain I would like to apologise for many warnings we made, saying #Brexit would be an omnishambles clusterfuck Even we didn't go far enough in saying just what a total shitshow run by 3rd rate cretins it would beFor not screaming louder & constantly, I apologise 
EU warns UK government could fall NEXT WEEK: Juncker says May will be toppled if Brexit talks stay deadlocked - as PM gives herself until the end of TODAY to seal a deal over Ireland  
Tory Brexiteers say we must come out of the Single Market to respect the referendum, but they haven’t always said that ...  
We Get A Lobotomy In A Bid To Understand Theresa May’s Brexit Strategy  
"Theresa May’s Brexit blinkers are preventing her seeing anything else. While the Govt obsesses over every Brussels twist and turn, Britain’s other problems are growing & getting worse", writes @DawnHFoster 
The EU cares about just ONE thing in Brexit talks – BRITAIN’S MONEY, IDS rages   Not just Money-They also want to destroy Britain 
Although the Committee voted (on party lines) against holding the Brexit Secretary in contempt for failing to carry out the Commons motion, evidence he misled the House is a separate issue and one also raised by @DavidLammy, @PeteWishart and @helenhayes_ 
Irony: the mythical EU "benefit tourists" will do much better out of Brexit than they would have if Cameron's renegotiation had been implemented..   
Hello Martin, people are starting to get a bit sceptical about Brexit over here, so if you could just say this in the first two languages for now that would be grand.  
Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin claims food & drink will be cheaper after Brexit due to a cut in tariffs, prefer to take the word of a successful businessman than MPs, also we’re entitled under WTO to scrap tariffs altogether on food. 
“How will Brexit affect health and health services in the UK? Evaluating three possible scenarios” By .@HealthierIn .@mikegalsworthy - leaving EU will have profound consequences for health & NHS - substantial threats posed  
My testimony yesterday: The Trump Admin supports Brexit rhetorically but in its actions it seems to be pursuing a predatory policy designed to take immediate economic advantage of the dislocations & vulnerabilities created for the UK by the Brexit process.  
It is shameful that members of the public are increasingly doing governments work (as government are so utterly incompetent & in arrogant denial) .@HealthierIn have written a piece into the impact of Brexit on the NHS.   
I spent three months trying to get the Government to publish Brexit impact assessments that they never actually did and never even existed.. But on the bright side this is quite funny  
Handily summarised in a tweet why public opinion on Brexit hasn't shifted much since the referendum, and why many Brits feel the hassle will be worth it in the long run.  
Siri, show me a metaphor for Brexit please.  
What has David Davis been doing since he was appointed Brexit Secretary? “Nothing” says @mrjamesob  
.@M_AndersonSF offers to share legal advice showing special status is possible with Tory MP and asks him to share British government legal advice on Brexit. Still waiting . . . @M_AndersonSF @BBCTalkback 
Remainers absolutely loving Brexit now  
MPs did not properly approve Brexit—so the triggering of Article 50 was invalid  via @prospect_uk#StopBrexit 
This government doesn't understand Brexit's trade-offs. @plegrain on the UK's trade policy 
Willie Rennie in the chamber there, stridently demanding a second referendum. No, not YOU, Scotland. #FMQs 
Completely unsurprising but Britain won't retain an Advocate General in ECJ after Brexit. Most recently, AG Sharpston's contribution to the development of EU law has been important & valuable. #NoSeatAtTheTable 
When will @jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour wake up to the fact that allowing Brexit to happen will ruin your hopes to rebuild the NHS?Stop playing politics and work to save the NHS now while you still can.  
Exactly as Vote Leave warned in the referendum.  
EU hands Theresa May 72-hour Brexit deadline  
Going through with #brexit now is the equivalent of spending a 2 week holiday in Batley rather than admit you took the wrong turning on the way to the Lake District. #ExitFromBrexit 
Germany's Brexit team has set up an English-language Twitter account where they post pics of them discussing what the UK is doing. This is fine.  
The worse deal for Britain is to leave the EU. The best option for the future for the people of Britain is to stay inside the EU. Brexit can be reversed. The people were told lies. You can change your mind and we can #StopBrexit 
Damian Green - any news of this report into the investigation into May's de facto deputy? Heard it was meant to be published today and, with David Davis promising to resign if he was sacked as a consequence, I'm hoping for some good news!  
Brexit - impact assessments undertaken by the UK government  
Theresa May no longer represents the interests of the United Kingdom. She is placing our alliance with the U.S. in peril. She is sabotaging Brexit. Time to go. Now. 
Be very afraid. They want their Brexit no matter what. They will push for an exit deal and decide the rest on the Q.T once we’ve left. MPs - extend A50 or vote to be able to reject the deal.  
Info for this Monday!It's crucial to get there folks, many leave voters starting to see Brexit for the balls-up that it is. #StopBrexit #FinalSayCourtesy @spaceangel1964. 
The Alex Salmond Show - Brexit Special  via @YouTube 
There isn't an Irish 'problem'. The problem is Brexit.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Naughty Step for you!EU Bosses refer Poland, Hungary & Czech Republic to ECJ for protecting their citizensFurious Leaders of all 3 countries maintain that forced migrant quotas are a security threat to their citizens.So glad we're Leaving #EU#Brexit 
Also: Hard Brexit would be 'infinitely worse' for the UK than the EU, says Dutch PM: ... The sky is (sometimes) blue, the sun rises in the east, Department of Stating the Obvious. 
The Guardian view on the Brexit crisis: time to stop the fanatics | Editorial  
"We need to get going with the second half of the talks" - UK Foreign Sec @BorisJohnson on #Brexit 
I have never supported 2nd referendum... final vote yes but ref no... It won’t take many more Idiotic revelations to make me change my mind  
Brexit: UK fails to retain voice in European court of justice  
Brexit is an absolute con. Sling May out and put in an honest politicians such as Rees-Mogg. We cannot allow this incompetent to crash on with the destruction of our country and way of life. She is shameful and must go. 
UK Govt have conducted an impact assessment on gravity foul sewers and lateral drains, but not on UK leaving the EU, the biggest decision the UK will have taken in 50 years. #Brexit is being conducted by a chaotic and incompetent Gov which doesn't care about its economic impact. 
I have written to the Speaker of the House of Commons today asking him to investigate whether the Brexit Secretary has misled Parliament and whether this amounts to a contempt of Parliament 
The government just hired Mystic Meg, Russell Grant and Derek Acorah to advise #DavidDavis on #Brexit. #Satire from me. But only just... Do read/share! 
Brussels establishes a new hard deadline for a Brexit divorce deal of Sunday night. Until this one slips too...  
Brexit bingo *HOUSE*  
A #Lucidtalk poll has shown a majority support a referendum on Irish unity being held in the event of a hard Brexit  
China Commodity Carnage Continued Overnight As Brexit Fears & Bitcoin Cheers Dominate  
My view on the impact assessments scandal is that the Tory Brextremists want their #BrexitTaxHaven regardless of the impact #Brexit might have on the rest of us. So they've very little interest in impact reports or in conducting the negotiations competently.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
#MakeAMiserableFilm The Brexit Club  
'No-deal' Brexit would be worst outcome possible for UK, Lords warn  
If Theresa May resigns, is Jacob Rees-Mogg the man to deliver Brexit? 
Latest: @MayorofLondon @SadiqKhan has met with Pakistan’s Prime Minister raising women’s equality, trade opportunities post #Brexit and they discussed #Trump’s #Jerusalem move. The PM is a big fan of London’s tube which he uses on visits. @LBC 
PSNI deputy chief constable tells Brexit committee that Republican dissidents would probably attack any Irish border infrastructure. Pity Jacob Rees-Mogg has "snubbed" the meeting, which is being held in Northern Ireland.  
Breaking: Police confirm that no Brexit assessment reports were found on David Davis's computer, not one, none, nothing, zero. - #BrexitImpactReports He lied, so #DavidDavisMustGo pic.twitter.com/UMowOGWXPk 
This week's @WHFP1 is in shops now, please buy a copy. And at 32 pages long, it's a remarkable fact your WHFP is still a whole 32 pages more than any assessment made by the UK Government on the economic impact of #Brexit #truedat 
Why doesn't Jeremy corbyn as the largest political phenomenon  of the last few years, not simply eat all the others such as Brexit 
NEWS! Mixed reviews for Brexit TV drama after ‘Impact assessments were just a dream’ plot twist  
I see the "it's all Theresa May's fault, if only we could get rid of her" Brexit narrative is gathering pace. 
Birmingham still tryna work out what brexit is and we should give them say in who the London mayor should be? 
Andrea Leadsom says a total of 16 peers and MPs have taken the trouble to go and read the Brexit papers 
Polls show that Theresa May is FINISHED, with Jacob Rees-Mogg set to lead Britain into Brexit  via @Your Brexit 
We are told 'Brexit mean Brexit', its 'Red, White and Blue' and its 'In The National Interest'.I'm telling you INDYREF2 means INDYREF2, its WHITE and BLUE ONLY and its IN SCOTLANDS NATIONAL INTEREST.Westminster, the Tories and Labour DO NOT speak for me or Scotland. 
European health community calls on the EU and UK to prioritise patients as crunch Article 50 decision approaches. Read the full press release here: #Brexit4patients #Brexit  
Think it’s fair to say that David Davis has put the cont into take back control. There are a few other candidates, mind. #brexit 
Where are senior civil servants speaking truth to power? Amid Brexit chaos, keeping heads down, again.Impact statement shocker should have them demanding "letters of direction" from ministers. David Walker lambasts: 
In case you missed it: The Brexit Secretary has only just admitted that the Brexit Impact Studies, which people have been discussing and demanding for months (including over 23,000 people on our petition), don't exist  
This is why @Anna_Soubry and I are calling in the Times today for the people through Parliament to be put back in charge of the Brexit process.  7/7 
The very act of bigging up the Brexit Impact Reports, keeping them secret, 'redacting' them, and then finally admitting they were never real in the first place......has itself done untold damage to the UK's standing and negotiating position. 
"Between Nick Timothy and the Brexit Secretary, David Davis, one feels that there were few mirrors in Downing Street that went unkissed" Wonderful line from @stephenkb 
“@theresa_may has the smell of political death around her. She’ll be gone by #Christmas. We need someone like @DavidDavisMP or maybe @Jacob_Rees_Mogg! Get rid of the #TRAITORS!  #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #EU 
Hard Brexit is not about dishonesty, not ultimately.  It is about a fantasy: UK as a 21st century Victorian trading nation. Steampunk politics.The bluster and untruths accumulate as a consequence of the fantasy. 
MPs did not properly approve Brexit—so the triggering of Article 50 was invalid  via @prospect_uk 
Brexit options that the SNP would demand an indyref2 for:Hard Brexit Medium BrexitSoft Brexit Tory BrexitCancelled Brexit If Brexit Never Existed  
Varadkar gets 11 point poll lead (up from 2) in wake of Brexit talks veto threat:  
I very much like the comments from @AlexSalmond at the end of his great  programme @AlexSalmondShowToday about #Brexit Full video  
Thread: While the government has been treating Parliament with contempt over its now apparent lack of Brexit impact assessments, the Lords EU Committee has been doing its job for them, investigating the impact a No Deal would have on the UK. 1/  
Hard Brexit is a form of magical realism.For example, remember Davis (and others) talking of all the international trade deals which would be under way - even completed?They believed it. They believed that the deals would all suddenly appear, because they believed they would. 
Today @RIBA we've launched a new report detailing the impact of Brexit on architecture exports and how our profession can continue to grow globally as Britain leaves the EU - read #GlobalTalentGlobalReach here  #Brexit #architecture #architects  
"The Irish government has been played like a harp by the European Commission."Conservative MP and leave campaigner, Bernard Jenkin, on Brexit negotiations #r4today 
Brexit Saboteur May Flakes on Israel Support, Opens Up ANOTHER Front With Trump's America (Which Britain Needs a Trade Deal With)  
Incorrect Steve. The Irish government's position has been the same since the Brexit vote, reflected in the unanimous written agreement by the 27 remaining EU member states in April. Britain should have been paying attention.  
Let's be clear: when Trump was asking about his electoral chances, and Boris assessing the likelihood of Brexit vote, they'd be talking to the same people: Mercer and Murdoch  
Theresa May can go from zero to hero if she declares that she has done her best to make a success of Brexit but must now conclude that it is in UK's interest to Remain in the EU. Nor is the SM & CU Brexit preferable, as UK would lose its influence on EU policies it must adhere to 
As time goes by and more emerges about the forces behind #Trump and #Brexit, the notion they were just some rogue popular revolt becomes more untenable. There was years of disinformation and planning. What made Trump sure he'd win if he ran? What swayed Boris to Leave? 
Extremely important piece about what is required to ensure Parliament has meaningful vote on final #Brexit deal.  
Hoping to raise the @ElectoralCommUK investigations into allegations of law breaking by Brexiteers in the EU Referendum shortly. #brexitshambles 
Lady Hermon--who is a friend--and I, differ on many, many things (including Brexit); but it is absurd to suggest she's in 'Dublin's pocket.' 
On ‘end state’ only one reading possible of May’s speeches since party conference 2016: Canada. It’ll be by definition Canada + + cos we start Brexit with 99% of acquis in UK statute. So right now convergence/divergence/alignment is a purely theoretical debate. 
The UK is at risk of losing some of its #BrightestMinds to Brexit - read our Brexit Means report to find out more about the subjects most at risk.  
to those who say public opinion is not changing re Brexit take the trouble to read this  
A new opinion poll shows that a majority of people in the North support special designated status within the EU & are in favour of a United Ireland over staying in the UK in event of a hard Brexit. As young republicans we will continue to oppose any border in Ireland and Brexit.  
Britain's Brexit supporters still think that leaving the EU is a good idea—it is just being done badly  
Anyone have Brexit advice for David Davis? @ScotNational is asking: 
Hey @marianorajoy !you forbid our democratic referendum, you beat us, you injured hundreds, you ousted our democratic Gov, you jailed our politicians...To Silence Us...But it looks that your plan doesn’t work... #Brussels4Cat 
DUP demanding seat at Brexit negotiations.. hands up who wants the DUP to represent them? let alone the basketcase tories..  
If only Theresa may came on TV tomorrow morning & said, that’s it, we’ve tried our best to negotiate fairly with the EU but it’s a waste of time. So. No divorce bill, we go to WTO and all £40Billion is going on NHS, Social Care, Housing, Roads & Defence. Welcome to #Brexit 
The key elements needed to ensure Parliament has a ‘meaningful’ vote on the #Brexit deal:1. Must come before exit day;2. Should be provided with comprehensive details of the deal, not simple heads of terms;3. Act of Parl approving terms before the PM signs any agreement.  
Brexit Saboteur Theresa May Flakes on Israel, Opens Up ANOTHER Front With Trump’s America (Which Britain Needs a Trade Deal With)  
The @UKLabour party is keeping all #Brexit options open - including #stopBrexit 
These are absolutely brilliant. Bravo @ScotNational “Newspaper leaves front page blank and urges readers to help Brexit minister” 
New post: Has Ireland scuppered Brexit?   
It's vital that all of us, whatever our position on Brexit, understand that the Irish border challenge is to adapt Brexit to protect the Good Friday Agreement, not to adapt the Good Friday Agreement to protect Brexit. 
Parliament debates the #FinalSay referendum petition on December 11. If you can, please join the protest from 10am onwards outside Parliament. I think it's fine if you turn up as late as 4pm. @spaceangel1964#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
A Speccie headline I'd though we would never see.  "Nick Clegg is right: we need a second Brexit referendum"  
47.9% would back a United Ireland in the event of a 'hard Brexit' #Brexit #GUENGL #LucidTalk 
Soft #Brexit? There's no Soft Brexit..it's still Brexit. We still Leave the EU Mar 2019 unless we #StopBrexit. We still damage our econ. We R likely still to contribute to EU agencies & be accountable to the ECJ in areas; we still lose rights.It's PAY & OBEY NO SAY...so STAY! 
Extraordinary & shameful that the Government has done less work on the #Brexit impact on our #NHS than the Commons library or @CommonsHealth (PS it’s v bad indeed). 
A lesson from Trump to Brexit... when you give up a trading bloc to go it alone. From:  
‘What is Brexit?’ asks David Davis  
To summarise: David Davis has not bothered to investigate the impact of Brexit or the impact will be so horrific he would rather lie about it. 
Thank you for that: re: #skypapers No matter how you roll re: #Brexit...none of us deserve nor expect nor should tolerate this level of incompetence.#NoConfidence. @Conservatives 
Theresa May has tried to kick the can down the road when it comes to the matter of what Brexit deal she wants. But #DUP intransigence has now opened up that can of worms 
Nearly a third of local manufacturers are looking to relocate because of #Brexit A stark reminder of the economic catastrophe that the Brit Govt & DUP have bestowed upon us  
2. Take just 2 of the elements in the ever-unfolding clusterfuck; NI’s border & Shrodinger’s Brexit Impact assessments.A tiny group of wingnuts that doesn’t even represent a majority in NI has the entire UK under its malign control.And Davis lying. Just lying to waste time. 
Sadly it's in the interests of both the DUP and Irish government to string this along. Brexit has made beggars of us all. 
#Brexit at Tiffany's #MakeAMiserableFilm 
And this silent loss of credibility as a serious negotiating party will have more long-term adverse consequences for UK's goals of post-Brexit trade agreements than anything which is positively agreed as part of the exit agreement.ends/ 
Yesterday marked the high watermark of the cult of Brexit. And a dramatic low in our democracy. Faith over facts. Fiction over truth. Party over country for shameless cheerleaders. Watched across the world.  
#brokenpolitics Parliament failing to hold minister to account for quite astonishing behaviour #Brexit  
The head of the CBI, Britain's biggest business lobbying group, warns that companies will start to move away from UK unless the PM presents a clear Brexit plan  
Whilst it is foolish to reach conclusions on a single study or survey - pre-EU referendum, support for a UI was steadily declining. How Brexit is being handled is reversing that. We need more critical unionist voices, not homogenous deference to Tories.  
And this is the horrifying problem - the setbacks are unforced errors.Brexit would be hard enough, trade agreements are hard enough, with experienced serious negotiating parties.But UK is here needlessly losing credibility, because of (frankly) easily exposed bullshit./11 
Brexit: UK has 48 hours to agree potential deal or talks cannot progress  
I understand the arguments over whether further education should be paid through taxation and not fees. But surely the emergence of Brexit and Trump seal the deal. Free access to further education is for the public good. 
EU chiefs and Tories fear @theresa_may's government could collapse ‘within weeks’ over #Brexit deadlock.  
“Strong and Stable”“Brexit means Brexit”“Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed”It’s all bollocks isn’t it? @Conservatives 
#MakeAMiserableFilm Fifty Shades Of Grayling#Brexit #ChrisGrayling 
But.On any view of Brexit, the UK will need to enter into new agreements - with the EU and other countries.And UK has not negotiated its own trade deals for 44 years./7 
Unlike Government, the Lords are doing impact assessments. They conclude 'No-deal' #Brexit would be worst outcome for UK.20% rise in food prices, 75,000 jobs lost in City & loss in tax revenue greater than our current net payments to EU. #exitfrombrexit 
In Arlene Foster’s constituency of Fermanagh which straddles Border with Republic of Ireland there is only one question this week. #Brexit  
This Sat 9th Dec @Open_Britain will be campaigning in local communities around the country in order to raise awareness of the dangers #Brexit poses to the #NHS.Will you join us on this vital campaign?To sign-up for an event near you: Please RT 
Dutch Prime Minister Mark Rutte has said that a hard Brexit would have an "infinitely" bigger impact on the UK than the EU. All signs underline this assessment as 'probably true'... #r4today 
Tory David Davis misled parliament - as he boasted about the Brexit impact assessments he now claims don't exist.  
And so this is Brexit, and what have we done?I wish it could be brexit every dayIn the bleak mid BrexitI'm dreaming of a Soft BrexitGod rest ye merry Merkel men, Let none of you diss MayDeck the halls with Brexit follywith thanks to @bbc5live listeners #brexitxmassongs 
Brexit put on hold as everyone realises borders only exist in our minds  
Time to call off #Brexit. RT if you agree 
The key elements needed to ensure Parliament has a ‘meaningful’ vote on the #Brexit deal:1. Must come before exit day;2. Should be provided with comprehensive details of the deal, not simple heads of terms;3. Act of Parl approving terms before the PM signs any agreement.  
Could Theresa May's government collapse next week if #Brexit talks do not progress?RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Huge thanks to supporters who've donated to help keep us afloat. You've parted with your hard-earned money, & we take that very seriously. We will be tireless in making the legal case for Brexit. If you'd like to make a donation, please follow the link. 
Theresa May was prepared to sell out British citizens in NI to save her own face - wouldn’t you call this treachery? I would. As @AMDWaters has said this morning-repeal European Communities Act and walk away still able to hold our heads high as a proud nation #Brexit #forBritain 
The most significant reaction to Davis lying about Brexit impact reports  
“Put the British people back in charge of leaving the EU” | our Co-Chairs @Anna_Soubry & @ChukaUmunna spell out the elements of a meaningful vote for Parliament on the #Brexit deal in today’s @thetimes 
READ: 19 pro-EU Tories write to the PM to insist eurosceptics must not be allowed to dictate terms of Brexit  
David Davis has just shown us in the most unequivocal way that Brexit fundamentalists rely on faith not facts to shape their analysis 
Just in case anyone accuses #Brexit politicians of being weasels, here’s a real weasel. They’re nice. Don’t be unfair to them. (Photo from NYTimes)  
With Grayling's contradiction of Hammond it's clear that whatever is happening with the negotiations, the Government's communication strategy on Brexit has completely collapsed. 
Article 50 should be revoked until the Brexit impact statements (that the government promised) have been done and debated. No real profession would be able to take action without knowledge. If a doctor gave drugs with no assessment they would be struck off and maybe jailed 
.@LucidTalk poll  -57.8% support special status for NI within the EU- A majority of 47.9% support NI remaining in the EU by joining a united Ireland- 52.4% believe there will be a reduction in rights as a result of Brexit- 75.8% believe EU standards should be maintained. 
Hard Brexit would be 'infinitely worse' for the UK than the EU, says Dutch PM.    
The EU Committee identifies lack of time as the ‘key factor’ adding to risk of no deal, and warns against enshrining #Brexit date in UK law #dealornodeal:  
Companies prepare for disorderly #Brexit as talks stall  
Time for cross-party Remainers to stop Brexit. More accurately: to put it out of its misery - it’s dying a death horribly painful for all of us.  
Bernard Jenkin on @BBCr4today professed not to understand why trade talks can't commence before agreement on Ireland, citizens & settlement is reached.Agreeing to sequencing is literally the only tangible thing Davis has done as Brexit secretary but Bernard must have missed it. 
Grayling on #r4today “We haven’t assessed rail, because we only have 2 rail lines going to EU”Highlights their ignorance:Many trains: made in ItalySteel for tracks: lots importedWorkers: Many EU citizensEtc.It’s not just about the obvious, Brexit impacts everything.  
Hey, Theresa.At what point, when Brexit is going this badly, do you look around the room and think the man to face the media should be Chris Grayling?U ok hun? 
Secret Brexit impact reports revealed at last:  
Jean-Claude Juncker fears Theresa May's government will collapse next week without a Brexit deal. Do you think we can get a deal?  
Nothing to see here...move along now...Chris Grayling tells @BBCr4today that Brexit is coming on nicely, thank you 
"There is no Brexit deal which fixes the Union. There is no Brexit deal which can possibly outweigh the will of Scotland’s people, who voted overwhelmingly to preserve Scotland’s place in Europe." | Independence! Nothing less!  #Referendum2018 
Minister Chris Grayling on #r4today basically saying gov haven’t assessed impact of #brexit because wouldn’t like what would find. Incredible I/view. 
Chris Grayling saying there’s 800 pages of analysis as if that’s enough. I have a five day trial next week with a 1,200 page trial bundle. The notion that 800 pages even scratches the surface of a proper analysis of the impact of Brexit is laughable. #r4today 
Read the EU Committee’s new report on #Brexit: #dealornodeal:  
The Brexit breakdown - James Forsyth on what went wrong  
Grayling disinters an old May cliche on @BBCr4today - ‘there’ll be no running commentary’ on Brexit. Now we know why. They’re doing nothing. 
I’m beginning to get an incy-wincy feeling that Brexit might not be a brilliant idea. Retweet if you are getting it too 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 7: real wage growth has fallen sharply since the referendum vote:  
Now here is a headline you won't be seeing in the right wing Brexit supporting press this morning, but the Irish press has hit the nail on the head. How is this man still in charge of Brexit negotiations? Time end the reign of the Brexit fundamentalists and #StopBrexit 
Absolutely,a civilised society supports people in need,we’re so caught up in Brexit we’re losing sight of this,education,health;the things that really matter  
7 times Tory David Davis boasted about the Brexit impact assessments he now claims don't exist 
Fears May’s govt could collapse as early as next week without a Brexit deal. @TelegraphNews says Johnson, Davis & Gove ready to act in case of coup agst May. 2 Putin puppets & 1 liar. I feel sick to the pit of my stomach & mourn for the future of the UK. 
So many challenges facing the country going unmet because every day ministers wake up and think of nothing but Brexit 
Woke up full of rage at the thought that the Cabinet hasn't even discussed what it wants from Brexit, 17 months after the referendum. 
As someone who is regularly a target of the bile of Scotland in Union & some of their more unpleasant followers their total silence on #Brexit, the biggest constitutional crisis faced by the UK, is quite remarkable  
Watching Chris Grayling get smacked about re Brexit on @BBCBreakfast. The country is being led by a selection of absolute political lightweights at the most crucial juncture in my lifetime. 
My #tftd:Brexit minister, David Davis, has repeatedly lied to the country and to parliament about the existence of forecasts about the impact of Brexit on the UK economy.He must be sacked.#BrexitImpactStudies#DavidDavisMustGo#r4today @LBc @skynews 
Government suppressed Brexit impact assessments in effort to keep parliament and public in the dark. They’re meant to lead, not mislead, the country 
Looks like the Brexit committee is about the only place that doesn’t hold David Davis in contempt 
A British businessman and successful exporter talks some much sought-after, and long overdue, common sense about Brexit - politicians please note  
Chris grayling on #GMB to make excuses for the fact that David Davis lied to everyone,including MPs about 'brexit Impact papers' referring to them dozens of times, mentioning them on live TV,then,when ordered to produce them,admitting that they don't exist,is back covering #Inept 
As thousands from #Catalonia arrive in Brussels for a mass demonstration, @skynewsmichelle asks “Why not give them a legal binding referendum?” #skyviews 
If you're not from, or living in, County Meath: (1) Sorry about that.(2) Here's a bit of my @meathchronicle column stuck online anyway. Spoiler alert: Brexit is a shambles 
Mayday Mayday #Brexit #TheresaMay #NorthernIreland #DUP @DeGroene 
Companies prepare for disorderly Brexit as talks stall  
Brexit Tories take another page from the Trumpian-Republican playbook – Progressive Pulse:  Chaos is being created, deliberately 
'No-deal' Brexit would be worst outcome possible for UK, Lords warn  
‘Yes, the Brexit Secretary really does think there's no point planning for Brexit’  
The key point: #Brexit has become, even to its supporters, an identity-marker not a progress-determinant  
UK charities will lose £258m of EU money after Brexit. Where's the plan?  
Your morning briefing: Saudis condemn US shift on Jerusalem, #Brexit latest, IS fighters ‘shouldn’t come back to UK’ and #StormCaroline hits 
Brexit means...Taking back what we never lost to lose what we currently have. 
Up early in time to catch decent Brexit Tory Bernard Jenkin on R4 Today indulging in painful wishful thinking over Irish border issue ( etc) 
Yet again, we have a Leave Means Leave member, Bernard Jenkin, being interviewed on #r4today, sowing misinformation. I think BBC should replace ‘Thought For The Day’, with academics presenting ‘Brexit Facts Of The Day’, in which they fact-check the BS.  
How can the leavers tell us we don’t need a hard border in northern Ireland when they spent the entire referendum campaign telling us we needed a hard border so that we could stop immigrants coming into the UK? #r4today 
I really despair at the blatant pro Brexit bias of #r4today giving Bernard Jenkin the opportunity to repeat the Owen Patterson lie about Irish trade. The official stats totally refute these claims. 
Surge in support for Irish government on back of Brexit border row. Puts paid to some British media reports that Varadkar firm on border position because of Sinn Fein  
The Irish government is being "played like a harp" by the European Commission in Brexit negotiations says Bernard Jenkin #r4today 
"the Government’s assertion that ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’ is not helpful. It is difficult to envisage a worse outcome for the United Kingdom than ‘no deal’."#Brexit #NoDeal 
Has the government done 'impact assessments' of #Brexit on the UK economy?"No" - @DavidDavisMP, 6th Dec 2017"They're in excruciating detail" - @DavidDavisMP, 25th October 2017More   
The Tories have conducted a shambolic Brexit process, dragging the UK into oblivion, prioritising party interest over national interest... We need to #StopBrexit #r4today 
The Tories Theresa May David Davis have the data and the forecasts and it’s the Basket case Brexit abyss everyone fears.. they lie just to stay in power even though it means burying the country   
Because yesterday's appearance at the Brexit Committee screamed: "PM in waiting."  
Whilst we're all rightly up in arms about the blatant lies of @DavidDavisMP, let's not forget that @theresa_may still has the impossible #IrishBorder situation to solve. #Brexit isn't just stupid - it's threatening the very make-up of the UK and risks destabilizing Ireland & NI. 
- @Future_SA_ has called for a referendum on nuclear energy so that South Africans can directly make a decision about something that will impact their lives so greatly. #NoToNuclear #energyIndaba @OUTASA @_SaveSA 
Rees-Mogg's characteristic weasel words aren't enough to save Davis - investigation now needed into missing Impact Assessments 
David Davis lies again and again as the country prepares for Brexit collapse, Theresa May is disintegrating and the twisted evil Tory chancellor Phillip Hammond shockingly blames everything on disabled people... what sick times we are living in  
Would you buy a car or get married or take a job without any info, totally unseen? David Davis brazenly admitted yesterday that he’s negotiating Brexit while having zero info on its impact on us. What do you call that?  
British politics is officially bonkers.Fresh plots to oust May in the same week UK on brink of Brexit breakthrough.Chatter of 'Davies as PM' in the same week he admits that Brexit impact assessments he bragged about don't exist.  
Scottish newspaper leaves front page blank and asks readers to help out Brexit Minister, David Davis.  
Time for MPs to vote for what they believe in, put country before party. Stop the national humiliation and stand up for British values of integrity & openness. No more lies @DavidDavisMP #Brexit #FBPE 
Oh the irony of a member of this government pointing the finger at others re: a lack of productivity. They even have a guy who just spent a year not producing a single Brexit report. 
Imagine being dropped deep behind enemy lines, being under heavy fire, taking losses, and asking for the plan and being told there is none. That's Brexit right now. 
Dutch PM warns UK that #Brexit harakiri will hurt. How about shooting ourselves in the foot? No, that won't feel good either. Sawing our arm off? No.#stopbrexit & #DDexit 
Discussed on @GMB how David Davis admitted the dog didn’t eat his Brexit homework. He does no homework and doesn’t even have a dog 
Germany now has an official Brexit twitter account.  
Readers of @scotnational have given their Brexit impact reports.  
So if there is no Hard Brexit, then the SNP will not want indyref2?These idiots are playing the electorate for fools.  
#skypapers #Brexit #ThursdayThoughts #ThursdayMotivation  now he has successfully sued the nhs ,more public money stolen from theNHS  now in his Swiss tax evading bank accounts @theresa_may @RuthDavidsonMSP #skypapers 
Delusional? in wanting to protect Scotland's businesses, trade, citizens from Brexit? Just a pity rUK politicians don't think the same way. Hope you're better at your job than you are at posting sensible, rational posts.  
Actually the whole damn govt should resign and the referendum rerun!  
Nicola Sturgeon in crisis, as she has not been the centre of attention since her mauling at the General Election. Solution: pretend #Brexit justifies #indyref2 #DelusionalSNP 
It's bizarre in all my 18 years of being Tory MEP we were drilled in the doctrine that we must insist on impact assessments on every legislative proposal by EU Commission to ensure taxpayers interests are protected but apparently this doesn't apply at home on the impact of Brexit 
No deal Brexit threatens £4.8bn architecture industry, says report  
No Brexit deal worst-case scenario for Britain: Lords committee  
The government says it hasn't carried out any #Brexit #ImpactAssessments. But @TheAHDB has. It shows farm profit could drop from c.£38k to £15k a year.Details:  
@njorogep Kenya’s economy has witnessed 14 significant shocks in 2.5 years - Brexit, US elections, drought, extended electioneering period etc. #KenyaEconomicUpdate @WorldBankKenya @KNBStats 
Theresa May under pressure to break Brexit talks impasse  
The Architecture of #Brexit the Grand Design. Build a very big house with. No plot. No Architect.No Structural Engineer. No tools. No permission. No plans. andNobody to build it. Go ahead anyway and blame the Irish. #stopbrexit 
No more 'my dog ate it' excuses. Where are the Brexit impact reports?  
Harsh lessons for the next phase of Brexit  
I completed my #Brexit impact assessment some time ago. Action:Invest internationally, as recommended by @johnredwood. Buy a bolt hole abroadGet rid of all borrowingsTake your pension earlyStick fingers in ears#stopbrexit 
if Labour now go all out to stop Brexit, they'll gain a lot more voters than they'll lose ! @jeremycorbyn 
David Davis admits he lied to parliament and no financial risk assessment on Brexit has been conducted. His Tory chums say that's fine.If you agree it's not, join us Monday 11th December to protest at Parliament Square. Where MPs are failing, citizens must speak up. 
#DUP continue to show an absolute lack of class. But then again they’ve always favoured looking for a Unionist to bully and denigrate rather than taking responsibility. Sylvia Hermon, hasn’t been bought and can’t be sold by anyone. #Brexit  
NIGERIA THE 6TH LARGEST OIL OIL PRODUCING NATIONIN THE WRLD NO #SHIPPING LINE NO #AIRLINE BIG FR NOTHIN COUNTRY #FREEBIAFRA #REFERENDUM @UN 
Lords warn no-deal Brexit would be 'deeply damaging' for UK  
Davies's Schrodinger styled Brexit impact assessment is a bit like the govt's policy to get disabled people into work to save costs . And then claiming that disabled people in work probably caused a drop in productivity... how much more incoherent rubbish & lies before they go? 
non-stop winning since Brexit  
Welcome to the new age of despair in British Brexit politics  
Jean-Claude Juncker 'fears Theresa May's Government will collapse next week without Brexit deal'  via @telegraphnews 
Brexit is stupid.You cannot persuade smart people to implement stupid damaging ideas.Therefore Brexit will be implemented badly, by idiots..  
No Brexit deal will "deeply damage" UK, Lords report warns  
Historic map of the week (new Wednesday plan). Virginia's secession referendum from 1861 by county. The western split stands out and adds context to the splitting of the state during the war. Thread below on key stats in this map.  
Every day I wonder which history will judge as the greater unforced error -- Brexit or Trump. I think we're winning.  
Your reaction to "referendum" must be kind of like my reaction when anyone says something "trumps" something else. 
We shouldn't let Franken and Jerusalem distract from the fact that the UK's government has no actual position on Brexit and may fall within the week.  
ACTUALLY Jeremy Corbyn can stop brexit, he just needs to start thinking about how great neoliberalism is and then we all get flung into a dimension where the vote never happened, he’s just not trying hard enough  
Vote & Retweet: If Trudeau pushes for “free trade” with China, should the Canadian People have final approval over any deal with a National Referendum vote? 
Even Leave voters now expect a bad deal from Brexit.And a majority of voters would now vote Remain.Time to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
DUP new Brexit demand  
Is this a joke article? Is it April the 1st already? Mp's are writing to the speaker to get him done for contempt of parliament which happens how often? Yet someone thinks he's leadership material... These hard Brexit mp's are nuts. 
#TheCrown S2 & #PeakyBlinders S4 REVIEW: Forget #MeghanMarkle & #Brexit for a sec, it's Rule Britannia on @netflix this holiday says @DeadlineDominic 
Lucy Wicks now talking about Safe Schools. I'm pretty sure the No side said the postal survey was a referendum on Safe Schools, and they lost 
WTF!!! Gross incompetence of the highest order, an absolute travesty, and why? I still have absolutely no clue :((((((( #Brexit #uttershambles 
jemerey Corbyn, cackling,twirling his moustache, his finger slowly moving away from the STOP BREXIT button 
Why do we write impact assessments for grant applications, when the UK government doesn't even bother to do them for Brexit?  
Out now: EU Committee’s report on #Brexit: #dealornodeal: 
Apparently one in five of us think those Brexit talks are going well  
The masses voted for Brexit. That's why the elites oppose it. If Labour is a party truly for the people it would support Brexit. Labour: a party against the people  
You know all this David Davis brexit studies that may or may not exist farce? There's a politician we owe a big thanks for uncovering it, and her name is Molly Scott Cato, the Green MEP for the South West. Take a bow @MollyMEP >> 
I feel like this is a really good visual metaphor for how the @Conservatives are handling Brexit  
'No-deal' Brexit would be worst outcome possible for UK, Lords warn  
With Juncker saying that May's government could fall next week, a manifesto suggestion for @UKLabour. 1) Pause article 502) Carry out full impact assessments 3) 2nd referendum based on 2)4) Nothing else100 seat majority easy. 
Who says the Brits don't know anything about Irish politics? They actually pay close attention to what our Chee-chok says on Brexit!  
Maybe people in London don't understand but what Nigel Dodds did today to Sylvia Hermon at Westminster is sectarian politics at its worst. Implying a Unionist politician is in bed with Republicans or Dublin is a call out to the sectarian people on the street. Disgusting. #Brexit 
Goodness me! No Brexit impact assessments; would be held to be a major safety transgression in our profession @AoMRC  
The Daily Mail has kept Brexit off its front page for 4 days running   
Millions in the UK are in complete agreement, Brexit is a destination that would have a disastrous and highly negative impact, that’s our assessment; worth checking with the UK government, who will have undertaken its own rigorous assessment.  
And meanwhile we have the total cock up that is Brexit and the headless chicken Tories to contend with over here.  I mean, Fuck. Me.  
48 hours to save Brexit: Barnier says agree EU deal by Friday or trade talks CANNOT begin. Stop buying EU cars, especially German!  
A growing majority of voters expect to get a bad deal from Brexit.And a majority now want to Remain in the EU, polls consistently show.The best option is to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Front Page Exclusive: Shocking Brexit scoop by @ScotNational. Perfectly sums up the total mess the UK Government is in. #Brexit #carcrash 
David Davis is bluffing on Brexit. And now it’s clear for all to see | Rafael Behr  
‘Yes, the Brexit Secretary really does think there's no point planning for Brexit’  
Brexit madness ... some kind of mass hysteria - it seems to have disabled any sense of rational thought in most members of parliament ... party first, country very much last ...  
Cleuless! Does anyone still believe Brexit can possibly happen? It’s a national embarrassment! #ExitFromBrexit 
We've found them! #Brexit reports do exist.  
Trump and many of the leading Brexiters, including the tax-dodging billionaire press are working very hard at trying to confuse people as to the line between reality and fiction. Hannah Arendt had something to say about this. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE #LeaveLies 
I often find it useful to look back 1,2, 6 months etc to see how the #brexit situation is shaping up. The direction of travel is so clearly in favour of us calling the whole thing off. David Davis story just another nail in the #brexit coffin. 
Brexit never really happened #WriteAHappyStoryIn4Words 
Think Brexit can't be stopped? Let's work backwards:EU says we can withdraw Article 50Democracy demands that require a vote where "Deal", "No Deal" & "Remain" are on the tableWe would need evidence of changed minds to justify voteSo the youth must speak out now!  
Tick, tock Barnier. You think we'll capitulate and have another referendum. We won't. 
Government is better prepared for a zombie attack than for Brexit  
Ineffectual - needs sacking 7 times Tory David Davis boasted about the Brexit impact assessments he now claims don't exist - Mirror Online  
To think our Great-grandchildren will study this period in history. How proud I’ll be to say I never voted for Brexit & never voted for the @Conservatives! They both shame this country. 
Jean-Claude Juncker 'fears Theresa May's Government will collapse next week without Brexit deal''  
UK manufactures will be lucky if they get a deal by Christmas 2018 and then it won't be as good as the one we have now inside the EU. Brexit is an act of national self harm that can be avoided. #StopBrexit 
I have a plan to stop Brexit 
Devastatingly spot on analysis by @rafaelbehr on govt approach to Brexit...  
Time to stop the Brexit fanatics.Brexiters had more discipline and focus for a while. Now, pro-Europeans are getting organised and building our #FBPE network.We will #StopBrexit. 
December 11 is the day when Parliament debates the #FinalSay referendum petition. If you can, please join the protest from 10am onwards outside Parliament. I think it's fine if you turn up as late as 4pm. @spaceangel1964#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The @Conservatives won’t make any move to oust @theresa_may.They know she is the thing keeping them in power. The DUP or the EU will bring the Government down. And it will happen. All a matter of time but @jeremycorbyn will be PM & Brexit will be stopped.  
Govt #Tories & #Labour have been in thrall 2 37% voters who voted leave in a non-binding opinion poll.I sense growing anger amongst the ignored #Remain camp who've always known & those who R coming to know #Brexit's a CON...Parl better listen; we're the real majority!#StopBrexit 
Brexit shambles...May and Davis humiliated...Tory BBC #newsnight focuses on Jerusalem, poverty porn and 1990s rave music... absolute disgrace and yes I'm turning it off #BBCBias 
A hard Brexit has reached a dead end  
Brexit is like an experiment to see whether it’s UK govt or EU that’s more competent.  
'It's MY red line'Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts ECJ 'colony' plans for #EU nationals after #Brexit “My reddist of red lines is alway the European Court of Justice because it seems to me as long as we remain under European Court of Justice, we haven’t left EU." 
Brexit is 'infinitely worse' for the UK than the EU, says Dutch PM - The Independent  
Time for those of you with a conscience a principles to resign the Tory whip and set up as independents until this chaos is over. The country, or the Tories, or probably both are finished / because if about 25 Brexit zealots 
Our lead negotiator for #Brexit is a liar and a charlatan. Doesn’t bode too well for ongoing negotiations with the EU does it? 
You just couldn't make this up! David Davis unlikely to face contempt proceedings for failing to provide Brexit reports because Brexit committee decided since the Brexit reports he said existed don't exist he can't be held in contempt for witholding them!  
1) In this day of #brexit days, I'm posting a 6 month old threadThat thread, aimed at @Peston ,@afneil ,@bbclaurak & others asked "what will Brexit cost?"It was a simple question - if we're doing #Brexit, how much will it cost us?No one asked... 
I’ll be reviewing the papers with @Bonn1eGreer on @skynews at 10.30pm & 11.30pm. There is likely to be some mention of Trump and possibly even Brexit. The word “shambles” may also come up. 
Good enough to vote in the referendum - not good enough to know what the consequences of it might be: 
Today @jeremycorbyn  should have destroyed this vile government at PMQs. That he didn't, and was so pathetic in "trying", is the only reason this useless lot are still in power.That, and his own desire for Brexit at any cost.Useless twat. 
Brexit very similar to Cardiff City's rebrand. A stupid idea, poorly executed. And give it a couple of years and you won't find anyone who admits to supporting it at the time. 
'We can't go on like this': mood of resignation in EU as Brexit talks stutter  
Pick any one of these links, go to a random page, read it, and tell me if ANY of you see ANYTHING positive for the UK or find a paragraph that doesn’t point out how bad an idea Brexit is.  
Jean-Claude Juncker 'fears Theresa May's Government will collapse next week without Brexit deal' 
THURSDAY'S INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: "Brexit breakdown" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
If you don't know much about Ireland, Irish history, modern-day Irish politics & the implications of #Brexit for Ireland, & you're afraid to ask, read this totally spot on article by @NaomiOhReally. Ignorance is no longer a luxury Britain can afford   
Labour’s Brexit position is clear as mud.  
1) @rafaelbehr utterly nails it here, #Brexit in microcosm.Completely accurate & frustrating in equal measure, Davis & Brexiters have bluffed and blustered whilst throwing away the few cards we had  
The full Welsh Brexit impact statement has been leaked to us, the level of detail for a 1 page document is astonishing...  
love that the british public gets everything wrong. Brexit, Tories and now Stanley getting voted out of #ImACeleb 
DUP's @ianpaisleymp reads out our story on Labour's Brexit positions  
The Government of Great Britain & Northern Ireland in the midst of the most serious international negotiations for several generations....publicly fighting like ferrets in a sack .,,,Brexit: PM urged not to let Eurosceptics 'dictate' talks - BBC News  
If you're in the mood for a more esoteric #Brexit long read, this  by @EdConwaySky on how the London gold trade skews statistics, making a lack of confidence in the UK look like confidence, is utterly fascinating. If you're in a hurry, key passage here: 
David Davis on Brexit studies:December 2016 - officials "carrying out about 57 sets of analyses"October 2017 - the work contains "excruciating detail"December 2017 - "there are no systematic impact assessments" 
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon hopes Brexit will draw attention away from SNP's stalled Named Person plan.  
Always obvious that the #Brexit fanatics in Parl will bluff & bluster & use every dirty trick in the book to reach March 2019...it's Smoke & Mirrors...no other date matters which is why Labour must get off the fence now & knock the Tory Brexit into touch This is real.#StopBrexit 
It’s taken the government 18 months to realise that they don’t know what they’re trying to achieve. Dreams of Brexit unicorns are firmly in the gutter. All Brexiters have to look forward to is the nightmare of reality.  
UK business leader says Brexit chaos is looming over everything  
'A grubby excuse to deny our democratic rights in Wales'@LSRPlaid accuses @theresa_may of using Brexit as cover for a 'power grab' to undermine devolutionMore:  
So because the Tories have a majority on the Brexit committee with their DUP counterpart, they've all managed to successfully shield David Davis from contempt proceedings. He can basically do and say what he likes without repercussion. Disastrous for the UK. #DavisMustGo 
Good discussion in Dublin with Irish Taoiseach Leo Varadkar, mainly focused on Brexit. Everybody is working hard to reach an agreement. A difficult but not impossible task. It is in our common interest that sufficient progress is made and the next phase can start.  
David Davis' defence to not handing over the Brexit impact assessments? We never did any!  
“As long as we remain under the European Court of Justice we haven’t left the European Union” - Jacob Rees-Mogg on his ultimate Brexit red line  
Why is #Brexit going so badly? Because as all Brexiteers prove it was always about recapturing an impossible past (reconstituted as an imaginary future). Brexit is a reactionary exit from reality. It's a dream And the sleep of reason produces monsters  
BREAKING: Brexit is 'infinitely worse' for the UK than the EU, says Dutch PM /#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexit: PM urged not to let Eurosceptics 'dictate' talks  
I'm on @bbc5live at 10.30pm this evening. Topic is Brexit, how it's shaping up. Norton has biggest order book ever & strong future. #brexit 
18 months of "govt can't do anything on health, wages, education, housing, climate, tax havens, you name it... because all their energy is being spent on Brexit"Today: govt has done absolutely nothing on Brexit. It's all been lies.So what are you actually FOR? 
Moggie: Arlene is the new heroine of Brexit. Hammond does not understand we owe EU no money after we leave. The European Court of Justice & regulatory alignment are Jacob's two Brexit red lines!  
Glad the #Brexit Committee agreed that the Government had complied fully with the House motion on the sectoral papers. Clearly no contempt of Parliament. Onwards to #Brexit! 
I’m thinking that there are actually impact assessments on Brexit, but Davis would rather lie and say they don’t exist as they are that catastrophic. 
BIG problem here with what Davis told Hilary Benn today, just to recap:HB - Any assessment report for the car industry?DD - No.HB - Any for aerospace?DD - No.HB - Any forDD - That'll be No to all.Problem is, this is a FOI from September 2017...This could be more than lying pic.twitter.com/ITmqwNCp9S 
So #DavidDavis finally admits that Tories have no real #BrexitImpactReports at all! They’re proceeding to negotiate #brexit without knowing its affect on #Britain , its #economy ,  #regions ,#Jobs or anything...  
It's over to you, readers! What will the impact of Brexit be? Help the UK Government out by writing or drawing on tomorrow's front page box, then tweet us a picture of it  
Truly unbelievable. Whatever one thinks of Brexit, this is unconscionable negligence #brexit  
This Government that is supposedly "in crisis" over #Brexit has in reality carried every vote on the subject since the election... Might be a storm in the media, but in Parliament where it matters, the job is getting done! 
David Davis on Brexit studies:December 2016 - officials "carrying out about 57 sets of analyses"October 2017 - the work contains "excruciating detail"December 2017 - "there are no systematic impact assessments" 
Actual Footage of David Davis trying to make sense of Brexit.  
I’m no expert but I’m starting to get the impression that Brexit isn’t going all that well. I expected to be a billionaire jam producer by now. 
Just watched @RepGregoryMeeks give, probably, the best summary of Brexit from any politician either side of the water, and then he had sit back while a Leaver tried to feed him the same warmed up, and now very debunked, lies from a year ago. "German cars", anyone? 
Just had a bit of a personal epiphany: #Brexit fans hate 'EU law' because they see it as imposed from above when it's actually just all 28 of us agreeing not to screw each other over by having the same laws, the ECJ is just the referee 
Imagine any lawyer saying to their client - We know we want to win. But we’ll work out how to win & what winning looks like once we hear the other side’s closing submissions. And no need to look at any evidence, at least, not yet.#Brexit 
James Milner is back at left-back, and everything is right with the world. Except for Trump. And Brexit. And everything else on the news. 
Dear @DavidDavisMPDuring the EU-ref campaign #Leave cleverly undermined #Remain by dismissing all #Brexit risks as #ProjectFearEarlier this week I held a poll & we have decided to brand #Brexit as #ProjectFacepalmYou'll be glad to know that you're the poster-boy for it#FBPE 
THE NEW EUROPEAN: How is Brexit Going So Far? #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Green MEP @MollyMEP set to launch LEGAL ACTION against David Davis & @DExEUgov over #Brexit impact assessments, as early as TOMORROW, with @JolyonMaugham of @GoodLawProjectWATCH INTERVIEW:  
What we've learned today is that ministers can claim they've done things they haven't, admit they have no idea what effect Brexit will have and don't plan to find out, and behave contemptuously, and as far as this Parliament is concerned, it's fine. Change your vote next time? 
As if it weren’t enough to have covertly engineered Brexit and the Trump presidency, Julian Assange has now nicked my video, uncredited.  
White line picket and rally tonight in Belfast ‘No Brexit, No Border’ ‘The DUP don’t speak for the majority in the North who voted to remain in the EU’ - @johnfinucane #specialstatus 
In order to achieve an outcome, you have to believe in it. How can Brexit ever be a success with Remainers in key positions... it’s time to change! 
Brexit cancelled. Trump impeached.#WriteAHappyStoryIn4Words 
How much does it cost to leave the EU's customs union? Britain doesn't know  
Proof that @DExEUgov lied in responses to FOI requests about Brexit impact statements. Surely @ICOnews should investigate and fine/prosecute!! #DAVISMUSTGO 
Brexit is 'infinitely worse' for the UK than the EU, says Dutch PM  
Brexit illustrates the inherent difficulties of trying to frame a complex set of multilateral issues (UK/EU/Ireland relations) in terms of a single, abstract dichotomy (sovereignty/non-sovereignty). 
The UK's single top export destination is the United States. We are not bound by US regulations when trading with other countries. Nor should we be bound by EU regulations post-Brexit when trading internally in the UK or when exporting to countries outside the EU. 
This is David Davis. He's in charge of #Brexit for your Govt. He said he had impact reports on 58 sectors of the economy. Now he says the reports don't exist. David Davis is a liar. He will get away with his lies. Your Govt is a joke #BrexitShambles  
The absolute state of Brexit. A government, without a clue, making it up as it goes along. Parliament must hold this reckless government to account.  
Dutch Prime Minister Mark Rutte; "I hate Brexit from every angle.....I don't understand it intellectually....The effect of a hard Brexit on [the EU] will be big, but it will be INFINITELY bigger on the UK itself"  
All those FOI requests, where the Department for Exiting the European Union confirmed it held the Brexit impact studies. And now they say they don't exist.How is that even possible?  
Philip Hammond should stick to his calculator. He is neither responsible for negotiating (a) Brexit nor (b) international free trade agreements with countries outside the EU. 
I love helping my child with their homework...said no parent ever.  After negotiating fractions and decimal points with him tonight I'm fairly confident I could negotiate Brexit with less stress  
Dutch PM MArk Rutte on No Deal: “The impact of a hard Brexit will be felt on us, but will infinitely bigger on the UK” 
Rutte, Dutch PM: “I hate Brexit from every angle.. I don’t understand it... the softer theBrexit will be the better the impact on our economies, but we will not compromise on the issues” 
Mark Rutte, Dutch PM:  I hate Brexit from every angle. I don't understand it intellectually. 
In summary: ten years ago bankers gambled with all our money, lost most of it, caused a global financial crisis, which resulted in austerity, that was manipulated into anti-migrant rage by billionaire tax-exile press-barons, revitalised the far right and brought Trump and Brexit. 
"Gerry, it's Leo here. Listen, I know what you mean now." #Brexit 
Polls show that Theresa May is FINISHED, with Jacob Rees-Mogg set to lead Britain into Brexit. May has to go!         #fo2eu 
3/ HE - 'Do you think voters have the right to know what effects Brexit might have on the economy?' JRM - 'Oh,no....' Staggeringly arrogant!  
Brexit Committee announce that David Davis is NOT to be found in contempt of parliament for lying about Brexit Impact Assessments. How did they vote? 8 found him guilty, 11 not guilty. The 11? 10 Tories  & 1 DUP. Is there anyone in the Tory Party with integrity? #BrexitShambles 
BBC in Scotland Text Service quoting David Mundell as saying, (regarding returned 111 powers), that amendments will be made to the final Brexit deal. The reason? It's due to the efforts of his 12 ScotTory colleagues and not the SNP. I kid you not, this is now their strategy. 
My company is thinking of redesigning the navigation bar on our 3rd best-performing website.I produced more Impact Reports for that than the government did for Brexit.And I didn't lie about it. 
David Davis won't face contempt proceedings, Brexit committee agrees - Politics live . How disgusting, MP’s are pathetic. The whole country should rage.#FBPE 
So grateful to have such a strong opposition party leader like Chuka to challenge the Tory Brexit liars.  
The #DUP is turning #Brexit into the political death warrant of British unionism in #Ireland 
I've said all along, for the past 7 years, that the Tories can say and do what they like because they own the media. This David Davis debacle is the final and damning proof. In normal times, this would be it for them but I think it's too late #brexit 
Attended the anti-Brexit whiteline picket and rally at old Andytown barracks site tonight.  
Does the government have a plan for Brexit? 
Peter Bone MP - "The fact is that the British people made their decision. We’re coming out of the European Union and the only question is whether there can be an agreement with the European Union as to how that happens." #Brexit  
I would have thought the mere fact we are still going through with #brexit is an obvious hint there are no assessments of its impact on the economy. 
For those asking here are two occasions when @DavidDavisMP gave MPs to understand economic impact assessments existed. Hansard 20.10.16 and @CommonsEUexit 25.10.17  #brexit @StephenGethins @theSNP @PeteWishart 
I don't think I've been so angry in years. There's only one reason you don't do your due diligence on a project and that's because there are no identifiable benefits and it's not worth doing. Project #Brexit is  a failure and Davis is an utter incompetent. #DavidDavis 
Tax changes set out in each Budget/Autumn Statement are modelled so that HMT knows the impact on Government revenues and on different types of taxpayers. But, according to David Davis, Brexit wasn't worth the bother. Pathetic. #brexitshambles 
Guardian editorial on the architects of Brexit-the tiny minority who aren't thick at all, but who dishonestly sold Brexit to the thickies for evil and selfish reasons. They are the monsters of Brexit, who are content for people to suffer for their greed. 
WATCH | Jacob Rees-Mogg appears on fellow Brexit titan Nigel Farage's show to applaud Arlene Foster, lay scorn on our treasonous Chancellor, and express ever-increasing ECJ concerns. "There's a long way to go", he sighs.  
It’s reassuring that so many of those getting hysterical over #Trump and #Jerusalem are the same progressive bubble-dwellers who were wrong about him winning the presidency and wrong about #Brexit. The “Palestinian” Arabs have had their chance and blown it. Great day for #Israel. 
Jonny Mercer has not signed EU WIthdrawal Bill amendments, nor has Luke Graham, but is on here and Heidi Allen was the other name I could not read - this moment seems to have opened up a much fundamental debate on shape of Brexit 
DD cleared of all contempt charges by Brexit select committee 
BIGGER EUROPE! Juncker uses Brexit to push forward plan for ‘united states of Europe’  
THEORY: Reason more ppl not angry about Brexit shitshow (& about the lying & incompetence that are obvious to nerds who are interested in intricacies of how we’re governed)= voting Leave not about effecting specific change but about administering a kicking to those in charge. 
No more 'my dog ate it' excuses. Where are the Brexit impact reports?  
Just imagine how every UK Business leader feels tonight knowing that David Davis has not completed even the most rudimentary investigation into how #Brexit will impact them. These clowns are not fit to serve in government. They have to go. 
“Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed” is @theresa_may’s new “strong & stable”. She’s a prat.That’s the whole point of negotiations; until something is signed, sealed and delivered, anything is possible. We know this: @Conservatives are a shambles & Brexit ruinous. 
.@ChukaUmunna has written to the Speaker to initiate contempt proceedings against @DavidDavisMP for telling MPs in October Brexit impact assessments were being made, when in fact - according to Davis’s testimony today - no such risk assessments have been made 
Brexit committee has said David Davis complied with the instruction to provide us with copies of impact assessments even though he didn’t provide them. Now he needs to explain why he said so much to the committee about documents that didn’t exist.  
David Davis will not face contempt of Parliament charges after #Brexit committee votes 11-8 against.The Brexit committee members include 10 Tories and 1 DUP. 
MPs howl with laughter as Theresa May claims Brexit negotiations are going well  
Assessments of the impact of Brexit abound, and are publicly available, but not in Brexitland.  
We go now live to phase 2 of the Brexit negotiations  
How did we get to a point where we have so many irresponsible idiots in charge? Getting frown lines watching the news today #May #DavidDavis #Brexit #Trump #Jerusalem #c4news 
Davis says the scale of change will be so great there is no way to predict anything. I don't remember the slogan being "Vote BREXIT, because we haven't got a clue what will happen if you do" 
Trump's recognition of Jerusalem as Israeli capital will stir up yet more conflict. But that is just what a cynical scumbag like Trump wants; fear, hate, conflict and violence which will boost support for his thuggish, bullying & abusive form of populism.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
UPDATE: In light of the finding of the @CommonsEUexit this evening that the Brexit impact assessments don't exist, I have written to the Speaker to ask him to consider whether the Govt have misled the @HouseofCommons since the Brexit Secretary told us last year they did exist.  
We are seeing the betrayal of Brexit. Delay, make it seem impossible, string it out to next election. Then Con & Lab both run on staying in. 
Wonder what David Davis & all his lawyers & civil servants were doing that was so important they couldn’t be fagged to do Brexit reports. 
Each day brings a new peak of brexit madness.1. Government says we've done 58 impact assessments but they're secret2. Parliament says hand them over or you go to jail3. Government says there aren't any really4. Brexit committee says "fair enough, don't worry about it".  
When are Corbyn supporters going to stop putting allegiance to their faction before allegiance to the poor that will be devastated by Brexit?  
@ChukaUmunna writes to Speaker calling for action, accusing David Davis of misleading the House (Brexit Cttee apparently voted that he was not in contempt of Parliament because documents don’t exist) 
Seriously. David Davis cannot remain in position. His performance in front of the Brexit Select Committee was beyond satire. It was a disgrace.  
This man is responsible for your country, for our children’s future & he giggles when he admits he hasn’t produced ANY impact studies on Brexit  
7 times David Davis boasted about the Brexit reports he now claims don't exist  
Corbyn is a Brexiter. He cannot attack May too fiercely as that would risk exposing #Brexit for what it is, a foolish & destructive project based on a rag-bag of lies & delusions. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The British Government will not attack Mr Trump, the US is one of our eldest friends and we might just need their support after Brexit. You concentrate on planting money trees and leave the Politics the real people. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg joins @Nigel_Farage to discuss Theresa May’s Brexit red lines and more. Watch live:  
People keep saying, ‘Oh, don’t worry, you’ll be ok!’, when we tell them about the situation we EU citizens are in. Would you be re-assured if your future was in the hands of this bunch of devious incompetents? No? I didn’t think so! #InLimbo #brexit  
Impact assessments of Brexit on the UK 'don't exist'  
There is not 1 reason the UK should stay in the EU. After over 40 years of fighting to free the UK from the EU dictatorship, Brits will never stop until the UK is totally out of the EU & a full Brexit has been delivered to make us a completely sovereign nation again  
Great to welcome Dutch PM @MinPres to Govt Buildings this evening, for discussions on our shared European priorities and of course #Brexit  
We MUST protest against taking us into Brexit with no risk assessment.(I had to do a one just to go to a conference abroad) 
No impact assessments on brexit Well glad to see David Davies is taking brexit seriously Like buying house with out knowing what it’s like and where it is or how much it costsAs long as there mob is ok he doesn’t give a shit 
So Davis - having said there were impact assessments and then not publishing them - is *not* in contempt of Parliament because the IAs didn’t exist and hence couldn’t be published?Seriously?#brexit  
The Brexit Select Committee has ruled Brexit Secretary David Davis was not in contempt of parliament by 11 votes to eight 
Guess what? 18 months after the EU referendum, the Cabinet hasn't even discussed what kind of Brexit it wants.  
David Davis has to go now!!! He has lied to parliament, mislead the public and trashed any possibility of making Brexit not a complete and utter disaster. Sack, resign - just walk away in shame... #DavidDavis #BrexitShambles We must now #StopBrexit 
So it now turns out the Government has been misleading the #UK people about the #Brexit impact assessments: they have not carried out the detailed assessments of sectors that @DavidDavisMP said they had. Given this, do you have confidence in this government?Please RT for sample 
This is from October. Its more urgent now,"The government is locked into a Brexit death spiral of its own making...Like any friend who goes off the rails, it needs an intervention by loved ones to get it out of its cycle of harm."  
So David Davis won't be found in contempt... 10 Tory MPs and one DUP voted that he had complied with resolution on releasing Brexit impact assessments. Rest of Brexit committee (8 opposition MPs) said he hadn't. 
BREAKING - Benn's committee vote 11-8 against reporting Davis for contempt - Fucking Stinks. 
But he blatantly an repeatedly lied about these statements, misleading Parliament about what preparation he had done for Brexit. If this isn't contempt of parliament, what the hell is??? 
This is why we must stop #Brexit. Please retweet.  
Oh dear, here's @LeaveEUOfficial calling for real leaders, like Churchill & Thatcher. They've forgotten their history. Let's start with Churchill who advocated a US of Europe & in the early 1960s wanted the UK to join the EEC #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
That Brexit bus going off the cliff? That's because there is LITERALLY NO-ONE FUCKING DRIVING.  
Brexit impact assessment? Here's one:  "The economic impact of Brexit-induced reductions in migration" by me & @cmlrqn   
Trump impeached, Brexit cancelled. #WriteAHappyStoryIn4Words 
It's the Tory EU pantomime as various groups launch rival bids to shape their hapless Brexit plans. How long will this nonsense continue as Tories put their own interests ahead of our national interest?  
Split verdict - but no contempt by Davis votes the Brexit committee because there were no impact assessments 
SDLP, Alliance & Green Party ppl hold protest in Belfast against DUP stance on Brexit - say the NI Remain voice needs to be heard @UTVNews pic.twitter.com/xlrRx1VEcO 
Labour MP STRUGGLING for words!Give example of country in Single Market without free movement."Norway...““They have free movement”“Sweden..."“They have free movement”“There is no example, price of membership is free movement isn’t it?#Brexit #EU 
You mean there's no assessment of the impact of #brexit on social care????  
This brexit sub committee can’t even decide what colour to paint the room FFS  
EU 27 Nations stand together, this Tory Govt are a mob of batshit BasketCase ‘Brexit No-dealer goons and clowns’ that can’t even get its own cabinet united let alone its crazed backbenchers and DUP partners of hate pic.twitter.com/7jZerTuQJ1 
A clean #Brexit means returning* Full control over our own borders so WE can decide whom we let in* The Supreme Court to London, NOT Luxembourg under the ECJ* The power to negotiate our own trade treaties with #EU and beyondAll of that means having to leave the Single Market. 
I think it is clear now that #Brexit as it was sold to the public is undeliverable.  The best option is to revoke Article 50,  apologise unreservedly to our EU counterparts and try and reverse some of damage already caused.#StopBrexit 
Philip Hammond: “We’ll pay a divorce bill even if you we don’t get a deal” Blatant sabotage! #Brexit 
Fake news from the @Telegraph. The poll doesn't show the UK public is still set on Brexit. It shows 53% - 47% in favour of REMAIN:  
Sectarianism has infected the Brexit processas it infects anything else that takes it seriously and gives it house-room 
“Our Brexit negotiating team would pay full price for a DFS sofa” aye @frankieboyle 
Imagine if Keir Starmer was leading the UK government's Brexit negotiations: He's a barrister and award winning QC who specialises getting resolutions to complex negotiations. Instead, we have David Davis - who can't even be arsed to produce Brexit impact reports. 
The Chancellor admits that the UK Cabinet has not discussed Brexit outcome, which begs the question as to what they have been talking about? 
Africa's brain drain to brain gain: African elite graduates head home as Brexit, Trump, EU close doors via @qzafrica 
“And now, moving on from Brexit we go from one clueless, destructive politician to another as we be bring you Trump’s speech on Jerusalem...” 
Davis' appearance before the Commons Brexit commitee today showed that all Caroline Lucas' observations here are true. And his responses to Seema Malhotra were so dismissive and contemptuous that chair Benn was remiss in not telling Davis to treat the committee with more respect.  
If we have to #Brexit it should be treated like WW2.1. A coalition government of all parties.2. Tories negotiate Brexit3. Labour run the country4. Greens run energy5. SNP/Plaid run independence referendums6. DUP run Natural History Museum7. LibDems run for coffee 
Meeting of Brexit Committee now happening to decide what action if any 
PMQs An initial staged question to draw the Brexit sting. Then May adopts that "world weary" pose, "I answered, you didn't listen to it!" The twisted mouth and sardonic smile, egged on by her brainless puppets! I'm sorry Ladies, but she's a fucking devious slimy twat! 
Message to @jeremycorbyn: If you aren’t able to challenge the government on #Brexit because you find it a tricky subject, please stand aside and let someone who can take over. 
Regardless of how people voted in the Referendum, this level of governmental incompetence is unprecedented  
I've just emailed my MP to ask them to preserve our parliament's sovereignty. We need a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. Email your MP here  #FBPE 
EU ambassadors we're speaking to agree that Article 50 extension may be the only way of avoiding a cliff-edge Brexit. When will the government accept the inevitable? 
Brexit Select Committee: Gov never did any impact assessments. Treasury Select Committee: Budget didn't factor in Hard Brexit. For real?! 
It's funny how so many Brexit-defending politicians seem to be followers of Calvin's approach to complex situations.  
Run that past me again @PhilipHammondUK ... you want to hand over £45,000,000,000 of OUR money to the EU if there's no #Brexit deal? What are they going to do if we don't pay it? Throw us out? Wise up, man.  
NEW: a look at John Curtice's latest analysis of Brexit pollsSeveral pollsters show clear shift in views on Brexit, with growing numbers — especially among Leave voters — accepting that UK is unlikely to get a "good deal", and impacts could harm economy  
David was forced to confessImpacts have not been assessedSector by sectorThis Brexit selectorHas had all the bad news suppressed. 
No analysis for Brexit yet Wales and Scotland are expected to produce report after report on how they can afford and sustain independence. The hypocrisy is rife.  
Thank you for your valuable input on Brexit  
Treacherous Remainer / Destroyer of the UK Tory MP Ken Clarke has the cheek to savage May when no doubt he is doing all he can to scupper Brexit  
David Davis has misled parliament and under his leadership, the Brexit department has turned incompetence into an art form. He MUST resign. If you agree, add your name now and back our call:  
Nick Clegg is on the money here.  Repeatedly been ahead of others on the v uphill parliamentary and political strategy required to stop Brexit.    via @FT 
What would the final Brexit bill cost the UK? Nothing at all if we agreed to pay in sterling and the Bank of England created the cash with QE. It bailed out the banks. It could bail us out of the EU too. 
Apparently I am personally to blame for the Brexit chaos this week, according to my last caller. Who knew?! 
**PLEASE RETWEET POLL**WOULD YOU WANT A REFERENDUM ON THE OUTCOME OF BREXIT WHEN EU NEGOTIATIONS ARE COMPLETE, WITH THE OPTIONS TO: REMAIN, ACCEPT THE DEAL OR LEAVE WITHOUT A DEAL? 
#Libdems were right on #Iraq and we are right on the #Brexit  disaster and chaos.  
The astonishing revelation came as the Brexit Secretary faced a grilling from MPs over the state of the country’s bungled attempts to leave the EU.  
If David Davis is squirming now, wait until he remembers his BBC interview about the Brexit impact reports [VIDEO]  
Minister has apparently promised to meet Lady Hermon with a view to incorporating the Good Friday agreement clearly in the Brexit process or the bill - not clear how yet 
Quite calmly but with great conviction, I would like express that, at this point, a second referendum on Brexit is of primordial importance. Basically, we are watching a driverless train careen off-track into a chasm. And we are the passengers. 
What the government has said over the last year about brexit impact studies.Today David Davis said no assessments existed  
Why would the Cabinet sit together to discuss their #Brexit strategy? Their sole mission was to get the UK out of the EU by 2019 - to avoid the tax avoidance directives. Wake up, Britain, before it’s too late. 
While today is peak Brexit lunacy please remember that it looks like @The3Million & @BritishInEurope will go into the holidays for a second year completely in limbo. It’s inhumane. It’s beyond shameful. Make it a #ChristmasMiracle @theresa_may & @MichelBarnier #PeopleB4Politics 
Luckily the #EU has done their own impact studies on #Brexit which can be viewed her:  
@UKParliament  Can I suggest that the 1000 Barristers who complained about "brexit" now get together and urgently report Davis and May to the DPP for Misconduct in Public Office 
Hammond admits Cabinet yet to decide what it wants UK's post-Brexit relationship with EU to look like: extraordinary confirmation that negotiations are failing because one side - ours - has no idea what it wants. Unbelievable irresponsibility. 
No more 'my dog ate it' excuses. Where are the Brexit impact reports?  
Can we all accept now that @Nigel_Farage lied to the British public about the controls we had on immigration, in order to win the Brexit referendum?  
#WriteAHappyStoryIn4WordTrump impeached, Brexit cancelled. 
Very proud to speak at the fabulous @BestForBritain event in Westminster this afternoon - with many brilliant MPs fighting against hard Brexit  
North Down v North Belfast in the Commons over Brexit. Lady Sylvia accused of favouring Dublin.She tells the DUP to stop "chuntering".  
Today David Davis admitted that his department have conducted no analysis on the economic impact of Brexit. What world are they living in? 
Today, we are starting to see what Britain's post-Brexit future might look like: forward-looking, highly skilled and built on a very British tradition of creativity and entrepreneurship, writes @Jeremy_Hunt 
I've just dug up a 220k U.K gov't petition from 2015 calling for an end to all immigration. The patterns in the petition vs what would transpire a year later at the Referendum are something  
If the UK does not leave the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice, in reality it will not have left the EU  #Brexit 
Sector-by-sector Brexit impact forecasts do not exist, says David Davis: “Do not draw the conclusion that because you use the word impact, you have written an impact assessment.” #speechless 
Michael Gove writing about the Article 50 process during the referendum. I wonder how that is going.  
For the nth time since I started having to write about #Brexit, I have to quote the Bronx sage, Yogi Berra: "If you don't know where you're going, you may end up someplace else". On current evidence, unlikely to be anywhere good.  
Brexit is called off! #WriteAHappyStoryIn4Words@jk_rowling @mrjamesob @terrychristian @radioleary @DeborahMeaden @Harryslaststand @haveigotnews @TheNewEuropean @StopBrexit17 @scarletmonahan @BrexitBin @EUflagmafia @GdnPolitics @bbcstrictly #StopBrexit #FinalSay  
Brexit was fuelled by economic inequality & resentment of immigrants, right?New research highlights another driver: political exclusion & alienation.How do we tackle this?Fascinating interview with @anandmenon1 
“There are no Brexit impact assessments,” says David Davis from vet surgery where his dog is being treated for paper consumption. 
Post-Brexit: Technology won’t make the Irish border disappear  
On Brexit Mrs May & the Brextremists and all the great brains at Legatum have still not advanced one centimetre beyond ‘Brexit means Brexit’ 
Brexit stopped, Trump impeached. #WriteAHappyStoryIn4Words 
David Davis is bluffing on Brexit. And now it’s clear for all to see | Rafael Behr  
David Davis finally reveals the status of the Brexit impact reports:"It's all up here!"  
There's only one thing worse than the government having done no impact assessments as a result of Brexit... & that is- they have & they're just too damaging to reveal. If you're not already worried about Brexit... start. 
How to stop #Brexit: Override the expressed will of a majority of the British people, ensuring  a total breakdown of trust in the political process and serious social disorder. Ensure that no democratic vote is ever taken seriously again. Sorted.  
"The EU respects Ireland’s borders and national integrity like a shark respects a seal." Brendan O'Neill of @spikedonline#Brexit #Irexit 
.@timfarron calls for David Davis to resign: "Forget Brexit - we need Dexit"  
Great thx to @GoodwinMJ and to all participants for the very interesting discussion on the #Brexit vote @migrpolcentre @RobSchuCentre @EuropeanUni on Monday. For those who could not be there, the video is now available:  
I have concluded that Ruth Davidson and her Westminster Bakers Dozen will accept any Brexit deal for Scotland no matter how bad it is. The Parcel of Rogues will sell Scotland down the river as long as they keep receiving the English Gold.Quislings everyone of them. 
Main reason I don't think they'll be an election next year is it's no one's interest:Tories/DUP don't want to risk PM CorbynLabour don't want to be saddled with Brexit implementationSNP/LDs have almost no safe seats 
Does any British government have the authority to make a deal on Brexit?  
Brexit impact assessments DO exist. Unlike our incompetent government led by @theresa_may  and @DavidDavisMP, the EU has done its own Brexit impact assessments.And it found Brexit will cause "virtually insignificant" losses to the EU 27, but "highly significant" losses to UK:  
The story of the government’s Brexit impact analysis papers has been worth an episode of The Thick Of It, says @SeemaMalhotra1 
Bella's Xmas Single:  … for BREXMASNo1!?.... 'Will You Last Till Christmas?'DOWNLOAD from Itunes  #BREXMASNo1 #Brexit #TheresaMay #DUP 
Yep. And I stick by it. The UK people voted for Brexit - but not this Brexit. Their vote has been hijacked by the extreme Brexiteers to support their own prejudices. This is not respecting the vote it is abusing the vote for extremist nonsense which damages the UK. 
The man in charge of steering us through the minefield of the Brexit negotiations has carried out zero assessments because he’s “not a fan of economic models”. How is this man still in his job? #ResignDavidDavis  
EU and UK government negotiating teams meet up to compare the sizes of their Brexit impact assessment reports.  
True Colours: Parliamentarians Vote Clegg’s ‘How to Stop Brexit’ Their Book of the Year After Secret Ballot  
so what do we know about the government's handling of #Brexit after this week? shows some flaws.. 
Gina Miller (@thatginamiller) calls for David Davis to ‘go today’  via @FinancialNews #brexit #impactassessments 
Brexit today:- Philip Hammond admits cabinet hasn't even discussed UK's end state (let alone agreed it).- David Davis admits no impact assessments have been done on Brexit and the economy. - But Theresa May hails "very good progress" on Brexit at PMQs. 
This is money UK owes for things agreed BEFORE Brexit. UK would be paying whether we stay, or leave. This isn't a payment to leave, or a bribe to get a deal. Obviously if UK doesn't pay EU may sue & we certainly won't get any deal. EU won't want to do business with a spiv Nation.  
We've less than a year to go until the Brexit deal has to be ratified and May's Cabinet has:- Not agreed their policy on the final deal- Not commissioned a single impact assessment on Brexit- Not even discussed what they want out of it. 
We are pursuing Brexit reactively, in the spirit of damage limitation rather than opportunity. Where is the vision?  
David Davis admits ‘early versions of the government’s analyses were “not very good” – suggesting the government’s original Brexit plan before triggering Article 50 was based on “not very good” thinking’ #StopBrexit 
The disastrous mess May and the remain supporters have made of the Brexit negotiations has damaged the country. A Brexit “war cabinet” is needed to take control of the process and regain the initiative.   
"It is right for British businesses, industry and families to understand the impact of #Brexit. Surely this is a duty of government as David Davis said himself." #impactassessments 
Corbyn and his followers look at the damage Brexit is doing and seek only self indulgent satisfaction in laughing at the Tories. No action.Meanwhile tons of Remainers, alienated by Labour, are reaching out to those who now regret Leave votes and actually try to save Britain. 
God I wish she was negotiating Brexit!!  
EU19 (Eurozone): Number of voters who believe that the euro is a good thing for their country on historic record high (Eurobarometer poll). #Brexit #Eurozone 
Toom Tabard @DavidMundellDCT  either lied when he declared there was a #Brexit analysis for Scottish economy or he has been played as a fool by Davis admitting there was in fact NO impact assessment made. Which one, David?  
If the Brexit impact papers don’t exist what were the redacted papers that were made available a few weeks back?  
Just for a change a non #Brexit event in Berlin today: Illumination of the Christmas Tree in the Federal Foreign Office @GermanyDiplo . May the light be with us on December 15 @EUCouncil , too :-) 
There's an interesting new division now between those who think that the government has fucked up Brexit and those that think that Brexit has fucked up the government. I'm in the second group. 
7 deadly sins show Davis and this Government are cowboys in a Brexit Brawl - Time for the liars to RESIGN!7 times David Davis boasted about the Brexit reports that he now admits they don't exist  
Why are the Brexit negotiations going so badly? Well we now know for sure what we all suspected, 18 months after the Brexit referendum, the cabinet has not discussed and decided what type of Brexit the govt wants. Total chaos and stupidity. 
MPs demand David Davis face contempt of parliament vote for 'misleading' them over Brexit  
David Davis has finally admitted the Government has not done impact assessments for the implications of Brexit on sectors of the British economy. He had previously indicated that the work had been done. Lazy? Liar? Incompetent? #DavidDavis #BrexitShambles 
At #PMQs I challenged Theresa May to secure #EU citizens' rights now - not leave people like my constituent Francoise Milne swinging in the wind. #Brexit  
No way am I going to get behind #Brexit. It is merely a vehicle  to ensure the rich don’t get caught in the EU tax avoidance net. Cannot believe that Freddy Normal hasn’t grasped that yet.#StopBrexit 
Pete Wishart has written to the speaker urging that contempt proceedings be undertaken, following David Davis’s confession to parliament’s Brexit committee that no Brexit impact assessments have been carried out by the UK Government  
Philip Hammond suggests that the UK will pay the so-called Brexit bill even if the EU refuses to move talks on to trade  
David Davis says he and his team has done no analysis on the economic impact of Brexit. If I did no work for a year and a half, I would’ve been sacked. Why is he still in post? 
So the Cabinet never actually discussed ditching Single Market & Customs Union and STILL haven’t discussed future relationship with EU after #Brexit. And if they do discuss it, they’ll not bother with any impact assessments... Hurtling towards the cliff edge, no questions asked! 
David Davis is bluffing on Brexit. And now it’s clear for all to see | Rafael Behr  
To anyone who's surprised that for the last year and a half David Davis and his Brexit team have been basically doing nothing, we'll leave this here for you...  
If Davis doesn't have a Brexit assessment, can I give him a tip....ask the EU for a copy of theirs, because you can bet your arse they have done their homework. 
So it appears that the @WingsScotland crowdfunded ’Wee Blue Book in 2014 had far, far more detail about Scottish Indy than the entire UK Tory Government has about what happens during and after Brexit. You angry yet, Scotland? 
Agree with @nick_clegg it’s time all the groups and politicians with concerns about Brexit united under one umbrella. He should lead it. 
As new facts emerge, it is becoming more evident that Brexit in the terms that it was sold are impossible. If at the end of this process the government fails to deliver the Brexit as it was sold in the referendum, the public have the right to change their minds. 7/7 
A thwarted attack on the PM? By those who have infiltrated your country - with permission? Brexit is the will of your countrymen! Better get some borders & hurry !!!  
Confidence in government, which the strong evidence of David Davis misleading Parliament over Brexit impact assessments this morning will only undermine further, has plummeted. 6/  
5. EU officials say Juncker wants to stop UK Government collapse6. Tory leadership favourite say red lines turning pink7. Chancellor says Cabinet has not yet agreed end state Brexit8. EU asking for 15 year ECJ role for citizens rights in UK 
#Labour #MP @KateHoeyMP - "In these negotiations, we should be saying, very  clearly, it is the #EU that’s stopping the continuing cooperation." #Brexit !   #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #UK #NODEAL 
The Red Team and the Blue Team are the same teamThey both want BrexitThey both represent EnglandThey only want Scotland as a cash cow to pay for their profligacy  
BREXIT LOGIC: "If I loudly shit myself in public, the simple answer is for everyone else around me to shit themselves too." pic.twitter.com/U3kiXso1KL 
1542 Brexit developments so far on day meant to see “sufficient progress”1. Davis says no impact assessments exist2. Brexit committee ponders contempt3. No deal with DUP on regulatory alignment4. Varadkar says prefer phase 1 talks to go to 2018 than soften language......> 
The non-existence of the 58 Brexit reports proves that Brexit is an ideological vanity project being pursued at the expense of the British (& Irish & other EU) people rather than an act of serious policy. It's a disgrace. #FBPE #WeAreEurope 
Two questions: Is Brexit for the good of the people? Is it in the interests of the UK ‘s economy, security, and international relations?One simple answer to both: No.Those who disagree, please give your reasons and - required - your evidence. 
We must not stop asking the questions:"Why did you pretend to have Brexit impact reports when you do not?""Why did you spin a deception about them being secret, rather than admit they do not exist?""Why did you not make any?""How many other lies have you told?" 
MPs demand David Davis face contempt of parliament vote for 'misleading' them over Brexit Impact Assessments  
7 times David Davis boasted about the Brexit reports he now claims don't exist  
The latest research finds that a majority of people, 52%, now expect a bad outcome to the Brexit negotiations. 2/  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Thread: To briefly turn away from the controversy surrounding David Davis this morning, the @NatCen have carried out a new raft of polling on what voters currently think on Brexit. Here are some of the key stats they uncovered. 1/ 
See what’s happening with Brexit? It’s what happens when you fail to plan...  
(1) Yes, England. (2) From papal authority, not Europe. (3) So he could marry Anne Boleyn who he later accused of treasonous adultery and incest to have her executed—some guts, that.  .... More evidence of how bending history to Brexit ideology always fails.  
Brexit things government has not yet done, which we learned today:• impact assessments for various parts of economy• impact assessment of leaving customs union• impact assessment of no-deal Brexit• cabinet discussion of what final deal we want. 
The government has not completed any impact assessments of leaving the EU because the usefulness of such studies would be “near-zero” says Brexit Secretary David Davis.Theresa May later said a “sectoral analysis” had been drawn up.  
So they shout ‘Brexit means Brexit’ at everyone, insist only they can interpret the vote, draw up red lines, trigger A50 and wait to crash into reality before *actually* trying to decide what any of it means. 
Majority of Remain voters and plurality of Leave voters now think Britain is headed for a bad Brexit deal.via @NatCen 
Be in absolutely no doubt...this #Brexit is now unashamedly about politics, #Tory vs. #Labour politics...it has nothing to do with democracy or even the Will of the Ppl...both main parties are ignoring the real Will of the Ppl in denying them a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option 
'Britain could slash environmental and safety standards a very long way after Brexit', Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Another SHAMBOLIC week for the TORY Govt.The #EURef opened a door and a whole load of BAD stuff came pouring out.*The Country is DIVIDED*Brexit is CHAOTIC*The Govt is INCOMPETENT* The PM is POWERLESSIts TIME for them to GO ! 
David Davis has failed to do his homework. The 57 assessments on how Brexit will affect our hospitals, schools, economy and jobs don’t even exist!  
6. As and when the PM actually tries to get the Cabinet to agree what the world should look like after 2021, after Brexit, and after the transition period, all hell might break loose because she has no majority and simply, members of govt want different things 
Testifying this afternoon on the Brexit negotiations. The United States has a huge stake in the success of Brexit and the strength of the US-UK Special Relationship.  
Even Leave voters now expect a bad deal from Brexit  
Varadkar not backing down on wording agreed for Monday’s lunch says Brexit talks will move into new year, if necessary  
David Davis admitting the government hasn't taken ANY impact assessments on the effects of Brexit. It's excruciating, shocking and just wow.  
1. The basic Brexit flaw is - and always has been - simply this: an unreasonable assumption that, just because the European Project never signified anything other than "business interests" to British Conservative politicians, it signifies nothing else to millions of people. 
1. Hammond confirms publicly what everyone in SW1 knew privately - cabinet is still to have THE big discussion about the kind of Brexit they ultimately think we should have - DUP row has hugely ramped up the pressure for it to  happen 
"British people deserve a reliable, affordable food supply, decently produced, that’s fair to people, food providers, animals and the environment. And we need it well policed." #BetterFoodBritain Our Kath giving evidence @CommonsEFRA #Brexit Trade in Food  
Shadow Brexit minister Jenny Chapman confirms Labour will back Sylvia Hermon's new clause on protecting the Good Friday Agreement 
'your Brexit red lines have turned PINK!'Jacob Rees-Mogg to May:“Before my Right Honourable Friend next goes Brussels, will she apply a new coat of paint to her red lines because I fear on Monday they were beginning to look a little bit pink”#Brexit #EU 
Every journo writing about Northern Ireland and Brexit and unionism: stop what you're doing and pay attention to Sylvia Hermon  
Here's @Theresa_May's lines (soundbites) on Brexit: "Brexit means Brexit""We want a red, white and blue Brexit""Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed"I have drafted a single statement for her that incorporates all of them: "I HAVE NO IDEA WTF I'M DOING"#PMQs pic.twitter.com/Uad5Fctvgm 
On the other hand, could ask the European Parliament, who have produced and published a whole series of Brexit impact studies. Spoiler alert - it's not looking great for the UK.  
Progress in Brexit negotiations in Brussels hindered by fact negotiations in London haven't even *started* yet...  
The Tory Govt is in MELTDOWN.*GE17 - squandered their majority*Propped up by DUP*Brexit strategy shambolic*NI Border DUPcalling the shots*PM overruled by AF  *Davis LIED re impact assessmentsSO it's ALL a bit of a MESS ! 
Tory party donor calls for “that bunch of jellyfish masquerading as the cabinet” to force Theresa May from office after Brexit deal failure #JellyfishCabinet 
For fans and not-fans of #DavidDavis, here's the latest on the #BrexitReports ...#Brexit #StopBrexit #Brexitshambles #FBPE #Notafan 
In Wednesday's Brexit Briefing: the minister who just made Theresa May's job much harder.  
Chancellor Philip Hammond: The Cabinet has not yet had a full discussion of what should be the Government's preferred "end state position" for the UK after Brexit.   It's official. HMG has no agreed destination on Brexit. 18 months on. 
Philip Hammond has contradicted hard Brexit supporting Tory MPs by warning the UK will pay its £50bn-odd EU “divorce bill” even if no trade deal is struck! 
.@JeremyCorbyn challenges @Theresa_May on whether the Conservative government plans to release sectoral analyses and impact assessments of Brexit.The Prime Minister says “we will not give a running commentary on negotiations as we proceed”.  
BREAKING:The Brexit Impact Assessments actually have been carried out, but due to how severely negative they showed the impact of Brexit to be on the UK economy, David Davis thought it was safer not to publish them and deny they even exist. 
Key and damning passage from @rafaelbehr piece on David Davis's appearance before the Brexit select committee earlier.Full article here:  
My theory for what it's worth is David Davies has done the Brexit impact reports and he knows how bad things are but he has no choice but to plough ahead. If this isn't the case and he just hasn't bothered to do them then the man is an utter incompetent. Arrogant, smug, dangerous 
David Davis accused of 'total dereliction of duty' after he reveals Brexit impact assessments 'don't exist'  Wow! This should be an unambiguous resignation issue, not just for Davis, but for this Government! 
Brexit wasn't an anti-elite backlash. It was delivered by a very British cast of billionaires & colonel blimps:  
Our once proud fishing fleets have been decimated by EU legislation and during the referendum campaign fishing communities were amongst the loudest voices in the Leave camp having experienced how disastrous EU policy has been to our country.  
It's only been 18 months since the referendum...  
Top Tory David Davis just admitted he's done NO impact assessments of Brexit and people are calling for him to go. #ResignDavidDavis  
David Davis admits that the government has NOT conducted any analysis on the economic impact of Brexit on any sector.  No one in the room could believe it.  531 days since the vote and no impact assessment - why? #CancelBrexit #StopBrexit 
We all do!MPs demand David Davis face contempt of parliament vote for 'misleading' them over Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
This is a must listen on #Brexit & #Ireland 
The Scottish Tories are trampling over the devolution settlement and today @lesleylaird rightly challenged them over their disastrous Brexit negotiations.  
Journalist: Hi David Davis, do you have a dog?David Davis: No, the Brexit Impact Assessments ate it.This is the level of competence in our government. 
Here's my speech in the 'devolution threatening' parts of the Brexit repeal bill. Think you'll like it.    
They call Corbyn's supporters a cult, but it's his enemies who seem to think he has the godlike ability to click his fingers & 'stop Brexit' 
'Jobs first' Brexit  
Urge people to watch or read speech given by Lady Hermon on impact of Brexit on Good Friday agreement and peace in Northern Ireland. Courageous and very moving. 
Brexit summary: the final scene of Thelma And Louise, but with a clown car. #PMQs 
Couldn't make this stuff up. The Chancellor of the Exchequer has confirmed today (18 months after the referendum) that the Cabinet has never actually sat down to discuss what its aims are for Brexit. Not actually discussed what kind of outcome they are seeking in negotiations. 
To ensure the descent into farce continues, the Chancellor has just admitted to @CommonsTreasury that the Cabinet has not had a specific discussion about the final Brexit outcome it wants.That explains a lot. 
Brexit means Brexit.  
The DUP didn’t ‘save Brexit’. In fact the party is deeply divided over the EU | Edward Burke  
‘@PhilipHammondUK confirms cabinet has not had a specific discussion about the final Brexit outcome it wants’So how the hell can @theresa_may say the Government has a plan & they are united?They don’t know what they are doing or what they want.More lies from @Conservatives! 
Wasn't there a story recently about Bojo sticking his fingers in his ears and singing the national anthem when anyone tries to tell him something unwelcome about Brexit?  
MPs howl with laughter as Theresa May insists Brexit negotiations are going well  
"Wouldn't it be better if they just got out of the way?" @jeremycorbyn​ rinses @theresa_may​ and her @Conservatives​ over #Brexit talks during #PMQs. 
Asked about the 58 Brexit impact papers that parliament voted to see, Theresa May started to change the subject and then said there are no reports and just to trust her.She's lost her mind. #PMQs 
Thing is, I don't want #Brexit. I want it to fall apart. Last few days' events are music to my ears. Every minute of this farce makes thousands "Bregretters".It's supporters of Leave that should be absolutely FURIOUS at the lack of preparation and amateurishness of this gov't. 
After David Davis' omnishambles today, we put Philip Hammond through the honesty filter... #Brexit  
#janeygodleyvoiceover #DavidDavis  chewing a sweetie not giving a flying funk about #brexit  
We now go live to the Brexit negotiations.... #PMQs 
Don't blame the DUP - the #Brexit crisis has been caused by the elites’ war on democracy, writes @mickhume.  #EU 
RT @seamusmccauley;If we don't have any Brexit impact reports, as @DavidDavisMP now claims, have any journalists tried glancing at LinkedIn to see how many people claim to work in DExEU on the reports we, er, don't have? Spoilers: it's not zero. 
UK (Scotland), Survation poll:European Union Membership ReferendumRemain: 68%Leave: 32%#EURef #ScotRef #Brexit 
if your boyfriend is on the train from Belfast to Dublin and he's called david then I hate to break it to you but I've just heard him telling his mates that "he's not a fan" of Brexit impact assessments 
"No impact assessment on Brexit. Nup. No sectors". But he told us there were "nearly sixty" on the Marr show months ago. Is this guy actually, *actually* busking it? How can this go on??  
Friends! Summary:1. This Cliff-Edge Brexit stall could mean the end of May's Government.2. After all, the DUP might well decide they prefer to have the IRA-supporting Jeremy Corbyn as Prime Minister.3. Why doesn't anyone take the Indy seriously any more?4. That's all, folks!  
WATCH: David Davis has again & again misled the public on Brexit impact assessment reports. As it becomes clear that Brexit is far more complicated than Leave campaigners or Ministers will ever admit, we're right to keep an open mind. Pls RT:  
There must be a proper inquiry now into the Brexit Dodgy Dossier.But I don't want it to bring the government down. I want it to bring brexit down.  
A Basketcase Tory Brexit a shocking austerity that has wiped out people public services wages and created a homeless epidemic but look David Cameron buys another house .. this time a £2 million holiday home.. he is the embodiment of Conservatism a ruthless cruel spiv  
Following the ongoing farce of the (do they do they not exist) Brexit impact assessments I have said that the gov't must finally fully comply or face contempt proceedings.  
Lack of Brexit impact assessments is staggering. Just really sinking in for me. This matters to the economy more than any budget, but imagine if the Chancellor announced a load of tax changes and said “nah, we haven’t modelled this. It’ll be fine”. 
"Where we'd had murders... we have normality"Independent unionist Sylvia Hermon's warning on no deal Brexit  
Brexit talks in chaos, pay falling and more people in poverty. Wouldn't it be better if the @Conservatives just got out of the way? #PMQs 
Well exactly. There is a strong correlation between "Tories who favour Brexit" and "Tories you wouldn't trust to run a whelk stall" which I have always struggled to believe is purely coincidental. 
Governments of Scotland and Wales have been arguing for this for over a year.  No reason why all three devolved administrations cannot be included especially for devolved issues (in fact it would be essential) but as Governments, not as individual political parties. #Brexit  
What frightens me most about the dangerous waters Britain now steams through b/c of Brexit, Donald Trump and the rise of fascism is our country hasn't had a leader as unprepared for real crisis, since Neville Chamberlain. For the sake of the country #TheresaMay has to go. 
Brexit 'SAPPING demand for German cars with number of exports PLUMMETING'  
Lack of Brexit Impact Studies has reminded me of how much this is all completely David Cameron's fault.  They should have been published & scrutinised in 2015, and informed a proper question on the ballot paper. 
20th Oct 2016: David Davis informs parliament that 51 sector by sector Brexit impact reports were being compiled by the government.6th Dec 2017: David Davis confirms that no sector by sector Brexit impact reports have been compiled by the government.  
Jeremy Corbyn: "Whether it's Brexit, the NHS, Social Care, our Railways, Rising Child Poverty, Growing Pensioner Poverty, or Universal Credit. This Tory government is unable to solve the issues facing this country. In Fact, it's making them worse."#PMQs 
Independent NI MP Lady Sylvia Hermon just made powerful & moving speech on the current relevance & importance of the Good Friday Agreement, saying half her life has been blighted by the troubles, & Brexit can’t risk giving away what we’ve achieved 
Good idea. I have a better idea. Let her, not May, lead the talks. At least she believes in Brexit.  
That £3 billion the Chancellor set aside for Brexit - is it actually intended for the DUP? 
Jolyon is among those who think there are indeed impact assessments but Davis is lying because they’re so terrible that Brexit could not & would not happen if anyone saw them. - We need a public interest whistleblower from among the many who have fled DExEU to speak out.  
The Brexit Secretary admitted today that no impact assessments on leaving the EU have been carried out by government despite him telling MPs that over 50 were underway last year. This is strong evidence that he misled the House.  
Groans of disagreement in the House of Commons as DUP's Nigel Dodds tells independent unionist Sylvia Hermon that "many people in Northern Ireland suspect that she is on the side of Dublin" regarding #Brexit talks. 
NEWS! Santa could be barred from delivering in the UK after Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn: "Nearly 60 sectorial Brexit impact analysis were done...and this house voted to see those analysis. But today the Brexit secretary told the select committee they don't exist.""So, do they exist, or don't they? Have they actually done the work, or not?"#PMQs 
PROJECT BREXIT:1. NO definition2. NO plan3. NO majority support4. NO impact assessment5. Say "NO" to ruin of UK & #StopBrexitNow 
This is #Brexit under the Tories: #PMQs1. No impact assessment on Automotive industry.2. No impact assessment on Aerospace industry.3. No impact assessment on finance sector.4. No impact assessment on manufacturing industry.5. No impact assessment on economic growth. 
Government's ideological approach to Brexit risks decades of progress on peace in Ireland. Theresa May's DUP deal and her own red lines are completely incompatible. It's time she admitted she's incapable of governing the country in our best interests.  
If David Davis is squirming now, wait until he remembers his BBC interview about the Brexit impact reports [VIDEO]  
Is this really the best we can do? Shouldn't these reports have been commissioned the day after the referendum vote? smh  
Jeremy Corbyn: 2 months after the original deadline for first phase of Brexit talks, and after Monday's shambles. "Can the PM outline what the Governments position is on the Irish Border?"#PMQs 
MPs renew demands for contempt of parliament vote against David Davis after Brexit hearing - Politics live  
"Sir John Holmes, the chair of the Electoral Commission, also confirmed to the Guardian that the body has launched an inquiry into possible Russian interference in the EU referendum" #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Reuters reporting that Varadkhar suggests Brexit talks can be picked up in the new year if there isn't agreement next week.... 
All these "Corbyn's finished! People just loaned him their vote, to stop Brexit" people - do they now think that the polls are wrong, or that these tens of millions of vote-loaners are too stupid to have cottoned on yet? 
WATCH: my question to David Mundell on why the UK Government's approach to the Irish border is contrary to everything the Conservatives said during the Scottish Independence Referendum about a hard border at Berwick.Solution = Single Market and Customs Union for the whole UK.  
Watch: David Davis confirming that the government has not carried out a sector-by-sector impact analysis of the UK's decision to leave the EU. Previously, he had said the Brexit studies had been done in 'excruciating detail'. Read more:  
#bbcdp #afneil said @jeremycorbyn never asked any questions at #PMQs just made short speeches, I replayed and counted 5 direct questions to the PM on brexit, why is this man allowed to lie we have a right to a balanced & truthful reporting by a public broadcaster @BBCPolitics 
Westminster's plan has been scuppered by a handful of creationist morons in the DUP, which speaks volumes about the intellectual level of unionist governments right now. Brexit, the result of British nationalism, has hit gridlock due to the idiocy of British nationalists. 
Me: You can't do anything in opposition, there's no point just being a protest party. You need power. Corbyn doesn't get that.Also me: Jeremy Corbyn, the leader of the opposition because everyone I know and respect sensibly voted Tory and LibDem, just refuses to stop Brexit. 
What kind of democracy do we have when a very minor party controls the #Brexit outcome for 65 million, men, women and children?  
Brexit means brexit  
There are no Brexit impact assessmentsIt is lunchtimeDavid Davis has not resignedDAVID DAVIS HAS NOT RESIGNEDWhy not .@DavidDavisMP? 
Please watch this video of #DavidDavis regarding #Brexit impact assessments. If you then agree with me that he has lied to Parliament please ret-weet & re-tweet - re-tweet#DavisMustGo pic.twitter.com/fHjdEZ3TtZ 
To be fair it would have been helpful if the Gov had considered the impact BEFORE the referendum.  
David Davis is a charlatan and should resign immediately. The levels of deceit during this whole #Brexit mess are an insult to the electorate  
Sobering to consider that there is a more thorough risk assessment of the toilets in the House of Commons than there is of the impact of Brexit on our country.#impactassessments #PMQs 
David Davis, October 2017 “The government has done Brexit impact assessments in excruciating detail for 58 sectors."Lying then or now? 
People who would favour #NoDeal over stopping Brexit: The far-rightMarket predatorsDestructive psychopathsXenophobesThe terminally stupidPutinTrump There are overlaps between some of these categories 
David Davis knowingly lied to Parliament about conducting Brexit impact assessments. The general public should never tolerate politicians lying through their teeth. Davis is clearly in contempt of Parliament and MUST be sacked.#DavisMustGo 
Here's an idea. Why don't we just cancel Brexit and try it again once Leavers have a plan?#StopBrexit#DavidDavis 
My guess: David Davis told the truth in June, and lied today. The analysis is so damning the government dare not release it. #Brexit 
John Bercow not ruling out allowing contempt of parliament proceedings against David Davis - will await verdict of Brexit select committee 
Pete Wishart is digging inThere is a realistic prospect of contempt charge going forwardre Brexit Impact 
Speaker says he'll study comments from Brexit committee this morning. SNP want contempt of parliament proceedings against Brexit secretary. 
"The DUP are taking their time"No shit, their thinking is still in the era when people believed there was a volatile old wizard in the sky and all the animals fitted on a wooden boat. Screw the DUP and screw the hard-right. Brexit is a disaster & needs to be put on hold 
David Davis is bluffing on Brexit. And now it’s clear for all to see | Rafael Behr  
Now it's clear David Davis lied about the existence of the Brexit Impact Assessments should he carry on as the UK's Brexit secretary bc lying is OK now in British politics? Should he be sacked or should he be locked up? 
Her voice was getting quite screechy and hysterical and she looks tired and haggard. I think the stress is showing. Corbyn's right, she and her party have no idea how to solve the problems of Brexit, Universal Credit, the economy, the NHS, low productivity and economic downturn. 
MPs howl with laughter as Theresa May insists 'very good progress' is being made in Brexit negotiations#PMQs 
The SNP's Pete Wishart raises a point of order on Brexit papers saying govt must be in contempt of Parliament 
On economy, wages, NHS, education & Universal Credit we’ve a good idea what Corbyn would do when he attacks May. Not on Brexit. Blunted until he’s clear #PMQs 
I have 1 question. If the Govt has not done due diligence on Brexit impacts, how did the Chancellor produce a budget and future growth forecasts? Is he lying too? #FBPE 
“If we have a problem, would it help if I came over to Brussels with you to sort them out” @PeterBoneUK asks @theresa_may on #Brexit talks #PMQs 
#Brexit required hard work and sacrifice. Brits avoid both like the plague, so failure was guaranteed. You’ll survive. You always do. And there’s a Royal wedding to think about.   
Irish PM hits out at @DUPleader saying it doesn't represent all off Northern Ireland, doesn't understand why it's being portrayed in London and elsewhere that they do #Brexit 
.@GOettingerEU: "Distinguishing between #Eurozone and non-Eurozone  no longer makes sense." - especially after #Brexit. That's why @EU_Commission is not proposing a separate #Eurozone budget. 
.@theresa_may avoiding answering on Brexit impact assessments by wasting half her time talking utter nonsense. How can anyone still vote for these people??#PMQs 
Brexit has made some people lose their senses. Here's an environmentalist complaining that @MailOnline has put the environment on their front page today. Surely trashing our one and only planet is a bigger story than Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn: In July, Liam Fox said 'the Brexit negotiations will be the easiest in human history.'"Does the PM still agree with that assessment?"#PMQs 
This is your best "We now go live to Brexit" yet. 
Britain has not formally assessed impact of Brexit on economy -Brexit minister  
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP'Now we know the DUP has a veto over Brexit negotiations - is this a PM who is in office but not in power?' #PMQs 
I am now in a position to publish my four Brexit impact assessments. Thank you.  
In  the real world, #DavidDavis & #TheresaMay would have their offices in cardboard boxes.. and they and everything they got would be out on the pavement.#Labour  really ought to be  stomping these  into powder#BrexitSelectCommittee#PMQstxt-@Brexit 
In #PMQs May showed the Tories' Brexit negotiations are a total shambles. She had no answers. May is in office, but she certainly isn't in power. 
Looks like May wasn't consulted by Trump over Jerusalem - he did say he spoke with world leaders - perhaps he spoke with Arlene Foster? #PMQs 
MP Peter Bone offers to help Theresa May out with Brexit negotitations in Brussels  
Leave MP Peter Bone offers to go to Brussels to "sort out" EU negotiators in #Brexit talks #PMQs  
It would probably be easier for the UK to play hardball over the EU's refusal to move to stage 2 if our Brexit Secretary hadn't spent the morning explaining that we've basically done no modelling of the effects of Brexit because we were going to agree a deal so why bother? 
Simply astonishing that Davis can effectively admit having lied to Parliament previously about Brexit reports, with no contrition  or consequences. #brexitshambles #ExitfromBrexit 
Did he know & lie? Or not know so is incompetent fantasist? Nightmare for UK either way - why the hell hasn't Govt assessed Brexit impact?  
My comment: if David Davis refuses to commission/produce an assessment of the economic impacts of Brexit, Parliament should.  We set out a suggested framework here:    
.@IanBlackfordMP - DUP brexit veto shows a PM in office but not in power. PM must recognise a deal to keep us in single market and customs union. Anything else will be a failure of leadership. #PMQs 
"The only hard border around is right down the middle of the Labour party" - Theresa May fires back after Jeremy Corbyn attacks #Brexit "shambles" #PMQs  
My cartoon Wednesday @TheTimes. The #DUP ties May's hands over #Brexit..... #ArleneFoster 
Sooner or later it must occur to Corbyn that he'd be quite a lot better at attacking the government's position in Brexit if he actually had one of his own. 
The Tories’ Brexit negotiations are a shambles.Only Labour will fight for a Brexit deal that protects Britain’s economy and people’s jobs, rights and living standards. RT if you agree. #PMQs 
Theresa May: "Corbyn keeps making promises he can't deliver" the DAY AFTER going back on a preliminary Brexit deal she had agreed on Northern Ireland.#PMQs 
David Davis guilty of "unforgivable recklessness." GMB's @Tim_Roache says Government "playing fast and loose with people’s livelihoods, communities and the economy" #Brexit #WhereAreTheImpactAssessments 
Corbyn asks for itemised Brexit bill - May says ‘nothing is agreed til everything is agreed’ (again) 
Jeremy Corbyn asks Theresa May to clarify the government's position on the post-Brexit Irish borderTheresa May says “We will ensure there is no hard border in Northern Ireland” to shouts of "how?" from Labour MPs #PMQs 
If Labour had a clear and strong position on Brexit they could be taking this Tory UK government to task on Brexit. Their ambiguity on the Single Market and Customs Union is undermining their opposition. #PMQs 
Crikey, even the Daily Mail has turned on David Davis, and the comments are heavily anti-Brexit. Even.The. Daily. Mail.  
NOT ONLY should there have been impact assessments done, BUT ALSO they should have been done before the stupid referendum was even called. Our ministers would not last five minutes in a middle manager job in any self-respecting company. How CAN they be in charge of a country? 
“I haven’t looked at the impact of Brexit at all”*David Davis then proceeds to actually fucking giggle* pic.twitter.com/0ILFgMCapR 
Jeremy Corbyn missing an entire stadium of open goals over Brexit at PMQs. 
Watch as the Speaker calls out the Tories playground tactics - trying to shout down Jeremy Corbyn as he exposes Tory Brexit shambles.... #PMQs 
Showing my age but the current government feels like a Sid James movie crossed with Dad’s Army.  Carry on Brexit.  
*committee hearing*chair: mr davis, have you done any research on brexit at all?davis: yes *opens spark notes under table* brexit is a tale of two men which serves as a wider allegory for depression-era america and the human cond-chair: that's of mice and mendavis: i have not 
Tbf, Jezza is on bold ground with his Brexit negotiations stuff, given that he himself hasn't yet even managed to have them with Seumas Milne.  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May heckled as she says "very good progress" made in #Brexit talks #PMQs  
Theresa May's update on the progress of her Brexit negotiations: "Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed". So there you go then! #PMQs 
Seriously, the UK government hasn’t done full economic analysis of the impact of #Brexit? They’re either terrified of what it would say, or incompetent. Or both.   
Turns out David Davis and hundreds of DExEU civil servants have been getting dressed, going to work, playing Minecraft all day, then going home again. :-/#Brexit #PMQs 
If May really thinks there is “good progress” in Brexit negations I’d hate to see what she regards as failure #PMQs 
The Tories’ Brexit negotiations are a shambles.Only Labour will fight for a Brexit deal that protects Britain’s economy and people’s jobs, rights and living standards. RT if you agree. #PMQs 
Corbyn starts with Liam Fox’s claim that “Brexit negotiations would be the easiest in human history” PM says it’s going well. More laughter. #PMQs 
Corbyn goes on Brexit - does she still agree that Brexit negotiations would be the easiest in history? Big laughs 
Has #DavidDavis breached the Ministerial Code Of Conduct? You decide...#brexitshambles #impactassessments #Brexit@brexit_sham @acgrayling @RichardDawkins @ProfBrianCox 
There have been no #Brexit economic impact assessments.Davis lied to the public, lied to parliament and lied to his boss. If May doesn't sack him and call for a pause to the A50 timetable to assess the impact, her own MPs should call for her resignation. 
BREAKING: David Davis unveils his 'excruciatingly detailed' #Brexit #impactassessments 
What would upset you more - that the government won't publish formal studies of the economic and industrial impact of Brexit or that it hasn't carried out formal studies of the economic and industrial impact of Brexit? 
David Davis reportedly said today that the EU27 would not make their Brexit impact studies publicPorkie alert   
Imagine we have a Labour government and Diane Abbott says the government hasn't produced a single economic impact assessment on Brexit as she's "not a fan" of them. The internet would collapse. #PMQs 
LIVE: @theresa_may holds #PMQs as #Brexit talks descend into chaos  
This Brexit process is like watching someone falling down a really tall flight of stairs in slow motion. 
so to sum up: when Dexeu said it had 57 sectoral analyses assessing the impact of Brexit they didn't mean they had 57 Brexit impact assessment studies. CLEAR NOW? 
I bet they do exist, in some form or other. I bet Davis has decided he'd rather take heat for misleading Parliament and the public than come clean about what Government knows Brexit means.  
Andrew Neil, visibly annoyed about his beloved Brexit falling to bits, is delightful to watch. De-lightful. 
WATCH: David Davis in June admitting Gov has '50, nearly 60 sector analyses nearly done'.  Today he claims no impact assessments have been done on impact of Brexit on UK economy.  The Government’s shameful hypocrisy over Brexit impact assessments continues  
This alone says stop Brexit right now. We cannot proceed under these circumstances.  
NI is now a surrogate policy instrument for all sides in the Brexit debate. A change from a decades-long convention in UK politics. This is bleak but inevitable: all of the contradictions and trade-offs lead back to the island of Ireland. And always did.  
And there we have it – the worst ever Brexit tweet, courtesy of an UKIP MEP.  
So David Davis hasn’t bothered assessing Brexit’s impact and now the DUP want to negotiate for us? This is shambolic even for the Tories.  
The early history of the 58 Brexit sector analyses  What Davis once promised is documented here. He didn't do any of it, he now says 
Sinn Féin's November Newsletter from our seven-strong MP team. It's been a busy month. Sinn Féin MPs engaged in extensive Brexit lobbying in Dublin & London, and fought for truth & justice for families bereaved during the conflict.Keep up to date - follow our MPs on Twitter!  
If you know someone who still thinks Britain is run by serious people, send them these 53 seconds. Gentleman with grey hard is Minister for Brexit. He's being questioned by a parliamentary committee  
Quite extraordinary: Watch as Greg Hands MP tries to gaslight Andrew Neil in order to cover for David Davis' lies on the Brexit papers. What a bunch of chancers we have running the country... #BrexitShambles 
Choices, choices. What’s the bigger Brexit clusterf*** right now: 
. @afneil on form this morning. Like a school headteacher telling off two naughty students. Both the government and the opposition in complete disarray over Brexit! #brexitshambles #FBPE 
I try not to swear in tweets, but after revelation that 18mths after #EURef the UK gov't has not assessed impact of #Brexit I am going to let former senior civil servant Sir Richard Mottram speak for me.  
This is how #Brexit Secretary David Davis told MPs the UK government has not carried out an impact assessment of leaving the EU  
At very least - at very, very least - this is a resigning matter. But in truth the whole government should go & the whole Brexit disaster stop. - If ONLY we had a sensible, rational opposition dedicated to the good of the country!  
Damning post last month by @davidallengreen tracing the history of the #Brexit impact assessments saga June 2016 until June 2017Tl;dr: DExEU has been blagging about all of this for more than a year. 
Davis just now explained why he’d not done sectoral impact work.Pardon my language, but this is plain fucking stupid.Firstly, not “all” broad economic models have proven wrong (w Brexit £ fell, GDP slowed). Secondly, that’s nawt to do with nuts-n’-bolts sectoral impact. pic.twitter.com/13h3YmQf41 
David Davis admits the government has not done an impact assessment on Brexit's damage to the NHS.  
There are around 500 staff in the Brexit department. What is it that their Ministers have been asking them to do? 
Brexit means Brexit  
As well as being instantly sacked, Politicians should also be prosecuted for knowingly lying to Parliament like Davis has done with the now supposedly non-existent Brexit impact assessments.  
For all its current anti-Brexit posturing, it's worth remembering that Sinn Fein opposed the Lisbon Treaty in 2009.  
David Davis admits there have been no impact assessments on the impact of Brexit. He doesn't know what he's doing.  
June: David Davis says 50-60 sectoral Brexit impact reports have been made October: Davis says the reports are in excruciating detail November: Parliament says Davis must release the reports December: Davis says the impact reports don't exist  
Even if Brexit is your most cherished desire, you have to look at the absolute cretins in charge of implementing it and despair. 
Watch this and make your mind up about whether this lying, duplicitous, incompetent, arrogant, making it up as he goes along absolute shower is fit for office in leading us through Brexit. Resign  
"Dear Irene of Manchester, I apologise for being split. I'll try harder.Best regards, Ireland"#brexitshambles #Brexit  
Commentator on main German radio station DLF describes #Brexit as the biggest political nonsense since Caligula appointed his horse as Consul.#StopTheMadness 
Tory leadership doesn't give a shit if Brexit is a disaster because they think no deal is what their voters want.Labour leadership doesn't give a shit if Brexit is a disaster because they think suffering leads to glorious revolution.Please, someone, tell me I'm wrong. 
21 months after the referendum this is a complete dereliction of duty and proof of gross incompetence. Government not fit for purpose.  
Here's a video of David Davis explicitly mentioning more than 50 #Brexit sectoral analyses. Today, he has said 'no systematic impact assessments' exist. Either misleading public or wholly incompetent.  
Enough! Brexit *cannot*, *must* not be done like this. We don’t risk our economy, society and unity on the basis of this utterly irresponsible bullshit. #StopBrexit 
All I want for Christmas is to see Claude from #TheApprentice interviewing David Davis about his Brexit CV. 
It's almost as if Brexit was an idea based on an almost complete absence of evidence.But let's try and be positive.... 
This is deeply serious.David Davis just told Brexit Cttee there are no impact assessments.  Never were.  His defence is the Commons motion asked for something that never existed.  Also said no assessment made before deciding to leave customs union. 
Brexit is an expression of ideology or feeling, an act of faith. An impact assessment is therefore beside the point. It is, like Trump, an irrational movement: it casts aside expertise where that conflicts with the movements wishes.  
"If Brexit goes wrong, it'll be the EU & those nasty Remainers who subverted it."No, it'll be down to Hard Brexiteers who steered Govt, yet never thought it through and never came up with a realistic plan/strategy.Thanks a bunch, guys.  
Will @jeremycorbyn raise Brexit  at PMQs or maintain his silence to try to damage Tories rather than secure best deal for UK 
David Davis, October 2017:“The government has done Brexit impact assessments in excruciating detail for 58 sectors."December 2017:"We’ve been playing Playstation and looking at porn for 18 months" 
David Davis just told Brexit Committee it would take 10-50 years of civil service time to do #Brexit impact assessments and ALSO SAID the gov't plans to do this work "in due course".I want to laugh, but we put this man in charge of the most critical negotiation in generations. 
Got to congratulate David Davis for somehow getting Schrödinger’s cat inside Pandora’s Box #Brexit 
We call on the resignation forthwith of Theresa May, David Davis and the Brexit department.To have no economic assessment of various Brexit options is a national disgrace and imperils our futures.Brexit must now be stopped. 
Public blame the EU as optimism falls about a good Brexit deal - but voters still back the same kind of Brexit as before  
An alternative plan. Impact assessment, share outcomes, hold referendum so we had a clue what we’re voting for. Radical? #brexit 
.@DavidDavisMP's evolving thoughts on when an impact assessment isn't an impact assessment: #Brexit  
Davis admits 'no sort of systematic impact assessment' exists. Man in charge of Brexit doesn't know what it'll do to our economy, and doesn't want to know. Why might that be? 
No detailed Brexit studies done. Allegations of Russian interference. An intractable NI/Eire border issue. Next week MPs will debate a petition demanding a  referendum on the final Brexit deal, including the option to Remain. Have you signed yet? 
Brexit is like if Farage & Johnson said “May we make you an *amazing* apple crumble?” & then 18 months later handed you a leaking bag of maggots & offal. You shouldn’t have to eat it. 
Dippy David Davis: "We have 58 Brexit impact reports""Well,  quite a few""They aren't quite finished""The dog's eaten them""Trust us, it will be alright""This time next year Rodders" 
Alexa, drip feed me so much terrible news about Brexit that I no longer care what happens to the UK and only want to watch light romantic comedies from the 80s 
If this isn’t a gross dereliction of duty what is?: ‘The government has not carried out an impact assessment of leaving the EU on the UK economy’ Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP told MPs. 
Tories are in chaos over Brexit: This morning David Davis said the Government has done 'no systematic impact assessment'. - in October he clearly said 51 sector assessments were 'in place'.  
Brexit means Brexit?  
David Davis admits he hasn't done his Brexit homework - our favourite responses online  
Imagine bring a Tory voter and seeing David Davis making such a mess of things. Beyond making a mess of Brexit he. Theresa May and hard-right nutjobs are killing the party 
David Davis admits the Government has done NO impact assessments on how Brexit will hit sectors of the UK economy! An infants school class could have managed this better!!   
First the #Brexit impact assessments were "in excruciating detail", then they didn't exist, then they were shared with MPs and the Scottish Government... now they don't exist again.  
The key point is these "impact assessments" were used as a shield for a year to tell business all their concerns and needs were being listened to and entered into the Brexit masterplan.  
The Government have just admitted they lied about the Brexit impact reports.Oh, that's ok then. Next. 
Let's just keep saying it: this government is not fit to serveDavid Davis says government has not assessed impact of Brexit for different sections of economy  
This exchange between Hilary Benn and David Davis after the Brexit Secretary revealed the Government has not conducted any sector-by-sector Brexit impact assessments is astounding.  
This is a public scandal. There never was an evidence base to support govt policy on Brexit. They didn't look for it. 
The Tories #Brexit shambles gets worse everyday. Today David Davis gets caught lying. His department NEVER did the assessments he said that they DID do...  
And this, folks, is surely the point of Parliament. Parliament which the brexit lot say they want to give more power to.The Government can't just do what they want. They have to be accountable. The Government cannot just make it up as they go along. 
David Davis in June: "We’ve got 50, nearly 60 sector analyses done”David Davis in December: "There's no sort of systematic impact assessment"It's either deceit or gross incompetence. Neither are acceptable for a Secretary of State leading our Brexit negotiations.  
Before we all wonder whether we’re going mad - Davis’ previous claims to the Brexit committee; 57 sets of analyses being done  
This is utterly, utterly ridiculous. How could any competent news broadcaster possibly cover yesterday's Brexit developments starting with what Ruth Davidson says about the SNP? Parochial nonsense.  
I love that the Patron Saint of Brexit is a petulant autocrat who murdered two of his wives and had an open, festering wound on his leg that stank to high heaven.  
Brexit secretary David Davis has admitted that the UK government has not yet conducted sector-by-sector studies on the impact of leaving the EU  
Brexit Secretary David Davis told a committee that the government has not assessed the impact of Brexit on different sections of the economy. 
This government should be removed immediaftely incompetence isn.t the word. David Davis must resign along with the rest of them, no wonder the world is laughing at us.. SACK this Government today, scrap Brexit lets deal with the real problems, poverty, homelessness our NHS. 
.@Wera_Hobhouse - "It is unbelievable that these long-trumpeted impact assessments don't even exist, meaning the government has no idea what their Brexit plans will do to the country."  
BREAKING: Whoomp, there it is."There's no sort of systematic impact assessment," David Davis told the Brexit committee just now. FFS 
Recap of the past 48 hours in UK:1) UK agrees a deal it has to backtrack on after PM gets a call from DUP2) Brexit analysis so excruciating in detail PM only read a summary turns out to not exist3) Decision to leave customs union based on “judgement” not a formal assessment 
If you were a COO or Head of Finance of a multinational company’s UK operations listening to the #Brexit news the last three days… what would you do? 
Let me negotiate Brexit  
The harm from Brexit is quantifiable and real.The benefits from Brexit are non-existent.How can our politicians support this act of national self harm? 
That feeling when you say you've done your Brexit economic impact assessments in excruciating detail but you get caught out lying to Parliament and the public  
It's one Brexit, Michael. What could it cost, ten dollars? 
Blair makes a rational point about Brexit and people on here say 'Iraq.' Clegg makes one and it's 'tuition fees.' This is not what constitutes debate. 
Michele Allan took this picture in July 2016 just after the EU referendum. The Coatham Hotel/Windsor Ballroom once home to the legendary Redcar Jazz Club stood empty and derelict. All of Teesside voted leave. Comments on the picture included:“After Brexit, who do we blame now?”  
Reluctant to say this but the only rational explanation is that Davis and other @DExEUgov ministers must have known they were misleading Parliament on (a) number and (b) quality of the Brexit sector analyses.  
I was trying to think of a witty tweet about this whole Brexit shambles but I can't.I just feel anger.Anger about a government that don't care about you unless you're rich, a government hell bent on destroying this country.A government that holds nothing but contempt for you. 
UK has been clear about not having a hard border. Difference is, EU trying to play games and undermine Brexit by attempting to effectively lock NI in the Single Market when it's not necessary  
All the times David Davis said his department had done the Brexit impact assessments that he now admits don't exist  
The fact the prime minister speaking to the leader of the DUP is now breaking news gives a further indication of how badly No.10 have managed the Brexit negotiations. 
David Davis back in June said that he has 50-60 sectoral analyses already done. Today he told Parliament that no impact assessments have been done on the impact of Brexit. Let’s all face it , the Conservatives have made a mess on Brexit.  
Only one name so far been suggested to take over from Mrs May leading our Brexit negotiations by certain @bbc5live listeners.... 
David Davis has now confirmed that UK Gov has done NO analysis of the impact of #Brexit on a sector by sector basis.  This is appalling. The UK is about to take the single biggest economic decision ever and the UK Gov have not analysed its impact.  A complete dereliction of duty. 
BUSTED !Impact assessments #BrexitDavis FINALLY admitted what we ALL suspected.THEY DON'T EXIST ! 
Schrödinger's Brexit Impact Assessments: They do not exist but are in excruciating detail. @DavidDavisMP is having a laugh 
No deal on "sufficient progress".No impact assessments.Withdrawal Bill in deep trouble.Eighteen months after vote.Article 50 clock ticking.UK could not really be in worse predicament on Brexit at this stage. 
We’ve reached peak farce.#brexit  
David Davis has just admitted that his department have conducted no analysis on the economic impact of Brexit.This is gross negligence. Our government are winging it on the biggest issue facing our country in 70 years. An appalling dereliction of duty. 
Remember this, EU negotiators.The next time UK demands the EU does an IA on the limit values of formaldehyde in the packaging of a widget subsystem, laugh back at them.#Brexit  
I watch the #Brexit developments like it’s a gobsmackingly ludicrous reality show, while fully aware I’m doing so from within the burning house that is America. We are two countries swiftly bleeding out from the most ridiculously avoidable self-inflicted wounds. 
So not only have there been no assessments done on the impact of Brexit on our economy after 18 months, but David Davis has been fibbing to Parliament all the way.  
David Davis tells Hilary Benn at the #brexit committee that there was 'no formal quantative assessment' undertaken before the cabinet decided to leave the #eu customs union 
Brexit comm chair @hilarybennmp: "So the govt hasn't undertaken any impact assessments for the implications on leaving the EU for different sectors of the British economy?" Brexit sec David Davis: No  
We see it's going well for David Davis in the Brexit Select Committee...   
There is no way to finesse @DavidDavisMP evidence today. There is no way to finesse a govt leading us out of the EU without a clue. Will Parliament really stand for this? Will we? #Brexit  
Bad tempered exchanges between Davis and Brexit select cttee. DD tells MPs to "move on" as he's "worried now" because he's running late. MP on committee reminds of speaker's directive that there is nothing more in DD diary than this 
Impact assessment of Brexit on the UK 'don't exist'  
OH GREAT. He's a liar one way or the other. Top Tory David Davis just admitted he's done NO impact assessments of Brexit:  
If Brexit was about 'taking back control', why is it that Arlene Foster & the DUP suddeny have the control. Theresa May has caused an immense #BrexitShambles 
Ian Duncan Smith Brexit negotiation strategy.  
Watch this and weep.Seema maintains extraordinary calm. And Davis just blags an answer.#brexit #impactassessments 
The inference of Davis defence is that there might be things about Brexit that UK side has thought of and EU side hasn't. Pattern of negotiation so far clearly indicates opposite is true. 
David Davis:- we have assessed the impact of Brexit - not literally, obviously, fuck that- we have a bunch of documents you can look at in a locked room- ok that was just a decoy- listen, brexit is going to be the tits, ok? That’s my assessment. 
BREAKING: It has been 18 months since the #Brexit vote - and not a single impact assessment has been done.  
Surely what is happening in the Brexit Committee just now must be the final nail in the coffin of Brexit. It is absolutely incomprehensible to me how any of these things can be happening >> incompetent and irresponsible beyond any measure. 
Two possibilities:The studies do exist, and Davis has lied to the House and must resign.The studies do not exist, and Davis is guilty of dereliction of duty and must resign.Either way, he cannot maintain the confidence of the House as our Brexit negotiator#BrexitStudies 
Here is David Davis back in June saying that @DExEUgov has 50-60 sectoral analyses already done. He just told Parliament that no impact assessments have been done on the impact of Brexit on the UK economy.  
"Mr Davis how much preparation have you done for Brexit""Almost nothing""Mr Davis how much preparation did you do for this meeting""Oh none at all""Mr Davis where are your trousers""not sure" 
David Davis written statement to Parliament 7 November: "The sectoral analysis is a wide mix of qualitative and quantitative analysis contained in a range of documents"David Davis today: No impact assessments have been done on the impact of Brexit on UK economy 
David Davis has now told Parliament that the Brexit impact studies 'do not exist' after saying only a few weeks ago that they exist 'in excruciating detail'...  
Impact assessment of Brexit on the UK 'don't exist'  
It's hard to believe this is actually happening. If Davis is finally telling the truth, the government has failed to do ANY material due diligence on ANY potential brexit outcome. They are flying blind.  
Monday: "regulatory alignment" versus "no regulatory divergence"Today: "sectoral analysis" versus "impact assessment"Brexit has become a branch of applied linguistics. 
I was told in an FOI from DExEU that they held the Brexit #impactassessments but the Govt needed a "safe space", then they delayed in handing them over, then apparently they didn't exist and now haven't even started, Incredible. 
David Davis admits the Government has done no impact assessments on how Brexit will hit sectors of the UK economy  
Reminder that Corbyn wanted to trigger Art 50 the day after the vote. He has not once asked for impact statements. He gave no thought to Euratom. He has whipped his troops to allow the Gov to Brexit. Both sides are utterly negligent here. 
.@DavidDavisMP If you’re not going to use the 50/60 impact assessments you said you were doing on Brexit, can I have them for my litter tray? You’re not the only one who’s full of s**t... 
Four cartoons about those #Brexitreports and @DavidDavisMP ... #Brexit #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #FBPE 
The crucial point is that @HouseofCommons UNOPPOSED motion mandated disclosure of IMPACT ASSESSMENTS to @CommonsEUexit. Having not opposed the motion @DavidDavisMP now says they don't exist! It's quite extraordinary #brexit  
.@DavidDavisMP told me "we have a major contingency plan" on #Brexit, while also saying DExEU had not started or completed a sectoral impact assessment for our economy?! #brexitshambles 
What this means is that Davis wants to give Starmer "confidential" information about Brexit. Starmer would likely refuse because having that information would tie his hands.  
David Davis just admitted sharing Brexit information with Keir Starmer on Privy Council "terms" and also with others. So those who are in the Queen's inner circle know more than others who need that information? Nobody sees anything majorly wrong with that in a modern democracy? 
So the official line is now - we pretended to have assessed the impact of Brexit in detail, until we were forced to show it to some MPs, and now we admit/claim we haven't assessed the impact of Brexit in any detail at all actually...WTF? how are people not resigning over this 
Here is a reminder of the text of the motion passed by @HouseofCommons UNOPPOSED. NB it uses the words "impact assessments". @DavidDavisMP now says they don't exist. #brexit  
Brexit is not about logic or economic outcomes. It's about sticking two fingers up to Johnny Foreigner. There is literally no more substance to it than that. 
David Davis has just stated that he did not think that a no deal #brexit would see a shortage of nurses in the UK, this is despite there having been a 96% drop in nurses from the EU registering in the UK since the referendum  
It doesn't matter what your opinion on Brexit is: this is shockingly arrogant and appallingly incompetent.   It is 17 MONTHS since the vote.  
My @JackofKent post listing all the pre-negotiation boasts to Parliament by Davis and other @DExEUgov ministers of (a) the number and (b) the quality of the Brexit sector analyses.A sham all along.A confidence trick.  
David Davis' evidence to the Brexit Committee in October, when he was quite happy to talk about the impact assessments that exist in "excruciating detail". Now he says they don't exist. This is madness.  
As pointed out by several observers, David Davis's appearance in front of the Brexit select committee to explain the whereabouts of the impact assessments this morning is, essentially, Monte Python's Cheese Shop Sketch without the music. @EricIdle 
So, today: Davis, to nobody's surprise, is revealed to be a lying bullshitter and Brexit is a disaster of oceangoing proportions, and Trump is about stomp like a drunken hippo over decades of careful Middle East diplomacy. And it's only Wednesday  
Government ministers have confirmed that the EU Common Fisheries Policy will be included in the Great Repeal Bill, which will transpose all EU law on to the British statue books for a transitional period. Frankly this is an abject betrayal of Brexit 
The Labour position on Brexit is clear. Stay in the Single Market and Customs Union. Keep borders open. Pay whatever the EU ask. No trade deals. And no fixed date to leave the EU. In summary - Remain. 
The Brexit select committee has two lever arch files in front of it. These are the government’s impact assessments. A barrister has more documents defending a shoplifting case 
Horrific and totally irresponsible! David Davis has declared that the government has not produced any economic impact assessments on Brexit. 
David Davis just told @CommonsEUexit - we have not done "a quantitative economic forecast of outcome" of Brexit. "The Government has not written an impact assessment". Read my thread below and see how many times the Government has misled Parliament and the public:  
WATCH: David Davis in June admitting Gov has '50, nearly 60 sector analyses nearly done'Today @CommonsEUexit he claims no impact assessments have been done on impact of Brexit on UK economy.The Gov's shameful hypocrisy over Brexit impact assessments continues:  
I'm reminded of this bit from @tconnellyRTE's Brexit & Ireland, on the level of preparatory work the Irish government had done *before the referendum vote* pic.twitter.com/e5QAhoNblU 
"OK, this Brexit thing. Should we try and work out what impact it might have, or not?". "Potentially the biggest economic impact since the war, right?". "Yep". "Nah, let's just wing it". 
Here's David Davis's Statement to the House a month ago. And here's his evidence to the Brexit Select Committee this morning.  
David Davis's evidence to the select committee this morning is, shall we say, not reassuring as yet. Q: So has the government undertaken an assessment of the impact of Brexit? Davis: Not on a sector by sector basis. 
The evidence of @DavidDavisMP to @CommonsEUexit just now re non existence of #brexit #impactassessments would appear to directly contradict what he & other UK Govt ministers have previously told Commons committees. This is pretty serious 
David Davis says the government hasn't produced a single economic impact assessment on Brexit as he's "not a fan" of them. 
So: 1. A hard #Brexit is incompatible with peace in Ireland2. The DUP is incompatible with a soft Irish border3. The government is unsustainable without the DUP4. May's only remaining option - though she will take a while to get there - is to call an election 
The Brexit Secretary is now saying he has carried out NO assessments of the potential impact of Brexit on ANY sector of the British economy. We are through the looking glass, people. 
David Davis tells the #brexit committee there has been no impact assessments by sector of leaving the EU  
.@DavidDavisMP has just admitted that the Government have not conducted a single economic impact assessments on the impact to Brexit to our economy. Staggeringly. A dereliction of duty.  #brexitshambles 
David Davis reveals government has not done any formal impact assessment of Brexit on any sector in the UK. Brexit select committee 
David Davis: No impact assessments have been done on impact of Brexit on UK economy 
David Davis has just told the Exiting the EU select committee that govt hasn't done any impact assessment of Brexit on particular sectors of the economy 
Delighted that How To Stop Brexit won at the Parliamentary Book Awards. Thanks to all who voted. Makes me think that I may be listened to more now than when I worked in the building... 
I had a phone call with the Taoiseach @campaignforleo and assured him that we stand by our Irish friends regarding #Brexit. A hard border within #Ireland is unacceptable. 
Real Brexit dividing lines finally become clear: the trade- off between regulatory freedom & trade integration with our biggest trading partner, dressed up as a fight over the Irish border. 
"It's important viewers realise that the Brexit negotiations are going quite well"  
Trying to understand Brexit is like trying to figure out what colour the letter seven smells like. 
6 December 2005. David Cameron (right), defeated David Davis to become leader of the Conservative Party. His decision to call the EU Referendum will go down as one of the greatest political mistakes in British History.  
The week Brexit died of shame.  My column on how the UK Prime Minister sabotaged her own summit. And Ulster said NO.  
Some people to follow on Brexit@WomaninHavana and @JMPSimor - two best QC commentators on Brexit@AgataGostynska - who got all the complications re A50 right before anyone else@jessicaelgot - on the sector analyses story@JenniferMerode @lisaocarroll  - ongoing news updates 
There's a very important question here. If voters have become far more gloomy about the economic effects of Brexit then why have not more of them changed their minds? Whisper it quietly but... maybe... it is not all about economics.  
We’re told Brexit is biggest issue to hit U.K. since 2nd World War. So why is it in the hands of a minority govt. and a party, the DUP, that doesn’t even reflect the majority views of Northern Ireland? Time for a cross-party team to negotiate, representative of all U.K. 
A handy list of who's to blame for Brexit not going well.  
Having a bad morning? Well, you could be David Davis, who in ten minutes has to explain to the Brexit select committee why the Brexit impact assessments are in fact a few hastily-scrawled post-it notes tied up with old string. 
Who knew Brexit would be so complicated? 
In 10 minutes MPs will be questioning David Davis about the mystery of his "excruciatingly detailed" Brexit studies. Here's the story so far:  
John Humprhys been commentating on EU ref / Brexit for over 2 years now.JH: “Well, surely we’ll get the NI thing sorted soon”Reporter: “Well, I don’t think they can”JH: “Really?!”How can we hope for effective interrogation of guests if presenters don’t ‘get it’? #r4today 
Kinnock fought 1983 General Election on a manifesto promising to  take the UK out of the EU  without a referendum.He later became a highly paid EU Commissioner and now wants to reverse #Brexit.The man is a hypocrite.  
EU officials have begun referring to the possible #Brexit transition phase as the Full Monty or “Full Monty Minus” (minus because the U.K. won’t have membership of the institutions.) 
I sacked three shadow ministers for voting to keep us in the customs union. I am therefore shocked that the Tories don’t want to entertain the option of staying in it. #Brexit 
How much more of an insult to the nation and its democracy can this lying, twisting, weaselling, secretive & destructive Brexit coup be allowed to perpetrate? This is shocking:  
The Labour leadership have gone full Remoaner in Parliament, urging the government to abandon the Brexit deadline of March 30th 2019, and consider staying in both the Single Market and the Customs Union.In what amounts to a complete betrayal of their manifesto commitments, 
The EU referendum was 18 months ago. Why haven't the Tories used that time to come to an pre-agreement over the border situation in Northern Ireland? Now they're trying to cobble something together in a week.....#ToryBrexitCrisis 
The UK did not vote for Brexit. 37% of a rigged electorate voted for a hand-waving catch-all slogan in an advisory referendum missold as mandatory, narrowly won by a torrent of hate and lies spewed out by the tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Boris Johnson and Michael Gove lead Cabinet revolt over 'soft Brexit' fears as Brexiteers back the DUP's demands for a clean Brexit for the whole United Kingdom  
Jacob Rees-Mogg, Ian Duncan Smith, Nadine Dorries, Theresa Villiers and other Brexit Tories have been falling over themselves to praise the negotiating prowess of the DUP. The same DUP that walked out of the Good Friday talks & campaigned against the agreement #BrexitShambles 
The UK must have full control over our standards and regulations post-Brexit, says businessman Simon Boyd  
Does no one like us anymore?  I’m sure it’s just random, and nothing to do w our Brexit nonsense ()  
On the three-way struggle for control of UK Brexit policy. The DUP/Tory right v Theresa May v Reality  
If you want to know what an attach on free speech looks like, here's @BorisJohnson accusing those who oppose Brexit of "talking the country down"  
The truth is that Jeremy Corbyn could stop Brexit and save this country, along with millions of jobs and the NHS, if he wanted to 
And Greg Clark needs to be challenged directly on this.  If no assessment took place because it would stop Brexit, this country is beyond redemption.  
This is a farce. @DExEUgov and @DavidDavisMP famous Brexit economic impact assessments make no assessment of the economic impact of Brexit.  
Starmer clearly wants to undermine Brexit. Totally unacceptable. Labour MP’s from Leave constituencies really need to have a word. 
."Brexit is a project which accepts an economic cost to achieve a political goal.But the price keeps climbing & the political advantages look ever more ephemeral."by @CliffTaylorIT 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 6: as Brexit continues, facts are starting to come to light which no-one could have known at the time of the referendum. Please RT:  
Met wat peper en zout #referendum #D66 #Ollongren #kanibalisme 
Theresa Villier has been very quiet of late. Then NI sec of state campaigned on doorsteps w/DUP for #brexit  
This is a great read on Brexit and trade from an Irish perspective. Warning: it contains facts.  
The DUP took Theresa May's bribe but have now bailed on agreements. Now in the hard brexit camp, we have DUP, UKIP, Gove, Boris & Ian Duncan Smith. If you voted Leave, do you feel part of this gang? #r4today 
The Times: Another Fine Mess. #brexit  
Looks like today (just like yesterday) BBC Scotland and radio will be going full Tory propaganda to cover the tracks of the Brexit disaster their party has createdJust pure unmitigated dribble 
Until this week I’ve argued it’d be useless for the Tories to replace May, as she’s middle of the road for them on Brexit.This week has led me to reconsider. Her approach to the Irish issue was so *personally* inept it’d be better to replace her.But who would be better? 
'You won't discuss the positives!' Tory MP slams BBC Newsnight over 'negative' Brexit view  
Funny that this alleged attempt to assassinate Prime Minister Theresa May is only reported the day after she ran away from facing Parliament about the latest Brexit shambles. 
Watch @CommonsEUexit question @DavidDavisMP live from 9.15 on #Brexit sectoral impact assessments  
."The proportion of Leave voters who think the UK will get a good Brexit deal has fallen from 51% to 28%.". 
Most Brits still want Brexit but expect it all to end badly, poll suggests  
Must read - the reality of how UK now seen in Brussels.  “We can't go on like this': mood of resignation in EU as Brexit talks stutter | Politics | The Guardian  
This administration is now sabotaging BREXIT, no longer can we simply put it down to incompetence.Our antecedents will wonder just how thick all the actors were in this debacle.The Europhile civil service & public service broadcasters are determined to keep us in.  
Yup. Brexit is totally idiotic. My position remains the same, best for UK to remain full member if EU but if regrettably we do leave, best 2nd best option is membership of Single Market and Customs Union.  
Merry Christmas everyone #Brexit #nexit 
‘David Davis confirmed some UK economy sectors may have to align with the EU’ - this means we remain embedded. It’s a fake Brexit being sold to us. I reject it. 
From German political commentator P. Kapern...."Brexit is the biggest political nonsense since the Roman emperor Caligula made his favourite horse a senator"And they say the Germans lack a sense of humour! I guess the comic opera of #Brexshit inspires lampooning analogies#FBPE 
Isn’t BREXIT going... 
The more catastrophic #brexit becomes the more the British parties in Scotland ramp up their attacks on the snp. Interesting is it not? Snp have consistently supported mmbship of single market/custom union to save jobs in whole uk but somehow it's all their fault. 
Sir @Keir_Starmer sounding oh so reasonable on @BBCr4today. But also all over the place. In his 13th policy change on Brexit he’s now adopted the ‘have cake and eat it’ approach. 
Update. Labour’s position on Brexit is that it doesn’t really have a position on Brexit, but Keir Starmer quite likes Norway. 
am told that Owen Smith, shadow Northern Ireland secretary, argued during yesterday's shadow cabinet in favour of Labour shifting towards a softer Brexit position  
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer says he wouldn't rule out staying in the single market and customs union after Brexit #r4today 
Pursuing #Brexit is like backing your kid‘s tantrum wish to chuck in school. Weak. Pathetic.#StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
Guess IDS assumes all politicians play selfish games on Europe for internal party political reasons, since that is how his own hard-right faction has driven Britain into this Brexit stupidity  
Eight months and seven days since the Article 50 letter, May has not agreed a Brexit strategy with her full cabinet, and appears to have taken the Irish question seriously only in the last fortnight.#r4today 
Goes to bed anxiously awaiting results. Wakes up. Checks Twitter.BrexitUS electionAshes 
Keir Starmer says without deliberate  irony that the Tories have a "contorted position" on Brexit. #today 
"Irish border trade - in perspective" - We shed some light on the latest figures.  Your #Brexit Facts4EU are here  @duponline 
The higher reasoning capacity of those opposed to Brexit  
Pressure grows on May as DUP reveals Brexit 'shock'   
Shadow Cabinet Brexit Positions in Full Corbyn whipped his MPs to vote against single market and customs union membership – he even sacked rebels on this – now Labour’s Brexit Secretary says it is party policy..Lab & Con in chaos over #Brexit. 
Financial Times: "the latest derailment will deepen suspicions that the UK has misjudged the Brexit process."Well,  bless my soul! 
"They can be the party for overturning the referendum altogether. They can be the party for staying in the single market and the customs union for good. Or they can let the government have its way. There are no other options."  
Did Carlsberg do a hypocrisy brew for the DUP:Foreign British killed MILLIONS of Irish.1800 Ireland dragged into UK with no mandate from Irish?1912 Home Rule usurped?1918 Ireland's exit UK vote ignored?1921 partitioned at gunpoint?2016 56% of NI colony voted Remain #Brexit  
This government is failing to deliver because Brexit is a fallacy, it’s impossible to deliver it. So, the question is: is there still a mandate (if there ever was one) or should we #StopBrexit? 
As EU 27 Nations stand together, this Tory Govt are a mob of batshit BasketCase ‘Brexit No-dealer goons and clowns’ that can’t even get its own cabinet united let alone its crazed backbenchers and DUP partners of hate pic.twitter.com/7jZerTuQJ1 
Bombardier rejects Brexit deal that would effectively redraw U.K.-Ireland border in the Irish Sea  
THE FINAL #BREXIT SOLUTIONGiven the numbers of #brexit fans on twitterWhose profiles also feature the #MAGA &/or #trump hashtagsSurely it would be cheaper just getting them one way tickets to the USWhere stupidity is welcomed with open armsEven when electing a president 
BrexitFoxdale Opts For Post Brexit 'Hard Border' With St Johns#iom 
Ed Miliband Tweets the Government couldn't organise 'a p*** up in a brewery' as MPs slam Brexit 'shambles'  
Britain's handling of the Irish border question illustrates the painful choices imposed by Brexit  
Great explanatory thread explaining the wicked web that's been woven by the deceivers.....little wonder Farage worships Bannon.... 
Ruth Davidson and Scottish Tory MPs tell Theresa May any Irish Brexit deal must apply across UK #Premium 
Wow, beautiful thread showcasing the many contradictions @RuthDavidsonMSP has spouted about #Brexit.#Whicheverwaythewindblows.She hasn’t got a scooby.  #SNP@BBCScotlandNews 
Ireland might consider adding to Brexit border text - Irish Times  
Bannon pushes Alabama Senate race as referendum on Trump  pic.twitter.com/toyoJwxW55 
Gujarat polls not a referendum on implementation of GST: Trinamool Congress Trinamool conceding defeat already as Derek says Gujarat will vote for Asmita.  
To my mind the #Rand is implying a high confidence in a #Ramaphosa victory at the upcoming ANC elective conference. That seems fair & the most likely outcome. But as with BREXIT & Trump, actual results can surprise/shock. Hope that’s not the case here  
My mum voted Leave in the EU referendum, primarily because she was desperate for a pay raise.She's horrified by what it actually enabled and now always has a story about trying to inform colleagues who want to blame anyone but Britain for what's happening.Good for her  
Lets find out exactly what Brexit money is for. Please sign & RT -  Petition: Publish a breakdown of any Brexit money agreed after negotiations are complete 
Gary Foley: Harold Holt's death and why the 1967 referendum failed Indigenous people | #IndigenousX  via @IndigenousX 
The Tories have run out of ideas for Brexit - so Labour's Keir Starmer is showing the way  via @MidWalesMike 
Tories show further contempt over Brexit impact assessments with pathetic 'reading room' offer  via @MidWalesMike 
Tory Brexiteer @BorisJohnson leads Cabinet rebellion against FEARS Treacherous Remainer @theresa_may wants a 'soft Brexit’  
Brexit Explained  
I feel bad for Doug Jones, who in another time & place could run a strong state race on his considerable merits but is now locked in an absurd national referendum on whether Donald Trump should be President. 
Most Brits still want Brexit... but expect it all to end badly  
For anyone asking how this student referendum would benefit EVERY student- here is your answer from AD @wrenbaker. This very small increase will help SO many students so don’t forget to go vote before 5 p.m tomorrow! #GMG #MeanGreenNation #VoteYes 
Hear what Vice President and Director of Athletics @wrenbaker had to say about the @UNTSGA student referendum vote! Don't forget to vote, polls close tomorrow at 5 pm! @MeanGreenSports @NorthTexasTV @ntTV_News 
What if we told you New South Wales has bigger coal mining expansion plans than Adani? Vote online now in our People’s Referendum on the future of NSW and RSVP for the massive statewide rally.  
Bannon: "This is a referendum. Are we going to take this country back? Are we going to restore it to its former greatness? Are we going to let a bunch of elites who have pillaged this country win?"  
The Titanic Ship is the complete metaphor in our time of the Tory Government and the Brexit scam, the only people that are going to end up dead or in peril are the ones on the lower deck 
Bannon makes it Official: this is a referendum on Trump. 
Im glad leaving the EU is turning out to be so easy, just like the Brexit negotiating team predicted. Just imagine if it had turned out to be difficult, like everybody else thought. :-/ 
Analysis: This is why Irish politicians are frustrated with the U.K.’s Brexit negotiations  
Britons increasingly pessimistic about Brexit, poll finds  
Once more for the cheap seats: the Brexit referendum was non-binding.There's no legal reason Parliament can't call the whole thing off.And there's every sane reason to do just that. 
After May's snap election backfired and her party lost seats, to maintain a government she had to ally with backward fundamentalists know-nothing to keep power.That's now backfiring. They just torpedoed part of the Brexit negotiations.Whocouldaknown?  
Brexit Explained  
"I voted "no" in the Scottish independence referendum and am bitterly regretting it. Our Government is being hel..."  
The DUP were invited to several "All Ireland" meetings to deal with #Brexit over the last year and have declined every opportunity. To pretend they've somehow been left out is ridiculous. #tonighttv3 
15. Two things remain unclear to date: why was Cambridge Analytica repeatedly offering help to Julian Assange over Russian hacked emails? And how deep do those Russian connections go with #Brexit? 
The @UKLabour party has been taken over by a far left which not only fails to oppose #Brexit but supports it.Support the @LibDems who are calling for an #ExitFromBrexit A progressive radical party. 
During the referendum campaign was the minister, Theresa Villiers, merely ignorant, negligent, cavalier, or did she lie about the effect of brexit on the NI border?  
1. The effect of Mercer funding - of both Young Americas Foundation and Young Britons foundation - shows the three pronged strategy of Steve Bannon's influence on both #Brexit and #Trump 
IDS and Redwood are intent on a hard Brexit at any cost, however damaging.Meanwhile, 52% of the public now want to Remain, according to the latest polls.Critical we have an option to #ExitFromBrexit. 
London says EU rule capping bankers' bonuses should be scrapped after Brexit. Merry Brexit Christmas to all our bankers! Austerity for the rest of us. If not #ScotRef then what? 
Congratulations @DavidDavisMP and @theresa_may on coming runner up in the #TurnerPrize with your piece 'Brexit Dog's Dinner'.As the @guardian arts correspondent put it: "It vomits all over Emin's Unmade Bed and Hirst's formaldehyde nonsense and forces the audience to retch" 
EU has been trying to "bounce" Theresa May into a #Brexit deal that suits Brussels and not the UK, says DUP's Sammy Wilson  
Now Tim, remember when you enabled the Tories to pursue the hard right anti-social agenda between 2010 and 2015, that made Brexit and all this madness possible? 
Media Watch: BBC Scotland headline Ruth Davidson on brexit as opposed to the news that First Minister of Scotland @nicolasturgeon was trying to seek an arrangement for Scotland as part of uk agreement for a softer brexit.  
Yes. Churchill called for a united Europe and Thatcher took us into the Single Market. May wants to take us out.  #stopbrexit #brexitshambles #brexit @nickreeves9876 @mrjamesob @dontbrexitfixit @Scientists4EU @mikegalsworthy @GuitarMoog @spaceangel1964 @EK_EuropeanMove @euromove 
Re-read your own tweet. Go on. You've become an apologist for a Tory hard Brexit haven't you. Well done comrade! 
For the Tory Right a bad #Brexit is the least damaging kind of Brexit. They want a brutal, devastating #Brexit which will profit disaster capitalists & force Britain to slash regulations and taxes on business and the rich in order to attract investment.#StopBrexit #FBPE /2 
Lawyers of major Leave donors will be busy at the moment trying to understand if 'regulatory alignment' means compliance with EU Anti Tax Avoidance Directive from January 2019 even post Brexit. They might have wasted millions in Brexit campaign at no avail.  
Parliament votes for How To Stop Brexit by @nick_clegg as book of the year.Clearly, many MPs and Lords want to #StopBrexit. Show your MP your support for remaining in the EU. #FBPE.   
The prospect of a government in Ireland—a long-time British colony—stymying Brexit has inflamed sections of U.K. politics and media.  
Calling it ‘soft Brexit’ or ‘hard Brexit’ was always wide of the mark, there’s pointless Brexit (immediate reduced sovereignty, Norway option), moronic Brexit (immediate economic collapse, followed by massive reduction in sovereignty) or monkey with a machine gun Brexit (no deal) 
The Tory Brexiters are opposed to freedom of movement & a role for the ECJ during a transition because they know the EU won't agree - the result being a brutal cliff edge #Brexit forcing a desperate Britain to adopt ultra-free market economics in order to survive.#StopBrexit /1 
Excellent @rafaelbehr column on the Brexit mutineers who dare not mutiny  
No Tom. We the UK - are in this Brexit mess - because we the UK - voted for it. And it would be irresponsible of any UK Party leader to be seen to ignore the result of a democratic referendum. That is what you did and why you lost Lib Dem votes and got replaced by a proper Tory.  
‘Enemies of the People’.       ‘Crush the Brexit Saboteurs’.          Left hand.... Meet right hand  
The past couple of days of the Brexit cluster fuck really puts into perspective the utter inane arguments Yes folk have been flinging their handbags at each other about 
What the country needs now is a politician with the charisma and the balls to stand up and say: “Enough. #Brexit must be stopped now. We are stronger, safer and better off remaining in the EU.” We will support you. #FBPE @Labour4EU @NoBrexitTories 
The letter comes out, the head goes down! Arlene & the DUP know #brexit is disastrous for the North but they continue to jeopardise everyone's lively hood & future for the sake of their own cultural supremacy!! #ViewFromStormont #Brexit  
So great to have people like @JolyonMaugham scrutinising the Government over their #Brexit “plans”. He’s trying to provide a much needed big shiny light  
With so many MPs under a cloud re #citizenship CALL A FULL NATIONAL ELECTION and include a referendum updating provisions under s44.Stop wasting taxpayers funds on silly games and by-elections #auspol #sickofthis 
Now, Jeremy, remember when you voted with the Tories for hard Brexit with no conditions over Ireland, workers protections, single market or anything? Yep, that's why we're in this mess.  
Just two days before last year’s #EUReferendum, @Theresa_May insisted there’d have to be border controls with #Ireland if UK voted for #Brexit. 'Enough is enough,’ writes @Jon_Danzig. 'She has to go.' Read and share his report:  
BBC busy digging out as many Brexiteers as they can find tonight. IDS given pride of place. The licence fee is supporting the Brexit machine and of course offshore.#FBPE 
Facebook's New London Offices & Engineering Hub (video) #Brexit Luring Tech Talent to the UK  #London #Facebook #technology #startup #VentureCapital #hightech #investor #investing 
Dear AlastairCorbyn and Starmer will be vital to any serious attempt to stop Brexit. Let them decide their timing.Please rein in your Corbynphobia and use all your commendable efforts to move public opinion - *that* is what matters now.Tom  
Murdoch is gunning for Hammond and Green, because he wants a hard Brexit. Bojo, Gove, Fox all have much worse scandals. Suppressed for political gain  
Equal partners?Respect?Broken vow!Rise of EVEL.Brexit & now the clear power grab planned by breaking the devolution settlement. How anyone in SCO can even consider backing a so called union like this is beyond me.& a Tory viceroy in charge who cares not one jot. #VoteYes #ScotRef 
What's the point in having Labour MPs on a discussion about Brexit when they have no idea what their position is? 
Bang on the money by Brendan O'Neill at @spikedonline.Even destroying the UK itself: there's nothing the anti-democratic technocratic elite won't do to kill Brexit, the democratic nation-state, & equality under the law, just to preserve their own power. 
Brexit: Luring Tech Talent to the UK vs EU (video)  
In any enterprise doomed to failure, history shows there comes a moment technically called "the tipping point", when the whole damn thing goes tits up.Some scholars call this phenomenon "Brexit". 
What is the economic impact of Brexit? Don’t ask the government, apparently it hasn’t assessed that trivial question. #impactassessments 
Best line @BBCSpotlightNI  was from @JohnODowdSF   '...there are those in the Dup who are actually seeking a hard brexit...a hard border..to make them more secure within their own unionism' .. nail on the head! 
EU blasts Britain will be ‘PROTECTORATE’ of Brussels under May's Brexit alignment plan, Now GOT to Leave, No Deal!  
Highly interesting timeline account about the EU referendum call and the EU tax-evasión directive.   
Actually that’s not true @SDLPlive proposed Special Status. During an SDLP debate on securing EU Special Status Sinn Féin Brexit spokesperson John O'Dowd said '56% of the people didn't vote for Special Status they voted to remain in the European Union' SF u-turn came the next day  
The EU elite's despicable attempt to exploit the Irish border issue shows they will try almost anything to undermine Brexit  
Rees-Mogg would turn Britain into a Brexit wasteland where we eat whatever chlorinated crap the US tells us to☟Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says   
Forget DUP revisionism - this is the last agreed letter re: Brexit from the last Executive.  
Dear Santa, If you're handing out any big ticket items this yr, no #Brexit would top my wish list @TheSavoyLondon 
“It’s very important viewers realise that the talks are going quite well" - @KwasiKwarteng on Brexit #newsnight 
So many MPs think Brexit is a terrible idea that will destroy jobs and public services.Help show them the support that gives them the courage to stand up to the Brexiters. Let your MP know you want to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Maybe the 96% drop in applications from the rest of Europe to be a nurse here due to Brexit are a contributing factor, you self-defeating racist tosspots?  
There is a collective sense of delusion that infects #TheresaMay's government that usually only happens to governments at the final stages of a losing war where they revert to fantasy and bravado in an effort to deny that the jig is up to themselves and the people. #brexit. 
This is correctThe most egregious examples of absurd and highly destructive BBC “balance” are Brexit and climate changeTruth is BBC shamefully allows itself to be bullied by the right wing press  
Parliament votes for How to Stop Brexit as book of the year  
At this moment of Tory confusion,  we stand united and send a single clear message on Brexit:  
You know the sort of team in shiny tracksuits on The Crystal Maze who start all "WE GONNA SMASH THIS RICHARD MATE" and finish with one crystal, three team members locked in the Aztec Zone and a negative score having randomly collected more silver than gold?Well. That's #Brexit.  
Ladybird book of BREXITEERING #brexit  
Arron Banks, who spent a non-elite £7.5m trying to buy #Brexit would like to privatise the #NHS. Nothing of course to do with creating a huge new market for his insurance business. #BrexitTaxHaven #StopBrexit #FBPE 
AWOLShouts of ‘where is she?’ as Theresa May ducks parliament after the Brexit implosion [VIDEO] 
The fact that the DUP appear to be the voice of NI in the Brexit discussions at Westminster is definitely not their fault - it is overwhelmingly down to the fact the rest of the NI MPs don't and won't go. Well played lads. 
Iain Duncan Smith is a millionaire. Jacob Rees-Mogg is a millionaire. These "rebels" are wholly detached from ordinary people. They won't be affected by uncertainty one jot. #bbcnews #brexit 
Not going on a European away.Brexit means Brexit  
David Cameron called the EU referendum, he lost & resigned . Theresa May became leader of the Conservative party, she called a general election to get a mandate , she lost her majority. To keep her job she took £1bn from the public purse . The conservatives are now in shambles. 
LAB Brexit1) Don't interrupt your opponent when he's making a mistake2) Don't take anything off the table during a negotiation3) Work with your negotiator not against them 
i.e. Stop Brexit.  
Absolute pleasure listening to Prof @deirdreheenan in our @BBCWorldTonight discussion. Talking sense about the nonsense of Brexit 
I am not convinced the excruciating difficulty of Brexit will change public views on it. Those who voted to leave will see in that a confirmation that UK was so entangled it had lost national sovereignty... 
About to do @BBCWorldTonight on Brexit. Great thing about radio car is I can get round BBC clothing slogan rules  
Some Conservative disquiet at how Brexit Cabinet subcommittee not informed about regulatory alignment N Ireland offer last week.../1 
Oh, were we not clear? RT if you will only vote for Labour if they oppose Brexit. The 48% have been silenced for too long. @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @EmilyThornberry @HackneyAbbott @AngelaRayner @johnmcdonnellMP @tomwatson 
All Brexit scenarios lead to a zero sum game for Northern Ireland. Because of this, there's only one solution - stay in the EU. 
Brexit press declare anyone who mentions Troubles of wild scare mongering but history of NI since 1921 is violence-calm-violence-calm. Last 20 years of peace in no way inevitable 
NB: @TheSNP pushing for a #Brexit solution (that weakens their case for #IndyRef2) because it's best for the whole UK. 
Would urge British readers to look beyond Sun, Mail and Tele to political facts. Nationalists post Brexit have w/drawn support for N Ireland. (As SF success attests). London is not seen as an honest broken by almost all 
Iain Duncan Smith is a multi millionaire married to a multi millionaire heiress. He won't be affected one jot by a no deal Brexit. You will be. #bbcnews 
If Theresa #May did this without consulting with either her #Cabinet or the #DUP, surely she must go. Boris Johnson and Michael Gove lead Cabinet revolt against Theresa May over fears she is forcing a soft Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
'Britain has always had the upper hand in its relations with Ireland. It was completely unprepared for the reality that Brexit is creating: a rapid waning of British diplomatic power'  
Given that the blind pursuit of #Brexit is predicated on the 'Will of the People', according to @theresa_may & @jeremycorbyn and it is turning out to satisfy neither Leave nor Remain voters, should they now commission an independent opinion poll to see if opinion has shifted? 
Important thread on the Brexit sector analyses and freedom of information.Kudos @ShaunGDavey 
8,585 supporters & growing. We oppose the division Brexit has brought us & the austerity it brings. We oppose those who lied to us & misinformed us. We oppose to ensure our rights & our freedoms.We ask Jeremy Corbyn: Please #StopBrexit now.Please RT 
Quite. DUP walked out of Good Friday talks, were only major party in Northern Ireland to oppose the agreement and campaigned vociferously against it in the referendum.  
So the Brexit Minister has been lying; I'm shocked, shocked I tell you.  
The Great #TonyBenn knew the #EU very well! Total Power without any accountability Shame about the #Brexit betrayal of the #Traitor @jeremycorbyn! @UKLabour #LabourParty #Momentum #JeremyCorbyn #Labour #BBC #SKY #NEWS #UK #BREXIT #labourdoorstep #MP @Keir_Starmer @johnmcdonnellMP 
We have become the neighbours from hell.☟'We can't go on like this': mood of resignation in EU as Brexit talks stutter  
Tomorrow's front page ... Sturgeon says NOW is the time to stop a hard Brexit  
‘Walk away’€50 BILLION for a 'free' trade deal, then it ain't FREEIDS tells EU to BACK OFF & warns May to prepare for WTO RulesUK ready to pursue a GOOD deal for Britain that “will NOT be beneficial” to EUSo glad to be Leaving #EU#Brexit 
No, Keir.BREXIT is an embarrassment for Britain.The TORIES are an embarrassment for Britain.LABOUR is an embarrassment for Britain.Get your act together and help #StopBrexit 
And the question remains..."Brexit...WHY?" Brexit has NO ADVANTAGES whatsoever. What Britain needs now is a strong leader to take us out of this political mess. I can be contacted at..... :) 
The party of business is threatening businesses. The party of national security is weakening Britain. The party of the union is endangering the union. Not sure how the Tories survive Brexit. 
Since 2000, the #UK has given more than £100billion to #Brussels. We are  net contributors and have paid far more in than we have received in  return. We may indeed leave the #EU without a deal. #Brexit  #MoggMentum #BBC #SKY @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress 
The price of solidarity from EU on #brexit is #pesco Nothing for nothing. 
"We want to attract the brightest & best" Govt says. With #citizensrights not secured over 500 days after referendum, just keeping the best & brightest will be an achievement.  
So let me get this straight: Labour (whose position on Brexit is to say four contradictory things at the same time and hope nobody notices) are calling the Tories shambolic over Brexit. They're not wrong, but can I interest anyone in a proverb about pots and kettles?  
It’s worst, they actively sought to discredit any data as “project fear” and boasted ignorance: “people in this country have had enough of experts.”Now they have it: Brexit without experts  
One small light in the Brexit gloom : southern pundits/ politicians have apparently abandoned the lazy ‘one lot up there is as bad as the other up there’ mantra. Whodathunk? 
A change of leader doesn’t require a GE, if we don’t get rid of her the next GE is already lost. Replace her with a real leader who will force Brexit through and I predict victory at the next GE. Anything less and The Tory’s and the country is lost.  
Who gets the Final Say on Brexit?As the economic, social and political disaster unfolds, people change their minds. Bring your EU flag, National flag, yourself and your friends.Join us at Parliament Square on Monday here: …  
Theresa May's "double humiliation" - devastating by @fotoole on the Brexit debacle and the Ireland crisis: 
In the Belfast Agreement all political parties and the Republic of Ireland agreed that there would only be six cross border bodies. In the BREXIT negotiations Dublin is trying to slip in more! That would be a breach of the Belfast Agreement and is unacceptable. 
Shadow Cabinet Brexit Positions in Full  
When you May have a slight problem...  #Arlene #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg brilliantly shames Davis: UK should be THANKING the DUP for SAVING Brexit  
I see umpteen anit-brexit tweets from MPs on here everyday, which is great, but........why didn't you stand up and vote against the madness when you had the chance; and why don't you fight it with every breath, everyday. 
This @guardian piece by @PeterWestmacott - former ambassador to Ankara, Washington and Paris - sums up very clearly why Brexit is so harmful to the UK.  
"As a democrat, and one who emphasises the need to listen to party members, you are surely aware that the vast bulk of Labour members do not want Brexit to proceed."  
A furious Iain Duncan Smith tells @bbclaurak on #r4pm: "We need to tell the EU to back off or we will get on with alternative arrangements." On an hourly basis, this #Brexit shambles alternates between tragedy and farce. 
Westminster incompetents are gonna drag Scotland to #Brexit oblivion along with rUK. Scottish unionIsts need to swallow pride + consider voting Yes in #indyref2. We won't gloat or say we told you so. We'll just work together for a better future for Scotland. 
Order of the OTT: Guardian Says “We’ll All Starve” Due to Brexit  
“If the UK Government is to be seen to respect animal sentience post-Brexit, as it has promised to do, it should take action to ban the use of all caged confinement of farm animals.” - @philip_ciwf responds to misguided comments from @ChiefVetUK 
Corbyn supporters:Every time you wring your hands and say "but what can he do re #Brexit" you prove a little bit more that he's actually a bit useless at everything other than telling friendly crowds things they want to hear. 
Good question, Steven. 17.4m Brexit voters are running out of patience with the Govt’s “jump, you say? How high?” approach to negotiation.  
Kate Hoey MP - "In these negotiations, we should be saying, very clearly, it is the EU that’s stopping the continuing cooperation." #Brexit  
It is genuinely weird watching fellow Brexiteers who, less than 12 months before the EUref, favoured a soft Brexit and continued single market, now wailing and screaming at the very prospect. 
Oh the weather outside is frightful. And our position on Brexit is spiteful. But as long as Theresa won’t go. We say no, we say no, we say no  
Theresa May’s Brexit red lines were reckless. Now she has to cross them | Keir Starmer  
Parliament votes for How to Stop Brexit as book of the year  
Since alignment is the talk of the town this week, worth noting that more than twice as many IoD members want the UK to align to Single Market rules on goods/services than diverge to maximise EU market access post-Brexit (Oct 2017 survey) 
Did hard Brexit die yesterday? My take on the last 24 hours in my latest blog post, just up:  
Fancy that. Brexit economic impact assessments don’t, er, assess economic impact of Brexit. Good to see UK govt back on top of its game   
I presume absolutely nobody wants to make the "Ruth Davidson in bed with Arlene Foster over Brexit negotiation fiasco" headline? If nothing else it would at least REALLY piss off Arlene Foster, I suspect Ruth would would genuinely wretch so I won't @ her out of courtesy  
Wouldn't it make more sense to replace "Brexit" in this tweet with, yknow, "austerity"?  
I've got a way out of this Brexit problem.It's called The Costanza Solution  
This is devastating on Lab’s Brexit betrayal. A real Paxman-style “why are these lying b*stards lying to me?” moment.  
My favourite quote of yesterday goes to @PeterKapern of @DLF: Brexit is “the biggest political nonsense since Roman Emperor Caligula made his favourite horse a senator.” Given what we have as our current government, I’d rather have the horse tbh  
Irony is dead. Like a parrot. In the grave. Dead, as dead can be #brexit #brexit #brexitireland  
Tories:- call referendum because they’re shit at appeasing their own party- threatening no deal because they’re shit at negotiationsGetting pretty sick of the country doing dumb stuff because the Tories aren’t very good at their jobs. 
Iain Duncan-Smith - a fool, or a liar #brexit: “You know this Irish stuff was not at this state some months ago, now its suddenly become an issue because the Irish for political reasons internally, presidential elections, disputes between two elements of the same party” 
So what exactly was @Number10gov cunning plan to solve Brexit problem of Irish border?  
Unfortunately the Leader of the Opposition both supports Brexit on ideological grounds AND has the most to gain from a botched negotiation. Chances of him doing the right thing by the country? Precisely zero 
Ruth Davidson emerges from her hidey-holeto make accusations against a politician-Nicola Sturgeon First Minister of Scotland-who has *consistently* put Scotland’s interests firstwhile @Conservatives mangle #Brexit through incompetence 
Astonishing that IDS is totally surprised by the impact of Brexit on Ireland - perhaps he should have read the impact studies released by the EU on the subject  -  
In the #EU big changes need unanimous consent. In the #UK, we’re doing #Brexit even though #Scotland, #NorthernIreland and #Gibraltar don’t want us to. Please read and share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
If you're ever concerned with the speed of progress on your PhD, just remember: the government has been working on Brexit for 18 months and still not written the aims and objectives! @PhDForum #PhDLife #BrexitShambles 
It is so upsetting to see Tories so obsessed with #Brexit that any price is worth paying - even sacrificing the integrity of the United Kingdom. Irish concerns are real and we must not take peace for granted. It's precious!  
Theresa May could not agree on any Brexit deal yesterday and comments made by Iain Duncan Smith today prove this government is incompetent and reckless. By doing this they are damaging our economy. I think it’s fair to say the country needs another snap general election. 
IDS wants a no-deal #Brexit providing great profit opportunities for disaster capitalists followed by a desperate Britain being forced to become a brutal ultra-free market economy to survive. Right wing Tory heaven!#BrexitTaxHaven#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Shouts of ‘where is she?’ as Theresa May ducks parliament after Brexit implosion  via @thecanarysays 
."It is convenient for moderate MPs that Brexit fantasies are unravelling. But they have outsourced the defeat of delusion to Brussels.". 
It’s like some quasi religion to them. No deal Brexit is their rapture. It’s not rational. 
So basically: if May had buckled on money and EU nationals' rights right after the referendum, she would have had her hands free re Irish border. But she dithered, called an election, had to bring DUP on board and now she's lost. 
'The idea that somehow the British people were misinformed about Brexit is absolute nonsense' ~ Iain Duncan Smith  
Memo to Theresa May: Remember saying “Brexit means Brexit”? And “No Deal is better than a bad deal”? Yes. You remember.  NOW DELIVER. 
Rees-Mogg's Brexit solution to the Irish border question "We simply say (to the EU) 'there is no border, we are not patrolling it. You can do what you like'" 
We need a new series of "Yes Prime Minister" just for #Brexit. Sir Humprey would have a field day with this lot  
 Islamic Mayor #SadiqKhan ’s calls for London to remain in EU’s single market and customs union have been slammed as “foolish” by #Brexit secretary David DavisJust like "Terrorism is part and parcel of life in the City" #BordersClosed #TravelBan 
Think it's time to call a border poll within next five years folks... that'll sort this Brexit mess out....#UnityPoll 
Protest outside the “Exit from Brexit” dinner in Kensington  
Germans mock Britain over Brexit and Ireland border fiasco: ‘It’s 3-0 to the EU’   
Brexit austerity the country falling to pieces meanwhile Cameron buys another house .. a £2 million holiday home  
In case you've been away for the last 18 months:》The economy's tanking as we said it would》Foreigners are leaving as we said they would.》Tories still don't have a clue how to Brexit》Labour are still supporting Brexit, but pretending to be open to keep Remainers on board 
Heavens above Brexit is a mess.  Why oh why are we allowing this vile bunch to run our country into the ground? May couldn't win an election so why do we think she can negotiate Brexit? Madness #c4news 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "Does David Davis share my sense of gratitude to our friends in the Democratic Unionist Party?  Who have helped our Majesty’s Government stick to its own policy in these negotiations." #Brexit  
Twenty years of lies and fake news about the EU by the British Press (much of the early Telegraph lies penned by Boris Johnson, of course). Much of this passed straight into folklore, presumed true. This was the foundation for Brexit.  
Ah,Iain Duncan Smith.The man who had a £10,000 portrait at the taxpayers expense,whilst trying to convince those same taxpayers that taking £30 a week off disabled people was the right thing to do.#Brexit 
The Brexit negotiations farce shows that Britain is right to leave the EU, says @iainmartin1 
Patrick Blower on Theresa May’s Brexit woes - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Not are we the laughing stock of the world we are also going to lose our place in the world. Brexit is nothing but bad news for Britain and it's people. #StopBrexit 
How Reporting Scotland opted to headline today's Brexit developments.  
More than that, you were constantly warned, by reliable people on both sides of the border, including your predecessor-bar-one as party leader, during the sodding referendum campaign. This is just insulting to intelligence.  
Arlene Foster said her source of Irish Govt's alleged subterfuge is the UK's Brexit team. If the IG had no role (as it vehemently states), it suggests more problems in the DUP's relationship with London than with Dublin.  
The Labour Party dares to criticise the Conservatives on Brexit! How many times has Labour changed its position on Brexit now? I’ve lost count! They’re a disgrace, a Party of traitors. I hope Labour voters remember their indecisiveness. 
On Brexit “The Sad thing about the Tories they still think they are an empire, throwing their weight around like the schoolyard bully when they no longer have any power”Bernadette Devlin McAliskey  
Iain Duncan Smith to BBC: "You know this Irish stuff was not at this state some months ago." Irish politicians warned repeatedly of border problem ("Irish stuff") during Brexit referendum - you just weren't listening. 
Yeah @BBC a bit less of that boss of a chain of dreadful pubs given as long as he wants to explain why the International Monetary Fund & Institute for Fiscal Studies are completely wrong about Brexit.  
A Senior Tory just said Theresa May could be toast before Xmas after her disastrous Brexit omnishambles 
Can we get @DUPleader to negotiate Brexit please? The shambles May presides over is beyond embarrassing. 
Oh dear. Eurosceptic ex-Tory leader Iain Duncan Smith turns on Theresa May over Brexit deal: "We simply cannot pay this price because it makes any future trade arrangement not worth the paper it is written on" (@bbclaurak interview) 
Memo to any @UKLabour members at this event: @sarahwollaston fights tirelessly for NHS and Social Care as @CommonsHealth chair. She also opposes disastrous hard Tory #Brexit. Next time, go canvassing.  
Pity UK government didn’t read this, would have given them a few wee clues. SWP even translated it into English now Brexit ministry no longer employs native German speakers as not keen on those with dual nationality! #brexitshambles 
No Kenny. #Brexit is the most serious political calamity of my adult life, and will have enormous, long lasting negative ramifications. People who could play a part to stop/mitigate it but won’t for party reasons are beyond the pale 
Brexit - the result of British nationalism - now appears to have hit gridlock due to the idiocy of British nationalists. It’s so perfect in so many ways. 
Come on Caroline lead resistance to Lab betrayal of Brexit or your party may be viewed as the biggest bunch of liars in UK political history  
Just to clarify. @RuthDavidsonMSP doesn't speak for Scotland. Our ELECTED First Minister @NicolaSturgeon does and it's rather unfortunate that Nicola isn't leading the UK right now. What an utterly shambolic mess Brexit has turned out to be. Indy in 2014 would have been a breeze. 
AWOLShouts of ‘where is she?’ as Theresa May ducks parliament after the Brexit implosion [VIDEO] 
'We can't go on like this': mood of resignation in EU as Brexit talks stutter  
I think it's extremely irresponsible saying Brexit must happen even if it's wrong. 
This is what pisses me off more than anything about #Brexit - there was NO CONSENSUS on what #VoteLeave actually meant (still isn’t), these options should have been on ballot paper for clarity. UK being pushed off a cliff when the majority was actually for #Remain! #StopBrexit 
I'm glad Brexit is happening if only to reverse the Brussels ban on curved bananas. I bought one of the EU enforced 'straight bananas' recently & it was awful. It wasn't yellow at all, it was green and it didn't taste very banana-like, to be honest it tasted more like cucumber. 
For context, this is the level of security MPs and peers need to comply with to read Brexit impact papers with seemingly very little impact  
DUP simply unable to countenance the fact that they were betrayed by London not Dublin? #Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg said the DUP prevented Britain from getting a bad Brexit deal where it could have been partially stuck in the customs union and single market.  
Leak of screenshot of government strategy on Brexit.(Forgive me.)  
‘Perhaps the most scathing verdict was that of the Deutschlandfunk commentator P.Kapern, who described Brexit as”the biggest political nonsense” since the Roman emperor Caligula made his favourite horse a senator.”Anyone who needed further proof of this thesis received it today” 
Or maybe, instead of giving airtime to this, you could invite those people already severely affected by Brexit to come and speak? Or people who live along the border in Ireland?  
Iain Duncan Smith again says the Irish are playing hardball on Brexit "for political reasons internally, presidential elections". Which pretty much sums up how much he knows about Irish politics. 
Boris is keeping very quiet about Northern Ireland and Brexit. Almost like he's never actually thought about it 
MPs and peers criticise "ridiculous" tight security around Brexit impact reports, which one source calls "“two lever-arch files for 80% of the economy”.Another: "“Nothing is redacted because there is nothing to redact.” 
During the referendum, brexit was all about controlling the borders. Now its about trying to avoid border controls. Its almost as if having open borders is actually a good thing, and the ref was fought and won on hysterical nonsense. 
There is the concerning possibility that there has been a huge confidence trick over the last year by @DExEUgov about the "thorough" and "in-depth" 58 Brexit sector analyses - bigged up by  ministers who believed they would never get disclosed. 
"There's no strategy whatsoever, @theresa_may​ is kidding us on if she's pretending Ireland was ever in the forefront of her mind" says @glasgowcathcart​ as @duponline puts pressure on PM to change #Brexit deal for Northern Ireland.  
This is going from bad to worse to dire. The Brexit fiasco is poisoning relations between Dublin and unionism and sending Ireland-Britain relations back to the 1980s. Moving from depressing to dangerous.  
Isn't it funny that so many people who have slammed @sinnfeinireland for almost a year for not doing a deal with @duponline are now disgusted by ... the bigoted and reactionary @duponline?#Brexit 
Knives emerging for officials who May surrounds herself with, with private claims that David Davis has been frozen out in last few days - but he is still in charge of govt dept meant to be managing Brexit and May is responsible for whole Westminster handling 
2) this chart helps explain it but fundamentally the Leave vote had no consensus.Some wanted hard Brexit, some soft, and an unhealthy proportion believed Johnson and co when they said we'd get an "even better" dealBut very few wanted the same thing  
Isn't it time we, the public, we're told what personnal financial gains Ian Duncan Smith, Michael Gove, Boris Etc etc will get from a no deal brexit? The future of the U.K. should not be governed by politicians lining their own pockets 
What’s stopping Brexit negotiations from moving forward? Squabbling between Theresa May and her coalition of chaos. Watch & RT @Keir_Starmer’s clip from the Commons today. 
This is terrifying. Dublin deny it but either way #brexit taking Northern Ireland back into dark past more and more every day. Wish could say this wasn’t predictable. But it was  
A little video for your all to summarise the confusing @uklabour position on #BrexitPlease do share the clear as mud position of #Labour#LabourFail 
Hi all. The #FBPE Follow Back Pro Europe tag is working really well. I have picked up over 800 new followers but I have followed a lot more. Come on guys the clue is in the tag. Please follow back. Lets amplify our voice. #FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit  
THE DUP: Ireland stopped us seeing the draft Brexit border dealALSO THE DUP: Ireland leaked the text of the draft Brexit border deal 
Michael you are incorrigible!Corbyn voted Remain & has said he would do so againProfessor Curtice, no less, wrote the criticism of him over referendum was unfair - a pretext for the “coup”He appointed Starmer. They are *best* bet if Brexit is to be stopped but *timing* is all  
Yes, HMG clearly did not order the studies so they could "ignorance is bliss" their way towards their morally bankrupt Tory Brexit.This is completely unacceptable and a vote of NO CONFIDENCE is within rights to be called. 
So who did we hear from on @BBCNews during its Brexit segment at 6pm? Owen Paterson; Ian Duncan Smith; David Davis; the DUP Deputy Leader; and Keir Starmer. Real balanced, BBC… 
This Peston piece confirms the idea that Heywood and Robbins are writing the Brexit small print.  They should be sacked  
Oh look! Create a crisis, claim it's the EU being "unreasonable" and walk away into a Hard Brexit, ideal for disaster capitalists and leeching corporations. And just what @J_amesp said was being planned way back in March 2017. 
Mortgage payers please note. The nice Mr Rees Mogg and his talk of "no deal" Brexit could cost you an arm and a leg. Toxic Tory dogma can be very very painful. Maggie Thatcher did it to us in the 1980's. 16% interest.  
The UK Government have released a statement regarding the current situation of Brexit talks.  
Ever since the Brexit all our corrupt out of touch Parliament has done is try to water down and reverse Brexit. Now the majority of crooked MP’s are trying to keep the UK in the single market & customs union which directly contradicts the Brexit vote & UK democracy  
Either Davis is guilty of misleading the house or he's in contempt for not producing the actual assessments, it's one or the other. 
The Government has rejected a claim by DUP leader Arlene Foster that they prevented her party from seeing the text of the Brexit deal. The Govt has said it has no role whatsoever in the negotiations conducted by the British government 
It was also the personal opinion of head of department Greg Clark that releasing a comprehensive and unredacted assessment would stop brexit 
I had it confirmed the other night by someone in Department for Business, Energy & Industrial Strategy that the Brexit impact assessment did not exist at the time of parlaiments vote to release them 
Oh dear.If true, the government has just scraped public domain sources for their "through" and "detailed" Brexit sectoral reports.  
Memo to Keir Starmer: If we stay in the Single Market & the Customs Union, in what sense is that Brexit? 
At last - someone who gets it. As is so often the case, Corbyn's strategy on #Brexit is far smarter than his critics (left, right and centre) realise...  
Seen sectoral reports in DeXEU under strict secrecy rules. Very hard to spot anything that couldn't be published and the EU would not be aware of already. What they don't do is provide any sense of the impact of a hard or soft Brexit on each sector. Brexit's a leap in the dark. 
US economist says that for the first time since the #Brexit vote she's hearing talk of a potential Sterling Crisis in London. If that does happen the Bank of England would have to sharply increase interest rates. Let's hope it doesn't.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
There is a scene in Educating Rita that makes me think of Brexit. Where an old lady goes to Rita's hairdressing salon and shows her a picture of Princess Diana and tells her to make her look just like her. Mrs May is in the position of Rita. Sometimes it's just not possible. 
Is Theresa May to blame for “embarrassing Brexit talks”? - Labour attacks 'embarrassing' Brexit talks RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Jeremy Corbyn's Labour must use its power to stop Brexit – now  
2/2 Labour has responded by calling for membership of the Single Market and customs union to be on the table in negotiations. By keeping their options open, Labour can take more steps towards halting Brexit as contradictions become clearer.  
Juncker has suggested a further Brexit meeting with PM which was expected tomorrow now “maybe tomorrow, maybe the day after tomorrow, not on Friday and Saturday because I’m out of town, maybe on Sunday”.Tomorrow trip to Brussels looking doubtful. 
Brexit will fail. At worst we'll remain in the Single Market and Customs Union. At best people will (and are) change their minds & we'll remain. Every poll puts remain in front. So keep pushing, the house built on sand is falling over. X. Bye Mrs may, your days are numbered #FBPE 
After months of claiming the UK could have it's cake and eat it, a sudden flash of reality illuminated the contradictions in the govt's position on Brexit yesterday, necessitating a swift withdrawal by the PM. A brief moment of clarity, followed by a retreat into ambiguity. 1/2 
#Brexit: Where we are at right now:The UK government squandered £1 billion of taxpayers money to put Arlene Foster in charge of our Brexit negotiations. 
"But what about Northern Ireland?" We said "Brexit could undo all the good that has been achieved there...." - Project Fear they said... Project Fear 
Jacob Rees-Mogg brilliantly shames Davis: UK should be THANKING the DUP for SAVING Brexit  
Brexit anecdoteBarnier “We will all stick together as 27 Nations and maintain our position and just watch these idiots implode”Tory Brexit Minister “I will resign if my colleague is not allowed to masturbate at work”Barnier “Jesus” 
"No such thing as soft brexit, vote was in or out, we voted out.  Nothing else is acceptable...." — @@ davidwilde  
The wait is over! The #BCIA #TakeOffinStyle! #contest has officially begun! How will you make over our boarding gates for  ? We’re looking forward to seeing your designs! Get started at:  
We could probably recoup all of the money that's been spaffed on Brexit so far by selling tickets to see Geoff Capes kicking Nigel Farage up the hoop until it's a bloody pulp then hoying the amphibious blackshirt off Beachy Head in a burning wheelie bin. 
Labour’s Keir Starmer said “the DUP tail is wagging the Tory dog" on Brexit. Nice one, Struggling Starmer, the EU tail has been wagging the Labour dog for YEARS! 
I can’t help thinking that the UK is undergoing a downfall caused exclusively by greed?Everything has been sucked out, exploited, sold off, syphoned off-shore, trickled up.Is Brexit the final straw where the ones at the top rake over the bones for the last good bits? pic.twitter.com/Gym3jzrui2 
The fundamentals of Brexit were baked in long before the campaign. No "genius" or "lie" swung the vote for Leave. It was a very long time coming/rooted strongly in desire to reclaim sovereignty + radically overhaul immigration policy  
In the Brexit debate, and around the Irish border question, it's honestly impressive how keen some British pols are to make statements that translate as "I know literally nothing and I don't care to learn" 
.@ElishaMcC_SF writing for @Independent today. DUP & Tory Brexit cannot endanger free movement in Ireland, basic rights, livelihoods, and Good Friday Agreement. 
DUP tied themselves in knots. No hard border. No change in NI relationship with GB. No customs union. They can complain about Irish all they like, but what do they want Brexit to look like? 
Who currently has the most control over the UK government's position on Brexit negotiations? Please RT for wider sample. 
This fits perfectly into the British-Irish conflict framing the DUP hoover up votes from. Remember when we said no to peace? Remember when we said no to a tailor-made economic deal on Brexit? Vote DUP, we will defend the Union, until everything else is incinerated.  
I humbly invite any and all to watch this video and then explain why Brexit is a good use of everyone’s time.  
After years of austerity and failing public services through national policy how unjust to lay the blame on immigration and the EU. And how misconceived to hold a referendum under such false and scapegoating circumstances #brexit 
When Carwyn Jones said Brexit didn’t have to mean leaving the EU’s customs union or single market, @IainDale told him: You’re ignoring Wales’ vote to Leave  
The only person with any spine in the Brexit talks appears to be Arlene Foster, who is not in Government and has control of just 10 MPs in Westminster. 
There's an alternative to this Tory Brexit shambles that:- respects the referendum result- solves the Ireland border issue- protects the integrity of the UK- protects jobs & trade- avoids further austerityPermanent UK membership of the single market and the customs union  
BREAKING Irish Government said UK could not show text of Brexit deal to DUP before Monday, claims Arlene Foster. Theresa May complied. @skynews 
By dropping March 2019 Brexit deadline, Starmer must mean he wants to revoke Article 50. This is a huge betrayal of Lab Brexit voters. 
Despite putting forward a Brexit manifesto to voters six months ago, Lab is now campaigning to block Brexit. Breathtaking cynicism. 
Arlene Foster tells RTÉ News the DUP had requested to see text of Brexit deal for five weeks, only saw it late yesterday morning  
BREAK: @DUPleader Arlene Foster insists they were not given text in advance "despite asking for it" and adds "The Irish PM can be as unequivocal as he likes. We're equally unequivocal." #Brexit 
An overwhelming majority now supports a referendum on the final deal. Don't let Westminster ignore this any longer. Get yourselves to London or #BrusselsProtest on 11.12.17 to demand that the ppl get not just a #finalsay but a #FinalSayForAll Together we can #StopBrexit 
So to summarise, the UK either is or isn't going to have regulatory alignment with the EU after Brexit and the Brexit secretary's words on the matter either do or do not represent the government's policy. More when we get it. 
Top trolling. UK Government hasn't been ready for one single part of this process since the day of the referendum. We warned them in June 2016 that Irish issue necessitated CU/SM; they began considering we might have been right a mere 18 months later  
#APExplains national monuments, Uranium One, how Irish border talks are holding up Brexit and more here:  
'We can't go on like this': mood of resignation in EU as Brexit talks stutter  
MPs and peers coming out of the Brexit impact papers reading room today really agitated... "completely ridiculous..." "nothing new..." "patronising" 
May fights to win over the DUP to Brexit divorce dealWe have the wrong people attempting to broker a deal!Tell them we are Walking Away No Deal! See them coming running!  
Sinn Féin to hold Brexit protests across north .@johnfinucane  
Labour has contempt for the views of the British people.Talk about Brexit and they call you extreme.Talk about high taxes and they call you greedy.Talk about punishing criminals and they call you archaic.Talk about high immigration and they call you racist.  
Staying aligned to EU rules and regulations after Brexit would be unacceptable. We must take back control! 
Labour is keeping all Brexit options open - including no Brexit.  
Friends! So UNFAIR!The country is - literally - falling apart due to Cliff-Edge Brexit, yet all the Daily Heil can do is smear Our Lily for being a "hypocrite",on the totally flimsy grounds that she constantly preaches one thing while wisely doing another! Talk about Fascism!  
Please widely share & RT. @ScotTories @scotlibdems @scottishlabour @RuthDavidsonMSP @willie_rennie @LabourRichard #Referendum 2018  
Unionists being interviewed about Brexit knowing this whole farce is going to breakup the UK.  
Minister calls for UK-only airport lanes for Brits to TAKE PRIORITY over EU arrivals  via @Your Brexit 
#Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP has insisted it is "emphatically" not that the case that any part of the UK will remain in the customs union or the single market after Brexit#TeamTory #ThankEUGoodbye 
Labour’s positions on Brexit. A - Corbyn & Starmer: end FoMB - McDonnell: leave SMC - Watson: stay in SM & CUD - Starmer: stay in SM & CU E - Chapman: leave SMF - Ashworth : Leave SMG - Abbott: keep FofMH - Gardiner: leave the CU#BrexitCrisis 
A diagram summarising the current state of Brexit.  
Scottish Tory MPs... “The Scottish Conservative group met today and unanimously agreed that we fully support the comments from Ruth Davidson MSP that the terms of any Brexit deal with the EU should be UK-wide.” 
To those wondering what a Republican would have to do to lose in Alabama: he would have to be pro-choice. Our elections are really just an abortion referendum. The majority is against it and will always use that to tip the morality scales back in their favor and pardon their vote 
Theresa May's spokesman repeatedly refuses to say whether her own Brexit secretary's call for "regulatory alignment" is the government's policy.  
Just woke up over here. Nice to see Brexit is going so smoothly. Can anyone fill me in on when the  piss up starts?  
Imagine if the big red bus lie hadn't been peddled before June 2016. The UK wouldn't have May as PM. It wouldn't be heading for a cliff edge and everyone would have forgotten about the referendum by now. Pound would be strong, inflation low, economy booming and everyone happy 
The government's Brexit talks are a "car crash", a former Northern Ireland secretary has said in the House of Lords  
"Theresa May wants to keep the border open in Ireland, while at the same time taking the UK out of the EU with a so-called hard #Brexit. Those two things ultimately contradict," says @jonworth in a DW interview: 
Our friendship with New Zealanders. 2016: Immediately after our EU Referendum, the Government of New Zealand offered its top trade negotiators to the United Kingdom. pic.twitter.com/uAdPMeSpn2 
My head hurts. Labour on Brexit.  
The #Brexit effect: - Pound collapses- Investment dries up- Lowest growth in EU- DUP holds the government to ransom- £60bn Brexit bill- National debt risesAnd we've not even left the EU yet."Take back control"?Because of Brexit, Britain is heading out of control. 
Seems Michael Russell is the ONLY Brexit minister in all UK who understands the meaning of Brexit? Before BritNatz attack him, he's English. 
Our friendship with Poland. Polish PM Beata Szydło: "Poland stands ready to help its old friend Britain reach the best possible Brexit deal" pic.twitter.com/4PvzjyszlD 
The farcical Brexit negotiations of the last few days demonstrate why leaving the EU is the right choice 
If only those bloody Remoaners hadn't talked the country down and caused a situation where the DUP were able to block the Brexit negotiations... 
The Govt only has itself to blame for  mess over Irish border...but the solution is clear. My #Brexit question to David Davis today  
DUP say they want a “sensible Brexit” with “no regulatory divergence” from the rest of the UK and a “soft border” with the Republic. As I said yesterday:  
We will not allow a hard border between Ireland and Northern Ireland. We need a clear signal from London on this. #Brexit @EPPGroup 
If the aftermath of the EU Referendum has revealed anything it has exposed the incredibly low calibre of the majority of our MPs. 
The DUP's position has been clear for all to see. It seems likely that @theresa_may was trying to force a Brexit border deal past them. @duponline 
Except Nicola has been pressuring Theresa into a softer Brexit for over 350 days.  
Shadow Cabinet Brexit Positions in Full:  
Government must stand firm against the narrow interests of the DUP and English Tories on Brexit - @GerryAdamsSF  
Can't promise to stop this broken Brexit, but we CAN promise we might do so!!  If you keep donating like this! For misled leavers and remainers.  Donations hotting up following the update on our casepage. Donate and read more at  … #a50invalidity 
Anyone wondering what @Jeremy_Hunt is tweeting me about, here is the original thread. I’m currently sat in @CommonsHealth finding out about the devastating impact #brexit will have on patients - I’ll reply later.  
Labour demands single market is 'back on the table' after Brexit talks fiasco  
DUP wants ‘sensible Brexit’  
Someone, somewhere is going to have to tell them they got screwed. This is called leadership. Brexit is a libertarian hedge fund wet dream, run out of Legatum. If they want to get angry with Remainers who told the truth. Fine. They should be angry with the lying Brexit scumbags 
we should get all the people who know where the little cup that came with their iron is into a team and let them sort brexit out, those people have got their shit together 
Regulatory discretion in implementation is already part of the EU framework - the best Brexit ironically continues to be the membership we have! @Law_and_Policy @anandMenon1 @StevePeers 
Remember, if ‘Remainers’ had just got behind Brexit they could have changed the wording of the Good Friday Agreement by using the power of positive thinking. 
"Leo Varadkar is reckless, immature and inexperienced" says the 10 DUP velociraptors who's own voters don't support their #Brexit stance. They want no hard border but also the same customs deal as Britain. That's called EU membership, btw. 
Agreed, the #Brexit question goes deeper than trade access though. There are real lives affected. @The3Million EU nationals in UK, the 1.2m @BritishInEurope and 1.8m people in NI who have benefitted from living peacefully alongside each other. 
it might have been better if rather than a referendum we just sent the whole of parliament on an introduction to EU law foundation course. 
this is *such* a good article on the recent UK anti-trans media panic and the history of these ideas in feminism (also I had no idea Janice Turner supports brexit!)  
"'..a hard, soft or scrambled brexit' Ireland is no longer under Britain's yoke"  
Delighted to have our Head of Government @marianorajoy in London. Fruitful and constructive talks with Prime Minister @theresa_may on matters of common interest: #Brexit, trade, security, economic bilateral relations and international affairs.  
This clown Sadiq Khan is suggesting that London could be seperate from the rest of the UK after #brexit Typical divisive @UKLabour #LabourFail ☭  
The fate of the Irish frontier shows the compromises that Brexit entails  
NEW: Labour spokesman on what Labour's Brexit policy is, after Keir Starmer said the option of the single market should be "put back on the table for negotiation". Attempt to interpret at your leisure.  
There is another way. Tell the EU we will trade with them under WTO arrangements after March '19. Suspend negotiations on exit bill and use the next 15 months to prepare for WTO trade with the EU using the government's Brexit war chest and preparations plan. 
UK turnout at the last European elections was 35%The turnout at the Brexit Referendum where the result was effectively a complaint that the UK people didn't have a say in their relationship with Europe, was 72%.Draw your own conclusions. 
When it comes to the black-letter law - EU directives *already" provide that it is entirely a matter for a member state how to achieve the outcome.So in this way Brexit will make no difference - other than that UK not part of the making of Directives it will be aligning with. 
More cancer sufferers will die, access to basic medicines will be delayed, they’ll be more expensive & in short supply expert witnesses tell @CommonsHealth Brexit inquiry 
This man believes in Brexit and would know when to walk away from a bad deal. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg you are needed. 
Hearing about the impact on patients if we are unable to import all the medical radioisotopes we need & use (we can’t stock them because the radiation doesn’t last)- “more (cancer) patients are going to die if we don’t have sustained assured pathways” #Brexit @CommonsHealth 
Next year, the Government will publish a law establishing our post-Brexit immigration system. That's an opportunity to stop locking up migrants without telling them when they'll be released. Tell @theresa_may it's #time4atimelimit:  
37% of a rigged electorate voted for a hand-waving catch-all slogan in an advisory referendum. A vote based on systematic lies and disinformation poured out by right-wing press and politicians. Absolutely not a mandate for anything!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
UK-wide regulatory alignment with EU was not (as far as I am aware) a post-Brexit policy of the United Kingdom until today.#HowPolicyIsMade#Improvisation 
The Brexit ‘thing’ is the amicable solution reached via free trade negotiation. If you are right Ian, we will leave with no deal.  
Dail in uproar about pushing through Ireland's involvement in PESCO (aka, European Defence force) with just 2 hrs of debate on Thurs.It will treble defence spending & undermine our neutrality."Was this a quid pro quo for EU supporting Ireland Brexit stance"? asks @RBoydBarrett 
During Euro 2016, Martin Mc Guinness asked Arlene Foster if she would join him in going to a ROI and NI match, as he thought it would be a good reconciliatory gesture. Arlene said NO, as Martin said you'd swear he'd asked her to a 1916 commemoration #Brexit 
One MP of the defence select committee today said that “no-one raised concerns about the European Defence Fund on the doorstep during the referendum.”That’ll be because it wasn’t announced and agreed until five months AFTER the referendum. 
The DUP: "We don't want different rules to the rest of the UK on Brexit."The DUP: "We want different rules to the rest of the UK on abortion and same sex marriage."DUP Bigoted Double Dutch..... 
They're creepy and they're crooky, sectarian and spooky, they're all together ooky, they're the DUP.#Brexit  
A stab at unpacking the whole 'regulatory alignment' thing #A50 #Brexit (h/t @MatthewWells for his earlier tweet/metaphor)@LouiseVThompson @UKandEU 
A virtuoso performance from @Feorlean @theSNP @Scotgov Minister for Brexit who, unlike his UK Govt counterparts, actually knows what he's talking about #Brexit #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope 
No, Keir, BREXIT is a national embarrassiment. Labour would be facing exactly the same problems if they were in power.  
DUP issues "warning" to Irish government that it's "in danger of delivering the outcomes they want to avoid", following impasse in #Brexit talks on Monday  
First real sign of public opinion moving on #Brexit to favour #Referendum on terms and #ExitFromBrexit 
Scotland's Brexit Minister, @Feorlean, calls on the Scottish Tories to support the whole of the UK staying in the Single Market and Customs Union. 
A bitter irony of the 2014 independence referendum is that the UK state pension people were urged to vote No to 'protect' is in fact the most miserly state pension in the developed world. 
DUP Nigel Dodds has the audacity to "issue a warning" to the Irish government over sticking to their guns on the border issue. Can't believe Ulster is still saying No over 30 years later. Utterly disgraceful and so depressing. #Brexit 
Quick piece: why actually an agreement between government and DUP, and a slightly softer Brexit may both be on the cards:  
The DUP, whose founder, Ian Paisley, made his name as a protester - famously throwing snowballs at the Taoiseach's car - found itself battling a lone anti-Brexit protester during its MPs' press conference outside Westminster.  
Once again, Keir, it's not the handling of Brexit that's the problem, it's Brexit itself  
"Not only is he threatening jobs, rights & prosperity, but also the future territorial integrity of our country"@heidi_mp slams David Davis for his damaging, hard Brexit approach to negotiations. Please RT:  
Starmer says a lot of hopeful things re Brexit position but EVERY VOTE the leadership whips to back the idiots opposite and their hard Brexit.  Wise up.. 
Amazed there's still some people arguing that the way to deal with the divisive, self-harming politics of today is to hold another referendum. Referendums aren't the cure, they're the cause. 
Looking at Twitter, MPs are starting to get that there is real stigma starting to be attached to voting for Brexit bollocks in the House  
More worrying information about the Legatum Institute, the thinktank that is writing our post-Brexit trade policy and has friends in very high places, some of them in Moscow, it seems  
Theresa May should lead or leave. Her Brexit negotiations are shambles. Yesterday she could not get Britain a deal because of her ties with the DUP. The current government doesn’t know if it’s coming or going. Jeremy Corbyn is a waiting Prime Minister to lead Britain. 
Five reasons why the Brexit negotiations have just got more difficult  
Brexit backlash: @theSNP's Mike Russell and @Conservatives​ David Jones get into a heated clash, over whether the UK should stay in the customs union. 
If you watch one thing today, make sure it's this fiery #Brexit exchange between @DavidJonesMP and MSP @Feorlean on @VictoriaLIVE 
#Labour saying they want to stay in the Customs Union & Single Market. So uncontrolled borders, unmanaged immigration subordination to the EU Court = a total betrayal of #BREXIT & the #British people. If you want #Brexit, only #UKIP is committed to delivering it!  
Democracy includes the right to campaign to overturn any policy no matter how it was arrived at. If Leavers don't like that, I would invite them to kindly consider moving to one of the many countries where that right is not respected.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Ruth Davidson has about as much backbone as a jellyfish. Flip flopping all over the place on Brexit. Embarrassing 
No, he is referring to the fact that..."Do you genuinely believe the elite and wealthy in the UK would allow you to vote away their wealth?"Of course they wouldnt.  Brexit deadline 29th March 2019.  EU Tax Directive effective 1st April 2019See the link? 
The "Bombshell" Reason Tech Stocks Just Suffered The Biggest Rout Since Brexit, In Two Charts  
From the double plus good bot and troll brigade. #Brexit  
I am running out of emojis to express my frustration with this crap.  NO. For f**k’s sake, NO.The law of how an external border of the EU works was clear before you went for Brexit.Maybe, you know, you could have looked at it?Grrrrrrrhhhhh.  
Brexit chaos: David Davis insists it is 'emphatically' not the case that any part of the UK will remain in the customs union or the single market #premium 
In 2017 Manifesto Lab,before election,committed to ensuring #Brexit happened.Now doing everything they can to stop it.Lab betray the 17.4m electors who voted to LEAVEVoters should show their disgust at next electionVoting against them is the only message they will understand  
Nightmare for negotiators. Dream for headline writers #Brexit  
.@NigelDoddsDUP: “the DUP only received a written text late of the proposed Brexit deal late yesterday morning. The DUP immediately said it was unacceptable.”.@Conservatives are sly. They have been well and truly found out. #Brexit will ruin them. GOOD!!! 
Don’t underestimate the level of political inertia we had to overcome to win #Brexit, and the amount of anger needed to do it. If Brexit is stopped, it will multiply that anger by ten, and it will set the worst precedent imaginable. No democratic vote will ever be safe again. 
Brexiteers have been campaigning for DECADES to Leave the EU. @vote_leave and @LeaveEUOfficial spent millions of pounds....And yet none of them checked the basic facts. #Brexit is tower of piffle, pulled out of a fundament of ignorance  
“UK must stay in customs union and single market to save Good Friday Agreement, says Lord Hain”:It would save hundreds of thousands of jobs too, from the dogma of hard Brexit 
Chaos in Government over Brexit means EU nationals in UK remain in limbo.  Just asked Secretary of State when their fate would be decided but he couldn't or wouldn't answer.  That's 27,00 people in H&F, over 3 million in UK. 
Unsurprising Ruth is on the side of the DUPFollow the #DarkMoneyLots of dodgy Brexit cash floats around between the DUP and the Scottish Conservatives#FollowTheMoney 
Jeremy Corbyn must listen to his MPs who want to stay in the single market and customs union. All progressive parties need to work together to avoid a disastrous Tory Brexit - @thomasbrake 
Pound rises up when an agreement is announced, and then falls sharply on breakdown in Brexit talks pic.twitter.com/6CVp741eBO 
Brexit, Trump, horrible, yes, you know. And that is why I am optimistic, yes! As Lenin said, you know, "the worse, the better".  
Brexit means leaving the Single Market says:David CameronBoris JohnsonMichael GoveNick CleggBefore the referendum  
Brexit bodger David Davis dodges my question on the future of UK and EU citizens. It was all going to be so easy... #brexitshambles  
We went to war in Iraq based on lies or the euphemism faulty information which is the exact same thing as why Brexit occurred (see side of bus promises) and yet no one in the media wants to ask Blair what's the difference between why Iraq & why #Brexit .  
It has been 18 months since the referendum. How are Labour still only here?  
#Brexit DUP say they will not tolerate any regulatory divergence with rest of GB. So why have they on abortion and gay marriage? When it suits them they are more Irish than the Irish 
I'm reminded of this speech by @CarolineFlintMP, who said “those who aim to keep us in the single market, know full well that this is EU membership in all but name” and Labour must move on, leaving the “trench warfare” of the referendum behind, as they promised in their manifesto  
Staying in the Single Market + Customs Union would ensure no hard border while protecting our economy and the integrity of our Union. But instead the Brexit Secretary ducks the issue with vague talk of "regulatory alignment" without being able to explain what it means.  
We're actually living in a world where a Brexiteer (Jeremy Corbyn) is pushing for pretty much full Remain, and a Remainer (Theresa May) is trying to force through a pathetic form of Brexit. This is mental. 
Grown adults can act like 5 year olds in their own houses but surely not in the Houses of Parliament?#DavidDavis is responding to #UQs on #Brexit like a petulant, peeved child.#NotInMyName #StopBrexit #citizensrights 
Davis: "Any regulatory alignment we get as part of Brexit deal for Northern Ireland will apply for the whole country."Boom. Ball game. Confirms @peston's story from yesterday - May wants all of the UK, not just Norn Iron, to have the same "regulatory alignment" to Ireland/EU 
Tory Brexiteer  @Jacob_Rees_Mogg " Britain should be THANKING the  DUP Arlene Foster @DUPleader  for SAVING Brexit  
Poor defending of the government's position by the Brexit minister.[/Alan Hansen voice] 
Bit rich of FM spokesman to accuse Davidson of Brexit flip-flop. So far, Sturgeon's positions have been:1. EU membership or nothing2. Single market membership or nothing3. Game's a bogey, we're having indyref24. EFTA not EU5. Best outcome is UK in single market/customs union 
You & @UKLabour will suffer the same fate Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn . All you have is a "for the many, not the few" jingle. There is no chance of negotiating any successful deal, Brexit will wreck the country & drive many many more into poverty. You will fail, just like the Tories.  
Brexit talks are a national embarrassment for Britain, Keir Starmer says  
Question of the day, from @MattWestern_ to DD:"Can he confirm Brexit is 'the easiest thing in human history'? If it is, how is this Government incapable of making it so?" 
The fact that Katie Hopkins is singing he praises of Arlene Foster tells you all you need to know about the DUP. #Brexit 
The political impasse could be resolved by MPs virtually overnight. Sane Labour MPs could ditch their soiled nest of communism and form a unity government with the Tories so to expel the DUP and marginalise the Brexit taliban. Then safe for an EEA exit. #Brexit 
One of ironies of Brexit is the real stress it’s placing on the relationships between the constituent nations of the UK. Was supposed to be about strengthening the nation state- it might only be short term- but right now it seems to be getting weaker and more fractious by the day 
Jacob Rees-Mogg calls for "maintaining the United Kingdom" and regulatory divergence to be a "indelible red lines" for BrexitDavid Davis responds saying "The red line for me is delivering the best Brexit for Britain"  
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg expresses his gratitude to the @DUPonline for "helping" the government stick to its own policy on #Brexit & reminds @DavidDavisMP that maintaining the #UnitedKingdom is an "indelible red line".  #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives #UK 
RTE's Brussels correspondent who got leak of Brexit deal text scotches accusations that his leak was "Irish government propaganda" and scuppered deal. His report of draft text, and revised text, did not come from Irish government, @tconnellyRTE has just said 1/2 
One for the silliest questions I still hear at Brexit meetings is about "talking our country down". To point to the economic disaster and loss of influence in the UK is not, as these ninnies believe, unpatriotic. 
Keir Starmer on Tory Brexit negotiations: "What an Embarrassment!""The last 24 hours have given a new meaning to the phrase 'coalition of chaos'"@Keir_Starmer 
Pleased to hear @Keir_Starmer say in the @HouseofCommons just now that @UKLabour believes permanent Single Market and Customs Union membership should be on the table in the #Brexit negotiations. We also rightly object to 29 March 2019 being the fixed exit date @laboursinglemkt 
John Barron MP: “The only way of respecting the referendum result is by leaving the customs union & single market”  
The elephant in the room that David Davis refuses to acknowledge is that the Govnt lost its mandate for hard Brexit outside the SM and CU on June 8th. That’s why Arlene Foster and the DUP have a veto and why the deal fell apart yesterday. 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg expresses his gratitude to the @DUPonline for "helping" the government stick to its own policy on Brexit and reminds David Davis that maintaining the United Kingdom is an "indelible red line".  
Is there any outcome in the Brexit process that could be better than the UK staying in the EU? Irish Ambassador: 'No.' #IFGBrexit 
Any Brexit deal that weakens the UK will provoke a backlash, says David Trimble in the @spectator 
In the Chamber for the Brexit Secretary’s explanation of the chaos around the UK’s negotiating position. He waffled on about an FTA solving the Irish border problem. Embarrassing, lacklustre, incompetent and incoherent. 
Irish ambassador at IFG says EU itself is a peace project. Quite right, alas never said enough in referendum. Says EU sees itself as mentor to Irish peace process and Good Friday Agreement. @ifgevents 
Labour should be careful what it wishes for. Taking over the reigns of #Brexit could be calamitous in the long run. Let Tories self-destruct in the dreadful mess they created 
Chris Bryant says the government's approach to Brexit is "based on the DUP and trying to keep the Conservative party together".David Davis says it's actually based on "17.5 million votes that were cast to leave the European Union"  
I am sure many who voted for Brexit have never voted Tory in their lives and never would. Clearly they voted to give Cameron and the Tories a "good kicking". Cameron has gone but May and the Tories remain, now firmly under the control of the DUP. Was that would you voted for? 
Wow!! Lots of commentators journalists going on about labour this morning then @Keir_Starmer brutal attack on Tories and calls for SM and CU to be back on the table and end deadline for Brexit.. said commentators **silence** why?  pic.twitter.com/evi9Sq2RVf 
Govt gross incompetence is turning the #Brexit negotiations into a national humiliation. To solve the Irish border issue, the UK has to stay in the Single Market and Customs Union and the people should be given a Vote on this Deal. 
Theresa May has installed the DUP Word Wizard to help avoid another day of shambolic Irish border announcements #BREXIT  
I've said it before, I'll say it again. David Davis is the Martin McGuinness of the Brexit movement. The only one who can persuade his more hardline troops to disarm + accept some compromise to secure their strategic goal. 
I'm grateful to the DUP for helping the government stick to its own Brexit policy says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
The #PM @theresa_may's Report Card - Brexit: F Social Mobility: F Foreign Aid: F Defense: F - Time to go and replace her with a true #Conservative & #BREXITEER! #Moggmentum #JacobReesMogg! #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #EU #UK 
Disgraceful!! Pls retweet Irish Government deliberately leaked deal ALREADY REJECTED by @theresa_may in order to destabilise the Government and derail #Brexit negotiations, according to prominent Brexiteer and Conservative backbencher Peter Bone.  
I'm eternally grateful to chlorinated chicken, because it's a such a brilliant and tangible way of explaining the mega-complicated issue of regulatory divergence in post-Brexit trade deals, I talk about chlorinated chicken every working day  
If the @UKLabour frontbench stood up now, & made unequivocally clear that they believe in Single Market & Customs Union membership, then we could save our communities from the worst effects of this #Brexit disaster. Over to you @jeremycorbyn. 
The Govt are letting MPs read their Brexit impact reports in private under supervision but are preventing the British people seeing them  
Urgent Question in the @HouseofCommons Brexit negotiations We are going to leave the Single Market & the Customs Union @EU_CommissionThe integrity of the UK comes first & no deal is better than a bad deal@DavidDavisMP @DExEUgov @LeaveMnsLeave @duponline 
More evidence that Theresa May's Brexit is softening. Real anger on Tory Brexiteer benches with this - a moment of danger for No10.  
Looking forward to 100% agreeing with whatever it is that Jeremy says about Labour's new Brexit position later. 
I feel that last tweet wasn't emphatic enough. Labour is the party of soft BrexitLabour is the party of soft BrexitLabour is the party of soft BrexitAnd if the Tories continue to play their cards wrong, Labour could stop this altogether  
A big moment. David Davis refuses Jacob Rees-Mogg's demand for regulatory divergence to be a Brexit red line. DD: "The red line for me is delivering the best Brexit for Britain". 
Make no mistake if you  believed that the Iraq war was for good you are just as delusional as those that believe Britain will be better off with #brexit  
Now is the time to move on to trade talks. Best for UK and best for EU27. #Brexit  
#Brexit Secretary David Davis says Britain won't leave "one part of the UK behind" when country exits the EU, criticising the SNP's Nicola Sturgeon and London Mayor Sadiq Khan  
Thank you to @daily_politics for having me on as guest of the day. Covered the incompetence of government’s Brexit negotiations, growing public support for @LibDems policy of referendum on the deal, and why the Ashes need to be shown on terrestrial TV #bbcdp 
And here it is. The moment many of us feared would never come. Labour calls for single market and customs union. Labour is the party of soft Brexit. For real. And the traffic is moving in one way only.  
Can someone remind the Brexit secretary that leaving the Customs Union and and the Single Market were not in the referendum question.  
Soubry 'the British people are fed up to the back teeth - if it's good enough for NI it is good enough for the rest of the country' - and claims parly majority for soft Brexit -  'let's grab it, seize it, rub out the red lines and get a deal for our nation' 
"What an embarrassment," says Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer, adding "the last 24 hours have given a new meaning to the phrase 'coalition of chaos'" over the Government's progress on Brexit negotiations  
Quite right. Time for a united opposition to this extreme #Brexit. Young people in this country are being betrayed by a generation of politicians failing to stand up for their future. Need leaderships of all opposition parties to step up at this most crucial moment.  
Shadow Brexit secretary Sir Keir Starmer calls for 29 March 2019 deadline for UK to exit Europe to be dropped  
Nicola Sturgeon is making out she's so keen on staying in the EU single market, yet she was happy to drag Scotland out of it in 2014 at the independence referendum.  
 @ScotTories are trying their hardest today to try and claim credit for a Tory Brexit climbdown. The reality is that @theSNP has had a consistent plan on how to deal with Brexit for 350 days. 
"What an embarrassment" - Shadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer criticises government over failure to reach #Brexit agreement with EU  
All the people who said Scotland couldn’t go independent are presently making an arse of Brexit whilst the Scottish Government is the only one making sense in the whole UK. 
Excellent to hear @Keir_Starmer say that Single Market and Customs Union should not be taken off table in #Brexit negotiations. Slams David Davis for shambles. @Open_Britain 
At the rate Brexit is going our next PM isn't going to need a degree in economics, they'll need one in air crash investigation. 
Martin Schulz: "I refuse to imagine a Europe where lorries and hedge funds are free to cross borders but citizens cannot".Time for Labour members and supporters to stand up and reject right-wing lies about there being an EU immigrant 'problem'.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Keir Starmer calls for Brexit deadline of 29 March 2019 to be dropped 
Theresa May’s devilishly cunning plan to create a government dependent on an uncontrollable DUP so as to destroy Brexit is at a crucial stage.Let’s not push her off course. 
.@Keir_Starmer says PM should put option of customs union and single market back on table, because "if price is break up of the united kingdom, the price is too high". #Brexit 
When Brexit turns into a disaster, remember who to blame #StopBrexit 
This sums up Brexit, and how I suspect it will go for the next 10+ years: Walk away, point fingers.  
To the tune of God Rest Ye Merry Gentlemen:Our MPs claim that Brexit simply cannot be undoneThough half of us predicted that it wouldn't be much funSo maybe let's have Boris Johnson launched into the sunAnd we've got some ideas for Michael GoveAnd a hot stoveetc 
Ruth Davidson makes her Brexit play. It's time to stand up to the blackmail demanded by hardcore Brexiteers.  
Theresa May's Report Card_____________Brexit: FSocial Mobility: FForeign Aid: FDefence: FTime to go and replace her with a true conservative! #Moggmentum 
I am one of the greatest critics of the Fine Gael government.However I dread to think what position we would be in if Fianna Fáil were taking lead on #Brexit negotiations. The only party in Ireland apart from hard-line unionists to contemplate notion of border controls!  
#Brexit. There is only one way for #TheresaMay to overcome the DUP’s objections: that is regulatory alignment between EU and UK. Or she could admit that #Blair is right, the UK needs a new referendum. @kathrynjohnston #Ireland #NoBrexit  by @Socialnews_IT 
Wow @Jo_Coburn that was very assertive >"They haven't changed their mind on Brexit have they?" to @VinceCable They are changing their minds actually JoCo but as a Brexit fan you won't reflect that will you? #BBCSP 
And there are still those who think the economy is doing just fine right now. Most of them also think Brexit will be a great success….  
The "mandate" of the Brexit referendum still stands.But the narrow gloss which May put on that mandate - red lines about borders, laws and money, and ECJ - seems now not sustainable.The UK, like the Magi, will have to leave by another way. 
Full support to @MichelBarnier in this key negotiating  moment of the Brexit agreement. The European Parliament will debate the developments next week in Strasbourg. I remain optimistic that a good agreement will be reached.  
What do we get first - a Brexit deal or a Rangers manager? 
Never has this post by @Rubberbandits been more appropriate. #Brexit #DUP 
I am not starry eyed about EU. What happened in Greece was absolutely terrible. I think - on balance - we are better in.BUT if Brexit is to be reversed it MUST be the people’s decision not an elite stitch-upEU *could* in future be progressive not neoliberal if citizens want it  
It's blackmail ( illegal ) to force result of referendum, fraudulently presented to the voters ( illegal ) to achieve the Brexit result  [illegal ] .. I'm lost as to what the problem is, in reality ..  We need to go back to square one, and have a LEGAL REFERENDUM ... simples !!!  
Who in their right mind can't see through this crazed obsession, spot the dog whistle descriptions of 'ordinary decent families' & recognise Brexit has delivered lower living standards to the poor whilst offering more opportunities to the rich to exploit those voting for Brexit!  
"This is a mess on several levels" says @vincecable on #Brexit talks with the DUP "effectively holding the government" "But they are not changing their mind on Brexit?" @Jo_Coburn "Not yet, but we have not yet seen what the outcome is" @vincecable #bbcdp 
David Jones a Tory MP, having his arse handed to him on a plate by @Feorlean over Brexit ignorance. The Tory boy looks remote from humanity.  
The chaos of last 24 hours is not incidental to #Brexit. It is integral to it. Brexit sunders national unity as well as national prosperity. 
I'd like to say that I'm surprised, but I'm really not. "The Irish Government deliberately leaked a deal already rejected by Theresa May in order to destabilise the Prime Minister’s Government and derail Brexit negotiations. "  
Mogg: DUP have saved Brexit  
Or even better @NicolaSturgeon, let's call off #Brexit altogether and be a rule-maker at the heart of EU decision making, not a rule-taker out on the margins.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Theresa May also pulled out of a Brexit deal over the EU's refusal to accept the end of ECJ jurisdiction in the UK  
As UK-EU talks fail to strike Brexit talks deal James O'Brien says we've hit a "brick wall" of reality  
Expecting Mike Russell to answer an urgent question on the latest Brexit ructions at Holyrood this afternoon. Here’s a flavour of his feelings on the matter:  
#Brexit : Humble Pie? #UK had agreed to a special situation for #Ireland  but #TheresaMay yet go down in history as the Prime Minister who negotiated The Evil Agreement. @kathrynjohnston  #NorthernIreland #BrexitReality   by @Socialnews_IT 
"What went wrong?" @Jo_Coburn asks @bbclaurak about Monday's Brussels Brexit talks which ended without a deal"Theresa May had to leave her meeting with J-C Juncker to have a private 1-on-1 phone call with Arlene Foster.... who basically said: We can't put up with this" #bbcdp 
.@vincecable - "there are a significant number of people who now want a referendum on the final Brexit deal" #bbcdp 
Sturgeon has actually been saying this for some time- the attached is from mid 2016.Labour did 'nothing' and supported the brexit bill, Davidson was fully supportive of May's brexit, and the uk media just attacked Sturgeon for the hell of it, as usual. 
I don’t buy this ‘waiting for the enemy to make a mistake’ excuse for Labour not showing any opposition on Brexit over the Irish Border.Guys, guys! The Tories have MADE the mistake! Not fielding a Labour spokesperson today is utterly scandalous. 
Brexit and Northern Ireland. 1. Approach it thinking "What could go possibly wrong"?2. Panic and realise you are stuck.3. Run away.  
If you want the view from the real opposition to #Brexit you just need to ask. Astonishing opportunity missed by the @UKLabour leadership. 
In preparation for the Brexit negotiations, the Tories have immersed themselves in Irish culture to understand the shared ground between our nations and the complexities that make the Border such a divisive issue.  
Corbyn's timeline of shameJune 2016 - Campaigns & votes for BrexitJuly 2016 - Doesn't stop brexitMarch 2017 Still does not stop brexitJune 2017 - campaigns for brexit again!Dec 2017 - rejects my plan to send Prof Brian Cox back in time via ​​hadron collider to stop brexit 
Tories & the #DUP: "We’re all going down on this sinking ship together"Everyone else: "But … but there are lifeboats *right there*"Tories & the DUP: *sets fire to the lifeboats* "NEARER, MY GOD, TO THEEEEEE" #Brexit 
Ten days to save Brexit: Theresa May will spend today desperately trying to persuade DUP and her own Cabinet to resurrect EU deal after Unionists killed plan to sacrifice Northern Ireland with one phone call  
Yesterday's events dramatically illustrate why it would be foolish to have a hard Brexit date on the face of the EU withdrawal bill 
WATCH: Tempers are fraying over #brexit & #irishborder #VictoriaLIVE 
A reminder that if Scotland had voted Yes in 2014, we'd be sitting back laughing at this horror show now (assuming Brexit even happened).  
I am looking forward to #Brexit being over so that the electorate can judge me purely on the basis of economic competence, my support for Hamas and jam-making. 
I see Brexit is going well  
The DUP: "We don't want different rules to the rest of the UK on Brexit. But we do want different rules to the rest of the UK on abortion and same sex marriage." 
Scottish Conservative leader concludes that the Belfast Brexit trilemma can be solved... by all of the UK remaining regulatorily aligned in same areas as required to avoid a hard border in Ireland  
.@UKLabour should be absolutely destroying this shambles of a government over Brexit. But can’t because those at the top won’t 
Our editorial @EveningStandard: the Brexit humiliation yesterday was a direct consequence of Mrs May’s decisions   
So what's the point of being able to read the Brexit Papers if none of the content can be discussed?    They were paid for with taxes so why can't we know what's in them? 800 pages, 6 hrs a day access, 8 spaces, 650 MPs + 800 Peers - will be post 29 Mar 2019 before they're read!  
WE NEED YOUR HELPA referendum is on the horizon in 2018 and we need your help. Just €8 a month can make a real difference. Support our #Give8Repeal8 campaign today. Together we can #repealthe8th 
Last night all 13 Scottish Conservative MPs voted to have powers over agriculture to return to the English Parliament at Westminster following BrexitThe same Parliament that has withheld monies due to Scottish Farmers  
Don't be a Brexit Monkey. If you voted leave in the referendum, know it is okay to change your mind. Fight to #StopBrexit. The MPs can't bury their heads in the sand forever.  Staying in the EU is in the best interest of the people of the UK. 
Watch @John_Mills_JML explain to Anna Soubry why those who have accepted the referendum result, do not want to stay in the single market  
Standard Labour response to Brexit difficulties:Backbenchers call to stay in the SM/CU,Ed Miliband posts “amusing” tweet,Corbyn insists on a “jobs first” Brexit despite not knowing what that means,Keir Starmer asks Urgent Question. 
Many @UKLabour MPs are taking advantage of the #Brexit chaos to push for membership of the Single Market/Customs Union. Which is fine, but the inescapable logic of that is to remain in the EU. Otherwise we are just a vassal state of the EU without influence. 
.@HeydonProwse prank call to @KTHopkins is comedy genius!  Notice Hopkins doesn't bat an eye-lid at Miss Brexit, it only accepting indigenous people & being quite happy to be  a judge on the same panel as David Duke & David Irving. RT this peeps!  
The real test of "sufficent progress" in Brexit is not the formal EU27 test.It is whether the UK government has made sufficient progress in reaching any position which unites 22 cabinet ministers, Tory backbenchers, the DUP, the tabloids, Scotland, and majority in parliament. 
How on earth can the SNP expect a seat at the Brexit negotiations when it is clear that their vile MPs will do everything possible to undermine the UK?What does this nasty piece of work find so funny?A bad deal for the UK is a bad deal for Scotland.  
Labour is granted an urgent question on Brexit at 12:30.Once again Corbyn's critics in the MSM make arses of themselves. When will they ever learn? And they have the nerve to call themselves journalists.  
Senior Tory source: “David Mundell told Cabinet this morning that there could be no Brexit deal that put the integrity of the United Kingdom at risk, to broad agreement around the room." 
In a handy metaphor for Brexit, AG2R demonstrate that there ain't nothing so bad that you can't make it worse.  
NEWS! Theresa May to convince DUP over terms of Brexit deal by insisting God wrote them  
France's @libe, leads with, "Brexit: Theresa May taken hostage at the Irish border." 15/  
Typical silence from @David_Cameron as the national calamity he created to appease a tiny minority of Tory right-wingers threatens the Good Friday agreement his predecessors worked so hard to bring about #Brexit 
[Turns on tv]Brexit caller refers to Irish government & European allies as "cockroaches crawling out of the woodwork" [turns off tv. dismantles tv. starts dismantling house] 
Tory economic competence has always been a myth. Now that incompetence is amplified as the Government can only concentrate on Brexit... #BrexitShambles 
Remaining in the Single Market is what's best for Northern Ireland, read why here:  #Brexit #BridgesNotBorders 
Theresa May is in Number 10. Tories are responsible for Brexit, and for the failing Brexit negotiationsJeremy Corbyn is not in Number 10. Labour are not responsible for Brexit, nor for the failing Brexit negotiations 
David Davis to answer UQ in Commons on breakdown on Brexit talks. Cd be lively. 
This is a DUP MP (who preciously said that the border was Dublin’s problem). Feels like NI style ‘negotiating’ being applied to #brexit. Could get v v difficult in that case  
The Mail- you’re a champagne socialist, you should be ashamed of yourself.Me- you don’t pay any tax and your beloved Brexit is coming apart at the seams. Also, thanks for the Promo   
Please read & RT. It’s time UK industry was AMBITIOUS for Brexit. Let’s promote BRITISH workers doing British jobs!  
Brexit Update  
Nicola Sturgeon made an offer to the Labour Party to work together on a softer Brexit  
There is no better alternative to this chaos than committing to staying in single market and customs union - that’s been the case since start of brexit negotiations and will be case in future too. #brexithaos 
.@fcollomp writes in Le Figaro: "Has TM's final concession to the Europeans unhooked a Brexit grenade in the UK? In the final stretch of these complex negotiations, the PM is on a razor edge." 13/ 
The time to jump offa this bus is rapidly approaching#brexit or #Scotref 
Leading Brexiteers including Iain Duncan Smith and Jacob Rees-Mogg have echoed the DUP's warning over Northern Ireland having a different Brexit deal from the rest of the UK  
At this time of great Brexit uncertainty, let us calm ourselves with the wise words of our great leaders  
Brexit: We’ve hit a ‘brick wall’ of reality says @mrjamesob  
Theresa May & her motley crew of Ministers have consistently maintained that the #Brexit process was simple & easier than it isMonday - the moment when REALITY bit !#DUP#NIBorder. 
Shadow Brexit Secretary Sir Keir Starmer will ask an urgent question in the House of Commons about progress in the Brexit negotiations at 12.30pm 
May seeks to rescue Brexit deal as Dublin says it won't back down. Theresa, darlin' you are stuffed, now for heaven's sake COME TO YOUR SENSES! The Brexit cabal in your party have made you look a bigger fool than you are! Stop Brexit NOW! 
From the referendum. the EU have kept impeccable unity - 27 very different member states, as well as European Parliament.UK cannot keep unity with own 22 cabinet ministers, let alone with backbenchers, and still less with Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales.Hence implosion. 
Most obvious solution for PM would seem to be keep UK in CU/SM. Keeps Irish & DUP happy + Scots/London etc. Labour would play along. Doesn't contradict Brexit mandate. Only losers would be UKIP/Tory headbangers. Quel dommage... Even better solution - Remain! 
Complex departure from political EU begs one very serious question. How did we become so integrated, so untwined with Brussels without a single vote, without any Election since 80’s not including EU objectives. Brexit is a result of railroading democracy and political arrogance 
She is fatally undermining #Brexit and emboldening the EU #MayMustGo 
NEWS! DUP demands same post-Brexit laws as rest of UK, apart from all the abortion and gay rights stuff  
Look it's that idiot Owen Paterson who wants pensioners to pick fruit after Brexit. #bbcnews 
Dear people who keep hoping Corbyn will do a gamechanging thing on Brexit...he wants power. He is playing both sides to get it. He is in favour of Brexit and has been for 40 years. Also unicorns don’t exist. 
At 1230 there will be a UQ from @Keir_Starmer asking @DavidDavisMP to make a statement updating the @HouseofCommons on the Brexit negotiations. Outrageous that despite @theresa_may yesterday saying that she was going to ‘consult’ that the Govt refuse to make a statement. 
DW: "Just how dangerous the Irish problem is, was clear when both the Scottish PM & the Mayor of London weighed in: Neither Scotland nor London voted for Brexit, and if there could be a special arrangement for Northern Ireland, then they wanted something similar." 9/  
How wise the British people were to DENY @theresa_may a majority back in June. Without the DUP to restrain her she would betray every aspect of Brexit. 
BREAKING: @Keir_Starmer has been granted an urgent question in @HouseofCommons about progress in the Brexit talks. 
The great @Jacob_Rees_Mogg - step forward #Sir, we need you  The #UK #Government needs a Leader who is a Real #BRITISH #Patriot who BELIEVES in #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #EU #Labour #UKIP #NEWS #DUP @duponline 
Last night Tory MPs voted down key #Brexit amendments that could have protected the devolution settlement. Find out how Westminster grabbed power from the devolved nations here: 
DW continues: "Brussels was all joy and optimism on Monday afternoon. MEPs sent off tweets assured of success...The start of this week would finally bring the hoped-for breakthrough in the Brexit negotiations, it seemed." 8/  
Labour is granted an urgent question in Commons on Brexit at 1230 
Five reasons why the Brexit negotiations have just got more difficult  
Before you all start falling over yourselves at Ruth Davidson’s intervention here’s a useful thread on the many, many contradictory positions she has held on Brexit & single market membership   
The UK Government's own Brexit paper on NI/ROI Border had ruled out this option - acknowledged significant constitutional & economically detrimental impacts for Northern Ireland..  
This is brilliant and also sad. Hatie Slopbins thinks she might be crowned 'Miss Brexit' in a forthcoming (imaginary) hard-right beauty paegent.  
Just a reminder. The DUP don’t actually have a veto. The Irish government does. #Brexit 
Just seen the headline 'Steven Moffat blames Brexit voters for not casting a female Doctor sooner' and realised there are in fact some things you cannot credibly blame on Brexit voters 
Didn't pander to the ultra-right and foist an unnecessary referendum on us, then allow demonstrably untrue propaganda to dominate the nationally suicidal debate though, did they? And handle the subsequent negotiations like a bunch of chimpanzees on acid? #LesserOfTwoEvils 
.@DeutscheWelle leads with, "Nothing again: Brexit talks without success." 7/  
Considering Sinn Fein were the first to come up with the ambitious idea of special status for Northern Ireland it's bizarre that political commentators are only talking to @FineGael Not suprising but still bizarre. #Brexit 
And Labour continues to back a #Brexit built on a mountain of right-wing hate and lies which will render it much harder to achieve Labour's goals. Pathetic and confused.#StopBrexit 
Sorry mate but this is such transparent fence-sitting. What are your terms? Where does the border go? Why is Brexit still a good idea? This is the most incompetent and reckless government in modern British history, why can't you oppose them via actual policies?  
And finally, "The truth is, the UK is breaking up in Bantustans right now.Even if an agreement on Brexit is found in the next few days: By today's events, every observer will have to realize that the UK will not only leave the EU but, above all, the world stage." 5/  
Brexit means Brexit - Britain is leaving the world stage. (And the UK of Eng/Wales/Scotland/NI may soon cease to exist at this rate)  
Updated reindeer names for 2017:ExtraInstaBrexitShippingSavage CancelLowkeyBitcoinSnowflake the Fake News Reindeer 
“Never interrupt your enemy when he is making a mistake” - NapoleonBrexit is a Tory (& UKIP) projectIt can only be stopped if public want it to be stopped and they express that in a 2nd refCorbyn right to let May hang Brexit & Tories on the sufficiency of rope @MarinaHyde 
Britain's Brexit negotiations with the EU hit a major snag on Monday  
Brexit poses huge risk to Britain's food standards, report says  
‘@Jacob_Rees_Mogg: The DUP have saved Brexit.  
Comment in @DLF, leads: "Britain's departure from the World Stage." - "Brexit is political idiocy. By today, every observer should have realised by now that the United Kingdom will not only leave the EU but, above all, leave the world stage."2/  
Some Leavers have thought that because we're open-minded & tolerant we Remainers must be fragile little snowflakes. I think they're starting to learn that an open and tolerant spirit can go very well with being strong, resolute & determined.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Brexit and the Irish border:  
Sadly they are obsessed about the BREXIT process failing. BBC'S Katya Adler positively salivates at the propect of the EU having one over on the UK Government! 
'European Press Reaction,' to #Brexit thread time. It's been a while, always good get some perspective. (Will add more during the day). /1 
Why failing to reach a deal over the Irish border could mean trouble for Brexit talks  pic.twitter.com/h4rak5Bpbi 
The Scottish MPs have the power to defeat Mrs May on the floor of Commons. It will be fascinating if/when they mobilise to press for a softer Brexit  
A polite way of describing this exchange is that it gets heated…@DavidJonesMP & Mike Russell MSP (@Feorlean) lock horns over single market and customs union #Brexit  
Open goal for Labour and Keir Starmer right now - surprised he hasn't said anything about the Tory Brexit chaos. Important that we have effective opposition during these turbulent times. 
We were about to have a Brexit which would have kept the Good Friday Agreement intact by avoiding a hard Irish border.The DUP blocked that, and you're calling that a win?Your definition of 'patriotism' fascinates me. 
Anna Soubry trying very hard to blame hard Brexit on Labour. Let's remind ourselves:1. The referendum was called by the Tories.2. Majority of Tory voters voted Leave.3. Majority of Labour voters voted Remain.4.  This Tory government is pushing hard Brexit. Own it. 
Jacob this is nothing but a betrayal from Theresa May. She is utterly incompetent and certainly far from on board with the whole Brexit idea. Announce a leadership bid ASAP. Regards, pretty much every single Brexiteer x #Moggmentum 
The Brexit negotiations must be driven by the best interests of people on these islands, not by narrow isolationist ideology.It's time the DUP acted in the interests of people on these islands, not their own self interest @ColumEastwood 
Brexit saved thanks to the DUP  
Or is Davidson - flanked by her dozen Scottish MPs - trying to bounce May into a softer Brexit? Remaining in single mkt/customs union solves Ireland border question. Also destroys her government .....  
"Support for Scottish independence surges amid Brexit chaos". People in Scotland do not believe UKGov will make a success of Brexit.  
Brexit poses huge risk to Britain's food standards, report says  
And yet there are still citizens rights issues that mean families may be split and livelihoods destroyed. Does our Gvmt accept this happening to British citizens as collateral damage of Brexit (a referendum many of us had no vote in).  
"Why is Labour not doing media on Brexit?" Gee I don't know....  
How is it that we had a referendum & these issues barely featured? Not to worry though, we did immigration thoroughly.   
Beyond laughable to hear @tconnellyRTE story yesterday in some way being blamed for busting a #Brexit border deal. It was paused, or collapsed, due to political failure. Simples 
#LBC Remoaner bore, James  the plank O’ Brien just on Brexit bashing again !!!!!!  Don’t you ever shut up about Brexit morning noon & night. The worst radio presenter on anywhere no competition hopeless.  
We’ve waited so long to see some strength and determination. Theresa May it's time to put Brexit bully Jean-Claude Juncker in his place   
Worth repeating that Labour leadership is in as much of a fantasy land as Brexiteers, except Labour seems to think that a major shock to the system in the form of hard Brexit will augur in the age of socialism rather than empire. They're mad. 
When you read that over 500 MPs are pro-remain but were forced by party whips to vote for #Brexit or lose their jobs, you have to ask yourself, what part of taking back control, sovereignty and democracy is that? 
the crossover between people who scoff at the feasibility of any kind of revolutionary action and who think corbyn can "undo brexit" somehow is vast and tiresome 
Our #Remain movement keeps growing! It's not backed by big money or the two main parties. It's formed of 10s of thousands of activists giving their time & energy. It's a huge & growing popular movement of people who care deeply about their country!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Very interesting piece here by Fintan O’Toole. This Tory Brexit is damaging Britain at home and abroad  
Yes, how about it Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn? Your idea of Brexit is no less damaging than the Tory Brexit. You cannot stand by and wait to pick up the pieces of a shattered country. Do something now.  
Yet another reason why brexit is a con, an undemocratic con:  
Why do the BBC & the FT appear to gloat whenever progress on Brexit is obstructed? Why is every bit of good news prefaced with “In spite of Brexit 
I get the feeling twitter sometimes makes us over analyse stuff.  Too many folk reading too much into every last bit of Brexit related blah blah 
Tim Martin, stop the brexit bullsh.Yes, immigration is a good thing. But let's be honest. It's the uk government who is failing to implement EU requirements for member states to control immigration.Stop the bollox and tell people to keep their willies to themselves!   
Sky sources: Despite constant contact with the Tories, the DUP was "never shown a copy of the text" presented in Brussels. #Brexit 
Tusk has cancelled trip to Israel in order to be available to get the Brexit negotiation over the line 
Remember the time the Irish republic held a referendum and the EU told them to hold it again because they didn't like the result.Independence??? Oh how we laughed 
I wonder if at some point we might see a calculation comparing the amount of money we were told Brexit would save, to the amount the time and administration to make it happen is costing. 
While I am sympathetic to this view - it would leave the UK in the 'Norway model'  - budget contributions; FoM; no own-free trade deal, rule-taker ect. But no say. Honestly, what was the point of the referendum.  
It doesn’t deliver Brexit  
Irish PM throws Theresa May under the bus, says UK PM abandoned North Ireland Brexit deal  
Sadly @jeremycorbyn continues to collude with the Brexit Right in peddling the mendacious fantasy that there can be a successful #Brexit. There are no successful Brexits. Any Brexit will be harmful for the majority of the British people. #StopBrexit 
Pound heads for biggest drop in a month after Brexit talks stall  
Know the way electoral maps show people who actually live near immigrants didn't vote Brexit? This is who voted DUP (red) and Sinn Fein (green) at last election. The DUP literally don't represent a *single* human being on the border. (Graphic from @RobertMackey). 
Spanish PM Rajoy is meeting @Theresa_May today for #Brexit talks. With the emphasis on citizens’ rights, it must be remembered that the rights of the people of British Gibraltar must not be sacrificed, traded in or diminished in any way.  is as  as the UK  
May is obsessed with the wrong Commons majority on Brexit based on Tories+DUP. She'd easily win a Lab/Tory/SNP majority for keeping us in the customs union. Which would be far better for Britain and NI. 
Theresa May fighting to save #Brexit deal after DUP backlash  
Hard Brexit: An outcome nobody wants, following a non-binding referendum nobody asked for, brought on by pressure from a party nobody voted for, enacted by an unpopular minority Government purely to keep itself in power. 
The EU Referendum was a UK-wide plebiscite where every vote, wherever it was cast, had an equal value. The votes were then counted and the result was:17,410,742 Leave16,141,241 RemainThe UK had voted to Leave the European Union by a margin of 1,269,501 votes. 
Let's just quietly admit brexit is an complete omnishambles presided over by the clueless and the terrified & call the whole damn thing off before more damage is done! #remain #bollockstobrexit 
Jeremy Corbyn's spin doctor Seumas Milne takes a call.#Brexit #r4today #BBCR4today 
Just typical of the BIASED BBC! Does ANYONE actually think the BBC is impartial over Brexit? 
Also looks like Corbyn's man in Scotland @LabourRichard has yet to utter a peep about disastrous brexit negotiations?! He should come out and join the many in fighting for Scotland's voice to be heard.Looks like he has had orders to keep schtum from down the road? 
How will the EU fill the black hole in its budget caused by Brexit?  
Former Brexit minister David Jones & Mike Russell pulling zero punches. MR: "We're being led to disaster by people like David Jones who dont have a clue. In the name of god stop this nonsense." DJ says MR was "biggest impediment" to intergov talks; "a danger to the whole process"  
I remember the first time I heard the word Brexit. That's so ugly, I thought. It's not even a word. And now we are living in ugly times, when we're concentrating on borders and walls and difference, instead of the things we have in common, the things that make us human. 
Government confirm one statement today and NOT on Brexit, so when the PM told the press conference yesterday that they “require further negotiations and consultation”, it seems the PM didn’t mean consult or update Parliament. 
PM 'could face leadership change before Christmas' over Brexit crisis says Tory  
I really hate Brexit. 
You have 13 Scottish Tory Mps in westminster. That's 3 more than the 10 DUP MPs strong arming the gov into a hard brexit. Time for Scot Tories to put their money where their mouth is & push the government into remaining in the single mkt which is in Scotlands interests 
Hopefully Pep will make his mind up on the starting XI for Sunday, then ensure not one of them plays a single minute tomorrow night. Don’t care if we lose our winning run tomorrow, or about the Ashes or Brexit or Meghan Markle or bloody anything. Just win on Sunday City. 
Sounds like David Cameron and Brexit.  
May fights to save Brexit deal after DUP vetoCouldn’t talk her way out of a paper bag! Needs a Brexiteer to hold her feet to the fire! 
From @nicolasturgeon on Saturday. Still the best answer to the Brexit problem. "To limit the harm done by Brexit, stay in the EU single market" | Nicola Sturgeon  
Labour to force Government to publish its own assessments of Universal Credit  The debate will be after the PM's statement on Brexit talks this afternoon... 
Reports suggest May could be forced out by Christmas due to her handling of the Brexit talks. 
If this is an attempt to 'soften' brexit for the whole UK it will be welcomed but Ruth doesn't say that. The main thrust of her remarks is to not allow a separate deal for Scotland, whatever the cost. Shameful 
What's the price of this 'solidarity' from the EU? Nothing for nothing. We are currently burning billions under threat from the ECB yet we still seem to believe they have our best interests at heart. Remember. "The seismic shift" Still paying for it.  #Brexit 
5. I am in no doubt that deposing the right is the only effective long term cure for Brexit. Standing in the centre, dividing your energies equally between railing at the right and the left guarantees maintenance of the status quo.The right owns the status quo. 
Like "the simplest answer to the Brexit problem is for the whole UK to stay in the single market"? That's consistently been SNP position, and still is. 
Ukip London will be outside the Carlton Jumeirah hotel tonight at 6 for the exit from Brexit dinner heckling remainers. Fancy going?  
Spot on. People don’t want an Irish border, they don’t want one in the Irish Sea and they don’t want regulatory divergence in the UK. It’s like 1+1+1. It’s not hard. Regulatory alignment with the EU is the only Brexit which works on all fronts i.e. Norway/EEA 
Brexit is a disaster for the people and economy of Ireland. Tomorrow evening at 7.30pm I will be speaking at a ‘Respect the Remain Vote: No Border in Ireland’ rally.Show your support & send your message in support of special status within the EU  
Ruth Davidson becomes the Tory voice of the softest possible Brexit. Such a deal would only be possible with all of UK within customs union and single market. All sides now using Irish situation to advance their own interests.  
I can understand the Gov not wanting to go on radio to talk as they are in the middle of negotiations but Labour should be shouting about the mess of Brexit. Unless they want it..... 
The DUP doesn't represent Northern Ireland on Brexit and the border. Watch the fascinating things people said to me in Derry and Coleraine:  (videos) 
Remember, the DUP helped the hard Brexiteers during the referendum campaign (by funnelling big cash through a loophole) - so it makes sense they'd help them now too...  
'It's desperation!’ Wetherspoons boss says Brexit deal at ANY cost is NOT worth it   
My position on the current Brexit negotiations:  
Labour failing again to hold Govt to account over Brexit shambles, no doubt because their own position is so incoherent.  
The First Minister has just called out Corbyn on Twitter. #Brexit  
“What did you do in the Brexit war, daddy?” “I let the Tories 'own' the defeat.” 
Infuriatingly some Labour leadership zealots appear as ideologically in favour of Brexit as the Tories - despite it betraying the very people they profess to protect - because they consider EU membership as a barrier to them nationalising everything up to and including breathing.  
Types of chaos in ascending order:ErrorCock-upFuck-upCalamityOmnishamblesUber-arseryCatastrofuckBrexit 
Wishful pro EU thinking. The DUP, unlike Theresa the Appeaser, are pro Brexit!  
Will people complaining about Jeremy's silence on Brexit chaos PLEASE just let him get on with his job.  
Recommended #follow @LordRickettsP - former head of the UK's @foreignoffice now providing insightful and candid steers on where government getting things wrong on Brexit. 
Public opinion now appears to be backing a second referendum on Brexit.   
Backlash over Theresa May's stalled Brexit deal mounts as Ed Miliband calls Tories a "couldn’t run a p*** up in a brewery bunch of jokers" and former head of the Foreign Office brands her failure "pretty extraordinary"  
5) It's equally important to understand there aren't just "some" sectors affected by Brexit, or "agriculture, energy *etc.*" but up to 140 areas of north-south cooperation  
Why should labour intervene ? The Tories own this mess, Cameron walked away, May called an election & blew it & she made a deal with DUP. Tories are split, hard or soft Brexit. Them them sort this mess out. 
Confused about the disagreement over the Irish border and #Brexit? Katheryn Simpson from @ManMetUni explains what the issues are 
Sorry but this is entirely the Conservatives fault. We have Keir S perfectly attacking the Tories at every brexit turn and disaster. Trying to pin any of this on Corbyn is a bit desperate. 
Good morning £. Guess you're not liking the whole #Brexit divorce talks collapse, yes?  
Theresa May could face 'leadership change before Christmas' warns Tory as backlash mounts over collapsed Brexit deal  
Where there’s a way, but not the political will: Corbyn may soon have to decide between his vote base (who are largely either remain or soft Brexit) or his own personal issues with the EU  
A thread on the latest Brexit shit show (sorry):1) Important to understand EU27 position: the request is for UK to guarantee that *absent other solutions* there will be no hard border in Northern Ireland *under all circumstances* 
Oh Theresa, what a fool you look. Did you ever stop to think this might happen? Your naivety is truly gobsmacking. But the fact that you are already stirring up 'differences' in NI over your preposterous Brexit shambles is truly unforgivable.  
Funny because if @UKLabour really did have an alternative position on Brexit this would be the open goal of all open goals.  
We'll never get anywhere with these Brexit negotiations until we start talkin' their language.#TimeToBringInCaptainBirdseye 
The key to the UK's future lies in Belfast, at least as long as #Brexit negotiations continue.There, fixed it for you.  
.@theresa_may, NOW is the time to call a General Election.Brexit is a disaster. You don’t believe in it. It’s ruined your Premiership & It’s ruining the country. The people should be asked to think again & a General Election is the only way possible. 
On Brexit Jeremy is weak. Nodding along. Whipping MPs to vote along with this horrendous 'deal'. I'm a Labour member and voter but on Brexit they are utterly terrible. 
Brexit is so important that it’s rendered me speechless. 
The situation that the UK finds itself in.Is not the fault of the EUIs not the fault of IrelandIs not the fault of remainersIt is entirely and unequivocally the fault of the Conservative Party, its leaders and the politicians that support them.#FBPE #brexit 
Anyone seeking to understand worsening Brexit chaos should read this outstanding piece by @davidallengreen where he explains UK's Brexit troubles in 7 Ds:1 Delays2 Disparities3 Divisions4 Darkness5 Dishonesty 6 Desperation7 Delusion  
Can UK roll over existing EU FTAs after Brexit? "Frankly, I don't think so," says @MalmstromEU, interviewed at #EUtrade. So what to do? "That's their problem." 
When reality hits Brexit ideologues to the left and right run and hide. This country needs pragmatic, responsible politicians  
Something inside me is saying Theresa May is looking after herself and the Conservative Party before anything or anybody else #brexit  
This is how I viewed the #brexit vote:52% = Free thinkers48% = Indoctrinated sheep 
The question of where to draw the hard border of #brexit has been answered long time ago by Salmon Rushjob from the Delhi Telegraph. Probably the most realistic solution on the table.  
Dear SDLP, FG, FF,After months of telling SF to just "sort it out " with DUP and do a deal, any suggestions for Brexit negotiations?Or maybe time to state DUP is the problem? 
Important to understand that Brexit could implode without an election or the Tories falling. Just as Tories replaced PM & carried on when poll tax imploded in 1990, so Tories wd most likely replace leader & carry on if Mrs May’s Brexit collapses in coming weeks/months 
1. Where I’ve landed on Brexit.I listened to this last night. IT’S ON THE NAIL around so many questions - not least on how you really need to *want* to take on the right. So many strands in this discussion apply equally to the most feeble elements of British political discourse  
When most industries plead for special treatment, what’s the point? Really, what’s the point? #Brexit  
Open Britain’s BreXmas Advent Calendar: day 5 - Brexit had already made the average UK household £400 p/y worse off. Pls RT:  
The government of course is buggered, but it is pretty unimpressive for the main opposition party not to put anyone up to discuss the Irish-Brexit question on national media this morning. 
This could be the moment for opposition and soft Brexit/remain Tories to force a different, less damaging approach - keep the UK in the single market and customs union. But it needs Labour to get its act together. How about it @jeremycorbyn? 
Let this sink in. Labour, the official opposition, is refusing to put the boot in. Not because of a "long game" or a "let them destroy themselves" policy, but because Corbyn wants Brexit. 
Chances of Brexit collapsing increased sharply in last 24 hours - incompetence so great, it could now simply implode. Pay close attention to Ruth Davidson & Tom Tugendhat. 
An under appreciated aspect of yesterday’s chaos - puts the union front and centre of British politics once again. As #Brexit was always going to do  
'The DUP are on the wrong side of this...this isn't a green or orange issue' - @MaryLouMcDonald on the stance taken by @duponline on leaked #Brexit border deal which they have scuppered #BKNT 
I wish you luck in your quest to achieve a successful Brexit deal Jeremy but there's more chance of you negotiating the safe return of Shergar.  
I seriously don’t understand this. Why are Labour failing to hold the Tories to account over Brexit. Actually I do - Corbyn wants Brexit, just not a Tory Brexit  
No Mandate May, even worse than David Cameron, the man that got us into the mess. It is time to show the Brexit Tories the door. We can reverse Brexit. It can be done. We can save Britain and #StopBrexit 
Labour not putting anyone up this morning on Brexit. Remember when all those people were running around claiming the party had a new, "game-changing" position on the issue. 
Telling that the Labour Party not willing to make something of the Brexit shitshow  
This is the tme to kill Brexit. But Labour won't even mention it. What a waste of space they are. 
Brexit extremists say we should now pull out of Brexit talks. Wrong. We should pull out of Brexit. 
Will people complaining about Jeremy's silence on Brexit chaos PLEASE just let him get on with his important work on Latin America.  
Another clear indication that Brexit means that Tories who always opposed devolution are using the withdrawal bill to Take Back Control from Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland  
I’m beginning to get an incy-wincy feeling that Brexit might not be a brilliant idea. Retweet if you are getting it too 
Had she not called the election, Theresa May wouldn't be facing this particular problem. But she'd still have a tiny majority and be facing other, equally difficult, problems relating to Brexit. Which is why she called the election... 
All of the obfuscations, all of the red, white & blue Brexit is Brexit has been exposed as a euphemism for not having a coherent plan. #ToryShambles #r4today 
4 Catalan leaders remain in prison for having held a referendum & protested peacefully. We will have a letterbox at the demonstration in Brussels on 7.12. to collect #freedomletters. Drop your messages of support with us & we will send them! #LlibertatPresosPolitics #omplimbru 
Very sensible of Labour to not put up anyone on Brexit today. Leave the focus on the Tories. Labour split too. The country split. 
No regime since Hitler’s has set out to damage this country and its prospects in quite the way that this Brexit Govt is now. 
“Supporting Brexit will destroy UK. Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories” - Tory MPHigh time the Tories put our country…BEFORE THEMSELVES 
But NOBODY could have predicted this sort of problem after May went into an informal coalition with a radical, racist, sexist, homophobic, bigotted group, who have always been hell-bent on a hard brexit for religious reasons.  
No, Jeremy. The reason for the failure is the impossibility of Brexit. "Each passing day" provides evidence that there's no way to make Brexit work. But you ignore that. Today was the day to bury Brexit for good. But you didn't even mention it. What a waste of space you are.  
Good morning. Brexit is still a mess. Scottish independence is still a great idea. 
Train fares increase each year by a fix amount + inflation. Brexit has caused a spike in inflation. So things are more expensive due to Brexit. DO I HAVE TO SPELL IT OUT EVERY TIME?  
The party honest about an alternative path. You keep your poll lead, they’ll keep arguing against #Brexit. Tide is turning. #popcorn 
Leave.eu are calling Arlene Foster of dup a hero and May the villain of brexit. They're clutching at straws now. Rip brexit 
Looking at #Brexit unfolding from the outside is like watching a train crash in slow motion-weak leadership, changing tactics, no strategy & self-inflicted harm for what?  
And of course, on a wider level, that the future of millions is basically down to so few MPs is the craziest Brexit BS yet ....  
“For all the DUP scaremongering about Dublin’s designs on the North through the Trojan horse of Brexit... it’s hard to avoid the conclusion that what the DUP fears is what unionists have always most feared – not Dublin’s designs, but betrayal by London” 
Who are unionists, what do they believe, and what is the DUP? You can hear what people at a loyalist pipe march think of Brexit in this episode.We made it after the UK election that led to Theresa May relying on DUP for her majority; it's relevant again. 
If Theresa May has #NoProgress on Brexit by Christmas, there should be a vote of #NoConfidence 
#ConservativeChristmas Door5: Theresa May had a Xmas tragedy when she tried to announce progress with Brexit. Bribed DUP Leader & now boss of the PM Arlene Foster shot her down... Merry Christmas All #AdventCalendar #SeasonsTweetings 
Time is running out: Treacherous @theresa_may warned she has until FRIDAY to salvage Brexit deal  
Brexit will provide British politics with a year of temporal disjuncture  
It's time for May to fall on her sword. This #Brexit disaster could mean the end of Theresa May's Government – and the beginning of Corbyn's  
"The DUP appear to be running Brexit negotiations now" a Tory MP told The New European.  
Irish Government 'leaked draft Brexit deal to REMOVE May from Downing Street'  
Nobody voted for this nation to take leave of its senses: the damage Brexit has done already has been enormous and we will all be paying for it for decades. @jeremycorbyn must now lead demands for a second referendum. 
Your morning briefing: May looks to get DUP on side over #Brexit, Macron on Trump’s Jerusalem plan, Google ‘to tackle extremist content’  
If you had a choice between spending £50 Billions on a pointless #Brexit or paying for an additional 15,000 nurses and 1,000 doctors in the NHS for 10 years, which would you choose? 
Brexit is a complete and utter mess. Remainers know it. Brexiters with buyer's remorse know it. Even the government knows it. So Jeremy Corbyn - in the national interest, can you now stand up and call for a second referendum? #FBPE #Brexit 
For years, EU supporters tried to convince us that it did not run our affairs, that we hadn't surrendered sovereignty or self-government etc.Now they tell us that, so entwined are our affairs with the EU, Brexit is neither possible nor practical, so we may as well give up. 
I see that the main #Brexit cheerleaders didn't have room for yesterday's nonsense on their front pages today.  
Did yesterday mark a turning point in May’s approach to #Brexit? Perhaps, as Steve outlines. But for the rest of this thoughtful thread to happen requires a turning point in her approach to her own party too.  
With negotiations on a knife edge, it’s time to brush up on what effect Brexit could have on UK human rights  
Normal winter weather trumps May's and the Tory Brexit humiliation.  
Spent the evening away from Brexit madness to welcome Ophelia Symons-Jones to the family. Mum excellent. @NHSHomerton staff superb. 
**BREAKING: Next #StopBrexit Campaign**Too many people still have their heads in the sand. We need to make the reality of Brexit very real, so let's make it LOCAL. Please join the campaign & also RT #FBPE #RemainersNow @StopBrexit17 @BrexitBin @MarieAnnUK @Labour4EU @IanDunt 
So, this getting our Parliament's sovereignty back, how's that going? 
Can anyone point out to me what the Tories are doing right to justify polling at 37%? I genuinely can't see a single sector where they are being successful. NHS? No. Education? No. Brexit? No. Social care? No. The economy? No. International trade? No. Pensions? No etc etc 
The housing crisis is embarrassing at a time when Ireland is touting for jobs and businesses fleeing Brexit Britain  
Can Theresa May's minority government deliver Brexit? 
Feeling sooo good right now about the swiftness & efficiency of my #Brexit of 1534. I might even feel smug. In fact I do. I feel very, very smug. This is my smug look.  
London, Wales and Scotland shout "Us Too!!!" on Single Market membership. If one part of the UK can retain 'regulatory alignment' with EU after Brexit - then others should be able to as well. #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Isn't it lovely to think that by being total wankers the DUP might be responsible for bringing about a united Ireland and reversing Brexit. Tiocfaidh Arlene! 
Totally with DUP. What sort of imperialist power does EU believe itself to be, by what right does it grant itself power to try to break up UK? Brexit was to tell EU to sod off, we want to govern ourselves. No Brexiteer will accept kowtowing to their megalomaniacal demands anymore 
Housebuilders issue Brexit plea as poll shows UK reliance on EU workers  
How the world must see #Brexit Britain. Let’s take back control and end this madness!  
Imaginary bordersImaginary trading partnersIt's almost...I mean almost...Like this whole #Brexit thing is a big load of bollocks!Fantasyland!  
The DUP (who support Brexit) say they don't want NI to be treated 'more favourably' than the rest of the UK.You see - even THEY admit that to be in the EU is 'more favourable'. 
In isolating itself from the EU Brexit Britain is doing the very worst thing it can, in denying young Brits in future generations free movement, when demand for them in Europe is growing rapidly.  
Chaos in Brexit overIrush  border will  unite & not divide. @Kevin_Maguire & me on @GMB with @piersmorgan @susannareid100 
And discussing the Brexit shambles on @GMB in a mo. What a mess 
Asia stocks declining as tech blues offset US tax cut optimism. Investors rotate to banks and other beneficiaries. Sterling off 2mth high after lack of #Brexit deal.  
Certain industries would suffer greatly from a no-deal Brexit  
Post-Brexit farming: “New Zealand is no inspiration despite its farmers surviving the removal of subsidies in 1984. Their response has been to intensify, and export milk to China.”  
Theresa May hands DUP leader a veto on Brexit trade deal. What will it take to prove we're incompetent negotiators ?  
Theresa May torpedoed her own Brexit deal - by forgetting to tell her DUP partners the details  via @MidWalesMike 
No veto for the DUP: if the Brexit vote was about democracy then we cannot accept that a minority party from Northern Ireland decides the future of these islands  
Who would have guessed that Northern Ireland would prove the most difficult issue to tackle in Brexit negotiations? And who would have guessed that by promising Northern Ireland special status, it would open a can of worms with Scotland & London wanting the same. @theresa_may 
Aha, Brexit Schmexit, finally an article explaining the serious matter of cryptokitties on the Ethereum blockchain and how they could blow up a virtual currency (HT @katebevan)  
"This is not a failure, this is the start of the very last," said European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker. #Brexit-lunch brings Britain and EU so close, yet so far on key deal  
Brextremism: N Ireland voted 56-44% to remain in Europe(UK 48-52% out) so no DUP mandate for hard Brexit 
So after all that, Ireland didn't need to veto the brexit deal. The UK vetoed its own offer 
Trump’s victory, on the margin, came from the blue collar. Republican Congress is mostly elites. The Trump / Bernie / Brexit phenomenons are more interesting. 
Jeremy, you really need to wake up & smell the coffee. There is no such thing as a good Brexit, it's a fallacy! It will harm the people you claim to represent. Stop point scoring & start *really* putting your country first! #MPStopBrexit #StopBrexit 
Latest Stumbling Block in Brexit Talks: The Irish Question via @NYTimes by @_StephenCastle 
@MinistryBrexitStrange how all the Brexiters that were moaning about Eire having a veto over any Brexit deal just a few short days ago have gone quiet about 9 MPs from a party that almost no-one can vote for actually doing it.Taking back control? 
No such thing as a Left-Wing Brexit.You're doing Farage's job for himGo fuck yourself.  
Hard brexiteer crying about the hard brexit he created.You chose for Labour to vote against us being in the single market and the customs union.You created the border issue, so quit bitching about it.  
How about a separate referendum on religious freedom. My bet is that conservatives wouldn’t be game. Prefer a sneaky approach for their right to discriminate. 
So the DUP are now dictating Brexit terms to the Prime Minister What a fuckin shit show this country is becoming 
#Ireland, the #EU is playing you like a fiddle - @spectatorA few facts worth remembering while @campaignforleo basks @donaldtusk's attention.#JonathanSugarman#BREXIT #UK 
This is why the complex history of the Irish border is playing such a crucial role in Brexit negotiations  
Brexit: Theresa May under pressure to get DUP on side  
11th Hour Upset to Brexit Deal Complicates Life for Theresa May...  
You have been in power for SEVEN YEARS and failed to use the tools available to you to manage EU immigration (as did Labour).If it was such a big issue why did you not use EU Directive 2004/38/EC?Why do you always blame the EU for your *own* failings?Brexit = FOM too!  
Nicola’s nasty independence obsession surfaces as she attempts to weaponise Brexit. @AgentP22 @2351onthelist @ukunionvoice @cultfree54 @Del_ivered @mik61scot @Maureen6Johnson @graeme_from_IT @Effiedeans 
Straw man arguments...you have failed to answer the points I raised...waste of time talking further...A50 can be revoked #Brexit reversed...the Will is changing & polls now showing a 16% gap with 50% favouring a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option..goodnight... 
New banners are up! THANK YOU again for all that voted YES on the George Mason High School Bond Referendum. @fccps @MasonMustangs #fccps 
So, this lawsuit argues, prisoners on Nebraska's death row as of August 30, 2015, had their sentences commuted. The referendum could not and did not reverse that fact. 
Now we have evidence that UK could become a tax haven after Brexit  via @MidWalesMike 
MSM discuss May's failure to reach #Brexit agreement blame DUP. My take is different. Whatever else, May is not naïve. She knew DUP position but tried to trounce them into agreement. She failed. 
I'm on @BloombergTV Daybreak tomorrow at 7.10h EST discussing the implications of tax cuts on homeowners and then @bsurveillance at 7.40h discussing Brexit, the border issue and Europe. A regular smorgasbord of topics! 
The United Kingdom needs Canada once again.  Right or wrong we need to stand beside Brittain on Brexit.  They need our support and Canada needs to punch above our weight and stand with them in their EU negotiations. I thought we were back? 
So long Mrs May, it seems the Brexit Tories have already found a replacement. Stop the Madness ands #StopBrexit 
Burney says she saw parallels to the '67 referendum in the postal survey. She points out the former required a referendum, but marriage survey did not. "It should have been straightforward, and it should have been done a long time ago." 
Of course the EU-26 are going to back Ireland. It’s in the bloc that the UK chose to leave. #Brexit #WDYM 
The Irish border issue presents a significant obstacle to Brexit . shouldn't that sentence be the other way around.  
Scotland was lied to during the referendum, you were lied to about Brexit, when will the majority of the electorate wake up. It's not about what's good for YOU, it's about what's good for them., the few.Stop listening to the spin and the mogul owned bought media. 
Remain areas could stay in the EU Single Market.Nicola Sturgeon and Sadiq Khan call for special Brexit measures for Remain areas, mirroring Northern Ireland policy.Or we could just #StopBrexit. 
Interesting how all the Brexit papers have ignored the breakdown in talks with the EU on their front pages. Anyone would think it's another no news day. #StopBrexit 
Finally leaving parliament after another long night of no answers from ministers and no progress on Brexit - total #brexithaos indeed… 
Here's how one word – 'alignment' – undid nine months of gruelling Brexit negotiations and high-profile compromises  
#Brexit is walking dead.  It's almost over folks.   
Tory MPs just voted down key #Brexit amendments that would have protected the devolution settlement and stopped the Westminster power grab. Get all the facts on the #EUWithdrawalBill. 
I believe Brexit is likely to be diluted by various tie-ins to EU27 post-Brexit and depending to the extent that these proved prejudicial, a more protracted 2nd phase extrication process would have to be undertaken subsequently. 
A final thought before I move from Brexit to my own core research. There is a state crisis threatening the internal cohesion of the UK. But this also creates opportunities for renewing its constitution and revising its social contract in a way that strengthens the country 
#EUWithdrawalBill I didn't think I could hate tories more than I did in the Thatcher era. I fucking really hate this poxy power grabbing weak arse bastard government. Roll on the next referendum. 
Every day we get bombarded with wrongs. We need 2get #ToriesOut as soon as possible.UK is in chaos & Crisis. Chaos with #Brexit ; Crises with #NHS #socialcare #education #housingPeople suffering & dying unnecessarily because Tories chose 2give Tax Breaks 2Billionaires#newsnight 
Hilarious comments from the Irish Taoiseach @campaignforleo about the DUP (on 36%) representing a minority in Northern Ireland. His own Fine Gael got less than 26% in the Republic of Ireland. Also Remain campaigning Ulster Unionist Party now support implementing #Brexit #DUP 
Fantastic long read on the complexities of life on the Irish border - @NaomiOhReally is one of the few journalists who really nails the problem of NI and #Brexit  
Brexit means Brexit**exclusions apply; and not available in: Northern Ireland, London, Grimsby, Cornwall, Scotland, other UK areas TBC 
I've become obsessed with David Davis's living Brexit nightmare.This one's from the summer and I've got him coming back next issue in @prospect_uk for a Christmas one 
It’s  getting clearer & clearer that this minority Tory Government propped up by the DUP simply cannot deliver a Brexit vision that even they can agree on! It really is time to accept that reality & call another election. 
Brexit should have been negotiated by Quantum Physicists - then the borders could exist and not exist simultaneously. Just don't forget Schrödinger's cat  
With Mrs. May? She had the potential to make Brexit great for Britain. Instead? She has humiliated us and basically told the E.U "have it all"She is even willing to SPLIT up Britain! 
.@UKLabour @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer Please be advised I cannot and will not support the Labour Party whilst it supports any form of Hard Brexit. I am not alone and we Remainers are the ones who gave you your foothold at  #GE2017. NOT Momentum. 
Sadly it seems the Daily Mail went to press too early to cover yesterday's hectic events, in which the DUP sank May's Brexit deal and reduced her government to new levels of farcicality. A pity. Still, here's some bollocks about Lily Allen. Night!  
“Theresa May gave unionists £1bn for their support - now they derail Brexit”  
Worth remembering that the decision to leave the EEA internal market and Customs Union were never presented to the public in a referendum. This was an entirely arbitrary executive decision made by May after the referendum.  
Brexit: Taking back control of the United Kingdom of, er, well most of England minus the most prosperous chunk really.  Brexit, a stupidity wrapped in a disaster wrapped in a clusterfuck. 
The Brexit hilarity never stops, does it? And if Greater Pimlico, then why not Scotland?  
What a bizarre day - but then we seem to be saying that every day given the chaos of @GovUk and #Brexit...  
Brexit agenda threatens to:Finish the term of office of the PMBring down the governmentDamage the peace in NIWeaken our global reputationCause more anxiety and uncertainty...etcAnd the benefits of Brexit were what exactly? 
DUP diplomacy. @Conservatives: You got into bed with some really belligerent pricks. And that will probably lead you to no deal. Which will probably lead to no Brexit. Boom.  
I propose Farage & Boris are employed on the border crossing if there's a 'hard border' in Ireland - Newry would be my choice #IrishBorder #Brexit 
Over 200,000 more Londoners voted for Brexit than for Sadiq Khan.1,513,232 voted Leave in London at EUref 1,310,143 voted for Sadiq Khan* *In the 2nd Round of the London mayoral election, 5 May 2016. 
When I consider why the thought of a second referendum so repels me it’s because I think about the divisive, dishonest tactics of the first. I don’t see loads of point in pushing for another unless proper rules about lying were enforced. Pointless otherwise. 
No @jeremycorbyn it provides evidence that #Brexit is a foolish & self-destructive project built on a mountain of lies which will harm the majority of British people, and will undermine all of Labour's plans. A real Labour leader would campaign for it to be stopped.#StopBrexit 
Public increasingly want final say on Brexit. Thrilled to be publishing first column by @PeterKellner1 for @InFactsOrg  
The DUP are a shower of ignorant scumbags! They couldn't care less about their citizens,their economy or the Good Friday agreement (which they opposed) Someone please put these bigots in their place! The mind boggles #brexitshambles #dup #brexit 
Ireland chaos: Brexit will either break May now or it'll break her later 
Quiet day on the old Brexit front I see, nothing of any note occurring to report...certainly no big news on par with this strawberry jam use by date exclusive...THAT REALLY SCREAMS HOLD THE FRONT PAGE!  
Thoughts on #Brexit events today:1) The wheels come off over the Irish border, not money, because it’s a 0-1 issue with little room for fudging.2) The EU will become tougher because Theresa May has proven an unreliable partner.3) Expect more trouble as reality hits home. 
So it appears that when the UK Government talked about 'Taking Back Control' they forgot to add 'to hand over to our bosses the DUP'! What a dogs breakfast Brexit is and what an embarrassment the UK is becoming 
Final thought today - the DUP don't want Jeremy Corbyn in Number 10 but anyone who thinks they'll put the C&S agreement before N. Ireland's constitutional position needs their head examined. #Brexit 
Let's remember Leave only won a narrow 693k swing victory, by adding together those who wanted a WTO rules Brexit & those who wanted the Norway model when both couldn't be available... A ref conducted in such a way is not democracy it's gerrymandering.  
It doesn't matter now whether NI stay in Single Market & Customs Union or not as far as Scotland is concerned. The fact it was on the table means the precedent has been set. Either stop #Brexit now, let NI & Scotland stay in EU or let us go - the Union's dead whatever WM does 
The UK is currently trying to expel people who moved to the UK legally over 50 years ago.Why should the @The3Million & @MichelBarnier accept just 5 years of protection by the ECJ?#Brexit #BargainingChip 
How brexit is destroying NI’s centre ground – and could take the Union with it  
"I need the hardest Brexit you have. No, that's too hard."  
Forget Trump, Brexit and the World Cup. The way men with guns and power play with 20 million civilian lives in #Yemen is the most important story of our time. 
“Regulatory alignment” is this year’s term for “Brexit in name only” 
I’m avoiding anything to do with Brexit.  It’s not good for my digestion. 
Half of Britons are 'in favour of a public vote' on final Brexit deal  
North must be granted special status within EU  #Brexit 
“Will of the people.  Why do you hate democracy?”“The will of the people was for the softest middle ground 48:52 Brexit possible”“But that means staying in the CU, SM, ECJ, Euratom and everything else we didn't vote to leave!”“Will of the people. Why do you hate democracy?” 
"This isn’t a show exclusively for progressive liberals; this is also for people who voted Brexit. That’s not me politically at all – but we have to keep everyone on board."*squints*  
Extraordinarily powerful speech by @MikeGapes on the Good Friday agreement and the risk that the government’s hard brexit poses to Northern Ireland and Ireland. Well worth checking out if you want to understand just what is at stake #brexithaos 
It's been an interesting day.  Started with my neighbours, English, ex-forces, strongly NO in 2014, announced they are now YES in #indyref when it happens. Mainly because of #brexit and they've realised the lies. Then @BBCNews made some unfortunate comments and @theresa_may.../2 
Jesus Christ of all the 1.8 million people in Northern Ireland #cblive invites the sectarian Jamie Bryson in to talk about #Brexit he has never been elected to anything in his life. Can #rte not get anyone else who at least is educated rather than this idiot. 
So to sum up today's EU negotiations:NI: We don’t want #Brexit.Scotland: Neither do we.London: Nor us.Cornwall: We want Brexit, but not the part that adversely affects us. Grimsby: What Cornwall said.But apatently #StopBrexit will be too embarrassing...  
‘When people blithely tell you that ‘creativity’ is the answer to the Brexit border crisis, remind them that the Good Friday Agreement is already the apex of diplomatic creativity in peace-making -anywhere, ever.’ #stopbrexit 
Brexit isn’t more important than genocide you sentient ham  
Brexit chaos is the top story on every front page tomorrow in the U.K. (along with Prime Minister May)  
TOMORROW: Brexit falls to pieces, government betrayed by the partners they bribed for support and the PM hangs on by her fingernails - but the real story is a handful of replies to a deleted tweet by Lily Allen…  
Bertie Ahern & “Enda Kelly,” former Teeshocks of Northern Ireland, apparently. This is the level of much of the understanding (or lack thereof) & analysis when it comes to #Brexit, Ireland & NI. The mind boggles, again.  
Broadband, Bridges, Bullsh.. no problem let’s talk#Brexit oh well that’s not important  
Excl: Theresa May pulled out of Brexit deal after EU also refused to agree a 5 year time limit for ECJ’s role on EU citizens; 
A selection of Tuesday's UK front pages #brexit #DUP 
I'm no expert on anything. But I feel I could have seen the #DUP position on this coming a mile off. Why didn't the UK government? #Brexit #newsnight 
Everyone with any sense knows there is no "successful deal" for #Brexit, only degrees of failure.Pretending that Brexit is actually achievable without significant pain makes Labour part of the #Brexit problem  
Great to see European Parliament Brexit coordinator @guyverhofstadt support #FollowBackProEU #FBPE. The pro-European movement keeps growing stronger. 
This is not about nationalism, this is about democracy. As it currently stands, the #EUWithdrawalBill puts the Welsh Government at the mercy of Whitehall Ministers’ - why should we trust a UK Gov that is leading us into a shambolic #Brexit?  
Westminster is reaping the consequences of quite frankly centuries of misrule on the island of Ireland. It’s a well deserved Brexit comeuppance 
DUP should not be able to dictate UK position in the Brexit negotiations. This again shows the Conservatives are in office but not in power  
Tuesday's Guardian: "DUP wrecks May’s Brexit deal" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Tuesday's Times: "May fights to save Brexit deal after unionist veto" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Gosh, you wouldn't have thought anything at all had happened on the Brexit front if you happened to read the Daily Mail   
"Tory BRExit" is a "grubby deal". Unlike a "Labour BRexit", which would sell out working class LEAVE voters who voted to take back control from establishment toady politicians like Jeremy Corbyn and Tony Blair.  
Rumours that Corbyn is changing his mind back to No Brexit..is @NicolaSturgeon  the only leader that never falters and sticks to what she believes in..Wake up Scotland ..Vote SNP #ScotRef2018 
The fun and games on the issue of Gibraltar are yet to come.As are many over complicated issues.The Irish border is just one of many Brexit problems.  
Ex-Brexit Minister David Jones says UK should refuse to have a hard border between Wales and Ireland and to use "technology" to achieve free flow of trade. What planet is he on? Is he planning to go to @pcworld and ask for that off-the-self #Brexit free trading software? 
Clearly some plotting underway with Priti Patel, Bernard Jenkin and Edward Leigh in a huddle (and Jacob R-M close by).  Manoeuvring for a No Deal #Brexit ? 
Theresa May on her way to complete the agreement with the EU until she spotted Arlene Foster and the rest of the DUP #Brexit #Newsnight 
The Guardian front page, Tuesday 05.12.17: DUP wrecks May’s Brexit deal  
."Brexit whack-a-mole means that when you focus on solving one problem, another five pop up elsewhere.". 
-Call election to boost majority and get better Brexit deal-Lose majority-Cling on to power by doing DUP deal-DUP deal prevents Brexit dealLooking forward to @ShippersUnbound's next book, "Britain: The Banter Years" 
If May didn’t square the deal with the DUP in advance, she’s more incompetent than I thought. If the DUP signed up, and then pulled out, then they’re not reliable partners. Neither is great. A no deal Brexit looks more likely.  
People in Scotland voted to stay in the #EU. If #Brexit happens, and if NI is able to stay in the #singlemarket, Scotland should be able to as well. 
“Northern Ireland is as much part of the United Kingdom as Somerset is” according to Jacob Rees-Mogg. If May is willing to sacrifice Northern Ireland in the Brexit negotiations, Jacob Rees-Mogg needs to replace her immediately! 
It’s absolutely shameful how little regard was paid to the issue of the Irish border during the Brexit referendum campaign. This was entirely foreseeable  
All this talk of winners & losers is disheartening. Nobody wins. If there's one thing #Brexit shows it's that politics is too often about petty victories and infrequently about common good and material wellbeing. No good can come from this, and I think everyone knows it. 
Hmm I wonder what's going through Cameron's mind right now.It was his HUBRIS - his inability to manage his Party - and his purblind arrogance that he would WIN #EuRef that has led to this Govt's INEPT handling of #Brexit 
This economy is slowing fast. Companies are going bust and real people are losing jobs. You can’t tell me it is not Brexit related. We were the fastest growing economy in Europe prior to June 2016, we have real problems ahead. 
honestly fuck brexit for making me care about continued regulatory alignment 
GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: DUP wrecks May's Brexit deal #skypapers 
Clear now that Tory Brexit is causing economic and political instability and that is why we in @UKLabour continue to fully support it. 
We can be thankful for the leadership of Arlene Foster, @DUPLeader, for standing up for the UK and forcing the government to face down the Sinn Fein-EU alliance to break it up. They failed to achieve this through violent terrorism & they are failing to do so through Brexit. 
The #Brexit extremists are getting very upset at all the #FBPE tags everywhere they look.  It's almost as if they feel outnumbered and cornered now that the tide has changed so far against them.  Will of the people, isit?  
Analysis: The Irish border has crashed Brexit negotiations. Here’s what you need to know.  
Country disunites behind Theresa May’s latest Brexit plan – our favourite reaction online 
Theresa May called an election so she could go into Brexit negotiations with a strong hand. She ended up having to backtrack from a done deal because she gets a phonecall from the DUP.It's almost too embarrassing. 
It can’t be a coincidence that literally every single politician still pushing for Brexit is a complete fucking shitbag. 
Tuesday's FT: "Brexit divorce derailed at 11th hour after DUP blocks Irish border deal" (via @hendopolis)  #tomorrowspaperstoday 
May humiliated DUP Brexit chaos  
And there we have it. Ship Brexit Britannica is starting to hit the icebergs of reality. Much better to turn the ship around before the country crashes entirely.  #ThinkAgain#FBPE  
How would have thought Northern Ireland could prove an intractable political problem.... #brexit 
Labour will repeat its Commons ambush for secret Brexit papers, but this time on Universal Credit impact assessments.    
This - the coaster beneath my wine glass - this sums up the entirety of the #Brexit fiasco to date. #Newsnight 
What did I say earlier? When Brexit goes tits up, lead on showbiz.  
My greatest fear has always been a no deal Brexit. I know some think that the closer we get to that, the squeakier bums become, and the chances of stopping Brexit increase. 5/ 
So the £1bn deal with the DUP didn't include supporting a carefully crafted fudge over NI to allow PM to do her Brexit deal by the deadline  the phrase 'no surrender' comes to mind! 
And the fact that Brexit is a really bad idea for the UK. The best deal is to remain in the EU and people are starting to realise it. 
So what are you going to do about the Irish Border Jeremy? Any kind of Brexit will mean custom posts /checks / delays and the return of The Troubles. Only staying in the SM / CU will ensure peace. 
Good technical account of North-South integration making Brexit so damned hard for Ireland  by @anandMenon1 
Conservative MP Bernard Jenkins thinks that Bertie Ahern & Enda "kelly" Kenny were former Taoiseach's of Northern Ireland #brexit  
And while we're talking Brexiter bullshit - can we put the "Brexit was a working class rebellion" b*ll*cks away once and for all, please?The most working class parts of Britain: Liverpool, Glasgow, Newcastle, Manchester, Leeds, Peckham, Belfast - all REMAIN strongholds. 
Before you squander any more of our billions @theresa_may, hold a second referendum, or your legacy will be Johnson.  
Brexit: a shambolic day raises the stakes  
All you need know @bernardjenkin "enda kelly" Teeshock of northern Ireland #Brexit @SkyNews 
"10-year foreign language strategy seeks to prepare Ireland for Brexit through a series of steps such as potential bonus points for studying foreign languages."  
i FRONT PAGE: Brexit deal is done... then DUP says no #skypapers 
Being in the Middle East, searching through hundreds of Arabic satellite channels, it’s really hit me what a small island the UK seems right now - @bbc reporting endlessly on Brexit, but it feels so insignificant on the world stage. 
Why can’t England leave the EU and give all the rest of us peace?They were the ones that carried the #Brexit vote after allFor it will come to that eventuallyScotland will be independentIreland will unite 
My favourite part of #Brexit will be when @Nigel_Farage and friends organise a protest against the #2ndreferendum while claiming “democracy” without any irony whatsoever. #PredictTheFuture 
1.3million people voted for @SadiqKhan to be Mayor, in a city with a population close to 9million people. You speak for the few not the many. #BREXIT 
Failure of Brexit is deluded right wing ideologues being slapped in the face by reality.  Meanwhile deluded left wing ideologues think they could do it better  
That most clear-sighted of #Brexit commentators, @fotoole, on today's shenanigans.  
It’s not just a rubbish government - BREXIT IS UNDELIVERABLE in the form it was advertised!  NO form of Brexit will benefit anyone NOR will it satisfy anyone - whichever way one voted.Brexit is broken, unworkable, defunct, defective, disintegrated, collapsed on its own lies. 
Well why not, what good for the goose...!Gibraltar wades in to Brexit row - WE WANT IRELAND DEAL TOO  
When Theresa May and her Gang of Glory sold their souls to Arlene Foster, I genuinely felt that was it. They'd clearly made a deal to secure Brexit. We were outflanked.Turns out they hadn't even discussed it with them. £1 billion. No agreement on Brexit. Nothing.Astonishing. 
Brexit is sending U.K. solicitors flocking to Ireland  
May calls GE to strengthen mandate. Ends up with minority government. Pacts with DUP from NI. NI big pending issue of #brexit phase I talks. May offers EU deal on NI EU would accept. DUP blocks deal. The end? 
FYI: @jeremycorbyn did also tweet about Brexit.True Leaders are able to show leadership for more than one issue at a time.  
Your second premise is the intention. It’s precisely the need to ensure Brexit that a strong patriotic party in opposition is required. Labour does not fulfil that role.  
Irish Times “Brexit: a shambolic day raises the stakes”Clear. Succinct. And correct.“… will require May to show real leadership. She must either bring along her opponents or face them down”(Via @DPhinnemore) 
Corbyn had already responded on Brexit at 5.43pm - nearly two hours BEFORE your tweet :  
Tweet your town, job etc under the hashtag #WeWantABrexitExemptionToo if you want an exemption from Brexit too:  
“if, for the first time in 800 years, Ireland is proving to be in a much stronger political position than Britain, what does that say about what Brexit is doing to Britain’s strength?”  
Theresa May left red-faced as DUP scuppers Brexit deal  
Why does Tommie Gorman insist on misrepresenting NI on #rtenews saying SF pulled down NI gov over “Irish Language & other issues”???It was over a blatant DUP corruption scandal. Let’s facts straight please. #Brexit #cblive 
In the face of the shambles that is Brexit, somebody needs to bring back sanity. The vast majority of people in the UK are appalled at what is happening to the country. This is our future. Time has come to:#ThinkAgain#WeAreEurope#FBPE 
When @Conservatives  'chose' their new leader to replace Dave, was 'the plan' to choose someone who would reverse Brexit??  
Martin Rowson on British efforts to get a Brexit-Irish border deal – cartoon  
Despicable! It seems Theresa May was willing to sell out Northern Ireland for a very bad deal. Good for the DUP for standing up for a full #Brexit for the whole United Kingdom.  
Incompetence breeds implosion & public contempt. I’m struck by parallels between the fall of the poll tax & the unravelling of Brexit. 
Please watch, Johnson dismissed the negative impact of #Brexit on Northern Ireland. He lied.  
Arsenal fans claim they won the possession and Brexit meaning Brexit. It's Fan Denial...  
The only thing I’ve heard from @UKLabour about today’s omnishambles, is a big sigh of relief that it’s not them having to negotiate the Irish border issue to get their Red Brexit 
It would objectively be quite funny if Brexit ends up with a united Ireland and a Britain with internal borders. 
Martin Rowson on British efforts to get a Brexit-Irish border deal – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Long read  We need to talk about Brexit and  #citizenrights—and perceptions. 1/ 
We’re still missing one crucial fact in amongst all the recriminations of today’s deal but then no-deal on the Irish border and #Brexit.* * * * * * *We do not know WHY the DUP behaved the way it did today.* * * * * * *1/7 
The future of #Brexit #Britain.  Diminished, in every possible way.  Keep fighting, #Remainers!   #FBPE#DUP #StopBrexit #NorthernIreland #Brexitshambles #EU #IrishBorder #SNP 
Please describe the ‘successful’ deal you would negotiate @jeremycorbyn. Otherwise this is just posturing. Do you believe #Brexit is better for Britain than remaining? If you don’t, say so!  
."So far, we’ve been talking about the implications of Brexit for Ireland.NOW we have to talk about the implications of Ireland for Brexit.". 
 EMERGENCY #BREXITCAST! As Brexit talks break down over the Irish border issue @tconnellyRTE, @bbclaurak, @BBCkatyaadler, @adamfleming & @ChrisMasonBBC ask WHAT THE THE HELL IS GOING ON?   / Subscribe on iTunes:  pic.twitter.com/LUt0N9FK2S 
3/4 Even when promised a soft #Brexit with no hard border etc 56% we voted to remain in the EU therefore 56%+ would favour special status 
The Brexit that Britain wanted vs the Brexit that Britain is getting  
In last week’s Belfast Telegraph #Brexit Poll 78% of people wanted to remain in Customs Union - civic society in the north of Ireland must surely be reaching breaking point with DUP after today? 
I’m NOT sorry for @Theresa_May, but I am sorry for the UK. She chose to align herself with extreme Brexit hard liners delivering pain today & more in the future. She made us a laughing stock with her inept dishonesty. I despise her weakness & poor judgement.@Channel4News 
Hey British journalists, here are a few reasons why Arlene Foster & the DUP DO NOT speak for NI when they say we want a hard #Brexit (1/4) 
Any response to that Nick, given that it shows your comment to be inaccurate, or does that not fit your narrative? I'm no Corbynista, but maybe its a good thing that he comments on things like Austerity, or Genrocide, as well Brexit. Also has good Shad Cab Ministers who comment.  
Dear Scottish Torys,I’ve decided to write your future Brexit speeches to save you the hassle,ready?“Scotland would like to stay in the EU, and we will continue to fight for that”Repeat over and over. If you’re stuck here’s a wee photo to helpYours Scotland as a whole  
I grew up in North Longford and we regularly “crossed the border” from Ballyconnell into Enniskillen. The armed soldiers leaning their guns on the drivers window as they asked my Dad “what’s your business in the North?” is a memory I’d rather forget. #Brexit 
To put government's position on #Brexit in perspective, allowing DUP to force a no deal Brexit is no different than if Lib Dems forced no Brexit. DUP is a minority party holding too much power over a weak government concerned more with its survival than stability of the country. 
This Brexit business is proving to be a fickle mistress. So why don't we just stay in the EU? 
Today proved that Theresa May's as Prime Minister has less power to control events than a lolly pop lady  because she no longer controls her government. We are dead in the waters of Brexit and she must resign. #NorthernIreland 
Brexit stall could mean end of May's Govt & beginning of Corbyn's. DUP could get so angry that they scrap agreement with Tories & resolve to get rid of them. May would have to appeal to Opposition parties, including Labour, to rescue her. Fat chance.  
Theresa May is finished as a politician. She would do well, as a swansong, to do another 180 degree turn and say that Brexit is against the national interest. "No Brexit means no Brexit" #StopBrexit 
Theresa May's Brexit fiasco may be going from bad to worse but it's business as usual over at Nadine Dorries' office.  
While we’re at it: like Northern Ireland, Yorkshire wants an open border with our nearest EU neighbour and the right of all Yorkshire folk to apply for EU citizenship. #Brexit  
This Brexit stall could mean the end of Theresa May's Government – and the beginning of Corbyn's  
It's irrelevant that some parts of the UK - whether they be Scotland, Northern Ireland or London - had a majority who voted to Remain in the EU. It was a *UK-wide* referendum. A majority of UK voters voted to Leave the EU. End of. 
8. It cannot be said, therefore, that Freedom of Movement is impossible after Brexit, or that it cannot be accepted as part of achieving an important goal for the country's prosperity. That's not what was said in the campaign /End 
Remind me again will you - one of you great intellects on the Sun or the Telegraph or the Daily Mail or indeed the Today programme or Legatum - why Brexit was such a bloody brilliant idea. 
Have Richard Leonard & Ruth Davidson gone to replace Kezia in the jungle or do they literally have nothing to say about Brexit today ? 
No, the reason for today's failure is that a satisfactory Brexit is impossible and you need to stop being so bloody cowardly and say so! Stop letting everyone else fight the battle and sitting on your arse!  
'Irish Times' view on Brexit: A shambolic day raises the stakes  
Many conflicting forms of Brexit.Only 1 Remain.#StopBrexit for the economic, social and political good of the country. 
Before they go any further with Brexit @DavidDavisMP and @theresa_may should prove they can do a Rubik Cube. If they can't do that live on TV, within five minutes, then I don't see how they can puzzle through the dangerous labyrinth of Brexit 
Given the obvious complications re NI and Brexit, imagine how ridiculous it would have been for a party leader, the day after the brexit referendum result, coming out calling for an immediate implementation of article 50!...oh yeah  
Remoaners aren’t killing Brexit.  Reality is killing Brexit.  We said that what Brexiteers wanted was impossible, but they called it Project Fear.We warned you something like this would happen, but you ignored us.Don’t you dare blame anyone but your own, deluded, selves. 
A #Brexit agreement must take into account the Irish interests.  @Theresa_May has made some progress. But border controls in #Ireland are not an option. Without a commitment on that, no second phase of negotiations will begin. 
This is interesting from an outfit that claims to be impartial on Brexit. It is the patriotic duty now of anyone with information about this 'charity' to contact the fearless Simon Walters of the Mail on Sunday.  
Tories called referendum. Tories called election to make themselves stronger for Brexit. This is a Tory Brexit. Try, just for once, to focus on that rather than spin it against Labour.  
Northern Ireland to get concessions on Brexit... What about Gibraltar?What about Scotland?What about London?The way things are going, the only parts of the UK that will end up receiving a hard Brexit will be the houses of Katie Hopkins and Nigel Farage. 
If Brexit gets cancelled, we will put on the absolute godmother of all parties. 
Post-Brexit the Tories are planning an imaginary 'hard border' with Ireland!We'll also have imaginary: Trading partners Doctors & nurses Worker/ Human Rights protections Money Jobs#brexitshambles 
The only reason the Tories can present themselves as govt of UK is due to DUP backing, DUP just refused to back govt in Brexit negotiation. In any functioning democracy this would mean a general election. 
Since I first tweeted @jeremycorbyn has now tweeted about Brexit. 
Here's how one word – 'alignment' – undid nine months of gruelling Brexit negotiations and high-profile compromises  
1. We were all told there was a possibility that Freedom of Movement might happen after Brexit.  
Remainers yesterday: Brexit is divisive!Remainers today: Balkanise the UK! 
"Hard Landing"THAT BRITISH GOVERNMENT IRELAND #BREXIT ANALYSIS: A RECAP.  
Ireland, the EU is playing you like a fiddle  #Brexit 
I’m already hearing rumblings about how the Northern Irish aren’t REALLY British so why are we even bothering. How quickly they turn fellow countrymen into “others” when things aren’t going their way. Brexit is poison that devours anyone who gets too close. 
“If, for the first time in 800 years, Ireland is proving to be in a much stronger political position than Britain, what does that say about what Brexit is doing to Britain’s strength?” - @fotoole 
I simply can’t accept that having a Conservative leadership challenge would lead to a general election. All we want is a Conservative leader that does not pull another fast one like the PM today. Find the new leader behind closed doors and deliver Brexit as you promised. 
"Irregularity"THAT DUP VIEW ON THE #BREXIT DEAL, IN FULL.With thanks to /u/sinnoach for the inspiration for this one! 
"So how's that Brexit you've been working on coming along? Made a few trade deals? Loosened some regulations? Made the most of taking back control? Feelin' pretty rich, huh?"  
I hear that little lad calling out “Oh Mrs May, Mr Brexit has no clothes on!”  When will they realise and stop it? #exitbrexit #costofbrexit 
This government and Parliament, dominated by Remainers, are betraying Brexit and allowing the EU to treat the UK with contempt  
#SadiqKhan calls for special #Brexit deal for London after he sees that the PM is in trouble!Will no one rid us of this turbulent priest?  
Unionists like to disdainfully refer to the Republic as "Mexico", but it's genuinely hard to figure out if the current #Brexit impasse is a Mexican stand-off or the DUP re-enacting that scene in 'Blazing Saddles' where Sheriff Bart takes himself hostage. 
Theresa May has been held to ransom by the DUP over Brexit. Today's events confirm this is a Government that has lost all control of the agenda and are incapable of providing leadership. Our future as a nation in Europe securing our prosperity is at stake. 
 The #Brexit breakthrough that wasn't 
Nicola Sturgeon calls for 'special' Brexit deals  
Jeremy Corbyn: "The Tory trio leading the Brexit talks have got nowhere, and agreed next-to-nothing." 
Slight change of plan for tomorrow - now sitting in Manchester airport waiting for flight to Belfast. Celebrating with a grab bag of discos. #Brexit #regulatoryalignment 
UK in £470m post-Brexit cost savings by not having to part fund various EU agencies  
No #Brexit progress will be good enough if it is based on the Settled status.Instead, we could have a much simpler system such as our Alternative and no one would be left behind, read more :  
This Brexit disaster could mean the end of Theresa May's Government – and the beginning of Corbyn's  
Well, looks like Brexit isn't going to deliver on any of its many promises.Which one are you most disappointed to be missing out on? 
Yes it is, although Corbyn nd his comrades voted recently for a hard Brexit so there's another lie from Jezza x 
The reason for today’s failure in the Brexit talks is the grubby deal the Tories did with the DUP after the election. Each passing day provides further evidence that @Theresa_May’s Government is completely ill-equipped to negotiate a successful deal for our country. 
Enough’s enough.It’s right individual parts of UK are demanding out of this Brexit madness that suits interests of only a few billionaires. 
Just think, if Scotland had voted Yes, we'd be looking at Brexit shit an laughing at this shambles, instead of trying to navigate through the mess #brexitshambles 
The rest of #Europe looks aghast at #TheresaMay confusion & delusion:“Who can deliver a #brexit agreement? Who should we negotiate with?” 
#DUP #ArleneFoster @DUPleader: We will not accept any form of regulatory divergence which separates #NorthernIreland economically or politically from the rest of the #UnitedKingdom! GREAT LADY! #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty 
Wonder how much longer it will be before May realises #Brexit is undeliverable? 
If the Conservative Party was a rational party, they'd have held a special conference in July 2016 to thrash out what sort of Brexit they collectively wanted.  They might not have got it, but not even knowing what they *want* after 18 months is criminal. 
Labour takes poll lead as @jeremycorbyn chooses to let Tories implode over Brexit whilst he talks about just about anything else  
"Shambles" doesn't even come close to describing the mess that is #Brexit 
So far May has capitulated on money, transition, the ECJ - even the order of #Brexit talks. Yet she still can't grasp a deal. Face facts: there's no good deal to be had. 
If you thought the UK looked stupid today in eyes of the world ...just wait for the next gripping Brexit episodes!! 
#Brexit Can we get some politicians with a backbone sort this Brexit out FFS. Theresa Maybe hopeless  Was a remainer still is. Stop  waving bloody white flag start fighting for .    
#NigelFarage on @LBC The @duponline & @DUPleader were right to scupper the crap #EUdeal that could have seen #NorthernIreland remain in the #SingleMarket & #CustomsUnion  #BBC #SKY #BREXIT @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #EU #DUP 
Irish govt spokesman to @Channel4News : "Ireland has compromised greatly on this. We didn't ask for 'Brexit', we don't want 'Brexit' and we believe it will be a negative process, soft or hard." #NoBrexit 
Can't understand how, on a day like today, the man who gave us Brexit is still, after all this time, just short of 200,000 people wanting him sacked   
UK in EFTA would prob means going from 3 to 5 judges, UK prob getting those extra two. Yet more evidence that #EEA #EFTA is the answer for the UK after Brexit: squaring the circle of single market and sovereignty/control.  
It would be ironic if it ends up being the DUP that stops Brexit...  
A reminder that following the election omnishambles The Tories do not have a mandate for their hard Brexit. #brexitshambles 
Fleetwood or Hereford vs the mighty city in the cup, fucking great stuff. Granite Brexit fixture, pies, slide tackles, muddy pitch and wallopings. Up the city! 
We now have to pay £520 million to move EMA to Amsterdam because of Brexit-where’s the money for the NHS @theresa_may ? 
It is time for @UKLabour @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer to call out the Brexit car crash for what it is. Undoable without massive damage to UK 
"It feels like a big blow for the UK government today because it is" — @BBCLauraK on what on earth happened during the #Brexit talks  
Then someone tell me what the point of #Brexit is? All this time and money to obtain what we have already. Let’s #Remain and get on with normal life! 
Brexit talks fail what a shockDUP in mix now must need another billionBrexit is going to cost more than sep blathers expenses 
Scottish Tory MPs claim I’m threatening the U.K. by defending the Single Market and Customs Union. I don’t think I’m responsible for the mess they are making of both Brexit and the country. They are as big a threat to the union as the SNP. 
Ok enough Brexit for now. This week I’m interviewing an actual astronaut! Who’s got a #space question for #ThomasPesquet @Thom_astro ?Cc @esa @FRANCE24 @EuropeF24 #excited pic.twitter.com/6XqinKypvw 
For years the EU mocked Ireland and its voters. Now it pretends to be Ireland's best mate in the hope of using it to weaken Brexit. This is why 17.4m Brits voted against the EU, says Brendan O'Neill: it's a sinister, shameless, anti-democratic institution 
The Tory party thought #TheresaMay was a "Bloody Difficult Woman"... Until they jumped into bed with the DUP and saw what a Bloody Difficult Woman actually looks like! Well done #ArleneFoster for fucking up #Brexit like no-one else can!#StopBrexit 
Someone please call #FarageOnLBC and get him to explain exactly what he would consider a successful post-brexit Irish border. How would he prevent free movement with the EU while maintaining free movement within the Irish island. 
Almost 100 yrs ago, a minority in Ireland forced the creation of a northern state with a manufactured unionist political majority.Now that unionist political majority is no more it is a minority within a minority attempting to dictate the future for all of Ireland.#Brexit 
This is why the complex history of the Irish border is playing such a crucial role in Brexit negotiations  
Can I just point out that if the DUP dont play ball on #Brexit, there will be no deal, a full on hard brexit and consequently, there will be a border in Ireland, which is exactly what we want to avoid.   
By this time next year the Tories will be  gone and #Brexit will have been cancelled. In the meantime stay strong #Sheffield, look after each other and give generously  
If Northern Ireland can stay in the 'Single Market' why not Bristol? / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Both the Brexit Yes and No camps assumed it was fine to force a decision on the occupied six counties - a British colony. The mere vote itself is an act of recognising British rule in Ireland as legitimate. Both sides have a colonial attitude on Ireland. 
Brexit is like a Möbius strip: the logic of getting the best deal for the UK always leads back to membership of the single market and the customs union.  
'We'd have a hard border on the M25' - Sadiq Khan mocked for suggesting London could opt out of #Brexit  
This Brexit disaster could mean the end of Theresa May's Government – and the beginning of Corbyn's  
.@Nigel_Farage takes your calls and gives his unmissable reaction to the latest on the Brexit negotiations. Watch:  
Perhaps Nick Clegg wasn't as a eloquent a blackmailer, but I don't remember the Lib/Dems ever having this kind of power over Cameron's government #Brexit #DUP #NI 
2 points. 1. Big swathes of NI voted Leave (8 out of 18 constituencies and very close results in some. 2. It. Was. A. UK. Wide. Referendum. How many times?  
More Londoners voted for Brexit than voted for you, Sadiq.  
Probability of No Deal Brexit much higher after today: - Only way for May to appease the DUP or her “Leave Means Leave” backbenchers is to propose a hard border for Northern Ireland- But that will be unacceptable for Dublin and EU27=> “no deal” only viable outcome 
A quick thread on the failure for there to be an agreement on "sufficient progress" on Brexit today./1 
Brexit negotiations farce shows Britain right to leave the EU  
So after the enjoyment of the Brexit Bus game, you want another #Brexit game?Yes! Of course you do!The Brexit adaption of Whack a Mole#WhackABrexiteerWith added feed Arlene Foster money function 
EU: We recognise that Ireland is unique in terms of #Brexit and your history, and requires a special deal.DUP: Nah, we don't want a special deal and access to EU trade, rights and funding.British Gov: OKIrish Gov: WTFScotland, Wales, London: Can we have it. 
staying in the #singlemarket and the #customsunion the only sustainable Brexit solution.  May has to show leadership on this and call the bluff of the hardline Brexiteers in her own party. 
Brexit. We should cast off the EU regulatory system, lower barriers, liberalise trade, lead the world. In other words look to the future not the past represented by the moribund, always backward-looking EU.  
Labour if it was wise would make clear they would not vote with DUP to back a No Deal crash Brexit that would devastate jobs in working class communities and put GFA at risk. Show extremist Ulster pols playing Orange card has no support in Commons @MikeGapes @MaryCreaghMP 
King Sadiq Khan-ute is arguing for London to remain in the single market & customs union after Brexit. Seems he doesn't understand democracy...  
Disaster? Thankfully we avoided that. #Brexit  
Brexit v Good Friday Agreement - By Duncan Morrow.  
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon says a #Brexit deal for Northern Ireland would leave Scotland "doubly disadvantaged"  
The thing that enrages me most in this shitstorm is that Britain is so much better than Brexit. How did we allow tuppenny bit politician Farage and his moron army dictate the course of our politics? 
The brexit process, explained  
I see May has also found a potential way out for herself and the conservatives.DUP collapse the coalition. New election. Hand Brexit to Labour with no time - or inclination - for a deal. They go full Venezuela and wreck the country. Easy pickings. 
As the Brexit fiasco unfolds, worth looking beyond the detail to one huge thing: that what will eventually be revealed is the final death of the Conservative Party's claim that its beliefs & actions are always reducible to the quaint idea of the 'National Interest'. RIP. 
No breakthrough on Brexit divorce issues today, but PM May is returning to Brussels on Wednesday and positive noises are sent out. Irish border still the critical issue. 
Prime Minister @Theresa_May knew about the risks of #Brexit all along. Read and share what she said about #Scotland before the #EUreferendum. Link:  
Net migration to the UK has dropped by a third since last year’s Brexit vote. #Leave 
I am shocked that people are shocked that the DUP are being numpties on Brexit. A prime example of the politics of ego rather than the politics of sense #brexit 
Considering NI voted Remain, who does Arlene Foster actually speak for when she says NI want a hard #Brexit? 
Back in Blighty and genuinely confused: couldn't #TheresaMay have seen this coming?Don't the #DUP have "unionist" in their name? I mean...#NorthernIreland#ArleneFoster#Brexit 
As Britain moves closer to Brexit in 2018, politics will become more agitated  
Strictly speaking the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP) was the only major political group in Northern Ireland to oppose the Good Friday Agreement and campaigned against it during the agreement referendum.  
Oh, chuck it, Iain! Major and Blair both went to Northern Ireland during the referendum campaign and said precisely this was the danger if we left the EU  
The useless and pathetic Theresa May offered the UK "strong and stable" leadership yet runs scared of Murdoch, Dacre, Johnson, Gove, her backbench Brexit headbangers and most of all 10 DUP bigots in a parliament with 650 MPs. Tail wagging the dog would be a gross understatement. 
Note to #Brexit headline writers: 'Ulster' said Yes to staying in EU.  
Clean, green New Zealand is a lie – and a warning for our post-Brexit countryside | Patrick Barkham  
DUP deal was sheer strategic genius by those vying for the no deal Brexit option. 
And special status for London too? So that would leave Brexit England minus London. (And presumably Oxford and Cambridge would want special status as well then.)  
This woman now has to go. She failed as Immigration Minister, she failed as #Brexit minister and she has failed as PM. #JRM4PMTheresa gives in: PM 'taking political risk of her life and Brexiteers could SWOOP IN' 
Brian fucking Hayes (barely elected on last count) on #RTEbias again. Why is @lukeming (topped the poll) never on?#brexit #SixOne 
So, let’s get this straight:1) @theresa_may thought she had a #Brexit deal for #SufficientProgress, but then she called Arlene Foster, who scuppered it2) A cabal of DUP MPs is holding the UK & entire Brexit process to ransom3) So the tail is well & truly wagging the dog...  
NEWS! UK Brexit paper proposes ‘magic’ Irish border staffed by fairies  
Theresa May should now call a General Election to strengthen Britain's negotiating position. #Brexit 
#Brexit: The world’s worse, head banging, sweaty palmed, bloodshot eyed hangover you can never shake off. The party invitations should never have been given out. Fact. 
May I suggest all those interested in what appears to be the widespread and gross violation of parliamentary information security policy by MPs use the #Infogate tag.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Following the failure to reach an agreement in the Brexit negotiations today, what is the view in Brussels? @tconnellyRTE reports pic.twitter.com/s7doYloQOb 
Brexit is so bad that people are peddling remaining in the CU and Single Market as a triumph when it is merely a slightly less ghastly outcome. 
Yes, this.  But let’s be clear: for millions of people, incl @The3Million & @BritishInEurope, Brexit has been very real for well over 500 days.  
It is taking almost as long for the penny to drop that Brexit can't happen than to get through the first (and most simple) part of the negotiations Things would speed up if some billionaire bought The Daily Mail and sacked the editorial staff 
BOOM: great line for us EU/Brexit politics geeks.  
Breaking: Paul Gascoigne has turned up at Downing Street with a six pack claiming to be Theresa May's friend #Brexit 
Tory MP David Davies confirms our claim that #EUWithdrawalBill is a Westminster power grab. We'll be supporting amendments tonight to stop Westminster from stealing  Welsh powers voted for by the people of Wales in two separate referendums. #Brexit  
How come everyone is so afraid of no-deal #Brexit ? The EU has a huge positive trade balance with Britain and its economy will collapse if it loses the UK. So telling Brussels to go fuck itself is a great option. 
UK and EU fail to strike Brexit talks deal just as most of thought would happen!Walk away now, May! Your best chance!  
We were delighted to welcome @michaelgove to our Aylesbury's net zero carbon dairy today - the world’s largest fresh milk processing plant. Good to hear how open Gove is to working with farmers and committed to maintaining UK farming standards after Brexit. #dairyleader 
Brexit continuing to go smoothly like  
We can't afford #Brexit. We need to #remain in the EU and invest the money in the UK - in our #communities, our economy, our #NHS, and our #national #security! #StopBrexit ! 
Who'd have thought a plan as well-thought-out as Brexit would snag on something so simple as a 400-year-old sectarian divide? 
Clean, green New Zealand is a lie – and a warning for our post-Brexit countryside | Patrick Barkham  
I suspect the main #Brexit problem is that today was a deadline and this is Northern Ireland. We don't do deadlines. 
.@NicolaSturgeon says a #Brexit deal for Northern Ireland could leave Scotland "doubly disadvantaged"  
A Brexit solution? Apologies to those Remain voters in Leave areas. Options are to move or partake in a local referendum to let your area join the Remain side. This may seem fanciful, but no less so than the clusterf**k that's currently being negotiated. OR just #StopBrexit 
I don't reckon this will be the last time Varadkar will be foolishly walked to the top of the podium only to be walked back down on #Brexit A little tip Leo, when you can't spot the patsy in the room, you're it.#rtedt 
I've written & researched rather alot on #Brexit #Border NI/IRL, & peace process. Pl see here for links: Inc. 'Bordering on Brexit' report for @europe_icban : Plus report with @DPhinnemore on GFA & Brexit:  
Worth restating!In last 2 elections in the north the DUP received 28% & 36% share of the vote56% of voters in the north voted to remain-against the DUP Brexit positionArlene Fosters is a minority view-shes no right 2 assume 2 speak 4 ppl here & no right 2 dictate terms#Brexit 
Theresa May’s Irish answer poses new Brexit questions  
BREXIT: Some immediate Daily Mail reader reactions to Theresa May’s latest Irish border clusterfuck… pic.twitter.com/kvjZF7QNrr 
Today, @theresa_may has negotiated #Brexit with @JunckerEU. We just received some interesting insights... #StopBrexit #EU 
If @DUPonline gets a special deal for Brexit, @NicolaSturgeon wants one too. 
Worth remembering today the importance of the British single market to Scotland relative to that of the EU single market. Shall we ask Sturgeon why she thinks the latter is more important than the former?#Brexit #SNPFail 
The Brexit referendum has no legal authority over any part of Ireland if you are a believer in the Irish Republic of Easter Week proclaimed in arms and sanctified by the sacrifice of Irish Republican martyrs.   
Brexit's still going well then.  
The Tories paving over the cracks in their party by calling a referendum  
A lot of this Lonzo stuff has mostly been a referendum on overly excited Lakers fans or overly excited LaVar Ball marketing comments. Seems to have little to do with him. He’s a solid rookie so far who finds himself under the shadow of being a historically atrocious shot-maker. 
Kay Burley on Sky News: "There's only one story. Is this the day that Brexit broke?"#FBPE #WeAreEurope 
#Brexit.What they promised you Vs What you'll actually get  
We should also remember the DUP didn’t sign up to the Good Friday agreement which brought peace to Northern Ireland. These are the people propping up this minority #Brexit government. Shameful  
Ireland wants to move to next Phase of Brexit talks. Some progress today, and still time to conclude things before December 14th. 
Today feels like the day the house of Brexit lies started to collapse… onto the Tories.It had to happen. You can’t fantasise for ever. At some point you’ll be held to account. Even if your name is Rees-Mogg. 
Corbyn's silence on the Brexit shitstorm over Northern Ireland is deafening. Brexit just died, and the leader of the opposition is hiding.#NorthernIreland#StopBrexit 
It seems clear that the DUP are preparing to screw Northern Ireland for the sake of symbolism.  #Brexit 
So opposing the deal with the DUP but not Brexit. Anyone still riding this train?  
The real reason is that Brexit is:- fucking stupid- ah, no, was gonna make a list but that covers it. As you were.  
I believe some people need to take a close look at their own ideological position on Brexit and admit just one thing: Theresa May and the Tories are not fit to take our country out of the European Union. This has been an absolute shambles from day one. 
The poll also found that support for EU membership in Scotland has risen since the EU referendum of 2016, with 68 per cent saying they would vote ‘Remain’ were the referendum to be repeated  
Leo Varadkar very diplomatically points the finger at Arlene Foster for banjaxing the Brexit negotiations. Do we really want our future determined by a bunch of fundamentalist Neanderthal bigots who can't see beyond the Shankhill Road? #FBPE #WeAreEurope 
Brexit is a defining issue for @campaignforleo and he has been doing extremely well so far, esp on the #border issue. 
Theresa gives in: PM 'taking political risk of her life and Brexiteers could SWOOP IN'  May is the WRONG person to be leading Brexit. Time for her to step down... TODAY ! 
Furious DUP ‘sinks’ Brexit deal: Arlene Foster DESTROYS May's negotiation with phone call  
Thank God for the DUP. Northern Ireland must not be treated as separate from the United Kingdom. Brexit is for everyone in the UK.  via @telegraphnews 
Less than a year old, this Daily Mail front page has not aged well.#Brexit  
My full statement on today’s Brexit developments.   
A Prime Minister has:- a Soft Brexit cross-party majority in the House of Commons- Ireland supported by EU27- the DUP keeping her party in governmentHow does she get all three to the other side of the river, when she can only carry any two at a time? 
No deal: Theresa May's desperate bid to break Brexit deadlock torpedoed by DUP  
What the @DUPonline @DUPleader #DUP just scuppered was the chance to turn NI into the Hong Kong of Europe.  That special status would have had businesses beating a path to set up here.  They basically shot us all in the head. Economic terrorists, that's what the DUP are. #Brexit 
Something inside me is saying Theresa May is looking after herself and the Conservative Party before anything or anybody else #brexit 
Good Friday Agreement must be protected in Brexit negotiations - @M_AndersonSF 
Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. Fuck the DUP. RT if you agree #Brexit 
I avoid predictions on account of 2016 but it has never felt more like Brexit is collapsing and will take the government with it. 
Here's what we learned from Varadkar presser: - May told EU that she was ready to sign deal.- Deal effectively retained the 'status quo' even in the event of no overall deal. - DUP stalled the deal midway through the May/Juncker lunch- Dublin is pretty unhappy. #Brexit 
Reminder than an EEA Brexit, staying in the single market and customs union, would sail through Parliament and the problems are entirely of the Conservative party's own making. 
Sinn Féin should be leading #Brexit negotiations. Sinn Féin's Martina Anderson MEP urged caution this morning. Instead of listening to voice of experience Leo Varadkar was only short of opening the champagne.  
UK govn should apologise for taking up so much EU time.. a pointless year long 'renegotiation' and now Brexit - currently being partly determined by T May's dependency on DUP. EU gracious and patient in face of UK madness. 
Brexit's going well, haha. 
If Legatum really are the brains behind Brexit, I think after today we’re going to have to think very seriously about redefining ‘brains.’ 
Here's Nicola Sturgeon's full statement on today's shambolic Brexit talks.  
I’ve always been of the view that the best way to deal with all of these post Brexit issues would be to stay in the Single Market and Customs Union. Job done and move on. 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar says DUP do not represent majority of people in Northern Ireland, and points out NI majority voted to remain in EU. #brexit 
Yes, of course it is. Brexit seen by many as a way of undermining Welsh (& Scottish) nationhood. Rule Britannia and all that. Now, more than ever, Wales had to say “We are a nation, we want to be treated like a nation.” #indywales 
There is no United Kingdom. This was obvious before Brexit happened.... 
Summing up how the #Brexit negotiations with the EU have gone today....  
We will give Northern Ireland a special Brexit deal. Then Scotland. Then Wales. Then England. Eventually Brexit will only apply to Nigel Farage's house. 
The clear solution to this government chaos is a deal that protects both the Good Friday Agreement and our national economy after Brexit - UK remaining in the single market and customs union. 
The DUP keep saying Northern Ireland can't be treated differently to the rest of the UK. Spoiler: It already is #Brexit  
Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar "surprised and disappointed" anticipated deal on #Brexit phase one was not reached today  
There aren't enough MPs who want a hard Brexit (and Jacob Rees-Mogg is soiled for hanging out with far-right Steve Bannon). To allow these extremists any influence is pointless. If they sabotage a soft Brexit we can just stop Brexit. The options are sane Brexit or #NoBrexit 
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar said he is ‘surprised and disappointment’ with the British government over the failure to reach agreement in Brexit talks  
Hard border for Ireland could break #brexit deal.  Irish PM and DUP at loggerheads.  UK PM caught between a rock and a hard place 
Sammy Wilson on #bbcpm shows the DUP have drunk all the Brexit Kool Aid. They don’t have a clue & seemingly don’t give a crap about trade law. Even WTO would require a border but DUP don’t seem to know it. It’s Brexit for 10 yr olds 
Addressing the media this evening on progress to date on Phase 1 of the #Brexit negotiations with Tánaiste @simoncoveney and Minister @HMcEntee 
So @theresa_may Which part of "The Conservative and Unionist Party" is it that you don't understand? #Brexit #NorthernIreland 
No deal: Theresa May's desperate bid to break Brexit deadlock dramatically torpedoed by DUP 
NB: there’s a constant symbolism in the ineffectiveness/unwillingness of the union to compromise for its existence. This is a recurring historic habit from Irish Home rule to Scottish powers to Brexit. The greatest ally of its failure has been the State & nationalism 
Harder Brexit then.  
It's been said, but each of the border constituencies in Northern Ireland voted by large margins to Remain in last year's #Brexit vote.  
Do the Tories not get that their revolutionary zeal over Brexit has played right into our hands on the radical left? They can't really pin us down as the harbingers of chaos and a colossal risk anymore, can they? Oops. 
Sadiq Khan shit stirring as usual. Thinks he’s running the country now. #Brexit  
Darren Clarke really pissed off with Theresa May #Brexit All credit to him.  
We're apparently going for a Hokey fucking Cokey #Brexit.  
@TwopTwips Experience the thrill of attempting to negotiate a successful Brexit, by trying to saw your own legs off with a radish. 
Didn’t take long for #DUP to sink the #brexit deal (see my previous tweet)!Confusion and delusion reign! 
Nicola Sturgeon says if NI gets "special status" in Brexit deal there's "no practical reason" why Scotland shouldn't too - otherwise would be "doubly disadvantaged" outside single market  
There is no way to preserve stability between Ireland and the north without the whole UK staying in the customs union. @Theresa_May said she won't go with this. But then again she said they'd be no snap election. Assume from scrapping Brexit, this seems the only solution 
When faced with EU demands to date on Brexit, May has given in.When faced with DUP demands to date on vote deal, May has given in.We will now perhaps see the solution to a fascinating philosophical-political problem as May now faces concurrent conflicting demands from both. 
We've been briefed by the Taoiseach and are supportive of the Government's approach on Brexit talks. The draft text provides a necessary backstop guarantee supporting the Good Friday Agreement and a friction less Irish border. #brexitwithoutborders 
A referendum that was ADVISORY, based on lies (350m for NHS), possibly funded by dirty Russian or at least offshore money. I'd take a second referendum, but prefer MPs doing best for constituents and #stopbrexit#stopbrexitnow 
Cheerio chaps. If you fancy smashing the fuck out this whole Brexit thing while I'm away that would be lovely. 
Met with PM @theresa_may. I was ready to present draft EU27 guidelines tomorrow for #Brexit talks on transition and future. But UK and Commission asked for more time. It is now getting very tight but agreement at December #EUCO is still possible. 
Indyref 2It's the most rational and only option for us nowThis Brexit lark and UKgov are an absolute clusterfuck 
Well, Jeremy Hunt said yesterday “if there’s no May, there’s no Brexit”. Things are looking up. 
Brexit: May has three choices, all of which break her   
The noise you hear is a very large penny dropping. Unbelievably enough, for many supposedly in charge of brexit this has only today got real. 
Heads up @NicolaSturgeon BUT @DUPleader is clear - there will be no regulatory alignment between Northern Ireland and the EU post Brexit. Keep your nose out of our business.  
One fundamental difference on Brexit is EU27 have adopted long-term positions they have kept, and UK adopted improvised positions it could not:- A50 by royal prerogative- no sequencing- go and whistle- no ECJ jurisdiction- non-disclosure of analyses- security non coopetc 
#Watch IPOB Brazil yesterday 3rd Dec 2017, the battle is not yet over #Biafra or Nothing,Keep Calm support #Biafra Referendum  
Republic of Ireland to veto a hard border #brexit whilst the DUP veto a no border #brexit. Get out of that one with your regained sovereignty. 
Oi Theresa May! It's time for the UK to WALK AWAY...... from this basket-case Brexit. 
Extraordinary. What a shambles. Our government, and a Brexit deal, being held to ransom by a handful of MP’s who are completely opposed to the ‘will of the people’ of NI, who voted to Remain  
My friend from Bulgaria living in London for 2.5 years: "Brexit is turning into a real shitshow: Scotland, Wales and mayor of London saying they have also should remain in the single market lol!. I left the Balkans yet here I am again." 
If you're worried about #Brexit talks breaking down today don't be. We just need to bung the gay hating creationists another £billion or two & we'll be fine to move on to the next concession. They lead a minority party in a province of barely a million people but hey democracy..! 
Country disunites behind Theresa May's latest Brexit plan - our favourite reaction online  
tfw ur Brexit strategy comes off...  
Republic of Ireland is now geo-politically stronger than the UK precisely because of the EU.  Can you imagine the Tories dealing with China, post-Brexit? 
Only way to resolve the Irish border issue is for the whole of UK to stay in the Single Market & Customs Union. Prime Minister shouldn’t be afraid to admit she’s thought again and changed her mind. #Brexit 
Should European powers covering #Scotland be moved to#Holyrood or #Westminster after #brexit (if it ever actually happens)?Give where can or will vote & your choice(rUK = If you can vote in UK elections, but outside #Scotland)Lastly, give it a RT pleaseCheers 
After June 2016 I thought Brexit was inevitable After June 2017 I thought there was a 20% chance it would be stoppedThis morning I thought 30/35% chance Now I am thinking approaching 50%But must be the people’s decision in a 2nd ref. Must not be an elite fix. 
It's always about independence. Always. Everything she says about Brexit is really about independence. Everything.  
Brexit means Brexit**Subject to terms and conditions. Offer excludes NI. 
Brexit negotiations ‘absolutely critical for the future of the island of Ireland’ – @MaryLouMcDonald  
I can’t remember a news day as amusing as this in all of #Brexit so far.Almost as delicious as that famous Brexit  
Lots of people joked that DUP should be allowed to run the Brexit negotiations with Brussels. Looks like it's happening now. 
FM @NicolaSturgeon : if a special Brexit deal is possible for Northern Ireland (effectively keeping it in single market) it should be possible for Scotland too  
Theresa May ‘in office but not in power’ - the DUP - in power but not in office #Brexit 
What actually should happen now is...May attempts to impose reasonable but unacceptable measures on DUP who withdraw frm confidence & supply arrangemnt Tory Govt fallsElection calledSomeone (Labour sans Corbyn + libdems) finally run on remain platform #brexit toast 
Brexit is why the world is now laughing at us. We are like a drunken man trying repeatedly to jump on top of an extremely slippery elephant. 
No, voters have not changed their minds on Brexit  
Eventual Brexit outcome:United Ireland,Independent Scotland, Wales also part of Ireland,Cornwall part of Belgium,Independent Pimlico,Holy Roman Empire of the Midlands,and the UK left with a small rock off the Sussex coast, and it's somehow still part of the EU. 
It's now or never for the Tory and Labour Remainers. You are larger in number than the hard Brexit factions in your parties and DUP. But need to flex your muscles and take on your leaders for good of the country. Or shut up. 
It seems that UK Government today were prevented from reaching a Phase 1 #brexit deal due to the concerns of the #DUP, a Party that has a 36% vote share in a region that contains around 2.7% of the entire UK population, and its the #EU with the democratic deficit is it? 
I did this on Mastodon after @hollyamory talked about "what if Gilbert & Sullivan wrote an operetta about Brexit" and thought it deserved a wider audience.(For those who can't read image text it's on my TL @stealthmunchkin@mastodon.social )  
LRT: yes! I've been worried recently watching some people on the left talking about Brexit as though it's a fait accompli, or a sideshow, or some woolly centrist distraction. The harm it'll do to ordinary working people is unimaginable: it needs the strongest possible opposition. 
The DUP will back Brexit if the following terms are met:1. JimMcDonald back in Corrie by next week, so it is.2. Burn the negatives of Jurassic Park, 1million Years BC, The Flintstones and all films featuring ‘dinosaur lies’. 3. Cryogenic reanimation of Frank Carson. 
REMINDER: The DUP was the only major political group in Northern Ireland to oppose the Good Friday Agreement. #Brexit 
Once again hardline Ulster protestant identity politics is tail wagging English Tory dog. If May gives into the "Ulster Will Fight and Ulster Will be Right" mindset - just 10 out of 650 MPs - what leadership can she offer on other aspects of Brexit? 
Does anyone seriously think Corbyn would be any better at this Brexit malarkey than May? It's always going to be a game of Russian roulette with every cartridge of the gun loaded. 
Regardless of your views on Brexit, it is now more clear than ever just how wrong the claim that First Past the Post stops smaller parties from exerting undue influence really is  
It looks to me like the Tories are trying to make their government collapse, so they can use their 'Get out of Brexit, free' card. Like the one Cameron used the day after the referendum.  
Brexit is in the hands of a hardline party representing the votes of just 0.9% of the British public. Our electoral system is broken. #MakeVotesMatter 
SDLP Leader @columeastwood speaking as negotiations continue says the SDLP continues to make the case that the only way to avoid a hard border and a hard #Brexit on the island of Ireland is to maintain membership of the Single Market and the Customs Union.  
Will @simoncoveney allow a minority party from a minority community in a state containing a 5th of Ireland veto a #Brexit deal governing the future of the EU. They should know its this or deal with Corbyn as British PM. 
Dutch saying if NI stay in Customs Union then UK has to. Dutch now expect UK to stay. Commentators say if UK stay in Customs Union Britain hasnt left EU so what was the point of #Brexit. Exactly if EU gets it why cant our lot? 
This interactive diagram showing the possible outcomes of Brexit is just excellent. A triumph of simplicity, clarity and elegance. A must-bookmark reference!  
The irony. DUP set to block compromise. May's lack of a majority after election could lead to a harder Brexit. 
I've set up a new kickstarter, and if 292,316 people sign up we will have the same voting representation as the DUP and will sell our vote in the imminent 2nd EU referendum for £1b, netting a tidy £3,417 for everyone! (after i take a £1m snout-in-trough fee)#DoADealWithTheresa 
So if NI given special status to remain in EU then Scotland and Wales want it too ... does anyone  in UK actually want to leave? #Brexit 
A British Tragic Comedy the DUP now running the whole country. Mrs May has been out manoeuvred and outclassed by Arlene Foster.Stop this Brexit madness now Mrs May.#FBPE 
Here's that DUP #Brexit press conference  
Just for good measure Sammy Wilson lays into #Varadkar "Will part of the UK be treated differently just because bureaucrats in Brussels demand it or because of cynical abuse by the Irish PM" #Brexit #DUP 
Do you want the UK to strike a deal for #Brexit or no deal? - UK and EU fail to strike Brexit talks deal RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
DUP Brexit spokesman Sammy Wilson once openly supported the call for ethnic cleansing of Catholics from Northern Ireland. Now he and his fellow loons have power to derail some of the most delicate negotiations in recent European history.  
Eu diplomat tells me: the EU is on standby now for UK internal politics to play out .. again #Brexit 
No-one knows what’s going on now, one EU diplomat told me #Brexit 
Just asked the PM on way into Tusk meeting if the DUP has derailed today’s deal... no answer... but the German finance minister Altmaier was more loquacious says he’s dealing with Brexit “every day” 
The way Theresa May and her Tory cabinet have handled #brexit; it proves one thing Britain is not a meritocracy. 
Amazing what one Phone call can do...? #ArleneFoster @DUPleader a REAL LEADER with courage of her conviction for the SUPPORT of #BRITISH UNION! #Traitor @theresa_may needs to GO! #BBC #SKY #NEWS @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress @ConHome #ConservativeParty #BREXIT #DUP 
OK. So far, wanting 'special' Brexit exemptions we've got:CornwallGrimsbyWalesStoke-on-TrentTynesideWalesScotlandLondonScientistsUniversitiesFootballersBankersBaristasFarmersBuildersEasier to stay and give 'special' exemptions to hard brexiteers to leave? 
DUP’s Sammy Wilson on UK government’s SM & CU concession: “This is mad negotiating!” Big Brexit trouble brewing over Northern Ireland. If only someone had told us before June 2016.... pic.twitter.com/eSrvKqyDTc 
David Blevins on Sky News just said the DUP have "thrown a hand grenade into the negotiations" must be from the Ulster Resistance stockpile #Border #Brexit 
Will somebody in the Tory party please tell May to go - she's totally out of touch with reality and doesn't seem to realise what damage she's doing to Brexit and UK  
Unbelievable comment from DUP spokesperson Sammy Wilson - called the Irish government 'political chancers using Brexit to their advantage' - OH THE IRONY!  
From an optimistic start to a confusing end. Disappointing that a deal could not be done today. #Brexit 
UK Government in total disarray. They briefed hard that a Brexit deal was close, they then rowed back after DUP press conference and now saying no deal. What a shambles. 
No Brexit agreement between EU and Britain after May-Juncker meeting  
No Brexit deal reached today after major DUP intervention  
Nobody voted for division in the UK at last year's referendum. Please RT:  
Brexit is completely deliverable. But not on the terms that were promised to the British people, and which were narrowly backed on 23rd June. Now these promises are being shown to be impossible, the proponents are blaming Remainers. But it’s their mess.  
A Brexit referendum to unite Britain may destroy the Union & result in sovereign city states within the country. Well done, everyone. 
Not heard a single U.K. media outlet lead with reminding U.K. public that NI voted to stay in the EU. It’s all focus on DUP as lead voice without any accountability on their position. NI is being silenced & yet again presented as a monolith. #Brexit #IrishBorder 
Best advert for a united Ireland? Watching the shambles that is the British government. #Brexit 
Whatever the outcome of Brexit,  Northern Ireland, single market etc,  I hope it brings down Theresa May & her coalition of chaos . Brexit or no Brexit, Theresa May and her coalition of chaos will continue to make austerity cuts leaving the poor poorer and rich richer. 
The best thing about the Brexit debacle: the world has seen the ugly face of these political bedfellows - the North’s Unionism and England’s Far Right Extremism (NF, Combat 18 , Britain First etc). They have exposed themselves as regressive Neanderthals 
Brexit latest:- No breakthrough in Brussels- Irish border remains an issue- May says more talks needed 
Prime Minister @theresa_may remains confident following today's #Brexit negotiations  
"On a couple of issues, some differences do remain" - UK PM Theresa May on failure to reach deal with EU in #Brexit talks  
Everything about the past few days in #Brexit was predicted.It's a consequence of Leave being allowed to operate in a fog.The media are culpable in this, as they allowed Leave to jump from one position to another to avoid any actual exit details  
UK PM Theresa May says she is "confident" Brexit talks will conclude positively, although some differences remain  
It’s almost like Brexit is the stupidest idea anyone’s ever come up with. 
BREAKING: NO BREXIT DEAL TODAY. 
UK PM Theresa May and European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker confirm UK and EU have not reached agreement on first phase of #Brexit deal  
European Commission president Jean-Claude Juncker says no agreement has been reached between the EU and the UK on Brexit following a meeting with Prime Minister Theresa May 
If Northern Ireland and Scotland are allowed to stay in the single market, we demand the same for #Yorkshire.#Brexit  
Pound drops as no agreement reached today on Brexit talks  
I think Theresa May is so incompetent that she  doesn't understand that just like an egg, you can't have one portion of #Brexit hard and the other soft. #NorthernIreland 
As I predicted earlier - it’s only England -  without London - that now wants to be in Brexit. That should work just fine…. 
Of all the unedifying Brexit shambology of the last 18 months, the UK having to back out of its own proposals is right up there 
Reports suggest Theresa May has agreed that NI will be officially renamed ‘The North of Ireland’ after #Brexit 
But if the DUP and Brexiteers don't agree to what has been suggested today the most likely outcome of all this remains a No Deal Brexit. 
Theresa May and Jean-Claude Juncker are making a joint statement on Brexit progress  
Remember :  The referendum did not define Brexit. Under pressure from leavers in her party Theresa May decided it meant no single market, no customs union, no Norway or Swiss model. Her interpretation is an opinion that could be changed by parliament or an election 
A sterling story in two acts today - first rallying on "Brexit deal is close" reports, now tumbling on "No Brexit deal today" reports  
I think the next referendum should be on whether we get rid of the moon or not. Lot of people fed up with the big, shiny, night-time bastard. LOT of people. 
T May seeking to paper over the Brexit cracks with evasive words in order to move forward. T Blair did the same with his UN resolution pre Iraq. But in the end evasive words postpone the volcanic eruption and do not prevent it from happening. 
Insane. Just heard Peter Lilley ex Tory MP on Sky News say that the Irish, Scots and London Mayor are grand standing and the Irish position is borne of "playing to nationalists due to the election" - Amazeballs  #Brexit #IrishBorder 
No deal today I’ve just been told #brexit 
I've solved #brexit everyone. Anyone that voted brexit gets a blue passport, their freedom of movement curtailed and free kippers. The rest of us will carry on as normal. You're welcome 
"What a fool I was. I was only a puppet, and so was Ulster, and so was Ireland, in the political game that was to get the Conservative Party into power." - Lord Carson, 1921.  Arlene, you should have known it would end this way. #Brexit 
The Government must NOT cave in on yet another EU demand. The DUP are right - Brexit must not damage the economic and political integrity of the UK. 
Christian Adams - Theresa May, Brexit and the Irish Border problem  - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
I just can't decide which of these is the most meaningless & idiotic:A. Brexit means BrexitB. We will make a success of itC. Deep & special relationshipD. For the many, not the fewE. A Brexit that works for everyoneF. Love Europe, hate the EUPlease, can you help me choose? 
Beginning to look like DUP are set to sink prospect of any breakthrough in Brexit talks 
Brexit bias means the public are losing respect for journalists! 
As long as the Tories are in government there won't be another referendum on #brexit which is why I think there should be a general election b/c Theresa May and her lot are out of their depths. 
So let me get this straight, We're leaving the EU but we're going to have to keep absolutely everything exactly the same to keep both parts of Ireland happy, so it's going to cost 50 billion fucking quid to stop having a say in the EU regulations we'll have to abide by? #Brexit 
EU has been trying to "bounce" Theresa May into a #Brexit deal that suits Brussels and not the UK, says DUP's Sammy Wilson  
I am white.I was born in England.I speak English.WHY THE HELL DO I FEEL LIKE AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT IN MY OWN COUNTRY?Answers on a postcard addressed to 10 Downing Street.#brexit 
Arlene Foster "We have been very clear. Northern Ireland must leave EU on same terms as the rest of UK.The economic & constitutional integrity of UK will not be compromised in any way.Her Majesty’s Government understands the DUP position#Brexit #EU #DUP 
So as Labour in London try to protect London from hard Brexit... same in Wales... but in not a whisper from Leonard or any Slab MPs or MSPs. The Branch Office is as useless as ever. 
If you voted for Brexit so you could "take back control", did you expect the Tory government would take that control and use it to make you generally worse off and probably even poorer? It isn't too late to change your mind. Take back control and #StopBrexit 
Northern Ireland offered it ...but DUP says they don't want it... Scotland and Wales NOT offered it but very much want it..... it's going well this Brexit thing, isn't it? 
The United Kingdom voted to leave; it wasn’t a constituency by constituency, or city by city vote, it was for the entire UK. That’s how a nation wide referendum works  
Congratulations to PPP’s Amanullah and Shabab Bokhari in Islamabad for winning the CDA referendum tonight! #50Years0fPPP 
Spot on.U don’t need a planet sized brain to work out effectively staying in SM & CU delivers Brexit & strong economy for everyone in UK.  
The #PM @theresa_may worked to undermine #Brexit from the start. Delayed #Article50 for months, paying the #EU #Billions when the #UK owes nothing! Now pushing #Brexit deal so bad, it is encouraging calls to #Remain, Her Ultimate Goal! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives #TORY @CCHQPress 
#Brexit - For all those falling for the leftist press game today...1) @theresa_may has not betrayed us2) The @Conservatives have not sold us down the river3) Overturning the government would see our economy utterly sunk 4) Keep your powder dry! 
Handy guide to working out which commentators chat total BS about Brexit: see if they've retweeted Sadiq / Sturgeon / Carwyn uncritically today. 
What the debate over NI and Scotland's Brexit experience raises is... is the United Kingdom united by consent... or by force? 
Think about it. If Scotland stays in the single market, it means all our goods would go through Scottish ports. No longer have to be transported through England. Win/win. #Brexit 
The great irony of #brexit is that never before has the EU had more control over the fate of the UK @NewStatesman 
More people are realising that Brexit is trashing our NHS and healthcare -- from EU nurses leaving, to EMA gone, to £1bn extra costs (fallen £), to less money from weaker economy, Euratom & medical isotopes, research frameworks & cross-border healthcare hurt. 
Et voila, part 3.(following @NicolaSturgeon for Scotland, @SadiqKhan for London). #Brexit  
BREXIT UPDATE: Everyone now has their own border. The country makes no sense. Going to tesco for milk is now an international trade deal.  Help us. 
Time to check in and see how Brexit’s going ...  
Because the state of world politics  - Trump, North Korea, Brexit - is too screwed up for me to cope with, I have decided to focus all my fury and angst on THIS. It's just a bloody horrible, gut churning, infuriating outrage...  
Hard Brexit isn't only a threat to jobs, rights & future wealth, but to the UK’s territorial integrity. If we don’t want a border in Northern Ireland, the whole of the UK must stay in the single market & customs union. 
As the UK and the EU try to reach #Brexit agreement, live updates from the talks in Brussels 
DUP making lot of noise about Brexit border deal but they can't pull the plug on May as it would lead to their nightmare of nightmares: Jeremy Corbyn as PM. 
We're not doing a best of 3 here. Cameron went to the EU (did a poor job) asked for changes, nothing really worth changing so the referendum happened. We don't do a best out of 3 during elections. If people don't turn out, you still have to go with majority. 
Leavers blaming Remainers for their bad Brexit is just bloody stupid. The failure of Brexit is down to the incompetence of the Quitteratti, that means you too Mr Bickley, it's all down to you, it's your Brexit, you own it.  
really looking forward to the referendum in 2037 on england’s application to join the celtic federation 
Former Brexit minister David Jones' proposal for avoiding a Northern Ireland border: "It's very simple, we just refuse". Suggests "technology" will sort it out. 
Imagine being Alexandra Burke, knocking your pan in, week after week, for the Great British public to put you in the bottom two cos you don't display your emotions correctly enough for them.Fuck this nation, I cannae wait till Brexit and the final nail in the coffin. 
Over 70% of Northern Irish voters do not vote DUP, 56% voted against Brexit, and the DUP cannot form an Executive in Belfast: they do not represent Northern Ireland. 
BREAK: Sky sources - the Prime Minister spoke to Arlene Foster by telephone within minutes of the @DUPleader's statement. If anyone thinks the C&S agreement is not an issue, think again. #Brexit 
Why won’t @fmwales speak up for Wales’s national interests?If a post-Brexit deal is workable for NI, it’s workable for Wales. 
Theresa’s had 27 missed calls from Arlene Foster... #kitileaks #Brexit 
Glad Brexit is proving as straightforward and win-win as promised. 
Things have become a lot clearer:In her infinite wisdom, Theresa May and her Brexit negotiators didn't think it was necessary to keep the DUP in the loop on details of Irish border agreementThis is why DUP issued emergency statement which destroyed EU deal.May is finished. 
wow, can't believe the best solution for the UK post-Brexit is[spins wheel]A Plaid Cymru/Sinn Féin/Lib Dem minority government 
Now Muslim Mayor Sadiq Khan calls for LONDON’S own special Brexit deal after Theresa May’s Ireland pact  
FFS Theresa, it is so bloody simple. Either waste £60billion, keep UK as a whole in SM & CU and retain FOM in EU & EEA, or drop #Brexit. Problem solved and we can all get back to enjoying the run up to Christmas. Thank you. 
Who could have imagined that the ill conceived and poorly executed Brexit by an incompetent Government would lead to endless problems in Scotland and damage the integrity of the United Kingdom? Who the fuck knew I ask you? pic.twitter.com/7faR9KbQer 
Irish MEP @MaireadMcGMEP says she's not surprised by some of the criticism Ireland has faced from UK politicians during #Brexit talks  
"Why should Scotland have a terrible deal and Ireland a good deal?" The SNP Is Demanding The Same Brexit Concessions As Northern Ireland  via @JamieRoss7 
The legacy of my Brexit of 1534 -- my treasure fattened & a landscape filled with, let's be honest, beautiful ruins. A big win for everyone!  
Now the Welsh want a Brexit opt out too  
Welcome to the era of brutal Brexit trade-offs. Please the Irish & you upset the Northern Irish & the Scots who want the same deal for them & the Brexiteers. Every decision from now will please one group only to bitterly disappoint another. 
Solution to current EU/Brexit talks.1. Northern Ireland and Scotland stay in the EU2. Rest of the UK - has a quick civil war 
If Theresa May really has effectively said part of the U.K can stay in the customs union and single market after Brexit then Scotland and other parts of the U.K who voted remain will rightly be asking "why can't we then?", you couldn't get a more "bespoke" deal then that! 
#SOROS ally and all-around arsehole Tony Blair Admits He Is Actively Working to Reverse Brexit!      #fo2eu 
We now go live to Brexit  
This. So much this. Remember the current debate in the Brexit negotiations is about whether we've made "sufficient progress" - a term that deliberately has *no technical definition at all*.   
Border negotiation latest: Now the DUP vows to block any Brexit deal which separates Northern Ireland from the rest of the UK  
EEA-Efta is still the best solution. It keeps the UK intact while resolving most of the NI issues. It formally takes us out of the EU while preserving the economic collaboration. It is also the best and fairest compromise. #Brexit 
96years ago nearly to the day (6 Dec), the Irish delegation is in Hans Place when they received Lloyd George’s ultimatum. Thinking how strange a moment today must be for @NChildersMEP & all her colleagues in Brussels! #brexit 
Huge "if" rather. @theresa_may has *not* conceded that NI would remain in CU/SM. The "alignment" language is a classic #EU fudge. Compromise on both sides, but Ireland definitely climbed down from demanding hard guarantees. Only final #Brexit deal will spell it out - in 2019.  
Making brexit difficult wouldn’t really be karma unless we invaded Britain, murdered everyone, starved the rest, gave away their land, implemented penal laws, banned the speaking of English, deported more people to free up land, renamed London DerryLondon but it’s a start 
We need a hard man like @realDonaldTrump in charge of our country. He's man who understands the importance of hard work, determination and industry. He would get us the hard brexit we all want 
Belgian MEP confirms May has COLLAPSED on Brexit and has given EU exactly what it wants  
Decisions, decisions.... #Brexit #IrishBorder 
Theresa May dealing with Brexit  
Having offered NI Single Mkt and CU they cannot refuse Scotland the same .If they do it has to be a referendum 
STOP! STOP! STOP! THIS Brexit bollocks has gone too far! It becomes more staggeringly stupid every day. Mrs May and her fuckwit Brexiteer cohorts become more ludicrous every day. WE are getting ANGRIER every day. Let's stop and have another referendum NOW! Enough is enough! pic.twitter.com/JKaH8mvIKw 
Both Northern Ireland and Scotland voted to remain in European Union. If NI can effectively stay in the single European market there is no reason Scotland can’t as well #Brexit  
It's a year after Trump was elected & 18 months after we voted for Brexit and the political establishment is STILL trying to sabotage both.Let that sink in. 
I'm told An Taoiseach can't make his statement yet because he's waiting on a phonecall from Donald Tusk. But Tusk can't phone Varadkar because he waiting to hear from Jean Claude Juncker. #Brexit They need a WhatsApps group! 
UK taxpayer propped up the Irish economy with at least £20,000,000,000 since 2008 crash.If Irish Gov want to sabotage our  #Brexit we should ask immediately for a full repayment.See how they like that?Two can play hard ball.But you need balls to do it. 
Brexit means brexit!**Terms & conditions apply. Offer not available in NI 
I'd say it was David Cameron taking a gamble in trying to heal divisions, and appease Eurosceptics, in the Conservative Party that led directly to the referendum, not Nigel Farage. 
Today's Brexit buzzword(s) - 'regulatory alignment'  
DUP will pull plug on Tory government, snap election will mean Unionist majority up north gets smashed. We are now firmly on the path to a United Ireland. #Brexit 
The great thing about Brexit is that by the time it is sorted all the people who voted for it will be dead and all the people who didn’t want it will get all the benefits. Hooray! 
Here's a plan we prepared earlier - Scotland in Europe #brexit  
Regardless of your views on the ultimate merits of Brexit, the fundamental problem to date has been the continued failure of the UK government to treat Brexit as if it were complex, rather than simple.ends/ 
The Remain campaign could have saved everyone a lot of trouble if they'd had the slogan "Just so you know, Brexit would be a massive ballache." 
It feels like Mrs May has emotionally checked out of this country. She must see the damage that Brexit is doing to it, but it is clear she doesn't care. 
.@theSNP's @StephenGethins: "If a (special Brexit) deal can be done for Northern Ireland, then there is no reason why we can't look at something for Scotland aswell."  
 “Will there be a #Brexit breakthrough?” 
Nicola Sturgeon is right. Remain areas should remain in the Single Market. Leave areas can go and..... enjoy their bold new buccaneering offshore global future.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
2. If you're not into Brexit politics this is going to sound completely mad but... May might agree today that N Ireland can basically be like Norway (high alignment model) before the cabinet has decided if the rest of the country is going to be Norway or Canada (low alignment) 
Brexit is about to fall to bits thanks to two things the Brexiteers don’t understand: the truth and reality. 
The one crucial thing to know about Brexit is that it is complex.From this two important things flow./1 
Brexit means... ever closer union (for North and Republic Ireland)  
Huge ramifications for London if Theresa May has conceded that it's possible for part of the UK to remain within the single market & customs union after Brexit. Londoners overwhelmingly voted to remain in the EU and a similar deal here could protect tens of thousands of jobs. 
Leaked draft agreement shows Northern Ireland can opt out of some parts of Brexit  
Support for Scottish independence surges amid Brexit chaos  
#Brexit Worth reminding ourselves of the joint letter from then FM/DFM Foster and McGuinness to Theresa May re the triggering of Art.50 in August 2016 and stating that NI "region is unique" and ease of trade with EU members states must be retained:  
If @theresa_may betrays the Unionists & Leavers in Northern Ireland by making a treacherous, cowardly #Brexit deal with EU/RoI on the border, the DUP will go from loyal partners to unforgiving ones. And it will not end well for her. 
Could someone wake up the politicians and tell them there are only 2 solutions to Brexit and NI border issue - stay in the Single Market & Customs Union or #Remain. 
'BREXIT is not the answer to social injustice that many poor #Leave voters wanted. On the contrary, #BREXIT is a deepening part of a continuing problem.' #stopbrexit =#ToriesOut = #solveUKpoverty. Simples. 
Can someone please give Arlene her periodic reminder that she is *not* First Minister & the DUP do *not* speak on behalf of Northern Ireland? That would be great, thanks  #Brexit #NorthernIreland 
Looks like the shit is truly hitting the fan. This Brexit national suicide on the part of the UK government is proving to be a disaster for all concerned. And for what? What's the prize at the end of it all? Isolation, lost trade, economic ruin, financial chaos, a divided nation. 
Arlene Foster must have missed the memo where it states she is no longer First Minister and has no authority to tell others what the people of NI want regarding Brexit or anything for that matter. 
The DUP is the biggest supporter of NI having different laws from GB on abortion, marriage equality, selective schools and much more. There is no great Unionist principle against this sensible compromise deal. #Brexit 
》The latest EU/UK compromise on Northern Ireland proves that Brexit is unworkable.》If the DUP removes its support, we will have a new general election.》How could Labour possibly enter that election on a Brexit platform and hope to win? 
Arlene Foster flanked by her DUP MPs at Stormont as May-Juncker lunch occurring: “we wil not accept any sort of regulatory divergence...the Govt/ PM understands that there will be no border in the Irish Sea ... want to see a sensible Brexit”  
Theresa May is a globalist and will attempt to water down Brexit until it becomes barely any different to remaining in the EU.We need Brexiteers to lead Brexit. 
"Northern Ireland must leave the EU on the same terms as the rest of the UK, we will not accept any form of regulatory divergence" - DUP leader Arlene Foster on #Brexit talks  
The UK is going to end up going through all the incredible expense, trouble and years of Brexit to end up with regulatory alignment with the EU instead of non-divergence from the EU."Taking back control" 
I have received many hand written letters this past week from Brits living in the EU who are in complete turmoil about their lives changing because of Brexit. Keep sending these letters to MEPs. They could make a difference @BritishInEurope 
I am sure Tony Blair makes good choices for breakfast. But after you are instrumental in helping to kill 1/2 million Iraqis in a war based on bullshit which then set the mid east aflame; you don't get to act the sage politician on #brexit.  
Foster says DUP will not accept any regulatory divergence from rest of the UK - this is why final wording of text SO important - No 10 knows they can't get any of their Brexit legislation through without them 
DUP says nope, not happening.  NI must leave EU on same terms as rest of UK.  May needs their votes.  Sword of Damocles hanging over her by a thread. #brexit TBC... 
Scotland and Northern Ireland both voted Remain, that's 2 out of 4. At the very least that calls for compromise from hard brexit but the UK government treats Scotland with such contempt as a mere colony they won't even give us that. 
Our second edition @EveningStandard - progress in Brexit talks as UK appears to concede that Northern Ireland will keep closer to Irish/EU rules than rest of UK. Quite a win for Dublin.  
We need someone to give us the Brexit we 17.4 million voted for. It is now clear the @Conservatives and @theresa_may have betrayed us. Your country needs you back in front line politics. 
Nicola Sturgeon says Scotland should also be allowed to opt out of parts of Brexit if Northern Ireland can  
Why @Number10gov is today taking the political risk of her life with her Brexit offer to EU  
Scotland is a country in its own right, One country in a supposed "union of equals" , if England is able to outvote the other 3 on every single issue they like , how is that a union of equals? The Brexit vote is flawed in that it assumes there's a one size fits all approach. 
The idea that Wales can’t have the same special status as NI “because it voted for Brexit” makes no sense - the SM and CU were not on the ballot paper, our Government has explicitly stated it wants access to both, and polls show the Welsh public agrees  
Sammy Wilson's threat that DUP would use the Executive to block continuation of CU & SM in North, post-Brexit, is further evidence of how the DUP would abuse power-sharing. It has learnt nothing. Strengthens the case for no resumption of Assembly. 
I get this taste of sick in my mouth when  Tony Blair fights against #Brexit under the banner “So when the facts change, I think people are entitled to change their mind.”- considering he kept the true facts on Iraq from us to go to war.  
Here we go, good for you ScotlandThe SNP Is Demanding The Same Brexit Concessions As Northern Ireland  via @JamieRoss7#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Pulls out copy of @scotgov document “Scotland’s place in Europe” on differentiated #Brexit deal for Scotland  
The way this Brexit/Ireland thing is going, I want an Independent Scotland NOW! @theSNP 
Soooo, DUP, what do you do?Back the deal May has brokered with Coveney and Varadkar? And look like you open the door to splitting the UK?Or withdraw support for May, lose your promised £1bn, meaning UK might need an election and Corbyn might win?#Brexit 
So far as I can see everyone is going to have special terms to get them out of this Brexit nightmare except good old little England. 
Government must ensure that skilled #technicians are eligible to work in the UK following #Brexit  
Brexit SolutionUnited Kingdom of London, Scotland, Gibraltar and Northern Ireland to remain in EU.Brexitland to leave the EU.(Parts of Brexitland may vote over time to join the new UK in local referendums, as Overland Territories.) 
It's almost as if the Brexit dudes didn't think this through...  
That’s one - a big one - of many reasons such a consession would be Tory madness. Anyway, the UK and S. Ireland never wanted a border, the only entity demanding one is the EU Commission. Why are we dancing to their tune - the whole point if #Brexit is to end that malarkey. #UKIP 
Brexit in a nutshell: a mirage of "taking back control" in order to replicate exactly what we already have, but under much more time-consuming, more expensive and worse terms. But hey, at least John Redwood gets to say we're a "sovereign nation" again or whatever.  
Oh Vadadkar and Coveney, what *have* you done?#Brexit  
“Do they know it’s Brexit time at all?”  
The UK government trying to solve Brexit problems is like some nightmarish, endless whack-a-mole where getting rid of one creates ten others. 
If we concede “regulatory alignment” in Ireland, and there can be no border within the UK, then surely this dramatically curtails scope for UK free trade agreements with others like US? #Brexit  
Northern Ireland to become part of Schrödinger's Customs Union #Brexit  
QUALITY: Wetherspoon print 500,000 beer mats highlighting big business lies and how food prices can be reduced thanks to Brexit. Legends! @jdwtweet  
If this Brexit agreement holds, Northern Ireland could eventually have completely different rules and regulations from the rest of the UK. Does everyone understand that this is the price for this narrow form of hard Brexit? 
At govt buildings for Brexit briefing from An Taoiseach 
Can we all just take a moment to reflect on the fact that the DUP brought this on themselves. And were too stupid to realise the full implications of Brexit.  
Brexit deal agreed on all Irish issues: Irish govt. sources  
Scoreline on Brexit negotiations looks like EU 3 - UK 0. When will we accept that leaving is both pointless and potentially calamitous? 
Who can forget Enda Kenny 'seismic deal ' on bank debt which was a figment of his imagination, that cost us dearly .#brexit 
BBC1 9 PM “Brexit means Brexit” (except N. Ireland) 
If Northern Ireland can stay in CU/SM effectively can only expect Scottish and Welsh governments to demand the same. Today sounds like brexit rhetoric  has hit cold reality 
WATCH: @Alison_McGovern asks if we really want to move away from a European model that has worked for Britain or risk a hard Brexit preferred by Nigel Farage.  
The gap between early Brexit swagger of ministers and the inevitable concessions on cash, Irish border and sequence of talks is darkly comic and tragic.. with much more to come. 
Irish foreign minister Simon Coveney says the UK and EU are very close to agreeing a deal on the Irish border and the border will look like it looks today after Brexit 
So Theresa May's "Breakthrough" with the EU means the "Breakup" of the UK.Thanks Brexit.  
If Northern Ireland gets a soft Brexit, what happens to Scotland?  
MPs today will vote again on amendments to the Repeal Bill. MPs must respect the mandate of the referendum as they vote on these amendments.  
Simon Coveney says the border will look like it looks today after Brexit and discussions are moving in the right direction 
BREAKING: UK and EU reach comprehensive Brexit deal on Irish issues. 
So Northern Ireland votes (54/46) to remain in EU and seems to be, in all but name, getting its way. Scotland votes (62/38) to remain and gets told eat yer cereal. Union of equals? #brexit #indyref 
Feel like this might come back to haunt Farage.... #brexit  
Wales was promised we wouldn't be poorer as a result of #Brexit.If its good enough for Northern Ireland, its good enough for Wales.  
David Davis previously said Scotland remaining in the single market post #Brexit was simply 'not possible'. Guess we're about to see how that plays out. 
Ooft now we’re looking at closer to €100b Brexit divorce bill. Guess who’s paying for that!!! Scotland voted to remain within the EU but once again we get what England wants. Time to waken the F up #IndyRef  
BREAKING: British and EU negotiators have reached agreement on #Brexit deal for all Irish issues - Irish government sources  
If a referendum on the UK's EU membership was held today how would you vote. RT after voting 
There’s no option to reverse Brexit by saying “let’s just forget the last couple of years” and what 17 million people voted for last year, argues @isaby 
If Northern Ireland is getting a special "non-divergence" deal over Brexit, why can't Scotland? (Reminder: Scottish voters broke 60/40 for remaining in the EU.) 
In NI stays in the Single Market while retaining UK law, it could turn Belfast into one of the continent's biggest financial centres. If NI has the leadership & agility to grasp the opportunity. #Brexit 
#Brexit: Signs agreement on first phase of talks is about to be struck  
If London has agreed to NI remaining in Single Market and CU they better be prepared to offer Scotland the same otherwise the referendum has to called immediately. No ifs,no buts 
50% of the people now back the Liberal Democrat policy of holding a referendum on the final Brexit deal. Are you one of them? Join, sign and RT!  
Why are we sacrificing all of our power and influence at the EU to end up with a shit version of where we were at already? Blue passports? To make Nigel Farage happy? Anyone? #Brexit 
Presumably Theresa May is gambling on the fact that while Ireland has a veto over the #Brexit deal, Scotland does not.But that won't wash with Scots who see parts of the UK treated differently for political not economic reasons. 
For the DUP, funnelling £millions in dark cash into a Brexit that accidentally installs NI in a customs union with ROI is the political equivalent of that bit in Brasseye when Jez North is blasted into space with an 8 year old boy; "tHis IS tHe ONE thinG We DIDN'T waNT to HapPeN" 
Dear David Davis @DavidDavisMP . Please be so kind as to inform me as to the whereabouts of the 58 Brexit Impact Assessments? The ink must surely be dry by now. 
Ok folks, let’s not throw caution to the wind - no one knows the Brit establishment better than us:Let’s see if “continued regulatory alignment” agreed;Let’s see if ECJ has a role;Let’s see if no regression on rights;Let’s see if citizens protected #Brexit is bad for us all  
#Brexit means....  
The implication of this ministerial answer is that, unless UK stays in *every* EU body after #Brexit, the Govt is going to have to create some new public bodies between the end of the negotiations and 29 March 2019. Which is simply not possible. Madness.  
1) Many in the UK are furious at the power they believe was handed to Rep. Ireland over #BrexitThese would be the same people furious about how "powerless" the UK was in the EUPut simply, the UK had too little power, but Ireland has too much 
Brexit means BrexitExcept in Northern Ireland.And Kent, because we need the fruit pickers.And the City, cos we *really* need those taxes.And Grimsby would like to be excused because, well, shit, nobody told them it's hurt.And just wait until we get to Gibraltar. 
Right. It looks like Theresa May might have caved in to no border demands in Ireland, which means there's about to be a massive constitutional showdown between her and Nicola Sturgeon. #brexit 
Tell me why I like Mondays! Encouraged after my phone call with Taoiseach @campaignforleo on progress on #Brexit issue of Ireland. Getting closer to sufficient progress at December #EUCO. 
May has agreed to 'no regulatory divergence' in the island of Ireland. Means a deal today now very likely. But huge implications for future of UK. And (once again) a near total British climbdown. #brexit 
On Brexit divorce bill and now on Irish border question it appears that our ‘strategy’ is to waste months of a finite 24 month negotiating period chastising the EU before bowing to the inevitable right before a deadline and accepting their demands.  
I have long predicted that Reality will collide with Rhetoric and beat it on Brexit.  Today is but one of those days 
Theresa:  Right, we're going to back down on the border and give you what you want.Leo:  Great, glad you're seeing sense.Theresa:  Just one thing.  You have to look silly in a photo to take some of the heat off us.Leo:  No probs.  I have a Comms Unit for this. #Brexit  
What this means is that UK regulations still get set in Brussels. So it's like being in the EU, except that we get no voting rights, have to pay £50bn in severance and have just spent the past 18 months tearing each other apart. #Brexit 
BREAKING: Taoiseach Leo Varadkar to make at statement on the Brexit negotiations at 2:30pm Irish time 
The Irish border to 'remain in regulatory alignment' - meaning soft border, meaning Northern Irleand to remain in Customs Union. DUP won't be happy, Scotland will demand the same arrangement... Tories losing majority? or Brexit crumbling? or both...  
Just over a week after @M_AndersonSF proposed the concept of 'special designated status' for Northern Ireland - we have an apparent deal basically offering a special status for Northern Ireland in the #Brexit talks  
Irish parliament right now #brexit  
Morgan Stanley have told clients there could be another General Election towards the end of 2018, when Theresa May has to admit that she could not get the Brexit deal her party wants.  
Tailored advice will be at the heart of a new #Careers Strategy designed to make sure #youngpeople have the #skills they need & #employers want post-Brexit. Read more  #CareersAdvice 
The next joy which Brexit will provide for us all are endless arguments about the difference between "non-divergence" and "alignment".Wonderful. 
President @JunckerEU just spoke to the Taoiseach Leo Varadkar. @campaignforleo. #Brexit 
Latest: The UK and Ireland have agreed a compromise in Brexit talks, representing a momentous turning point. Here are the details:  
So much for May’s negotiating skills. At 11am the Republic were demanding regulatory alignment for NI from the UK. At 12 that’s exactly what May gave them. Massive Tory Brexit rebellion likely 
I dunno chaps, I'm starting to think that maybe this Brexit thing is undeliverable due to its internal contradictions. 
TUV leader @JimAllister describes "no regulatory convergence" as "a stepping stone to a united Ireland" and "NI remaining in the EU."  Big issues for the DUP today. #Brexit 
Sunderland, Oxford and other car manufacturing centres are also going to need a Northern Ireland style EU deal to ensure Nissan et al stay in the UK. In fact, right now only Norfolk and LIncolnshire might be doing Brexit 
MEPs say UK has conceded on Ireland border in Brexit talks  
I don't think there's any possible Brexit deal that doesn't risk bringing down the government. That's been the problem from the start.  
Reminder that the UK started the Brexit negotiations offering no transition period, 20 billion euros maximum, and no special arrangements for NI. Now it’s 2/3 years transition, 60 billion euros, and special arrangements for NI. The Art Of The Deal, by Theresa May. 
We DON'T need a customs border, we NEED a PEOPLE BORDER, and that's why many people voted for #Brexit in the first place, because our traitor MPs refuse to control our borders, so we killed their fascist #EU dream. #bbcdp 
Positive signs that the case for regulatory alignment seems to be making progress. Two simple ways of achieving this exist: staying in the single market, or just cancelling the whole chaotic Brexit mania.  
Also spoke to @JunckerEU and @eucopresident on the Phase I Brexit negotiations this morning. 
Northern Ireland won’t have a hard border with EU. So, one part of UK which voted against leaving will have a vastly different Brexit to Scotland ... which also voted against leaving and wants to stay in the single market. Beginning to look like a recipe for another Indyref. 
Reminded of Pascal Lamy's line. Biggest misconception about Brexit talks is that this is a negotiation. On every major issue so far: EU sets out its terms; London baulks, says no, lashes out... and then agrees 
Belgian Green MEP Philippe Lamberts, who has seen the draft text of a Brexit deal, tells @faisalislam "I would put my money on it [a deal today]". Says he thinks emerging UK-EU deal means "a special situation for Ireland & for Northern Ireland". 
Cabinet met this morning. I will be making a statement on Phase I Brexit talks later today. 
Two redoubtable Irish ladies make up the guest list tonight @veras1 & @AMDWaters join me. Vera is back with the latest (very good) news on daughter Ava & Anne Marie Waters will be discussing Brexit, free speech, radical Islam and more. Join me from 7 PM on the usual channels 
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar has called other party leaders in for special meeting on Brexit meeting on 1.30pm. @IrishTimes 
Health warning: #Brexit has unleashed xenophobia on one extreme. On another, the triumph of off shore billionaires and dark moneyIt is truly the most disastrous dent in Britain’s reputation in my lifetime - and probably for centuries And #Brexit still hasn’t happened  
Jeffrey Donaldson, DUP chief whip, tells me on suggestion UK has agreed there will be no regulatory divergence on island of Ireland on single market/customs union post-Brexit: "That is not our understanding of the UK Government's position." 
Survation, who were the best pollsters in 2017, have a 16 point lead for another Brexit referendum......... 
We have currently proposed #Brexit special deals for:Northern IrelandCity of London & bankersBut not Scotland & Wales. Why?  
#Brexit “direct effect” UK concessions on ECJ will create a separate legal order, inequality before the law. Expect aquick  supreme court challenge from a Brit Asian or Caribbean asking why they have less rights, different recourse, than a well heeled French banker. It’s poison 
Anyway, I watching a hollywood horror film to distract me from the terror of the world. Me: Argh, why is everyone doing the obviously stupid thing?! This wouldn't happen in real lifeBrain: Are you sure? *memories of Trump/Brexit*Me: ARGH! CURSE YOU BRAIN! 
#BritNat Tories please noteIf there can be a Special EU arrangements for Nothern IrelandThere can be Special EU arrangements for Scotland#Brexit  
That's either the end of Brexit or the end of the UK or both.  
BREAK Britain and the European Union are understood to have agreed a deal to ensure there is no hard border between Northern and Southern Ireland after Brexit 
#Brexit - looks clear that UK will allow courts to refer to ECJ on residency for EU nationals when jurisprudence is unclear or a clash with British citizenship rights 
Brexiters often use a simple and effective tactic in interviews, they motor-mouth lies and disinformation at such a rate that there is no possibility of more than a fraction of them being challenged. Farage is, of course, the prime exponent. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Just in: The UK and Ireland have reached a compromise in Brexit talks  
'London viewed as most innovative tech city in Europe despite Brexit'More:  
Tony Blair confirms he is trying to reverse Brexit as he issues Ireland warning  
Don´t you just love the way Blair is lying & rocking the brexit boat so as to frighten & depress people in the hope they will vote again to get rid of the pain he is inflicting on them. Before you listen to Blair, Google him. That should be more than enough for the average person 
David Davis really is a poor negotiator, it wouldn't surprise me if in the final Brexit deal he signs the UK up to the Euro and the Schengen agreement. 
At Stormont for launch of new pamphlet by @DeclanKearneySF ‘No Return to the Status Quo - Rights, Equality & Respect’ SF Chair says any proposals from Brexit negotiations will be tested against criteria of Special Designated Status for North.  
Ireland is quite right to hold its own during these negotiations. This Tory vanity project of “Brexit”, which was only a vote designed to give Cameron a stronger mandate, is now threatening a very fragile peace agreement. The TORYS must go, if not let’s hope Scotland goes first. 
Seriously, Brexit is worth the economic dismemberment of the United Kingdom ? For gods sake bin the whole mad enterprise now.  
WTF is wrong with Brexiters! They stomp out of the EU in a strop and then they wail and shriek that they are being victimised when they lose its benefits!#StopBrexit #Brexit  
And, again *if* UK has capitulated on the Irish issue then UK has not gained a single concession in the Brexit talks to date.Might as well have accepted all the EU guidelines in April.Eight wasted months against a two-year ticking A50 clock. 
Why would the government agree to a Brexit deal that would immediately bring down the government. 
Other than being stiffed for £50bn and handing control of your trade policy to Dublin, would my British friends say Brexit is going OK-ish? 
If Northern Ireland can stay in the single market, why not Scotland? Bristol? Cornwall? Grimsby? We can't have two classes of economic rights after Brexit  
Leaked draft agreement shows Northern Ireland can opt out of some parts of Brexit  
Pls stand up for us @The3Million @BritishInEurope at the negotiating table with @DavidDavisMP & @theresa_may. Do not forget that 16M+++ UK citizens did not vote for #Brexit. A democracy never ignores a minority, especially not a HUGE one! 
Second Brexit referendum has 16-point lead as half of Britons back new vote, opinion poll showsIf you are part of the quarter of population who voted Remain but  aren't convinced by need for a #FinalSay my message is: don't give up! We can #StopBrexit 
A new game of #Brexit semantics begins:Question. What is the difference between "continued regulatory alignment" and "no regulatory divergence" h/t @tconnellyRTE 
So we may have at last part of the answer to the question of "what does Brexit mean"?If - if - reports are correct, Brexit means part of the UK in effect remaining in the Single Market.Here "alignment" is the new all-important Brexit word. 
Wetherspoon's Backs Fishing for Leave Campaign! - Half a million Beer Matts coming to a pub near you - Huge thanks to Tim Martin & the team @jdwtweet #SaveBritainsFish #Brexit Enough Appeasement of the EU - Leave Means Leave.  
It seems to me that TV current affairs people think it's balance to   put a gung-ho Brexiter up against a more cautious Brexiter. Remainers are treated as an obscure  & largely irrelevant minority. Please tell me if I'm wrong.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
How London's loss is Dublin's gain after Brexit  
I mean, how could UK voters or politicians have foreseen that Irish border might ever be obstacle to hard Brexit? Impossible innit 
If this is what UK says - and what it actually does after #Brexit - struggling to see how DUP support it. Based purely on headline, looks like win for Dublin  
BBC News - Brexit impact on UK pharma industry to be investigated  All this doom and gloom from Labour remainers led enquiry,  but reality is 3 large investments in this sector announced in a week. #KnockItOff. 
UK to say there will be no "regulatory divergence" on the island of Ireland on the single market and customs union. That's quite a change of position. #brexit  
The majority of the most directly affected citizens were denied a vote in the referendum. We must have a #FinalSayForAll. Please support our #BrusselsProtest by retweeting or join us there. We have been silenced and ignored for too long. 
'We’ve put 7 months of work into getting to this point and are hoping @JunckerEU today will give us 'sufficient progress' so we can move on to #brexit trade talks.' I'm guessing EU will stand by Ireland's interests as a Member and not UK's as a Leaver.  
Brexit means we’ll be the Former United Kingdom - acronym is FUK @AnthonyBarnett 
If - if - this is correct, then regulatory "alignment" in 50-odd areas of policy would mean in effect(a) a united Ireland in policy terms, and (b) part of the UK stays as part of Single Market, regardless of the referendum "mandate" that the UK leaves the EU. 
Let’s be quite clear about this: *if* NI de facto stays in customs union and GB leaves, then Scotland’s small, open export-oriented economy and future wealth would be being sacrificed on the altar of an extreme nationalist #brexit 
YES. European citizens in the UK and UK citizens in Europe (many of whom did not even have the chance to vote) should not pay the price of #BREXIT.  #brexitshambles #BrexitBetraysBritain 
. Pitiful a bit like the EU's Brexit negotations  
Brexit means Brexit and United Kingdom means Great Britain?  
Brexit: Dublin seems to be demonstrating that 'pooled sovereignty' that is, the EU27 will usually trump a standalone, very alone, entity - the UK. 
Well Done Brexiteers! @OwenPaterson @LeaveMnsLeave @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @johnredwood for finally trying to stop Theresa the Appeaser limply conceding everything for nothing in return to satisfy Remainers. Remain lost and Brexit Won- No one voted Leave to keep status quo! @Number10gov 
Owen Paterson releases visualisation of innovative "technical solution" to Irish border conundrum - an invisible force field that allows passage of Irish residents but excludes everyone else, along with contraband goods!#Brexit #wishfulthinking 
Facebook is not afraid of Brexit, creates 800 new jobs in the UK  
Theresa May won't countenance a vote on the final deal. She sees it as a back-door exit from Brexit. If the people change their minds then we need to #StopBrexit - the 'will of the people' in 2016 can't supercede the will of the people 2018, 2019 or beyond... 
US companies in high tech, bio tech,& ecommerce flocking to the UK. They don’t like the EU bureaucracy. Not yet seen the forecast massive #Brexit jobs exit? Early days or should we be optimistic?   
European parliament's chief Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt has said no deal has been reached yet on the terms of the UK's withdrawal from the EU and he sees the likelihood of a deal as 50/50 
It’s crucial we have concrete and irreversible guarantees on citizens rights for progress on Brexit  
Tony Blair telling the BBC he is determined to overturn Brexit is a gift for Leave. it will drive even more people into supporting an exit 
Welcomed Secretary of State @michaelgove to Aylesbury site to discuss future Ag policy & Brexit @ArlaFoodsUK #sustainableFutureForDairy 
The rule of law must be upheld for #citizens stuck in #Brexit. 4.5M people were unable to vote in UK Ref but we are now being held hostage and acquired rights are being scrapped. We live @InLimboBrexit. @The3Million @BritishInEurope @16MillionRising 
"Are you struggling to get the job done?" - #Brexit Secretary David Davis laughs off question ahead of Theresa May's meeting with EU leaders  
Second Brexit referendum has 16-point lead as half of Britons back new vote, opinion poll shows  
"The UK is not a destination to us: it is our home." @cliodiaspora writes in response to @BrandonLewis on how "welcome" EU scholars feel in #Brexit Britain.  #EU 
Oh shoosh.Brexit is your party's fault. Cameron called the referendum and then ran from the consequences. Johnson and Gove ran with it without thinking of anything past the vote day. May has failed on every single aspect of Brexit planning. But aye, blame the SNP. #rocket 
Don't believe Leavers when they say #Brexit is a done deal.#Democracy is a living thing. We don't have to suffocate under the weight of a flawed vote carved on a tombstone. The evidence now emerging supports a change of course in the national interest.#MPStopBrexit #StopBrexit 
Some say we shouldn't rush to judgement on Brexit. Aye, right! #Referendum2018 
Friends!Summary:1. Brexit and fairness don't add up.2. After all, literally no-one voted for Brexit, apart from a tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots, who only did so because they were taken in by all the LIES on the side of a bus.3. Which was jolly unfair.4. That's all, folks!  
If this is true and the evidence is hard to ignore, then these ministers should be prosecuted. I would even go as far as annulling the referendum and I voted for Brexit. I'm not white & I'm not racist. I just hate big institutions that make us powerless 
@Jacob_Rees_Mogg poewerrs into lead in Tory poll of who they want to be next leader followed by @michaelgove Tory Party is a Brexit party 
So what are you wearing to work today? Here is Ireland's PM on his way to a special cabinet meeting this morning... #Brexit  
Our report, authored by @SimonFRCox, which found that the rights of Irish citizens are at risk because of Brexit is now available to download on our website.  
Why is @adamboultonSKY interviewing two Brexiters? Where is the balance between Remainers and Leavers? Do Remainers not count because the two main parties are both pro-#Brexit?Politicians and media are misrepresenting the country.#StopBrexit #BrexitBetraysBritain 
I would like Brexit to be stopped BUT it must be as a result of a bottom up desire to stop it -expressed in a second referendum -and NOT as a result of any kind of top down fixAll who want to stop Brexit need to persuade as many as possible of the British people urgently 
One of the Brexiters on @adamboultonSKY is peddling fantasy drivel about a frictionless border in Ireland. This is part of a cynical attempt to mislead the British people. If Britain leaves the Customs Union & Single Market there will be a hard border. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
John Redwood: Two views of #BrexitWe can only only take back control of our laws, our money & our borders if we leave with no further commitments to EU jurisdiction.We also need to remind #EU there is no legal requirement to pay a so called divorce bill. 
Read across from the #Brexit talks today to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill: Amendment (NC70) tabled by North Down’s Lady Sylvia Hermon MP which aims to ensure the Good Friday Agreement is respected - this is due to be debated on Wednesday and already has substantial cross party support  
The point made is @theSNP can’t throw Brexit into crisis - Brexit IS the crisis! Scotland voted remain - challenge your euro sceptic wing instead  
Shocking clarity for UK audience on aspects of Brexit for Ireland from @mrjamesob on @LBC 
Irony overload warning: The SNP: "once again seem to want to play games with the constitution". This in the midst of #Brexit & the biggest constitutional crisis since 1945 caused & being made worse by the Tories.  
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar arrives for an emergency cabinet meeting in Dublin on Brexit: Laura Hutton  
THEY ARE WILLING TO SCUPPER SCOTTISH JOBS BY SABOTAGING THE BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS...  
I wonder what Mo Mowlam would've made of Brexit, of Arlene Foster and Theresa May. I doubt she'd have had any time for them. She gave the Good Friday Agreement everything she had. A hard border will destroy all the hard work of this fine woman, and the efforts of so many others 
Most probably, the only thing concluded at Juncker-May lunch today will be a 1987 Chateau Lafite #Brexit 
Nigel Farage is going to leave the country if Brexit is a disaster - it is so , bye bye nige  
Sinn Féin invite you to a seminar examining the equality and human rights implications of Brexit.7th December, 12:30pm, Long Gallery in Parliament Buildings  
Two views of Brexit - There are others who seem to think after Brexit we need to mirror all the arrangements and controls we had when in the EU. They also seem to think the UK is in a weak position so they recommend making many concessions to the EU negotiating position. 
. @JunckerEU with @TimmermansEU @MichelBarnier meet European Parliament’s #Brexit team @guyverhofstadt @ElmarBrok_MEP @gualtierieurope @ph_lamberts ahead of working lunch with @theresa_may today at 13.15.  Working for a fair deal. 
„Overnight the UK will be the EU’s largest trade partner, bigger than the USA, China or Japan”. Of course, we need to move on now to discuss our future trading relationship - My Germany Brexit outreach continues in today’s Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung.  
Two views of Brexit - Brexit continues to dominate the media because there remain two different views of how to implement it. There are those in the civil service who understand the wish of the majority to leave.  They are working diligently on what can come as soon as we leave. 
Brexit is like the last scene of The Italian Job, but instead of Michael Caine we've got Mr. Bean, and the pile of gold bars is Theresa May's career. 
Brexit labour shortage will force UK to import more fruit – winemaker  
No DealNo TransitionNo BREXIT RansomYou @theresa_may do NOT have permission from the British electorate to hand over BILLIONS of pounds of British Taxpayers money @DavidDavisMP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @WestmonsterUK @LeaveEUOfficial @Nigel_Farage @_HenryBolton @LeaveMnsLeaveBREXIT  
One thing I will say about Brexit negotiations; the Irish know the British, can draw them from memory; the British don't know the Irish, that is the difference. 
Migrant workers were the mainstay of fruit farms across the UK. Already Brexit has caused a drop by 1/3 of fruit pickers. Food is being left to rot. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Yes @SteveHiltonx that's why hard nosed countries sign trade deals: to quickly & generously help other countries political leaders out. Good grief is there anyone involved with #brexit who hasn't shown themselves to be a complete moron? Anyone?  
As the Daily Mail is still pumping out far-right bile, let's recall its support for fascism in the 1930s. Here is the 1st Lord Rothermere, great-grandfather of the present Mail owner with Hitler & his 'Hurrah for the Blackshirts' article. #StopBrexit #StopFundingHate #Brexit  
#Brexit Nick Clegg out and about doing the rounds TV  Radio  !!!! No one talks more rubbish than CLEGGY. Just wont let it rest we’re leaving the EU. Get it through your thick skull we voted we’re leaving   
On the day we see a 700,000 rise in child & elderly poverty I have never wanted a Tory to be more successful than I do today, but I can’t see Britain gaining under this shambles of a gov’t #brexit  
NEW: Just ran into #Brexit minister  @SteveBakerHW on his way into No 10. He seemed very chipper. Said of talks; “everything is working out as expected” 
So European Parliament Brexit group led by Verhofstadt now meeting Tusk & Barnier at Commission, at same time Irish Cabinet pondering progress but no agreed text... Crucial meetings as PM and DD make their way over here. 
The European Parliament Brexit Steering group has arrived for their meeting at the European Commission. Lots of questions shouted, no answers. 
Tusk @eucopresident meets PM @theresa_may today at 16h on #Brexit.Updated agenda:  
The most hated PM since WW2. Who sent British Servicemen to die in an illegal war, on fake claims of weapons of mass destruction, is working to reverse #Brexit. #ThankyouTony 
Except most of the UK doesn't want any closer ties with America if it means losing our food standards, our NHS, our environment & our dignity. Brexit is a disaster, nothing can actually change that 
Yes, this. The Brexit bus is approaching and we're still at risk of being thrown under it. We must not be sacrificed to the god of trade. #PeopleB4Politics 
Day what feels like 6thousand in nightmare brexit land. All the tories are masturbating to jpegs. All of their passwords are password. Britain has never been stronger. 
Tony Blair confirms he is trying to reverse Brexit as he issues Ireland warning  
Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour is now 8% ahead of the Tories.A referendum on Irish Unity is getting closer every single day. #UnityRef 
Oh @jeremycorbyn :poverty will get a great deal worse after our severance from the protective European Union. If you win the election and Brexit, you will go down in history as a greater deceiver than any tory in history. We need to work with our allies and neighbours.#FBPE 
Link's Annual Debate on post #Brexit environmental leadership is TODAY with @TanyaMSteele @catherinemep @GeorgeMonbiot @DavenportJuliet & @karla_hill - if you can't be there in person, join the conversation at #GreenBrexit  
.@OfficialSYP wants to know your views on a range of issues relating to Brexit and young people’s rights. Tell us here   #SYPrights #RightsWeek 
Boundless editor @Arifa_Akbar will be on @SkyNews today at 10.45am talking about Boundless, Brexit and literary criticism with Adam Boulton - watch us if you can! @unbounders 
This should be the motto for the British government and DUP when it comes to Brexit and the Irish border.  
Joint letter sent by ICCL & island-wide coalition of human rights orgs & activists to #Brexit negotiating teams. Letter calls for #NoRegressionorDiminution of existing human rights and #EqualityofProtections for all in #NorthernIreland.  
Many anti Vote Leave pundits now in the position of almost willing Brexit talks to breakdown. 
On the fourth day of christmas my true love sent to me...Four calling birds, theee French hens, two turtle doves and a partridge in a pear tree...This lot are now negotiating our #Brexit deal   
Ireland: no go-ahead for Brexit talks to move on  
Today at @Stanford: "Legitimation Crisis: Catalonia's Independence Referendum and Spain's Constitutional Strain" with @epaluzie, @vpartal et al. -->  
Lest we forget - The #Brexit lies  
Ecological meltdown, gathering financial crisis, the Brexit cliff, Trump flailing ever more wildly, democracy being crushed by billionaires: the next few years will be, well, challenging. 
Holding a special Cabinet meeting this morning where @simoncoveney @HMcEntee and I will update Government ministers on the #Brexit talks. In a crucial phase of the negotiations. 
On my way to first meeting as 19th female member of Irish Cabinet. #Brexit top of today's agenda.  
So Farage will emigrate should Brexit be a disaster, making him an immigrant with an EU pension of 73,000 a year. Hypocrisy on steroids #Marr 
.@simoncoveney hopes they will find a way forward today but Ireland's position will not change #Brexit  
People voted for Brexit precisely so this would not happen  
David’s threads are invaluable, but also a tad dispiriting because they highlight just how much Brexit ignorance is wilful.  
They just don't get it; Scotland voted against Brexit, we don't want it, but if it is forced on us, we want all powers back in Scotland, where the Scotland Act said they should be.  
Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit  
Brexit labour shortage will force UK to import more fruit – winemaker  
Just remember that a bad Brexit deal for the UK is a bad Brexit deal for Scotland.Here is Nicola's right hand woman giving the thumbs up to that bad Brexit deal.Never be fooled into believing that the SNP wants what's best for Scotland.  
Today’s @thetimes cartoon  #brexit  
The lady has been protesting too much since the election,  but Brexit can be stopped, and here is a cabinet member admitting as much #StopBrexit 
Oh my.....complete contempt for any democratically expressed view from Scottish Government on Brexit Bill, from John Lamont, born again brexiteer, on GMS. 
"Seventeen million of my fellow countrymen voted for Brexit", says Scottish Tory spokesman on GMS, revealingly. 
I think there is likely to be a General Election April or May 2018I think Corbyn and Labour will winI think there is a 30/35% chance that there will be a 2nd referendum to #StopBrexit in autumn 2018All who want to stop Brexit need to persuade the British public urgently 
CLUELESS: Tony Blair still pushing to reverse referendum result. Someone should tell him only 12% now want to abandon Brexit. #Awkward 
Anything less than the north staying in the customs union will be a failure that will cost the country dearly in so many ways for decades. #Brexit @simoncoveney 
There are lots of players on the Brexit pitch and each has their own agenda and their own angle – especially those in the media – but very few have the facts, writes @bbradleymp 
In today's Brexit news: Theresa May hoping for Brexit breakthrough at crucial Brussels lunch with Juncker US-based fund to invest $1 billion in UK biotech 
The "sufficient progress" step served two related purposes for EU27.First, to ensure what was needed for an "orderly Brexit" was prioritised.Second, to maximise EU leverage on the "orderly Brexit" issues of cash, citizenship and Irish border./8 
There really isn’t a viable solution to Irish border issue. Hard border or a border at the Irish sea is politically and economically indigestible for all involved. We need a rethink on this whole Brexit shambles. 
Critical day for this phase of the Brexit process. PM Theresa May is in Brussels talking money. But the Irish border issue still likely to be the most difficult issue.   
What is "sufficient progress"?It is not a phrase used in Article 50.  It is not a formal legal step towards Brexit./3 
An unmissable read if you want to understand what happened to many EU citizens after the referendum @InLimboBrexit @BylineBooks @J_amesp @peterjukes @CynefinRoad 
Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit. By re-entering the public arena, this odious man reminds us all of the arrogant globalisation & open borders rejected by 17.4m Brits.  
Brexit as handy excuse even for remainers? Nothing to do with austerity and awful record of Cameron govt?  
European politicians in danger of looking like theyre moving the goalposts on Brexit. Commission officials were previously saying in private that issue of EU nationals was basically resolved.  
A short thread about why today matters for Brexit.  A big day (potentially)./1 
DUP demands N.Ireland & rest of UK are treated  same way. And hard Brexiters demand Britain does not have equivalent regulation post-Brexit. 
Facebook opens its new London office and says it will add more jobs in the capital next year, underlining its commitment to Britain as the country prepares for #Brexit.  
The country that could have been Britain’s closest ally in ensuring a smooth Brexit has been forced to look out for its own interests instead.  
The vote for #Brexit has increased the need for the #UK to maintain its military commitments to #Nato and global power projection just as #China and #Russia are ratcheting up their naval threats @FT @ModernNavy #defencecuts 
Multiple reports from Dublin suggest no text has emerged overnight for Irish Cabinet special Brexit meeting to consider, despite some progress over weekend:  
The UK government thought it could roll Dublin; barely imagined that EU 27 would stick together and hand Irish a virtual veto. Now it’s down to the wire #Brexit #TheresaMay 
"Unfortunately we will not have a final text that we will be able to approve [this morning]"Irish Minister for European Affairs Helen McEntee says no final agreement on Irish border in Brexit talks but progress has been made #r4today 
With Theresa May in Brussels today, here is a summary of the #Brexit negotiations so far. She really needs some #MondayMotivaton 
Big day for #Brexit negotiations: follow @faisalislam and @Stone_SkyNews in Brussels, @DMcCaffreySKY in Dublin, @skydavidblevins in Belfast, and @BethRigby in Westminster for every twist and turn! 
Exactly, the question is not Ireland blocking, but what solutions the UK has come up with (which were none as of Friday night) - 8 months into negotiations, 18 months after the referendum...  
Ian Duncan Smith, Owen Paterson, John Redwood & Nigel Lawson have set 'red lines' for Theresa May's Brexit negotiations. You get more right wing as you get older - these guys are ancient. Splitting the UK & the Tory party #ToryShambles #r4today 
FORMER LORD JUSTICE SLAMS THERESA MAY - “Abject voluntary surrender of sovereignty” - read part 4 of our 4-part special on PM's #Brexit deadline talks:  
"A SMALL MATTER OF THE LAW" - Pt 3 of our 4-part special on the PM's #Brexit deadline talks today:  Guest appearance by @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
#Brexit: All consuming with no reward...  
."Now with Brexit, old animosities are being rehearsed.The Border has left an unhealed scar across the country that has begun, with the Brexit business, to open up again.". 
I can’t wait for Brexit................... ...................... ...................... .........................................to be cancelled. 
.@BBCr4today fails to explain Norway’s not in #CustomsUnion. Staying in it wld solve NIreland/Ireland #Brexit border nightmare 
As much as some would find a "Well" today amusing or welcome if there is no breakthrough on "sufficient progress" Brexit talks, any sensible person should want progress.Too much at stake if there is more failure. 
The Irish Question.Without a free-trade agreement we will no longer be able to import Mrs Brown's Boys Personally I am warming to a hard #Brexit 
The "go to" account for Ireland and the Brexit talks is @tconnellyRTE. 
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says  
Tory NHS:-Trusts from surplus under LAB to £250m debt-635% increase in A&E waits-42,000 nurse vacancies-Stopped nurse bursaries-96% less foreign NHS applicants since Brexit-Waiting lists 4m growing to 5m by 2020-19 hospitals to shut-Decimated social & mental health care  
Theresa May in Brussels says there has been progress on #Brexit deal.. Just not on Irish border or People or anything else that matters. But they have agreed what to have for lunch.  
I wonder what new reason David Davis - the ‘Brexit bulldog’ himself - will give today for saying he’s thinking of quitting the Brexit dept? 
#TonyBlair on #Brexit:  ‘It’s reversible. It’s not done until it’s done. The will of the people is not something immutable. People can change their mind if circumstances change,’#StopBrexit #article50challenge #IrishBorder #NHS #citizensrights 
We will not change our red lines. The lives of millions of families are at stake. If no clear commitment is made, the @EPPGroup will not be ready to assess the progress made as sufficient to enter a 2nd phase of negotiations. #Brexit 2/2 
In #Brexit negotiations, money is one of the problems, but it is not the biggest one. We are much more concerned about the fact that negotiations are stalled on the protection of EU citizens’ rights & on the Irish case. 1/2 
If MPs are privately convinced that #Brexit is a disaster for Britain but won’t say so until they are assured public opinion agrees - are they sure they have what it takes to be an MP? 
Regardless of one's politics, today's a day for unwavering support for @campaignforleo No hard border.If the UK wish to faff about, fine. But we must be solid and if Brexit be stopped by Ireland, so be it. History is being made. 
Post Brexit, Unilever and Shell could take advantage of lower corporate taxes in the Netherlands.  
Second Brexit referendum has 16-point lead as half of Britons back new vote, opinion poll shows  
Seems to spectacularly miss the point, Brexit is the trigger for a crisis not the SNP.  
Tony Blair confirms he is actively working to overturn Brexit  
Great piece by CityAM's Francesca Washtell on CBI'S negative thoughts on UK Growth & BREXIT - such a pity Carolyn Fairbairn & her troops seems so unwilling to embrace the reality of BREXIT 
Half of Britons support a second vote on Brexit, poll finds  
Brexit talks with Ireland are stalled on the thorny issue of who will get custody of Jedwood 
Not surprising to see BME voters deserting the Tory part given Brexit immigration & uncaring positioning and: “If you believe you are a citizen of the world, you’re a citizen of nowhere”  
Monday briefing: Brexit faces hold up on the Irish border  
Ahead of PM visit, Brussels optimistic after months of grey and grumpy #brexit negotiations. My thoughts:   
I think I detected amongst the presenter-pals-banter on BBC Breakfast TV that we are close to Brexit agreement.  Aye right, or if so, only thru May capitulation. Propaganda piffle sold as news. 
#Brexit talks enter critical phase: What you need to know  
Interesting:- Islamic Iraqi Kurdish leader, Salahadin Bahadin meets with Hakan Fidan (1st such meet after referendum) - Tunisia's Rashid Ghanuchi (who is friend with Bahadin and Erdogan) has urged Erdogan not to take a hardline on KRG after referendum.  
What do you call a town in the middle of a Brexit tug-of-war? Middletown. No, seriously.  
I just checked the odds on a double of an England Ashes win and a successful Brexit. Turns out I could win £1 million! And if I were to double my stake to 2p that would be £2 million. 
Heading to @EPP Summit of Party Chair's in Brussels. @FineGael place at the heart of the European People's Party is invaluable in having Irelands voice heard in these crucial #Brexit negotiations  
An EU source has told @rtenews there has been no breakthrough in the overnight talks between British, European Commission and Irish officials on the Irish border issue post Brexit. It now looks unlikely the Irish cabinet will have a text to approve when it meets in Dublin at 9am 
Morning! What happened to Parliamentary sovereignty when Jeremy Hunt claims it’s May’s Brexit or no Brexit? Discussing in a mo on @GMB 
Former PM argues claims made by leave campaign now clearly untrue and so British voters deserve second referendum  
#Brexit is not the answer to social injustice that many of the poorest leave voters hoped for. On the contrary. Brexit is a deepening part of the worsening problem. @guardian editorial 
Tony Blair confirms he is trying to reverse Brexit as he issues Ireland warning  
Tony Blair confirms he is fighting to cancel Brexit  
We don't "get independence" - we are already independent. #brexit is turbo-austerity. It is 30 years of the country being chronically broke. If you want what is in that Labour manifesto - we have to #stopbrexit. We are one of the opinion shapers in the EU - it is a partnership. 
by getting rid of May we would get rid of Brexit what are we waiting for folks #winwin  lets start the process today  let.s get rid of Hunt as well 
BBC News - Facebook creates 800 jobs as it opens new London office  despite brexit. I’m sure could have been Scotland. But for the SNP factor 
Students in Denmark have a poll about #Indy and #Brexit. Why not help them out? #Scotref 
Frankly compared to what this government has done in Syria and Yemen Blair's Iraq legacy is not something that should prejudice people against his present stance on #Brexit  
With Prince Harry marrying Merkle, the renewed German and British ties may put an end to Brexit.I wonder how many will take this tweet seriously? 
“Yet behind the good new lurks a persistent and dangerous threat. The more that Mrs May yields, the more some Brexiteers argue that Britain should leave on March 29th 2019 without any deal at all”The economic effects of a No-Deal Brexit would be colossal  
The pound may not have much room to rebound even if Brexit talks advance  
When govts have money, they spend it. And they can’t stop when they run outta $$. George’s sugg’n—topped with no deficits allowed, at all 3 levels, after 5yrs—would return us to our fiscal senses. Referendum req’d to convince govts that citizens are serious.  
‘People are entitled to change their mind’: Tony Blair confirms he is fighting to cancel #Brexit  
No no no. The entire leave campaign was from start to end a well funded pack of lies. It’s makes the UK economically and socially weaker. It allows racists to tell us they were right all along and you have a choice. BREXIT or a NHS - one or the other. 
Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit  
#BREAKING77 Doctors Dead In Mysterious Circumstances.All where working on Vaccines, Cancer or Alternative #Medicine. Why is Media not investigating?@Lisa_Haven goes thru the list.#qanon #wikileaks #auspol @60mins @60Minutes @4corners #brexit #bitcoin 
Brussels 'unusually optimistic' ahead of @Theresa_May visit. #Brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May in Brussels for key talks with EU  
Facts are stubborn.  Can a prof with such a track record be the 'sharpest brains in Zim politics'? 1)Ford Foundation thief2)Wits thief3)Failed Mugabe critic4)Failed Yes Campaign 2000 referendum 5)Failed on Tsholotsho declaration 6)ZIMDEF thief7)Failed G40 project 
Personally I think it's a strange assumption saying the No campaign hasn't started, there's been a vitriolic ongoing campaign against SNP/Indy since the Brexit vote & it wasnt too quiet before that either! There's certainly been little in the way of a Yes campaign. 
'It's dangerous' A PROPOSED compromise that will give European courts the right to rule on certain British cases in return for a smooth Brexit deal “would be tantamount to reversing the result of the 2016 referendum”, a former senior judge has claimed.   
Brexit puts special rights for Irish citizens in UK ‘at risk’  The superiority complex never fails to show itself when the Irish don't want to bend the knee.  
Yer Da Hard Brexit XI John Ruddy Danny Simpson Gary CahillRyan Shawcross Leighton Baines Jonjo ShelveyJoey Barton Scott Brown Mark Noble Andy Carroll Peter CrouchWould have hipsters shook 
Brexit Bliar-ballsTony, Tony,  has his sayTony, Tony,  wants to stayWith Jean and Don and BarnierTony, Tony, go awayTony, Tony, we all hateTony, Tony, and his matesThey've made Europe such a stateTony, Tony, YOUR'E TOO LATE!We're off. x  
hear this @realDonaldTrump The #BritishPeople DO support you!! #Uk #Brexit #NigelFarage tell #Potus how loved and admired he truly is #TheresaMay does NOT speak for the majority of  
Nicola Sturgeon has never met a Referendum she respected the result of.  She performs her role as FM like a dictatorship.  
Every Leaver wants an exception.What a balls-up Brexit is!☟Nigel Farage Asks The EU: Please Can You Make An Irish Exception?  
The whole world can see that brexit will destroy our economy. We are stuck with it because most if our MPs wont ignore the xenophobic racist and economically illiterate 'will of the people'. Our MPs must do their duty and have the courage to get together and #StopBrexit & #Remain 
Half of Britons support a second vote on Brexit, poll finds  pic.twitter.com/0rUuy5TIem 
Is it right the PM of the UK makes another trip to Brussels for talks with unelected EU Commission officers to pave the way for post-Brexit trade negotiations?  
Irish Govt would be mad to let it through...there's no way the #Brexit the UK Govt espouses can avoid a harder border somewhere, whether ROI/NI or NI/GB...FOM on one side alone means passport checks somewhere. It's a Tory CON...just #StopBrexit & #Remain in the EU. 
We spend hours on Twitter railing against latest brexit outrage.But many in UK don't see that detail. Their view of Brexit is shaped by MSM.Has anyone produced a summary doc outlining history/consequences of Brexitshambles? Happy to make a start on it, if not. Worthwhile? 
The only difference between Labour and Tory over Brexit is that Labour have managed to portray their no Single Market, no Customs Union hard Brexit stance as some form of reasonable EU exit. 
Brexit update: Theresa May fails to strike border deal with Irish government - expected to seek more time tomorrow morn.  
Partition was a British imposition. So is #Brexit. The Fine Gaelers capitulated once, they better not do it again.#twip 
SUBSCRIBE!Full Episode list:14 North Korea Sanctions13 Billionaires12 Pacific Deals11 Developing Countries10 No-Deal Brexit9 GATT Origins8 NAFTA II7 Bombardier Jets6 Uncertainty5 Solar Tariffs4 WTO Held Hostage3 Steel War2 KORUS1 NAFTA I 
Why should Ireland care about the British discomfort? They certainly never worried about ours! Fact is #Brexit was a selfish reckless act and we're not doing the Brit's job selling it. 
Half of Britons now back the long-standing @TheGreenParty call for a referendum on the final Brexit deal.   
#Brexit will make austerity look like a tea party.  If you actually cared for these people you'd fight it, not try to ignore it or enable it 
Hey, @SkyNews - why do your journalists constantly refer to ‘the Irish border’? This #Brexit impasse is about the UK border with Ireland. 
He wants eastern Europe and a divided Europe overall hence why we had bots supporting the Leave argument during the UK's referendum on membership of the EU 
Who Tories have blamed for their own Brexit mess: EU Ireland Remain voters @theSNP 
Brexit and fairness don’t add up.Brexit is not the answer to social injustice that many of the poorest leave voters hoped for. On the contrary. Brexit is a deepening part of the worsening problem.#BrexitBetraysBritain. #StopBrexit. 
**The Scottish Govt are in brexit negotiations but you choose to highlight the SNP and brexit chaos in the headline. Directed straight from London? 
Brexit  
Breaking: Irish government accept written assurances from British government regarding the border. #Brexit #twip 
Did you vote for Brexit to end austerity? Well, Brexit means hard austerity. All the money that could go towards dealing with the causes of Brexit will be swallowed by Brexit and bring year after year of hard austerity. 
The Director General of the WTO warns the UK over cost of Brexit. I’d laugh..but Brexit.. 
This crisis was ENTIRELY of the Tories making.Scot Gov is trying to walk the line between respecting two referendum results. 
If our own government began educating people by telling the truth about the real Brexit, starting with their own illusive impact studies, any civil unrest would be practically nonexistent.  
Many are worried that moving on to phase 2 of Brexit negotiations makes us true #BargainingChip again.Time to put #peopleB4politics before moving on. 
Tory Brexiter MP @NadineDorries now playing the victim because she's been soundly criticised for violating basic simple information security. I think people should know that Nadine isn't immune from tweeting like an abusive troll. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Imagine we decided as a nation we'd got it wrong over Brexit, swallowed our pride, stayed and applied all our ingenuity and will to reform and making Europe a better place for all. I'd be proud to be British. 
“Nigel Farage to be stripped of his EU Pension on Brexit”.Oh, yes!  
i am 100% here for the SNP causing as much shenanigans as humanly possible in regards to brexit  
No deal on irish border tonight. Talks to continue tonight. Doesn’t look very positive. The 50-50 quoted in media seems on optimistic side #brexit 
What? Jeremy Hunt 'Back May or they'll  be no BREXIT'  It's as easy as that?...Yippee! 
An excellent thread explaining the lunacy of the "7 Red Lines" that hard-core Leavers have just drawn on Brexit.   
Our forces have been run down for years so that they can be absorbed into EU armed forces. 
Support for No Brexit keeps on growing.A 52% majority want to Remain in the EU, the latest polls show.50% want a second referendum on a final Brexit deal.People say Brexit makes them fearful, leaves them worse off, and hits NHS funding.We should #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
The ECJ is not only a foreign court but a political court, too. The court has “ever closer union” at its heart.  #Brexit 
.@guyverhofstadt I trust that you and @Europarl_EN will make sure this doesn’t happen. @The3Million & @BritishInEurope have already been burnt for Brexit far too many times.  
Farage used Norway to show we'll be fine after brexit, but denies that he was implying we'd stay in the Single Market (as Norway is).Nigel:   Jump out of the plane.UK:       But I'll die.Nigel:   No, Bjørn did it and he was fine.UK:       Bjørn has a ******* parachute!! 
In London in advance of the debate on the devolution parts of the Brexit repeal bill. Our whole devolution settlement is under threat from this power grab and our Parliament must not be collateral in this madness. 
》1,939,917 people have 'liked' the Britain First facebook page.》Leave had a majority of just 1,269,501.》Without Britain First's extreme right-wing supporters, Remain would have won the referendum.》So racists really ARE responsible for Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Half of Britons support a second vote on Brexit, poll finds  
Here is a map If you are wondering what areas of #Ireland Voted for #BREXIT The majority in the North voted to Remain.  
Our hard Brexit xenophobic govt, so terrified of the insightless racists in our electorate, is now trying to destroy our universities, one thing we still definitely excel at globally.  
‘Make an EXCEPTION for Ireland’ Farage offers BRILLIANT solution to Brexit border issue  
John Major called the anti-EU wing of his party "the bastards".Theresa May is now discovering just how right he was.These bullies do not want *any* sort of negotiated settlement - for them, #Brexit must be the full catastrophe. 
Jeepers, #bbcnews. People did *not* vote for Brexit in order to address inequality. They voted for it so that we'd leave the EU! One day people might finally, dragged-by-their-fingernails start to accept that. 
It's not crucial that we have a Brexit deal. It would be better to have one if it's a mutually beneficial & amiable deal. But it's not crucial. It's a mistake that we've allowed Remainers to paint it as such. 
Jeremy Hunt: No Brexit unless we back Theresa May. Change of tack as cabinet member accepts that we can #StopBrexit 
Never thought I would say this, but Jeremy Hunt is right. There are only two choices for the country, Theresa May’s shambolic Brexit or #stopbrexit and revoke Article 50... That may not be a verbatim quote, but it is accurate. 
Love how Lord Lawson, Viscount Ridley and Jacob Rees Mogg have written a Brexit demand to the PM. The aristos have spoken. They want their country back. #bbcnews 
Monday's The Independent: "EU citizens' rights at risk in bid for Brexit progress" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
#BREXIT WON'T HAPPEN IF WE DON'T RALLY BEHIND THERESA MAY?!?!Sounds like an easy target.We need a Strategy Meeting. Agenda: How to create further division amongst the Brexiteers and further damage the prime minister's leadership.Easy Peasy. Now let's #StopBrexit 
Brexit is not the answer to social injustice. On the contrary. Brexit is a deepening part of the worsening problem.  
Second #Brexit referendum has 16-point lead as half of Britons back new vote, opinion poll shows  
Tories for the first time now raising the prospect of there being no Brexit. We always knew May was a Remainer parading as a converted Leaver.  
"usually ascribed for no good reason"? But John, you wrote that the Remain campaign was right about the falling pound and that you deliberately avoided the question during the referendum in a blog entry dated June 23, 2017, remember? 
Brexit timetable in jeopardy as Theresa May fails to reach deal on Irish border ahead of EU deadline: TelegraphBritain and EU on brink of Brexit divorce deal: FT 
1. Jeremy Hunt No Brexit unless we back May.Is it just me or has a minister a) Just admitted #Brexit can be stopped?b) Given a huge incentive to those of us who have been arguing to #StopBrexit?c) Helped ppl who had given up 2 get back in the fight? 
Brexit timetable in jeopardy as Theresa May fails to reach deal on Irish border ahead of EU deadline #premium 
Brexiters: The will of the people is sacrosanctRemainers: What about 1975 vote?Brexiters: The EU has changed completely and all promises were brokenLeavers: That applies to your Brexit campaign/negotiation as well!Brexiters: Go to hell ... 
After #Brexit when OAP’s struggle to buy food and pay for heatingThe man the panicked the BritNat Tories into holding the referendum will be okHe has a £73,000 a year EU pension to pay for his luxurious retirement!  
Scotland can only have a referendum on ending UK Govt rule, if the UK Govt grants permission? That's a very strong argument for Scottish independenceWhat kind of union is it, when the question on your independence isn't decided by you, but by the other country in the union? 
Latest poll has 50% support #referendum on #Brexit terms. 34% oppose. Biggest margin yet. Boost for #brexitwonthappen and #ExitFromBrexit 
The preposterous tale of the Brexit "impact assessments," as told by @jonlis1 
Spot on by @OwenPaterson at @BrexitCentral:"An independent sovereign UK could not be bound by the rulings of a foreign court"Correct. Continued jurisdiction in UK post-Brexit of judicial-activist, integrationist ECJ = neither independence nor sovereignty 
Fantastic. This is the Independence ‘lifeboat effect’ starting to emerge. Scotland won’t go down with the iceberg bound stricken ‘SS Brexit UK’  
Jeremy Hunt says if people dont back Theresa May there'll be no Brexit. So two for the price of one 
When the "will of the people" want a second referendum on Brexit.  
Second Brexit referendum has 16-point lead as half of Britons back new vote, opinion poll shows: 50% to 34% 
May has worked to undermine & frustrate Brexit from the very start! She delayed article 50 for months, has not started trade deal talks with new countries, wants to pay the EU 50bnShe is working on a deal so bad it will only encourage calls to remain,which is her ultimate goal!  
Let my be clear. A person maybe a great parent, sibling & friend But if you support policies like austerity that increases homelessness & poverty promote racist beliefs (see Tories & brexit) sell off the NHS or support arms sales that allow for war crimes in Yemen-you are vermin.  
If #Corbyn remains wedded to Brexit and May stays, all Remain MPs really have no alternative other than to form an Alliance. A new Alliance free from the awful constraints of both the Labour and Tory parties could be a new beginning for Britain. @KCQCMP @DanJarvisMP @Anna_Soubry 
Such a plodding reply. ‘Status quo’ is debatable given the numbers who were not allowed to vote, but that to one side. Politics is about vision and leadership taking the public to a place that they would not otherwise go. Reject Brexit. Can we have courage vision and leadership?  
Tories are a total shower: Brexit heading into abyss, progress at home in decline, wages & growth down, and they just squabble about which of them should be sacked. The country needs some government & governing!  
This Congress will not impeach this president no matter what he does. Don't worry, just have to change Congress. 2018 is a referendum on Trump's presidency, and it's vitally important. 
Morten Morland on Theresa May’s Brexit woes - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Half of Britons are 'in favour of a public vote' on final Brexit deal  
At this point, Patrick Galbraith could probably stop Brexit. 
A strange week - discovered it only takes 5 days of Tories talking abt "Éire" to make me want to take to the mountains with a Flying Column #Brexit 
With the Tories in disarray and Brexit in crisis, surely time for all in @UKLabour to unite against the real enemy: Angela Rayner. 
David Davis let it be known a couple of weeks ago he Is planning to resign. Now saying he'll resign if Damian Green is sacked & if Green isn't sacked he will resign over something else. Davis knows Brexit is national disaster & won't happen. He wants out!   
.Uh Oh.....  "Theresa May will take PERSONAL charge of Brexit negotiations as she visits Brussels for crucial meetings". 
All four members of the government's Social Mobility Commission today stepped down, saying Theresa May's commitment to Brexit was leaving other issues fall by the wayside.@fatimamanji has the latest. 
I'm still dwelling on Jeremy Hunt's 'threat': get rid of May and there will be no Brexit. Basically, it's win-win so long as it's @PhilipHammondUK who replaces her. 
If you voted Brexit for the NHS, you certainly didn't vote to sell it off to the  US did you? Brexit breaks every promise and breaks the very things you wanted to save. Time to change your mind, time to stop Brexit.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
The news that Tony Blair and Alastair Campbell have taken the field and the command of the campaign to reverse Brexit sounds the death knell for the EU cause in Britain. Good riddance to them all. #Brexit #TonyBlair #Yugoslavia #Afghanistan #Iraq #Libya #Syria #Yemen #Gaza 
That's an interesting question Nigel.Perhaps you'd like to pose it to the millions of EU nationals who've had their lives shafted by your nefarious Brexit?  
Not the first to point this out, but Brexit is the Toby Young stag do on a global scale.  
Periodic reminder: Brexit makes it easier to remove employee rights. It doesn’t make it any easier to protect them. 
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says  
.@SteveHiltonx: "The best thing [@POTUS] can do is give @theresa_may a big, beautiful trade deal that will show that Brexit is a success."  
This repellent champagne socialist embodies the sneering, metropolitan-elite contempt for Britain & the working class that threatens to undermine #Brexit & democracy in UK.@EmilyThornberry & @UKLabour despise the people they claim to represent.Out of touch. 
Botanics chief 'flabbergasted' over Brexit uncertainty facing French wife' | via @telegraph 
After #Brexit, millions of working-class Britons will suffer financial consequences.Meanwhile, @Nigel_Farage will continue to enjoy a £73,000 pension from the #EU. 
Let me make this real basic: Trump and his campaign colluded with Russia. Leave.EU worked with key components of the Trump campaign and remain closely tied to him nowThere are no degrees of separation between Brexit and the Kremlin whichever way you look at it, even pre-Trump 
UK (Scotland), Survation poll:Independence ReferendumYes: 47% (+1)No: 53% (-1)#ScotRef 
First Brexit, then Trump and now, more importantly, StrictlyComeDancing2017 -- faith in democracy is being severely tested 
As right as rain. As thick as thieves. As cool as a cucumber. As bright as a button. As bold as brass. As hollow as a Brexit promise… 
The only benefits Brexit will bring are unemployment benefits. Time to #StopBrexit and send Rees-Mogg back to the 19th Century. 
This suggests UK final #Brexit proposal already on Varadkars desk. Will he finally break with tradition and not miserably capitulate to the British govt?  
I'm told by some that they think Ruth burst the independence bubble. She didn't. She was naive to think she did. Folk south of the border need to accept this issue isn't going away anytime soon - that gap will narrow fast if Brexit isn't halted/seriously reconsidered. #Indyref2 
That penny - the one that’s slowly dropping with the dawning realisation Trump knowingly colluded with Russia and isn’t bothered we know - is about to land with a thud on Brexit, courtesy of Trump’s U.K. chums at Leave.EU. 
EU source says:Despite cacophony of those in UK who want to scupper #Brexit talks, PM May and Brussels working on and nearing solutions (15) 
We're Labour people and always will be.We're also Europeans, and we are proud to stand alongside people from any Party who oppose the economic, political and social demise of Brexit.Looking for ward to meeting you in London, 11th December #StopBrexit 
Big news from the TUC, who came out definitively for the single market last week. Now to turn against #Brexit altogether. 
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says  
Brian Adcock on Theresa May’s Brexit mobility scooter - political cartoon gallery in Putney pic.twitter.com/TYlty3HKKI 
For the sake of the nation we need to #ExitfromBrexit Parliament can and must act to #StopBrexit before Brexit breaks Britain @theresa_may @Number10 @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer @EmilyThornberry 
Smart, creative and well-written #Brexit piece by @alexebarker - kudos to @FT editors for commissioning this kind of work 
Bannon and Rees-Mogg: The correlation between Brexit and white supremacy laid bare  via @LondonEconomic 
Taoiseach and PM due to speak in next 12 hours after which he will seek views of Irish cabinet. May plans to have lunch with Juncker/Barnier. They will then brief Tusk who will call back the Taoiseach before making any announcement. So #Brexit talks starts and ends in Dublin. 
Two shits that pass in the night, turds of a feather......etc, etc, here Hunt tries to imply he's not after her job, insinuating the Brexiteers have to keep her there. Garbage, he just wants her weaker so he can topple her when Brexit destroys the other candidates pic.twitter.com/3HaWdsd2R3 
Brussels in positive mood tonight ahead of PM’s lunch w JC Juncker here tomorrow #brexit  (1) 
Director General of WTO warns UK that a 'hard Brexit' would be economically damaging as it would add tariffs to most goods the UK imports and exports. There you go #Leavers, you dropped an enormous clanger and this chap should know. 
.@M_AndersonSF will be on the Sunday Politics Show at 10.30pm discussing Brexit and the need for the north to secure special status within the EU  
Farage's EU pension nearly x3 UK average wage. Don't object to taking it but Farage is a Brexit elite professional politician riding 1st class on a gravy train he denounces  
GE 2015 vote tory or get Miliband/Sturgeon, GE 2017 vote tory or get Corbyn, today back May or no Brexit. Is this all these desperate tories have the two party stitch up is a scam, its certainly not democracy  
Sturgeon: ‘to put ideological totems before the jobs of hundreds of thousands of people would be to... accelerate the damage #Brexit will do’. You’d never catch the #SNP prioritising ‘ideological totems’... 
Busy schedule tomorrow morning to discuss @LeaveMnsLeave letter to the Prime Minister @theresa_may @Number10gov & Brexit:@BBCBreakfast at 7:10am@rtenews @rte from 7:35am@BBCr4today @BBCRadio4 with @bbcnickrobinson from 8:10am@bbc5live from 8:35am@_UK2020 
I’m starting to feel there might just be a second referendum next year. #a50invalidity #BrexitBetraysBritain #FBPE 
Perhaps our best strategy is to publicise the threats of violence as much as possible, and suggest loudly that MPs are allowing themselves to be intimidated and our politics to be ruled by the threat of violence. And we need this to make a large MSM impact.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
We're going to see a lot more of this line about "the causes of Brexit". Many Remainers are congenitally incapable of grasping or acknowledging the democratic argument. They think if they tweak a few dials here and there, people will be happy and love the EU.  
Sit back in silence, as she makes a pigs ear of Brexit as per the GE? She's had the benefit of the doubt long enough. Needs to rapidly up her game. Only reason she's still there is because there's no obvious replacement, that will only carry her so far. 
I stand with Jo Cox. We are Better Together#MoreInCommon#StopBrexit #RemainReform #FinalSay If you would like a 2nd referendum on Brexit, sign here please: h/t @davidshrigley 
Every Brexiteer knows exactly how many lies, distortions and inaccurate (supposedly) factual claims were perpetrated by the Remain campaign in the run-up to the EU Referendum held on 23 June 2016. Nothing will erase them. So, Remoaners' ProjectFear #2 or #3 will not win us over. 
These motherfuckers just side-stepped everything from the Trans-atlantic slave trade to Brexit   
It's been nearly 5 months since an opinion poll said a majority still want to leave the EU. #Brexit is looking worse for the UK economy, society and culture every day; any courageous MPs our there want to start DOING something about it?! #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Shouldn't @BritishInEurope and @The3Million get a veto over Brexit sufficient progress too?  
People are fearful of Brexit, believing the NHS will get less money, they will be poorer and don't want to pay a fortune to be worse off.Just what can we done? Oh yes, that's it #StopBrexit 
#Brexit and the tyranny of the gerrymandered 'majority'.#StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE #StopBrexitHour #StopBrexitNow 
#Brexit will escape going down in history as the most idiotic decision a nation has ever taken.But only because it’s not going to happen.#StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
A tiny group of right-wing, ideological, multi-millionaire, lunatic Brexiters seem to be running the country now.Before Brexit, we had a functioning democracy. Now it’s like a plutocracy, run by aresholes seeking to increase wealth from economic chaos. 
£1000 to Brexitters to tell me how #Brexit will bring me/my business-staff CONCRETE benefits £100 each NOW WEEK 2 STILL NOTHING  Please RT  
It is time to stop Orban’s crackdown on freedom of speech. I support Momentum referendum against Orban’s NGO law. If he wants to be part of the EU, he must follow European rules and values  
Half of Britons support a second vote on Brexit, poll finds  
Josepha is not Minister for Brexit, Health or Housing. She is Minister for the Gaeltacht (among other things) and it is justifiably noted that she cannot speak Irish and has no intention of rectifying that issue. 
Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit  
Do I hear boycott 2019 election?Sounds good to me.#Boycott2019Election#Referendum for exit or restructure.  
I love my country so I need to say: Britain, you’re being an idiot over Brexit #StopBrexitHour 
Worried this Brexit farce is making Brits think Varadkar isn't an absolute weapon 
Here's hoping for a No Brexit   
Labour won't rule out offering a second referendum on Brexit   
Tony Blair: It is “impossible to have this policy discussion, so vital to a fairer future, without contemplating yet again the extraordinary and damaging distractive effect of Brexit.” Read his full article accompanying our housing policy paper  #TBIHousing 
Do read this thread from @JolyonMaugham regarding @Legatum. It’s a billionaire funded “educational charity” currently under investigation by @ChtyCommission It attacks Jolyon personally & has a #Brexit agenda which is slowly being exposed. Watch this space.#stopbrexit 
“The choice we face now isn't between this #Brexit and that Brexit, if we don’t back Theresa May we will have no Brexit” Health Sec Hunt to   "No Brexit"OK ~ you all know what to do! Lobby/email your MP/March/Tweet/talk to Leavers. Let's DO THIS! #fbpe 
Just in case you were wondering which side the SNP was on when it comes to Brexit discussions...  
A comprehensive analysis of Brexit as seen through the eyes of one of our closest allies, Canada. It’s well worth your time.  
Intriguing @anneapplebaum - ex Legatum - is retweeting this. I see a 'friend' of hers quoted in Mail on Sunday saying Anne left when the outfit became 'blindly committed to a hard Brexit.' Anne is an expert on 'Russian meddling,' the piece adds.  
It's absolutely staggering to think the Tory #Brexitremists are prepared to go through with #Brexit, despite mounting evidence of economic harm, loss of prestige & diminishing public support out of EMBARRASSMENT!#BrexitBetraysBritain #MPStopBrexit #StopBrexit #YesTo7 #FinalSay 
'If we don't back Theresa May, we'll have no Brexit’ - Jeremy Hunt.Latest polls show 52% of public now want to Remain in the EU. So that sounds like a plan.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
So Jeremy Hunt has said we can get rid of Theresa May and there will be no Brexit ...Ummm ... where the loss here? What's the downside? This sounds like a total win-win to me. 
BREXIT CHAOS: French wife of 24 years has been REFUSED permanent residency in UK / #Brexit #Toxic #StopBrexit 
The EU’s Common Fisheries Policy is a bloated, bureaucratic mess and grossly unfair to the UK - Brexit can bring immediate and tangible benefits to our fishermen, says @LiamHalligan 
BECAUSE YOU WANT TO LEAVE THE SINGLE MARKET AND CUSTOMS UNION. 17 months on from Brexit and still this crap. FFS  
Bannon and Rees-Mogg: The correlation between Brexit and white supremacy laid bare  via @LondonEconomic 
4. For the record I can show I wrote about abuses of charity law prior to the referendum. I'd respectfully suggest @LegatumInst focus on acting lawfully rather casting misconceived aspersions. /ENDS 
We've now reached the point where the only reason given by Leavers for carrying on with Brexit is that it would be too "embarrassing" to stop it.Let that sink in.We ALL have to suffer so that THEY can save face.#StopBrexit  
The truth behind #Brexit.  It's all about avoiding implementation of The Anti Tax Avoidance Directive that comes into effect in Jan 2019. #StopBrexit @brexit_lies @Labour4EU 
We saw on #Marr the real truth. The #Brexit champagne elite don’t want to suffer - they just want you to. 
Last night, the board of the @SMCommission resigned en masse after concluding that the government’s focus on Brexit means that its ability to tackle social mobility “is zero”.I'll be speaking to @joannaccherryAnd you can have your say too 0345 60 60 973 84850 @LBC 
Now even the Mail on Sunday's polling finds the public wants a second referendum.  
Jeremy Hunt: "If we don't back Theresa May, there will be no Brexit." And that would be a bad thing how exactly? #StopBrexit  
Jeremy Hunt: ‘No Brexit unless we back Theresa May’ That’s a no brainer for me, bye bye Theresa!  
Jacob it is time for you to step up to plate and save Tory government and UK from dog's Brexit that May may be delivering courtesy of her lack of steely determination and decisiveness! Your country needs you! Please heed call!  
 Have yourself a merry little Brexit Oh I wish it could be Brexit everyday Brexit time, Mistletoe and wine 
A Tory member of our Sovereign Parliament opines that a U-turn on #Brexit is not possible as it would be an “embarrassment”.What is it about “economic catastrophe” that makes it preferable to “embarrassment”?#stopbrexit @steve_mccabe 
Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit.Former PM argues claims made by leave campaign now so clearly untrue that voters deserve second referendum.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Whatever troubles Brexit brings you and yours, I'm sure it will lift your heart to know  Nigel Farage will still be receiving his EU pension 
Farage owes a huge debt of gratitude to the BBC. Without all the opportunities for publicity they've happily given him over many years, he would have remained a peripheral figure. Is someone at the head of the BBC a secret Brexit supporter??  
 Feeeeeed the woooooorldLet them know it's Brexit time andFeeeeeed the wooooorld 
One in two people now support @LibDems call for a referendum on the final Brexit deal. With each day that passes, the case grows stronger for giving people the chance to exit from Brexit and stay in EU  
Pretty sure those riots in Hackney a few years back were about racism. And so was Brexit.  
Correct @realDonaldTrump is a Great leader MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN while @theresa_may does everything in her power to keep Britain in the EU against the democratic result of BREXIT quite disgusting.  
Government said releasing impact assessments would harm negotiating position. Truth is that EU knows reality of Brexit and always has. Gov not trying to hide truth from Brussels but from British people. My latest for @prospect_uk 
Interesting #Brexit piece by ProfSir Anton Muscatelli @UofGVC @SCER_eu highlights Scotland's critical need for +ve in-migration for economy, tax take & ambitions for society. 
7. Deal on border in place by end negotiations. Well, yes, lovely, but, as everyone not in the govt, the DUP, or the Brexit ultras knows, a deal in line with the GFA is impossible within UKGov (& Brexit Ultras') red lines on CU. Fantasy 11/ 
Oh Tom Boy your idiocy is embarrassing!In 2016 the UK was still in the EU...Can you please come up with 2017 numbers? Early indicators already hint that investment is deserting the UK@Lab_Westbourne #stopbrexit #brexit  
So do we Remainers have to threaten disorder and violence to level the political playing field? It seems the government is legtimising terrorism as a political tool.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
'It's not done until it's done': Blair insists Brexit IS reversibleWho cares what Blair says or thinks?  
I think a second referendum on the negotiated Brexit deal is a great idea. 1. DealOr2. No deal and no BrexitMost people in the UK, I imagine, would not want to leave with a bad deal or no deal. 
The best bit is that "The Legatum Institute Foundation has made it clear that it is neither “for” nor “against” Brexit". Comedy gold. 
‘Appalling’: Fury over European Court of Justice concessions after Brexit  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
Personally I don't understand this. Why aren't we protesting against #Brexit with the same passion? I don't like Trump, but I'm not responsible for him. I'm responsible for #Brexit. #StopBrexitNow 
Brexit talks balls up: We want a second vote, say public  @VladimirFarage @BritainStays @BrexitBin @nawtydad @dontbrexitfixit @smburningham1 @City_Livery_SM @MutliRaceMan @chunkymark @David_T_Evans @MVLibDems @EUCADMalta @Blackro12653624 @HealthierIn @GDE60 
Hmm. This doesn't look like a tweet concerning an "educational charity". Anyway, many people object to the *type* of Brexit you advocate. And they are bound to ask about ulterior motives.If you have privileged access to government, you will be held accountable. Stop whining.  
We're supporting the Final Say Referendum debate protest on 11th December at Parliament Square.We believe people can, and indeed are, changing their minds on Brexit. Bring your EU flag, National flag, yourself and your friends.Join us here:  
Here's an update on Mississippi Gov Phil Bryant - who introduced Trump to Nigel Farage - Bryant continues to develop his Farage and UK ties, and seems to be an important link in the Trump/Brexit story - thread  /1 
As reported on the front page of today's @dailytelegraph, Sir Richard Aikens, former Court of Appeal judge & LFB President, has written to the PM to warn her of the dangers of accepting binding ECJ jurisdiction post-Brexit.Letter below. 
And as for divisiveness: a second referendum would be a couple of months of hell. Which may be better than a lifetime of economic misery. No easy choices anymore. Time to get real. 
Rumours circulating that the only thing making the govt determined to continue with this ludicrous Brexit charade is the threat of civil unrest from the loony right. Police and HO advise that they might not be able to cope.Govts abhor civil unrest, and right threatens violence. 
3. Free to sign trade deals during transition. This means UK cannot remain in CU for transition, and will need full customs infrastructure by Brexit day. Impossible for it to do so. Also guarantees no agreement on IE/NI border 4/ 
Folks with expertise in Eastern Europe and Central Asia were warning of Russian interference in US and EU democracies for years before the Kremlin finally went full-in with Brexit & Trump. Now would be a good time to start paying attention to people like my pal Nate.  
'EU is breaching Article 50!' Ex-Tory leader lambasts bloc for 'unlawfully' halting Brexit  
A 30 strong taliban of right wing ultras - today writing to May believing hard #Brexit is viable - holds a country to ransom.Time to resist 
As predicted, the seven new red lines from the Brexit Ultras are a mix of the impossible, fantasies, and embarrassing stupidity from people who feel tingly inside at the thought of a UK walk-out 1/  
So we’re not real fans for being abroad? Brexit means Brexit   
Rumblings and dissent within the Tory ranks over #Brexit indicate many have realised May chose the wrong course after the referendum. The momenum seems to be building to #StopBrexitNow. Let's get back on board and steer the EU from the ships bridge, rather than the quayside 
Tory crimes against the UK.1. The creepy secret destruction of our NHS.2. The Brexit referendum.(pilacs).3.  Universal Credit crimes: against the poor, the working class; single mothers and the sick and disabled.4. 4 million children living in the abject horror of poverty.  
Rees-Mogg: It isn’t Brexit unless ECJ has no involvement in British law  
I'm perfectly comfortable with that. I'll take no Brexit, thanks.  
Should the BBC reflect the views of its viewing & funding public? Since last year's referendum, BBC1’s Andrew Marr has had 129 pro-Europe guests compared with just 33 Leavers! 
Just discovered Walls don't make Lemonade Sparkles any more and now I understand why the older generation voted Brexit. 
Stopping Brexit would be “embarrassment” says MP. That’s really not a very smart reason...  
We must keep reminding #Britain that #Brexit can be stopped. It hasn’t been delivered yet; it was sold using false claims, and if Brexit was a product, we’d have every right now to cancel the order. Please share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
@Nigel_Farage says Brexit's exceptional problem on the Irish border requires an exceptional solution  
'You were too thick to vote in an IN/OUT EU referendum' .....cries the remainers who want to give you a second IN/OUT EU referendum!! 
Support for second EU ref rising. Exit #brexit  
Jeremy Hunt has issued a stark warning to Tory rebels that Brexit will not happen if Theresa May is ousted as Prime Minister  
Shock poll: Brits now want SECOND Brexit referendum in backlash over divorce bill  
Could we please have no @theresa_may and NO #Brexit?Please? It'd be the best Christmas present ever!#StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow 
"Brexit won't happen if Theresa May loses support" says Jeremy Hunt. So, we have a chance to #StopBrexit and #SaveOurNHS - let's get working... 
Coming up on #SalmondOnSunday, 3pm @LBC- @realDonaldTrump's future- @DamianGreen's future- Is UK Government's focus on Brexit having an impact on its ability to tackle social mobility?Have your say... 0345 60 60 973 84850 @LBC 
Not content with trashing our economy, damaging our global reputation and destabilising the Northern Ireland border, Tory Brexiters now want to force the PM into a hard, No Deal #Brexit. We must all ensure they face their day of political reckoning for destroying our country. 
Scott Clissold on Theresa May’s Christmas Brexit shopping list – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
“Party alone.” Tells you everything you need to know about Brexit.  
Foster - “DUP wants to see a sensible Brexit” | Democratic Unionist Party:  
#lbc Bloody Alastair Campbell on talking bollocks as usual !!! Spends morning noon & night trying to stop Brexit. 17 million voted leave you halfwit we’re leaving. Go away no one cares what you got to say about anything !!!!!!!      
Mike Russell: Scotland can't accept #Brexit bill in its current form 
Brexit impact map without the main UK-Ireland ferry port? Come on, guys! I can assure you #Anglesey is still here - I’m on it right now. @pestononsunday  
“If we don't back Theresa May, we'll have no Brexit” - says Hunt. Not true. But a good scare for the Brexiteers. And a good carrot for the Stop-Brexiteers  
Jeremy Hunt warns 'If we don't back Theresa May, we'll have no Brexit!' Best news I've heard for months!  
I am an #EUcitizen. Have lived & loved in London for 9 years, next April is my 10 year anniversary. This article by @sturdyAlex expresses exactly how I think & feel about #Brexit a 1000x better than I am capable of articulating:  Thank you Alex, thank you! 
translation: we will say (but not necessarily do) anything to keep mopping up Remainers while supporting Brexit  
We need a #Brexit that protects #international scientific #collaboration says @EdWhiting1 #TogetherScienceCan  
Some people really have no idea what they are talking about - don't spread partisan misinformation with a topic as important as #Brexit 
'Progress' made in ongoing Brexit negotiations via @RTENewsNow  
#TonyBlair Tony Blair, the most toxic man in history, say #Brexit is bad and the #EU is good. This should tell you something. 
The Brexit ‘patriots’ care little for British history or influence  
Why do so many of the liberal intellectuals who attacked the EU referendum on the grounds that the people weren’t fit to make such judgements, now want a referendum in the hope that they’ll change their minds? 
'EU is breaching Article 50!' Ex Tory leader lambasts bloc for 'unlawfully' halting Brexit  
Very concerned at how brexit will interfere with our ability to continue to do pan European clinical trials for children and young people with cancer 
A vote for @UKLabour is a vote for Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn's Brexit. This is the very same Brexit that the Tories want, don't be fooled by the "for the many" jingle. Brexit means Brexit and we will all be screwed for generations, please remember that.  
Once we move on to discuss future post-#Brexit arrangements, Ireland will be at the forefront of promoting the closest possible EU-UK relationship - @simoncoveney 
"By heading for Brexit, Britain seems to be having a collective nervous breakdown...our enemies thoroughly approve of Brexit."  
Jeremy Hunt says Brexit won't happen if Theresa May loses support 
While we listen to @simoncoveney on #marian lets remember his time as an utter failure as Min for Housing, helping to double child homelessness & failing on his own targets (before he ran off into the sunset). Now he's Tanaiste & our man on #Brexit. #RewardingFailure #ApolloHouse 
Blair on @BBCRadio4 wants to break up Brexit coalition & stop Brexit. Says he 'really believes in this country'; does he mean EU Superstate? 
I have criticised Lib Dems for their role a lot. But if I could vote and had a choice between Labour whose support of Brexit is helping tank economy and actively destroying future opportunities for millions, and Lib Dems, there’s no question over who I’d choose.  
The problem is Nigel, you're not actually interested in the rights of gay people or those oppressed by ISIS, your aim is to do the same as Trump, using the uneducated and ignorant as a conduit to spread division through hatred and misinformation to achieve your far-right aims. 
Find this attitude that "British people voted for it so we must do it" utterly pernicious. Many people had no idea of the ramifications of Brexit, the scale of it and the mass uncertainty it would cause. What is needed is more honesty @lbc 
She is distracted by Brexit Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, just as you will be. All your dreams and aspirations will be swallowed up by Brexit. There will only be Brexit.#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit For the many, not the few 
Agreed. So let’s stop Brexit, given that Brexit is what these two are salivatingly after.  
We're going to make sure that Brexit never happens. It's for your own good - you're too stupid to know any better.  
It's encouraging to see Jeremy Hunt admit that the option of an exit from Brexit is still on the table - @VinceCable 
No Brexit would be the result -? Good!  
Definitely! bring it on to #StopBrexit #FBPEBrexit talks balls up: We want a second vote, say public  
Even if I didn't hate Brexit with every fibre of my body just the idea of hanging out with the kind of arrogant toffs on the other side of the argument would have kept me waving the EU flag. 
Brexit is bad enough for Scotland and UK, but leaving single market and customs union is inflicting extra, serious and unnecessary damage. German MEP @davidmcallister outlines problems on  
I love how Nigel Farage takes full responsibility for the damage Brexit is doing to this country.....#Marr 
."Irish citizens in Britain could lose their right to live, work & get NHS services in the country after Brexit.".  
If true, this changes everything. Big if. “Corbyn meets Costa in Lisbon, and signals that Labour could be open to second Brexit referendum”(via @portugalpress) 
Jeremy Hunt: 'If we don't back Theresa May, we'll have no Brexit'  
No - It is Brit Govt who held Referendum & it is Brit Govt who are heading for a hard #Brexit  
This is important. Second referendum is going to be crucial as our MPs appear to need the support of the voice of the people to save our country. Without it they are quite capable of steaming ahead into the iceberg. Start preparing for the campaign.#ThinkAgain#FBPE 
We can still fight for our say, we can still make a difference and be heard right for a say!Sister protests in London and Brussels for a second referendum 11th Dec #FinalSay #BrusselsProtest #StopBrexit 
Ireland has 'no desire' to delay Brexit - deputy PM  
#CardiffNorth has 19,000 public sector workers, the highest % in #Wales. During the budget debate last week, I told the Government that their worst legacy is not ending the disgraceful #publicsector pay freeze – instead they chose to spend the money on #Brexit.  
The UK is in a really good position for negotiating Brexit, everything that the EU wants to do to stop it will make it worse for the EU and not us. 
This (from @BEERG ) is a really excellent summary of where Brexit negotiations currently stand and where they're likely to go. Do read:   
Better to save our country than save their faces!  Politicians must put people before politics - as Alan Millburn said 'to be hard on the causes of Brexit' so we have a fairer society  
I don't believe in Brexit bc I have got the strength of character not to be taken in by a cult aimed at the feeble minded. 
Just a reminder, a fairer Britain cannot be created as a result of Brexit. No matter how many times Corbyn or May tells us it can be, they are simply lying to us.   
I presume people like Tom Newton Dunn and Andrew Marr will be asking the likes of Nick Clegg and Peter Mandelson whether they will be giving up their lavish pensions and speech bungs in support of the European Union post Brexit?  
“choice we face now isnt between this Brexit and that Brexit, if we don’t back Theresa May we will have no Brexit” Health Sec Hunt to Peston  
Huh? If 50% of the vote was good enough in 2016, it must logically be good enough for any further referendum.  
.@VinceCable responds to Jeremy Hunt's comments that failure to back Theresa May will mean we have no Brexit.  
We May have a Referendum on the dealWe May stay in the Single MarketWe May stay in the Customs UnionWe say we Must end this ambiguityFor the well being of the country, and for the Many, let’s make 2018 the end of May and unequivocally back Remain @BarryGardiner#StopBrexit 
6) and to those many Labour supporters who say "it's not Labour's problem" I'd say "it's a national problem, our MPs should care first & foremost for the National interest"Tories are driving BrexitLabour is enabling itEnd/ 
Encouraging to see a senior cabinet minister admit the option of an #ExitFromBrexit is still on the table. Government must now confirm Article 50 can be withdrawn and the country still has a choice over whether to proceed with Brexit or stay in EU  
5) Right now Labour's greatest fear is a collapse of the Tory Government, because then they'd need to carry Brexit through.Instead they're hoping the Tories can hang on just long enough to take the blame.This is political cowardice & a dereliction of duty 
The majority now agree that Brexit is a bad idea anyway.  
My personal answer to your hypothetical question:Country has voted to leave. That therefore is the status quo.If hypothetically, there were a referendum on the final deal to leave. 2/3 would have to reject the deal in order to reverse the status quo.  
The public want a second referendum after the Government botched the first round of Brexit negotiations, according to a Mail on Sunday poll.  
It’s been clear for a long while now @OwenJones84 priority isn’t stopping a Brexit that will destroy the lives of working class people, it to stop any Social Democratic threat to Jeremy Corbyn’s leadership  
Michael Howard: I have complete faith in David Davis Inner Voice: he did just threaten to quit if his friend wasn’t allowed to wank at work though#brexit #bbcdp 
This is damning on the current state of public opinion on #Brexit. People fear it, they think it will leave them personally worse off, they think it will be bad for the #NHS. Not surprisingly, an overwhelming majority now want a 2nd referendum.  
Read about the report we are launching tomorrow which found Irish citizens and Irish Travellers rights are risk. Written by @SimonFRCox  #Brexit 
This - very important statement from Hunt, first mention of no Brexit  
Brexit and Trump inextricably linked.  We need to be exposing this more widely. Carole Cadwalladr and JJ Patrick doing some amazing work.  
Will Labour support a 2nd EU referendum? Sarah Smith quizzes @BarryGardiner #bbcsp 
.@OwenJones84 will never accept that through his explicit support for Brexit, he's facilitating the very politics he says he hates - racial bigotry, wage suppression and tax avoidance- all very real in the post-EU UK. He's a useful fool for the Tories * UKIP and nothing more. 
A typical beautiful Argyll backdrop ( at #Portavadie) for my #Brexit pre-recorded interview  on @Sun_Pol_Scot 
He’s batshit on Brexit but the Wetherspoons chap has outstanding musical tastes. The Dylan/Cash duet is close to perfect. #DesertIslandDiscs 
REALLY really interesting from @Jeremy_Hunt: he says if cabinet and Tory party does not back @theresa_may and her Brexit offer to EU, including continued role of ECJ and Brexit divorce bill of more than £40bn, alternative is NO BREXIT.  
“If we don’t back Theresa May, we will have no Brexit” says @Jeremy_Hunt  
Oh FFS. First Marr normalising multiple fascists, then shrill brexity Alice on The Archers, and NOW Kirsty Young fawning over Tim Martin and chuckling at his brexit vote victory. What exactly are remainers paying the @BBC licence fee for? Taxation without representation? 
Barry Gardiner getting himself into a terrible pickle on whether Labour will support a 2nd EU referendum. Clearly hates the idea, but party policy is not to rule it out #bbcsp 
Let me be clear: Labour will not support a new referendum. They will never support a second referendumThey just want to tease the possibility of one enough to keep remainers from voting Liberal Democrat 
Latest Survation/MoS poll shows clear support for a referendum on the final deal  
.@Jeremy_Hunt becomes the first Cabinet Minister to explain contentious government proposals for the ECJ to have a permanent role protecting the rights of EU migrants after Brexit.  
Is this Brexit Promotion Day? Rees-Mogg & Farage both on #Marr and now the revolting Tim Martin on #DesertIslandDiscs - too much to bear on a #SundayMorning 
Ah mais non! Brexit means Brexit!  
British MP to every foreign secret service in the world: our office has no information security to speak of & you’re welcome to access my account for the low price of getting an intern on my team via an exchange programme.Brexit Britain, taking back control yet again.#infosec 
Listen to him very carefully ...Jeremy Hunt: “The choice we face now is not between this Brexit or that Brexit. If we don’t back Theresa May we will have no Brexit.”I am very clear that I am not backing Theresa May, now or at any other time.  
Jeremy Hunt: "If we don't back Theresa May we will have no Brexit."Not exactly a tough choice then is it... 
A no-deal Brexit is estimated to cut Britain's GDP by a total of 2% by the end of 2020, equivalent to £40bn  
One of the reasons why the neoliberal right want #brexit :  
Day 3 of the BreXmas advent calendar: Brexit planning is already costing the Gov £1m a day. Please RT:  
An exit from Brexit would mean we could spend an extra £300m a week, enough to plug the entire gap in NHS and care funding by 2020  
 Rage. London abandoned. World carries on without us. Scotland is the last hope.Brexit is basically the plot of 28 Days Later. 
Typical conversation I have seen on Twitter a few times:EU citizen: I feel unwelcome since #eurefLeaver: Nobody is making you feel unwelcomefollowed by a selection from:- it's the remoaners who are telling you fake stories- if you don't like Brexit, go home 
BREXIT: If the ECJ holds sway over British law and taxpayers keep paying into EU budget then the UK hasn't left the EU, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. The people voted to Leave, let's get a move on. 
As predicted, Brexit will take over everything. Brexit will devour all the money. All the attention, all the focus, all the effort will go only into Brexit. Brexit will be the causes of Brexit. #StopBrexit and make the government deal with the causes of Brexit instead.  
Shocked by vast costs, job losses and chaos of Brexit, majority want 2nd vote. 2nd thoughts always better than 1st thoughts. 
.@M_AndersonSF will e on the Sunday Politics Show at 11.35am discussing Brexit and the need for the north to secure special status within the EU  
German MEP David McAllister says that the concerns of the Irish will be key in Brexit talks, but that the problems faced are the consequences of the British decision to leave the EU single market and customs union.  
Brexit Explained  
"Conservative MP Jacob Rees-Mogg suggested on Sunday that Ireland’s position on Brexit is being influenced by a no-confidence motion that never took place in a Tánaiste who resigned last Tuesday"  
Some of us always knew. It's why we warned about Lisbon being ratified without a referendum, we knew it represented a big step towards federal union. Back then we were written off as loons and conspiracy theorists. Nice to see the reality finally acknowledged, albeit belatedly.  
50% of Britons now want a second referendum on the final Brexit deal, according to the latest @Survation polling. 
Dear @HelenGoodmanMP We campaigned together for Remain on referendum day. I know what you really believe is best for your country. It's time you acted against #Brexit poverty. #MPStopBrexit 
A Brexit for bassoons? WTO terms tariffs on musical instruments are 3% - we run a deficit on musical instruments, apparently  
350 years on, a dead king wades into #Brexit. Reuters @Jacob_Greaves reports from Bruges, Belgium. More from @ReutersTV:  
So let me get this straight. Bitter EU enthusiast Alan Milburn, ally of bitter EU enthusiast Tony Blair, makes a grandstanding resignation from a committee while having a pop at Brexit? No further questions. #Marr 
German MEP and Angela Merkel ally, David McAllister says chance of moving to Brexit trade talks in December is probably only "50-50"  
Cheeky fucker. Brexit was a game to them. We will suffer whilst they ensure they are insulated from the effects. And *still* folk will think he’s a ‘man of the people’  
" Have you ever been to old Trafford to watch united ? " United came to me in DC cos you know, that's how globalization works Mr Brexit scouser 
In my humble opinion, the arrogance and -even more strikingly - the ignorance shown by Westminster politicians and U.K. journalists towards Ireland over #Brexit is breathtaking And believe me we saw some crackers during #IndyRef 
Time for EU to give, not just take, in Brexit negs: constructive and measured letter to PM from Leave Means Leave  
In that case, let’s have No Brexit.  
Jeremy Hunt: "The choice we face is not between this Brexit or that Brexit. If we don't back Theresa May we will have no Brexit."  
This is a serious vote of no confidence in the government's social policies. Brexit is sucking all the life out of government so that it has no time or energy to address inequality and lack of opportunity for young people.  
Tory MPs on every political programme this morning:“The Brexit mess is nothing to do with us. It’s all the EU’s fault!”#Marr  #BBCdp 
1/. THREAD: Could Gen Flynn's cooperation with the US-Mueller enquiry now throw light on Russian interference in #Brexit vote?   
Tony Blair: Brexit puts NI peace process at risk  
 stop giving a platform to No Deal as an option. 4.5 million people would be thrown under the Brexit bus, including vulnerable pensioners and children. How can any MP thinks this is acceptable? 
The #marrshow in six words. Anti Brexit. Anti Trump. Pro Labour. 
Wonder if MSM will be so happy to platform Farage when the full story of his links to Trump, Bannon, and Brexit money and chicanery is told. Sterling work by @carolecadwallar and others. 
Rees Mogg is saying the poorest should fund the costs of #Brexit. Hedge fund owners like him will short anything and reap the benefits  
To have a simple majority referendum on a major contitutional issue like leaving the EU was a catastrophic error. Become even more apparent as Brexit has progressed. The level of ignorance - accross the board - about the importance and relevance of our membership Is astounding 
Home Office data released on Thursday confirmed 5,321 EU nationals were forcibly removed in the year until September"Did you know that? I certainly didn't. #Brexit politicians and newspapers told us this is impossible whilst a member of the EU. #fbpe #stopbrexit .#LIARS 
  Have warned of this exact scenario. Hard #brexit = outside single market & customs union = hard border = disastrous. Hard Brexiteers really don’t care. Time people understood that.  
We have a remainer Prime Minister trying to get the country the best deal for #Brexit. This was a democratic vote by the people that is now being deliberately watered down & stalled by our own government.Time for May to go. Now.@Number10gov @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @Nigel_Farage 
We have written to the PM urging her to issue a final ultimatum to Brussels this week – agree to Britains Brexit red lines or we will not pay the EU a penny. The letter is signed by senior figures from politics, business and economics. Read our letter here 
Why was Farage on #marr yet again, defending Trump and repeating his Brexit lies ? And related extremism from Rees Mogg a few minutes later ! 
“It is very important we don't hand over a great deal of money unless we have an agreement,” says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on the Brexit divorce bill  
"We certainly don't want to be vetoing anything" - Irish Deputy PM says their government has no desire to delay #Brexit process #Marr  
Essex MP calls for halal meat to be BANNED from schools  via @Your Brexit 
"It is very important we don't hand over a great deal of money unless we have an agreement" @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on Brexit divorce bill #marr 
I love the phrase "tantamount to overturning the referendum result." It's Brexit Ultra code for "this is against my preference in some respects."  
Britain can rest easy. Liam Fox's search for a panoply of new international trade deals to compensate for the damage done by Brexit has finally launched. Day 1: a fact-finding mission to the international bassoon market.  
This entire “Irish border” debate over Brexit is banal. Northern Ireland operates as part of a United Kingdom. If the Irish want to pretend otherwise we shouldn’t indulge their conceit. 
Mail on Sunday poll finds the majority want to retain access to the single market and customs union in either a Norway style deal or by staying in the EU. Both groups working together can stop the Brexit fantasists hard Brexit. #StopBrexit 
The Irish are using Brexit to reunite Ireland by stealth which is why they called a referendum in the UK in June 2016 then insisted on the UK government going for a hard Brexit. #marr 
1. Brexit is not about regulations. It's about repatriating the decision making. 2. Yes, doing nothing usually is cheaper and more convenient - but politicians doing nothing is why we are here.3. They should have thought about that before taking us deeper in without consent.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg has just told the @MarrShow that Ireland’s entire position on Brexit is because of “a no confidence motion in the deputy prime minister, an election and the threat of Sinn Fein”. My word. 
100x this. When Brexit doesn’t magically solve people’s problems, either conventional politics must or door open to extremists  
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "We need to deliver the benefits of Brexit to the poorest in our nation." There aren't any benefits to share: OBR forecasts net fiscal loss of £300m a week. #Marr 
In any other Job May would have been fired for her abysmal performance. Why then is she still hanging on to leadership of the UK. She has screwed up relations with our friends in the US embarrassed us over brexit and cost us 45 billion so far - a figure we can´t afford. 
Now over 68% funded.As the polls start to signal a decisive turn against Brexit it becomes all the more important our MPs have power to call the whole thing off.Please fund.  
Westminster wants to use Brexit to relegate Wales back to a Little England annexe, says @HywelPlaidCymru 
Jacob Rees-Mogg and Nigel Farage will both profit greatly from Brexit. The haves will have more, the have-nots - well, who cares about them? #marr  #stopbrexit 
Sad to see the @BBC giving yet more air time to #Farage on #marr this morning to spout the most outrageous lies on #brexit and defend #Trump on his support for far right 
Wow. Farage just admitted on #Marr ‘Brexit is failing.’ 
LOL at @ayeshahazarika for attacking @Nigel_Farage as "hypocrite" for accepting pension from #EU post-#Brexit, but doesn't mention her fans Neil Moneybages Kinnock and Peter Slimebag Mandelson who have HUGE pensions screwed from British via EU. #marr #marrshow 
Govt. borrowing surged 6.25% from last year to £8bn. Brexit inflation hitting international debt repayment, & gov. hiring thousands of civil servants to deal with impact 
May continues the betrayal of Brexit. Why is anybody surprised?  
Whatever spin politicians put on it the People R waking up to the fact #Brexit can't be made 2 work, the UK's lost not gained control, ppl will be worse off & now want a #FinalSay with an option 2 #StopBrexit..& can we have more experts & fewer politicos on pls.We need the truth. 
I wonder if Brexit fan #Marr will mention the letter this week from an MP saying they are only going ahead with Brexit to avoid embarrassment?  
Paralysed by Brexit, Theresa May and her government are, alas, unable to tackle the day job. #BrexitChaos 
Brexit isn’t about social mobility. Official.   
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says  
No bandwidth beyond Brexit for the “burning injustices” which face our society. But blue passports...  
NEW: Fears grow over EU university funding as grants decline even before Brexit.“Ministers need to recognise the damage that their flawed approach to the Brexit negotiations is doing,” @PaulBlomfieldMP 
“The EU should use the opportunity of #Brexit to blacklist the UK overseas territories and force the government to end their poisonous tax secrecy" says @MollyMEP  
Theresa May's entire social mobility commission have quit because she's too busy with Brexit to help the poor 
To think the Telegraph told us yesterday Brexit is about taking power from the elites and giving it to the people  
Theresa May NEVER supported Brexit, in fact she campaigned for Remain. She has done everything possible to sabotage Britain's attempts to leave the EU. Do not be fooled, she is not a patriot, she is a pawn of the internationalist bankers.  
The referendum vote was split. The government lost its majority over brexit. Democracy means reflecting the views of the country. Why do you hate democracy? 
A really poignant thread from an EU citizen married to a Brit who is leaving Brexit Britain. Read 150+ such testimonies in our moving & powerful book @InLimboBrexit published today by @BylineBooks @CynefinRoad Open minds by touching hearts with our book this Christmas. 
#Brexit: ‘The notion that Trump will compensate Britain by offering a generous trade deal does not survive contact with reality’ @NickCohen4 
Anyone who thinks going ahead with Brexit is less embarrassing than cancelling it must hate those pilots who abort a landing at the last minute because it’s too dangerous. The embarrassment.  
Fascinating polling in #UK  on #Brexit: reveals a considerable degree of apprehension among British voters about what the future may hold:  
Tories at war over European judges amid claims UK heading for version of Brexit 'that effectively fails to leave EU' 
An insightful long read on the state of our nation post-referendum. #Brexit  
In 2018, Jeremy Corbyn will conduct a permanent campaign as Brexit talks stagger onwards   
TrumpAndBrexit have the same roots and the same goals. And what trump and his billionaire lobbyists are doing in the US now, brexit and Legatum will do to us.  
Backlash as voters say £50bn Brexit bill is too highWhat has it achieved? Nothing!  
.@nick_clegg: 'where does the rage go? Where does the rust belt rage go in America, when building a wall against the Mexicans does not lead to jobs being restored? Where does the legitimate rage among Brexit voters go when they discover that Brexit does not deliver paradise?'  
Brexit and the failure of social mobility both symptoms of a broken economic model that is designed to increase inequality. Milburn and his Blairite friends failed to challenge this when in office and so must share the blame 
British MPs know that Brexit will be bad but say they won't stop it. Why?It'd be too embarrassing.Unacceptable. As Brexit damages Britain more and more, voters demand that #MPStopBrexit 
ResetEra Forum User Gets Banned For Being Paranoid Of #GamerGate, Trump, Brexit  
The Brexit Broadcasting Corporation have Farage and Rees-Mogg on this morning. #Marr give them a hard time? No chance. We are sick and tired of the same old faces, the same old baloney. Just don’t watch. @MarrShow 
Important article by @NickCohen4 on #Trump, and the Brexiters’ “forlorn hope that the US will save it from the folly of cutting itself off from our true friends in the world’s largest free trade area” #Brexit  
"BUSINESS PEOPLE NEGOTIATE DEALS - GOVERNMENTS NEGOTIATE FUDGES" - Another 'do not miss' article from #Brexit Facts4EU:  
Abandoning Brexit would be a “national embarrassment”. Well @RobertJenrick I’m afraid going ahead with it would be a national disaster and a national humiliation. Hard to choose innit? 
Brexit supporters list demands for 'divorce bill' talks  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
Aerospace is a thriving British industry. What price will it pay for Brexit?  
Fears grow over EU university funding as grants decline even before Brexit  
EU tax haven blacklist is coming on Tuesday. Hot speculation about which UK territories will be on it, and how EU can use #Brexit negotiations to force them clean up their tax act#FAIRtax #taxjustice 
Thanks to Brexit, Ireland suddenly has 1,000 more lawyers  
Corbyn Signals Labour Could Be Open to Second Brexit Referendum  
Ireland is the world’s second-largest market for thoroughbred horse sales after the US, but with trade between Ireland and the UK after Brexit still unclear, there are concerns the racehorse sector could be adversely affected  
Yes, deeply depressing.We need a massive fact giving publicity campaign.  An attack on fake news and mistruths.  Nearly 18 months on and people are STILL repeating the lies .We have to address the lies & propaganda to be able to stop Brexit & also to try & reunite people. 
Massive majority in favour of a second referendum on a Brexit that will leave you worse off, the NHS with less money and about which we are fearful.  
DUP should be very careful at this point,as the latest poll in the Belfast Telegraph(historically its readership is strongly Unionist)shows that 70%+ want a referendum on CU and SM,and that 70%+ would vote to stay in those. The DUP is running out of roads.  
Obama traveled to the U.K. to campaign against Brexit.Several BHO officials worked the 2014 Israeli election.Obama campaigned for Emanuel Macron; including commercials.Similarly, Trump visited Mexico and talked w/ Nieto as a candidate (no-one upset). 
Oh wait. I forgot about #Brexit 
My daughter has written an essay about the referendum, has some poetic license but captures her experience. Published in her school paper: 
The Brexit backing head of Wetherspoon's just said immigration was a 'good thing' for Britain  
Whatever ordinary decent reason you voted for Brexit has long since been hijacked by bigots, racists, fascists and xenophobes. To continue to support Brexit is to support bigotry, racism, fascism & xenophobia. You are better than that. Brexit can be stopped. #StopBrexit 
#FinalSayForAll #BrusselsProtestBrexit has helped me realise just how many in the UK are racist, uninformed, detached,xenophobic, bigoted and aggressive. Also those that are wonderful, caring, lovable, determined, intelligent and supportive.  
@mikegalsworthy delivers his video blogs on what's happening on Planet Brexit so well.  
Jeremy Corbyn would squander the potential of Brexit with even more regulation than Brussels #premium 
Dear @AndrewMarr9,Please ask Nigel Farage and Jacob Rees-Mogg to name one practical, tangible, realistic benefit of Brexit.Just one will do.I've been asking for 18 months and haven't heard one yet.Thanks. 
Spent the night at an xmas do with 300+ Poles, Latvians & Lithunians the highlight had to be hearing them sing at the end..  "They'd walk 500 miles just to be EU" to a rapturous "Fuck Brexit!"  
What does @Ian56789 tweet about? 43% of his tweets contain one or more of the terms in his chart, commonly found in Kremlin agitprop. Note that several US-related topics are more prominent than Brexit.  
And validated neoliberalism in the process. Remember supporting a govt surplus? Supporting Austerity? Because u failed to recognise the role you had in shaping public opinion and not just following it? It led to brexit and subsequently a deeply damaging tory government. 
 Europe is talking about banning Doner Kebab and suddenly Brexit does not seem too high a price to pay 
Brexit: the most fateful mistake - staying in the EEA was always our only serious option. May has made a huge mistake committing to leave it ...   #Brexit.  
LOSER @theresa_may is a #Weak & #Pathetic #PM! #BRITAIN deserves BETTER!” 17,410,742 people demand an #Honest PM who believes in #BREXIT! #Tory Patriots could vote against #Brexit sham deal over £50bn #divorcebill!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU @Conservatives 
#UK #factories see strongest #growth for four years! Oh Lord, when will this #Brexit apocalypse end?  #ProjectFear...?  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #TORIES #TORY #NEWS #MP 
@DanJarvisMP Your role is to act in the best interests of your constituents and the country. Call out Brexit for what it is and #StopBrexit. #MPStopBrexit . 
There is now a clear majority, of those expressing an opinion, for a referendum to held on the #brexit deal. If the deal is rejected the option has to be to Remain by revoking A50.#exitfrombrexit 
Public backs referendum on Brexit deal by 50%-34% in new poll  
And then this is interesting38% back a “hard” Brexit outside Single market and Customs Union24% back a “soft” Brexit inside CM & CU28% back staying in EU...So, helpfully, leaving SM & CU is the plurality of these 3 choices, but a majority want to stay inside them pic.twitter.com/xGun2UX1iE 
Brexit: Theresa May under growing pressure to reveal true cost of divorce bill amid Conservative unrest  It was never on the ballot to spend these huge sums to 'gain' an inferior deal to what we have NOW. 
Also Survation report strong backing for a referendum on accepting or rejecting the EU exit deal 50% -34% - half of the 34% comes from over 55s... among under 55s support for Exit Deal referendum is 54%-27%  
Every line I read about Trump"s America is applicable to Brexit Britain. Why are many British people so up in arms about Trump but say nothing against Brexit? The former is atrocious but only there for a short time; the second is equally destructive but will be there long term. 
@J_amesp  @HeadUKCivServ Oh come on Mr Starmer - do just ask MI5, MI6 and GCHQ  what they know about the links between these right wing head-bangers and Mr Putin's subversion of British democracy in order to procure the Referendum leave vote. James Patrick can help with details 
."Head of Britain's Social Mobility Commission has quit, accusing May of being too fixated on Brexit to improve prospects of those from less privileged backgrounds.". 
Survation now have it 52:48 Remain... At actual referendum its sample voted 378 (46%) Leave: 360 (44%) Remain/ 77 DNV (9%) - that has turned into 426 Remain: 398 Leave...- 24 Remainers went LEave, 31 Leavers Remain- Swing to Remain from getting 69% (53 vs 24) 2016 non voters pic.twitter.com/eU4nNpXbzc 
When I set up the Social Mobility Commission I told Alan Milburn that his job was to tell truth to power. Looks like this government doesn’t want to listen. His resignation is a huge setback to the social mobility cause. This Brexit fixated government should be ashamed of itself. 
#Corbyn meets Costa in #Lisbon, and signals that #Labour could be open to second #Brexit referendum 
Grim reading for the DUP. Collapse May’s government, you’ll get Corbyn.The illusion of being kingmakers when you were only ever Tory cannon fodder and ballast.#Brexit  
@realDonaldTrump@KTHopkinsPLEASE HELP THIS GO VIRAL..Don't let the EVIL men who ruined the UK (Tony Blair, Alastair Campbell & Peter Mandleson)get away with overthrowing Brexit.. #GlobalistFilth #Traitors 
Embarrassment.Embarrassment.We’re going ahead with Brexit, tanking the economy, tearing the country in half and shredding our international influence because backing out would *EMBARRASS* the Brexidiots.GOD DAMN THEM ALL TO HELL.  
If this happens.....Tories at war over European judges amid claims UK heading for version of Brexit 'that effectively fails to leave EU'  via @telegraphnews 
one for those of us who have been arguing Brexit is imposing a bandwidth tax on govt decision-making  
Brexit is distracting from dealing with the very issues that led to Brexit.Damning statement from Alan Milburn as he and all other commissioners quit Social Mobility Commission over govt's complete failure to address critical issues dividing Britain  
While Brexit is not the answer, Brexiters (I feel) are right to be annoyed at the concentration of wealth and opportunity in London.I'm not an economist, but would tax incentives to businesses based in the (relative) North, not help? (may even lead to lower London prices) 
NEW: Labour will call on Tory MPs to back a plan to give the UK’s spending watchdog a chance to assess the Brexit divorce settlement and for Parliament to vote on it.“It is essential that the Government is transparent at every stage of this process,” @Keir_Starmer 
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS with £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says.At last, some real facts to put on the side of a bus.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Because we aren't violent people, we like dialogue and negotiation. We respect all kind of opinions and this is why we called for a referendum: to give the chance to vote either YES or NO.  
May & Brexit combined will set back social mobility generations - it's time full Labour movement recognised & opposed this fully  
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says  @BrexitBin @nawtydad @VladimirFarage @smburningham1 @dontbrexitfixit @dorsetnative @chrisfburgess @carolJhedges @DavidoOrr @theskibeagle @lbjfanbigups @Blackro12653624 @lesbonner 
Brexit presents us with a one-time opportunity to devise a new system, tailored to British farming’s needs, writes @Ruth_R_Davis  
Jacob Rees-Mogg warns EU Britain may BLOCK paying Brexit bill  via @Your Brexit 
All of a sudden £40 billion Brexit divorce bill is a “bargain” to the previous “ go whistle “ crowd. Did they collide with Planet Reality?  
Dear @vincecable, I am a constituent, and like at least 48% of the UK population (probably more now), I want to #StopBrexit. #Brexit will ruin us for generations. Please do something about it. #MPStopBrexit. (Please Retweet any Tweets you see withthis tag...Thanks @Gordon1000) 
'Rhetoric not matched by reality' is a phrase that could apply to almost any aspect of May's Government so it's no surprise Alan Milburn and the members of the Social Mobility Commission have reached that conclusion.May's paralysed by #brexit  
The true curse of Brexit is the massive opportunity cost. It is all the Government will be doing, when there is so much else that needs to be done.  
It’s been 17 months since the referendum & @toryboypierce is still pretending Norway isn’t in the Single Market. 
Great scoop from @ShippersUnbound. Brexit crowds out social mobility, as it does all else the Conservative Party cares for.  
living in the UK consists of; expressing it as a fact that the takeaway you go to is the best, making inbetweeners references years after it finished, hearing idiots discuss Brexit, wanting Oasis to reform, waiting for festival season and forever craving a tango ice blast 
Brexit Britain is so racist and chauvinist that four Black, Asian and mixed race guys from Watford are running away with the X-Factor final closely followed by a Black French guy... 
A Conservative peer recommends everyone immediately write their MPs suggesting a rethink. “Brexit not turning out as Leave leaders promised”  
Milburn warns that govt failure on social mobility will lead to “seething resentment” in Brexit backing areas and political extremism. See Sunday Times 
1) This cannot be tweeted enoughToday an MEP tweeted that the EU had handed a # Brexit veto to Ireland, when they, like the other 26, have always had oneBelow, a mainstream Brexit supporter doesn't appear to understand the basics re Norway/EU 
Gosh, pro Brexit press - and Murdoch in particular - has it in for May these days. Has she told Rupert he can't take over Sky?  
Sunday TIMES: “May ‘betrays’ families that voted for Brexit” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Your daily reminder that @UKLabour under Corbyn is just as much in favour of Brexit as are the Tories.  
Theresa May must accept 'enormous folly' of hoping trade deal with Trump will make up for Brexit, says Nicola Sturgeon   
Why is the @BBC serving as a mouthpiece for the far-right? A thought - only Tory Brexiters would slash BBC funding; the Beeb has no reason to fear Remainers. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
December 21 elections ‘round two’ for independence referendum, says Carles Puigdemont  
They're not craven. He's the perfect cover. While everyone gets cross over Trump, whether pro or anti, those with real power get to give themselves big tax breaks and gut healthcare. I mean, its bad in the UK with Brexit but the US is just unhinged. 
Brexit is already diverting £300m a week from government revenues that could be spent on the NHS & that's just the start of it. #Brexshit  
Oh Lord, when will this Brexit apocalypse end?   
Sadly Britain is screwed among the First Global generation because of Brexit which is incredibly unfriendly to the young.  
Hard-hitting explanation of the Brexit Brexodus. So many people I know are in similar situations making similar decisions for similar reasons. Heart-wrenching and horrible for them; disastrous and shaming for UK - economically, culturally, socially  
BBC's innate anti-Brexit & pro-Left bias. And we pay.  
Fat Sam called the europa league the 'euretha cup' then followed it up with calling it the UEFA cup or 'whatever its called these days'That's the sound of a man that wants a hard Brexit 
It's "astonishing" that Britain accepted the structure of Brexit talks, @yanisvaroufakis says  
Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS £300m a week, Sir Vince Cable says:  
.Well, Well, Well "Stopping Brexit could provide the NHS & social care with an extra £300m a week.". 
Clarke was absolutely right. All these grave #Brexit repercussions were waved away as irrelevant by the Leave campaign. Consequently, no instructions from the people can be claimed to have been sought or received. #FBPE 
26 years ago, on the first day after the Ukraine's referendum on independence, @Canada and @Poland were the first 2 nations that recognized @Ukraine. Thank you, friends! 
350 years on, a dead king wades into #Brexit. Reuters @Jacob_Greaves reports from Bruges, Belgium. More from @ReutersTV:  
Just as the chlorinated chicken is the symbol of the difficulties of Brexit. Importation of a chlorinated chicken turns a frictionless EU/UK border into a hard one.  
For the benefit of all the Remainers who ‘queried’ my tweet. “Tusk handed Ireland a veto on Brexit talks”. Today’s Express. Good evening all  
Senior Brexiteer: ‘EU Students Must Not Be Given Automatic Residency Rights in UK After Brexit’  
Tories incapable of negotiating Brexit, says @_HenryBolton 
David Davis has threatened to resign twice in a fortnight - first over Michael Gove & Boris Johnson's letter on Brexit & now over the Damian Green issue.Am I alone in wondering if he's actually looking for a way out because the Brexit negotiations are such a complete car crash? 
New Irish government #Brexit policy revealed  
In recent memory the electoral successes of Brexit, Trump, the Law and Justice party in Poland, and populist parties in Germany and Austria, have all been described as threats to “democracy.”  
De Gea could stop Brexit 
Still on the topic of Redwood. He was one of the Bruges Group members. along with Tory MPs Peter Bone and Bernard Jenkin who made a 30 minute video taking a pro-Putin stance on Ukraine. Disturbing in the light of Russia's interference in US & British politics.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Very important to stress that rejecting whatever Brexit govt comes up with would not be a 'U-turn' by the voters, even if it would be by this hopeless #ToryBrexitgovt. The voters were not given a prospectus, so they are entirely free to say 'not up to expectation; prefer #Remain' 
Senior Brexiteer: 'EU Students Must Not Be Given Automatic Residency Rights in UK After Brexit' - Breitbart  
To avoid revealing the full detail of the Brexit impact papers the Brexiteers could call for another vote in the Commons to overturn the democratic result (without a hint of irony)  
.@NickCohen4 once gain eloquently channeling my inner monologue better than I ever could, we’ve picked the worst period in modern history to abandon our European friends #Brexit  
Bannon in UK this week, meets with Farage. 2 days later, Flynn pleads. I don’t know if it’s relevant. But it’s definitely factual: all three connected to Robert Mercer. And firm under investigation for role in Brexit: Cambridge Analytica.  
Good point. I don’t either side saying we’d have to pay to leave during the referendum.  
Here's something else to make us laugh from John Redwood in July 2016: "Getting out of the EU can be quick and easy - the UK holds most of the cards in any negotiation" #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Theresa May must accept 'enormous folly' of hoping trade deal with Trump will make up for Brexit, says Nicola Sturgeon  
Brexit. If it’s now about damage limitation, it has to be stopped.The irrationality in our political order is criminal.  
For those who think it’s only about a deal with the EU, think again. After #Brexit the UK will need to renegotiate at least 759 treaties with 168 non EU countries. Not as simple as copying and pasting! 
Invited to do a talk radio show in Britain to talk about Brexit, border, politics etc. No fee! The booker was very pleasant and tried to focus on exposure element but I explained #nofeenoferguson #valuingjournalism @NUJofficial 
@chunkymark When the history of #Brexit is written the #BBC will go down as the biggest facilitator. It made household names of farage, b johnson and rees mogg and thus legitimised their extreme and very nasty views. @BBCNews #marr #bbcqt 
EU v Brexit. Why would anyone in their right mind vote to leave.  
Let’s be honest it is not the #Brexit voting public that has caused this mess it is the group of incompetent charlatans who thought it would be a good wheeze and beneficial to their political career to sell false promises 
Dear @snpwhen the time comes, please refuse to take part in any debates where panel make up is based on party. A referendum is a binary decision. Panels should be 2 x 2 or 3 x 3 not 4 x 1 
If you only ever watch or listen to the BBC, and read The Guardian or Independent, you are bound to be brainwashed into thinking that Brexit is already an unmitigated disaster. 
A deeply sad insight into the reasons MPs are pursuing Brexit.If you are embarrassed to admit a mistake, no matter what the cost, your education was flawed.It also shows MPs have swallowed a skewed sense of the “will of the people,” the very disinformation pushed by Russia.  
Good Hard Brexit win for the city that was. A nice simple goal, no fancy scoreline and a couple of Burnley players walloped. The young lad Gray should enjoy his goal bonus. £50 it was in my day, should treat his dollybird to a nice dress. Cheers bob 
To limit the harm done by Brexit, stay in the EU single market | Nicola Sturgeon  
"The issue the DUP has correctly raised, is that we cannot have a situation where NI is taken away from the UK, NI is much a part of the UK as Somerset is and that is the position of Conservatives & Unionists." - Jacob Rees-Mogg MP (Daily Politics Show). #Brexit #UNITEDKingdom 
The social fracture has been there since the referendum, as for national embarrassment, UK is already a complete laughing stock, other countries  watch and wonder why we’re doing this to ourselves.If Brexit was reversed they’d shrug and say we’d returned to our senses at last. 
BREXIT REALITIES: Fool Britannia - The Future Of The UK Has Never Looked So Grim / #Brexit #Toxic #StopBrexit 
Damned straight. I'm sick of them trying to "prove" #Brexit makes sense for economic reasons. I and everyone I know who voted Remain did so because we believe tolerance, diversity and multiculturalism make the world a better place (and they are wrong anyway!) 
Brexit climbdown is not what leaving the EU was meant to look like. All the claims of a post #brexit promised land have, as predicted, fallen away. No wonder the #Leave camp are so grumpy, they're realising they were lied to by their masters. Tough. 
#Brexit uncertainty has "firmly damaged Brand Britain", according to the boss of Fortnum & Mason: "Brexit is an alarming issue for me in terms of our ability to hire and retain good people," he said."They are asking: 'Do I feel welcome?' #StopBrexit 
Brexit was when the elites got one over on the working classes by spending a lot of money telling them exactly the opposite was happening. 
UK warned on cost of 'hard Brexit' by the head of the WTO  
.@Simonhartmp I am a constituent, and I want you to take action to #StopBrexit because #Brexit will harm our country.#MPStopBrexit 
Something to do about #Brexit.Find your MP's Twitter name here Send them a Tweet telling them you are a constituent, and you want to #StopBrexit. Ask them to do something about it.Use #MPStopBrexit. Retweet any Tweets you see with that tag.Repeat. 
Theresa May must accept 'enormous folly' of hoping trade deal with Trump will make up for Brexit, says Nicola Sturgeon  
They would be real "Freedom Fighters" if they had the backbone to vote down the Brexit madness in the interest of the country and its people. #StopBrexit 
Theresa May must insist that Brexit negotiations between Britain and the European Union move on to trade, writes @JGForsyth 
It only took Brexit to unearth the simmering anti-irish feeling in England. It's always been there, just now it's got a vehicle to vent with 
 “LOSER @theresa_may is a #Weak & #Pathetic #PM! #BRITAIN deserves BETTER!” 17,410,742 people demand an #Honest PM who believes in #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #TORIES #TORY #NEWS #TraitorMay #MP 
So much written about Brexit and so many angles to cover, but this stylish essay by Anglo-Canadian novelist Tom Rachman manages to pull together a lot in an insightful way  
Sorry but I think the plan in the UK is to kill us all either with the cold. I think it's part of brexit. 
The UK will ask for its aviation industry to be regulated by the EU after Brexit, in a move that will place it under the indirect jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice, a supposed “red line” set by Theresa May.- FT 
Telegraph today says Brexit is about taking power from elites. Party its owners threw showed it was never about that  
Gove calling for Government to overhaul (i.e. reduce) regulations "to give UK big advantages over EU members." Surely not the same Gove who styles himself as "environmental defender" & promises "Green Brexit"?? -  
Brexit will fail as it is a product of hate. The EU is based on respect and the common good. Love wins over hate in the long term.#FBPE 
BREXIT BOOM: Factory Orders Hit Four-Year High, Hiring Increased to Cope with Surging Demand   
Tony Blair’s secret memo to Alastair Campbell: My 12-point plan for stopping Brexit  via @BrexitCentral 
If you're a multinational company, i.e. with factories in each country, you don't need to export across jurisdictions.If you're a smaller export company, based solely in the UK, you do.Who does Brexit hurt more?  
As Brexit gets increasingly complex and expensive, would you welcome the chance to vote again on the UK's future in the EU? My answer: Yes. What do you think?  #StopBrexit #Brexitgate @StopBrexit17 @LibDems @jk_rowling @BrexitBin #FBPE 
Ireland will be ‘stubborn but fair’ on border issue in #brexit talks says Minister @simoncoveney who is hopeful that agreement can be reached. 
Yer da's dreaming of a white Brexit. 
So apparently the 58 Brexit papers have been released albeit in their redacted original as drafted versions  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
Nicola Sturgeon announces that in the new year the @scotgov will publish its own reports into the impact of a hard #Brexit because the UK Govt has so far failed to do so: 
Take back control. Wank at work. #brexit. 
Apparently Harry Windsor enjoys watching his once proud country being taken over by #Islam. #Brexit #BritainFirst 
This Brexit malarkey seems to have gone all wrong.We were supposed to have more control and money, not less.  
Correct. I intend to apply for my Irish passport too, post-Brexit.  
The Irish are “sectarianising” The Brexit discourse - say the people who designed and  managed a brutal sectarian state for decades. As we say in Carrickmore, “Aye surely, hi!” 
Ethnic cleansing. Just another reasonable response from Brexiteers to a problem rooted in their own ignorance #brexit #NorthernIreland 
Alan Bisset, After the original Scottish Referendum - What happens now?And that isn’t even including destructive #BrexitShambles 
'They're WEAK' Euro MPs mock how easily Britain 'caved in' over £40bn Brexit bill   
When it comes to talking about Brexit a reference to World War Two is never far behind, it seems.Despite being more than seventy years apart, many are linking the two events.  
A little island, afraid of it's own shadow.. Brexiters have left UK, 'Isolated & Alone', begging for scraps from the Trump table! #Brexit  
A reminder that the leavers campaigned on a ticket that said it would be good for businesses but will eagerly slur, and throw under the bus, any business that reports a problem with Brexit. 
On the question of borders with Ireland after #Brexit, has anyone noticed that these aren’t in the EU AND don’t have a hard border...- Vatican City- Switzerland- Liechtenstein So perhaps we can focus on practical solutions, instead of sensationalist naval gazing 
"...Statistics would indicate whether it’s in 5 years or 20 years, that a successful referendum on Irish reunification, underpinned in the Good Friday Agreement, has a huge likelihood of becoming a reality in the not too distant future" Insightful read.  
During the last 40 years we have been milked dry by the EU. No more. 'MPs could BLOCK it' Jacob Rees-Mogg warns EU Britain will not pay Brexit divorce bill  
I feel like this image will prove incredibly useful in the next while. #Brexit  
If it was possible to die from irony I probably wouldn’t point out that, in the context of Brexit negotiations, the EU really is strong & stable. 
3) Voting #Brexit doesn't make you ignorant or stupid, just perhaps a bit naive.Continuing to support it in the face of mounting evidence, refusing to absorb new information...that's what makes you ignorant & stupid. 
To limit the harm done by Brexit, stay in the EU single market | Nicola Sturgeon  
Ireland will have final say on progress of Brexit talks, says EU  
Speaking at SNP National Council in Perth today, Nicola Sturgeon gave her strongest hint yet that we will be fighting an independence referendum campaign in 2018. I reserve the right to say, ah telt ye! #Referendum2018 
If I'm following the argument correctly Brexit is going to be fine because a potential software bug nearly two decades turned out fine and I need to get over myself.I don't know about anyone else but I'm convinced.  
Journalist @fotoole on the Brexit negotiations#bbcaq 
*****POLL***** Since the Brexit referendum have you become more 'pro-EU' or more 'anti-EU'?  #Brexit #Marr  #bbcsp #SmallBizSatUK #Labour #Conservatives #JeremyCorbyn #TheresaMay #Leave #Remain 
After a hard #Brexit, the passport of a small, recently independent country like Latvia, the kind of country Leavers look down on, will be of far more value across Europe than the once mighty British passport!Britain, the King Lear of nations.#BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit 
Tick, tock Barnier. WTO better than a bad deal. See ya.EU may seek 'punishment clause' in post-Brexit trade deal. 
Great to meet smart pupils from John Fisher last week, they asked pretty sharp questions about coalition and Brexit - had a better understanding than our govt. 
@LegatumInst probed by Charity Commission into links with #Brexit politicos whom it advises (inaccurately) on putative trade links @JolyonMaugham @euromove @Open_Britain @BestForBritain @britainforeurop @acgrayling @thatginamiller @BrexitRecord pic.twitter.com/GwxarfylrR 
Let me get this straight. David Davis would critically jeopardise Brexit negotiations to defend the right of his male colleagues to wank at work? Have I got this right?  
Brexit has ruined 'Brand Britain', claims Fortnum & Mason boss  via @IBTimesUK 
Despite being risky and costly, a delusional no-deal Brexit could happen by accident or poor timing 
For many people in Europe and the wider world, Britain now means Brexit, and Brexit means madness and meanness. The fact that this horrifies many Leave voters doesn't make it untrue.  
The Irish border issue has emerged as the most difficult nut to crack in this phase of the Brexit talks. London must accept some hard truths.   
Brexit negotiations  
BBC News - Brexit offer 'must be acceptable to Ireland'  self-evident - a member state's concerns will always be prioritised over those of a 3rd country 
I absolutely love that Ireland has so much control over Brexit and all English wankers are raging. Ha. Ha. Ha. 
So-called Brexit Bill AKA Brexit Ransom: "Once the baddies have the funds, more often than not you find the hostage by the side of the road with a slit throat."  
Nick Clegg meets Richard Thaler: ‘All it would take to stop Brexit is a couple of dozen brave Tories’  
I hate when factual information cannot dispel the myth of #Brexit. We are now bottom for growth and top of the tables for inflation. Personally the future looks very bleak indeed so investigating move to Germany.  
I didn't, but my friend voted Brexit based solely on the NHS lie. She isn't politically engaged, works for the NHS and is directly affected by the cuts. I had to console her the day after the advisory referendum vote; when the lie was exposed. 
“Brexit was a vote against the interests of financiers and investors. It was a vote for the nation state, which remains the fundamental unit of democracy, and the best means of managing globalisation in the interests of citizens.” - Jonathan Rutherford  
UK's offer on Brexit must be acceptable to Ireland before negotiations can move on, European Council president says  
Excellent @guardian analysis massive gap between Brexit Leader claims & reality climbdown towards acceptance EU Single Market regulations or economic disaster @derekvaughan @OpenBritain @Eluned_Morgan @The_TUC @CBItweets @RhonddaBryant 
Remember the £350 million/wk for #NHS? According to recent research #brexit is COSTING US £300 million/week. Snake oil salesmen lied to us 
Desperately clutching at straws. The real reason why the border has become such an issue is that Sinn Fein is trying to exploit Brexit to break up the UK. The Irish government is trying to out-Sinn Fein them. And EU is exploiting both to attack Britain.  
Polls already show that support for Brexit has fallen to a level where Remain would win a second vote. How long before the MPs start to notice the "Will of the People" is now the "Will of the few". It is time to change course and  #StopBrexit 
."The more the [Brexit] stones are turned over, the uglier it looks.Do the Brexit lobby in cabinet realise that the game is up in terms of their hard exit strategy?". 
Fascinating piece from @davidmcw on demographic changes in Northern Ireland and what this means for the future post Brexit. Uses actual facts and figures rather than air and opinion  Big changes very soon 
Ill-informed, jingoistic British political and media response to Ireland has made a difficult situation for UK much, much worse. My @ForeignPolicy https://t.co/3YDhFQqvRt?amp=1 #brexit 
The Brexit Elite still trying to mislead Britons. Voters aren’t stupid. Norway pays for the single market but has no say in rules, Schengen and freedom of movement. #StopBrexit #FinalSay #RemainersNow 
You mean in all the campaigning for a referendum, in the referendum itself and in the 18 months since, not one Brexiteer gave a thought of a workable solution to the Irish border... seriously?  
Just seen two men exchange hundreds of pounds in a parked car in Tottenham while out walking with my kid! Love to see business thriving in Brexit Britain! 
‘All it would take to stop Brexit is a couple of dozen brave Tories’ - @nick_clegg. So let your MP know that you want to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
At AUB, Beirut:Baghdad treated Sunni Arabs as the defeated component after -2003 regime change-2014 & 2017 when ISIS emerged & defeated. Now treats the Kurds in the same way after Referendum.Q: what is Baghdad’s vision for, Reconcilation, Reintegration & full Recovery?  
BBC1 Question Time, debating Trump, Brexit bill, UK regional development & Yemen, 30th November 2017  
Limit the 'harm' of Brexit? Whaaaaaat! What goverment would actively seek to do the nation it purports to represent - HARM? Answer? Mrs May and her gutless Tories! (aided and abetted by a lickspittle 'opposition') We have to get VERY angry, guys! 
Nick Clegg meets Richard Thaler: ‘All it would take to stop #Brexit is a couple of dozen brave Tories’  
Ireland should use its veto on Brexit negotiations if the DUP attempts to use its Westminster influence to impose a new border on the island, Sinn Fein has said.   
London Olympics, UK The Most Admired Country In The World Brexit, UK The Laughing Stock Of The World  
When we entered brexit talks we had just about everything we needed on our side. Somehow May managed to lose it all and get us a deal worse than being in the EU. Bloody Tories ! How the hell did they vote for her. Did they really see a Maggie Thatcher in her. I very much doubt it 
Can't believe I still have to keep saying this 18 months on from the Brexit vote. NORWAY  IS  IN THE SINGLE  MARKET  AND  THE  BORDER  ISN'T  FRICTIONLESS   
On @MarianRTE now talking about meeting Donald Tusk and Brexit. Tune in!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "To get out of the customs union is the greatest advantage of #Brexit. It will be very good for people in this country but it will also help some very poor countries elsewhere in the world."  
Brits should be able to apply for an EU passport post-Brexit. 
‘If Ireland’s not happy, we’re not happy’: Tusk gives Dublin formal veto on Brexit border issue  
When the pound was going down we had daily reports of how worrying this was, usually ascribed for no good reason to Brexit. The pound at $1.35 is now up by 12.5% from its recent low, but there is little comment & no features on newscasts. 
As a director of a small business, whose customers are primarily small businesses, It's clear to me there's much less investment and more caution as a result of #brexit Biggest boost that could happen for small businesses would be the #exitfrombrexit advocated by @vincecable 
UK could pay £50bn Brexit divorce bill after bowing to EU pressure! > this gets madder & madder. Political leaders- lead. Stop this monster of self destruction   
Brexit: Varadkar 'being smeared by London' as tensions rise -  
Theresa May has ONLY been PM for 508 daysIMO these are her MOST serious misjudgements :*Snap election - vanity*Manifesto - pulled after 24 hrs*Brexit - premature A50*BoJo Davis & Fox*Conf speech - pass !*Becoming PM in the 1st place - not fit for purpose !#JustSayin 
‘EU officials point out that the UK is not driven by economics, either; if it wanted to minimise the economic damage of Brexit, it would not have rejected the Norway model of staying in the single market.’  
Brexit-politicians/parties deserve no mercy whatsoever from EU27. There was zero due diligence before the referendum, no consultation with Rep of Ireland, no feasibility studies. Brexiters alone created this mess, let them sort it  
My plan to stop tweeting  about Trump or Brexit for December isn’t going very well. 
The EU Wants A Cast-Iron Guarantee From Theresa May On The Irish Border No Matter What Happens In The Brexit Talks  
Has anyone noticed how all of the #Brexit promises have drained away like tears in the rain? 
Nick Clegg meets Richard Thaler: ‘All it would take to stop Brexit is a couple of dozen brave Tories’  
Democrat/Remainer: ‘It’s not your fault you voted for Trump/Brexit. You were given inaccurate information.’Trumper/Brexiter: ‘That’s so patronising!’D/R: ‘Ok. You WERE given accurate information, you were just incompetent at understanding and assessing it. Is that better?’ 
Despite being risky and costly, a no-deal Brexit could happen by accident or poor timing  
Excellent article by the FM. Their chaotic, clueless Brexit is compounded by leaving the single market.  
'Accept it' Brexiteer tells Ireland Brexit WILL happen and they MUST get on with it . Can anyone believe that Kate Hoey is a Labour MP representing a Remain constituency in London. The people of Vauxhall should demand she resigns.#FBPE 
Brexiteers' attitudes towards the Irish Government’s attempts to protect its people's interests from the Brexit bourach range from sneering and patronising to downright threatening, says @tasminasheikh.via @ScotNational 
Keep the faith, Brexit in ANY form is harmful to the many, only the few will benefit. Nobody who is ordinary and decent voted for this. Join the #Bresistance#revokeA50forthwith #StopBrexit 
Short of EU membership the best answer to the Brexit problem is to remain in the single market and the customs union. @NicolaSturgeon via @guardian   
The #FinalSay referendum debate is taking place in Parliament on Dec 11. Please try to be at the demonstration outside and make our voices heard!#StopBrexit #Brexit Please RT. 
Brexit summary this week.Lifting my buried head out of trial work momentarily, I discovered someone else had had our Brexit cake & eaten it. 
For heaven's sake stop talking as if Brexit is an inevitability, it isn't. IT ISN'T GOING TO HAPPEN! We're in the middle of the death throes of Brexit & the Tory party. It's painful and we've got another six months of it. Hang on & fight this lunacy with every sinew! #StopBrexit 
During the referendum campaign the media eventually quizzed Farage about the Irish border.  He declared that the border would remain open.  The obvious follow up question was never asked. 
It is clear that leaving the Single Market and Customs Union would mean a hard border in Ireland. And so it is increasingly likely that the government will be faced with a choice between abandoning hard-Brexit or going ahead with a catastrophic no-deal. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Let’s stop talking about how to ‘limit the harm of Brexit.’ Let’s just stop Brexit.To limit the harm done by Brexit, stay in the EU single market | Nicola Sturgeon  
Compared to their British native counterparts EU immigrants are better educated, have higher rates of employment & contribute more to public sector finances.  There is no EU immigration problem. It is a lie, whipped up by right-wing press & politicians.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Why do we not have a proper opposition to Brexit and a full investigation into Russian influence. The Americans might have gone mad and elected Trump, but at least they’re fighting back.  We have no opposition worth it’s name here.  It’s being left to radio hosts and a few MPs 
Net migration to the UK saw the biggest fall since records began this year, and now Fortnum & Mason are saying they're struggling to recruit staff since the Brexit vote. Can the UK cope without EU migration?  
If there is a #Brexit deal, it will be what the EU27 dictates."No deal" is not a serious option. The only democratic option is a #ratificationreferendum to #StopBrexit 
Once again a brilliant, detailed and cogent analysis of the Brexit negotiating process and what is at stake in the coming days. Frightening. Nerve-wrecking. High stakes. Our political future...  
Strongly worded piece in The Guardian: "Mesmerised by Brexit and oblivious to the world, Britain staggers on, led by a band of wretched ministers"  
Can you tell how people voted in the EU referendum by what they like to eat?  
One has to seriously question whether Tusk is trying to stop Brexit or favours a no deal approach.  Im struggling to think of a point when he seemed to assist the exit process   
Tony Blair’s secret 12-point plan for stopping Brexit (as leaked to former Labour MP @AVMitchell2010) 
Who is hacking Brexit? And why we need our own Robert Mueller inquiry. Slowly but surely the threads are emerging. Russia not only interfered directly in the election of Donald Trump, but also in Brexit.   
Warnings of 'economic ARMAGEDDON after Brexit profoundly wrong'  
In today's Brexit news: Donald Tusk says that if the UK's Brexit offer is unacceptable to Ireland, it's unacceptable to the EU UK factory orders hit four-year high UK landed record foreign investment in year of Brexit vote  
RTÉ's Europe editor @tconnellyRTE looks at the border issue, and how the coming days will stretch the politics of Brexit to the limit  
My article in today’s @guardian on Brexit.    
Important article by @NicolaSturgeon. The obvious solution to the Irish border question underlines what @theSNP @scotgov have said all along. Tolimit the harm done by Brexit, stay in the EU single market  
So what I’m saying is:Working with @Byline_Media not only have I been seven months ahead of U.K. security services on Russia, but almost every word written has been proven accurate so far.You want to know how Brexit happened? Read #AlternativeWar 
Looking up???Theresa May’s leadership ratings hit new low after disastrous party conference speech, Westminster sex scandals, cabinet resignations and Tory infighting over Brexit.What next? pic.twitter.com/ynQm8n8Jy6 
Journalists are one of the main causes of Brexit - a classic case of power without responsibility or the habits of follow through and execution.  
BBC Newswatch responds to criticism about the BBC news not reporting on the redacted #Brexit reports by saying they switched their coverage to Royal wedding !! 
Brexit: they simply do not understand - the "Ultras" seem to lack the intellectual architecture to make sense of what they see and hear. They are beyond our reach ...  #Brexit.  
Nobody quite does patronising like a Tory. Anyone with even a modicum of intelligence can see Mogg is deliberately attempting to mislead his target audience. Unable or unwilling to see the reality, unaware of EU GSP policies, far too many are falling for this dog whistle mantra. 
Back down Filbert Street later, the city vs Burnley. I want to see some Hard Brexit defending and fucking good wallopings. Up the city! 
This is how stupid right press analysis has become on Brexit - practically research free.  
Brexit Minister David Davis “the most important thing is a good deal for the country but not as important as my colleague the deputy prime minister watching porn at work”  pic.twitter.com/rNYDxKJ5pW 
#Brexit is a symbol of division. The EU is a symbol of cooperation and peace in Europe. Too precious to lose.  
Davis has been briefing that he may resign for the last couple of weeks. Now he's saying he will resign if Damian Green is sacked. Is he looking to resign on a point of principle or bc he realises Brexit is shit? 
62% of Scots want European powers moved to Holyrood after Brexit, poll finds  
Another major retailer hit by staff shortages bemoans #Brexit labour exodus & higher prices thanks to weak £. Not just the #NHS that needs EU staff 
The UK needs its own Mueller to formally investigate the manipulation & dirty funding of the referendum. @carolecadwalla you are doing a brilliant job & your revelations now need to be acted on. 
'Accept it' Brexiteer tells Ireland Brexit WILL happen and they MUST get on with it  
It would be a catastrophe for GB's future if the Minister in charge of the Brexit process resigned nowAnd yet, he threatened to do that to defend his friend accused of watching pornWhat does that say about him, the friend, the government - and most of all his beloved Brexit ? 
MPs will have a meaningful vote on the Final Deal. If the wheels fall off Brexit they need to see a clear path to Remain. Please donate and share.  
Repeat after me. No such thing as a ‘hard Brexit’. We simply leave the EU in its totality. This is what we voted for.   
Airbus told the British parliament that its operations “relies on the seamless flow of goods, people, and intellectual property across France, Germany, the UK and Spain.” If Britain became costlier, Airbus might move production to China. #Brexit reality  
Interviewed in the Evening Standard Catherine McGuinness of City of London Corporation very downbeat about lack of BREXIT transition period! Says ‘We are presenting ourselves as an unwelcome nation!’ Speak for yourself, Madam! Our heads in City are held high! 
Aerospace is a thriving British industry. What price will it pay for Brexit?  
Britain 20 years ago was labelled "Cool Britannia". As Brexit negotiations intensify, will 2018 be the year Britain loses its "street cred"?  
Brexit: Gazprom 'considering moving operations from London over EU trade concerns'. The company opened its trading operations in London in 1999, which now acts as the its EU headquarters.   
“If Brexit is going badly, it’s the fault of the Brexit elite: stop trying to blame the 48 per cent”. #Brexit#StopBrexit 
Interesting. So thats your bigoted agenda  Brexit isn’t stupid. The EU is a corrupt superstate,Europe’s current decimated state, is telling of that. We should stop foreign aid. Pump it into treating the foreign brain disease that’s threatening our civilisation. 
BIAFRA: [OPINION] : REFERENDUM AND THE NEED FOR SELF-DEFENCE  
.@SteveHiltonx: "The best thing [@POTUS] can do is give @theresa_may a big, beautiful trade deal that will show that Brexit is a success."  
This is the lesson that both Brexit and Trump are giving us: that most people are terrifyingly media illiterate. 
Sikorsky "I wouldn't overplay the security card, your army is smaller than Poland's, you have 2 carriers with no planes" #brexit 
#London set to loose #Banking #fintech #insurance #AI #ML #SocialMedia #tech #jobs to #Paris #Frankfurt due to #Brexit #Startups #SMB in #manufacturing #pharma #robotics #IoT #IIoT may relocate fm #UK t #France #Germany #EU $GS $GOOG $MSFT $AAPL $C $JPM $MS $DB $CS $UBS $FB $NFLX 
Not surprising that the Alliance Party (Stephen Farry) wants NI to cease being an integral part of the U.K.affer Brexit .He wants NI to remain in EU Single Market after GB leaves it. Typical Alliance Policy -it cannot be trusted by Unionists to maintain NIs constitution within UK 
countries harmed by the billionaire$ who bot our data and program the algorithms to just the right di$cord-frequency are linked to #mexico #ukraine #brexit #nigeria 22 countries & 50 u.s. #gop elections near u #thisisawar@PressHerald archives  
Congrats @jjhorgan & @AJWVictoriaBC for #BanBigMoney However, the job isn't done.  If #SiteC is approved and the proportional representation referendum fails, the Liberals will be back and they will change the legislation.  
Brexit is like burning your house down to stop people telling you what colour your curtains should be. 
#NigelFarage: The #migration figures from #ONS are still huge. Our #politicians need to know this is unacceptable post-#Brexit!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #Conservatives #TORIES #TORY #NEWS #USA #TraitorMay #UKIP #EU 
Key to the UK's future lies - in some ways - in Dublin: Donald Tusk warns Theresa May that border plans must be acceptable to the Irish for Brexit to progress  
This weeks #brexit update:'Everything continues to go well and is on track.'  
So David Davis is threatening to resign if Damian Green goes?‘Lose one - let one go’Two for the price of oneIsn’t that the kind of economy @Conservatives are aiming for?[Davis is looking for an out from #BrexitHe’s not up to it] 
Brexiteers:• Won referendum• Won subsequent election• Dominate 4/5 of press (by sales)• Lead govt• Lead negotiations• Policy of 2 big partiesBut we powerless losers are ruining the economy by... tweeting about 200% rise in race crime. Sure we are. Sure. 
I love the coordination.I expect we'll soon see some coordinated movement through #GCHQ and the #UK no doubt? Lots flowing out re: #Brexit as you know. 
So much for not being under the rule of EU regulation and the European court of Justice once we leave the EU. Seems that is turning out to be another of the Brexit fantasists lies. #StopBrexit 
So brexit means whatever Ireland says it means. 
Dawlish in Devon has all these signs. I wonder how they voted in the referendum?  
We Support  #BRITISH #Unionism! #NorthernIreland is #BRITISHand will always REMAIN BRITISH there can be #NOSURRENDER! The #EU can take their filthy hands of BRITISH #IRELAND! #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS #UK #DUP @theresa_may @Conservatives #BREXIT #LABOUR #UKIP #LibDems 
R/T Unionists must now boycott everything to do with the Republic of Ireland including Goods, Services and Travel. ROI Government are using #Brexit to impose an Irish Sea Border contrary to the GFA. #BoycottROI 
It will end when we stop "brexit" , and those responsible are appropriately punished for the damage they have done 
Person: "Are you concerned about the reproductive rights of women?"LM: "Girl Power"Person: "Do you support Theresa May, who supports Brexit?"LM: "We do b/c Girl Power"Person: "Do you welcome Donald Trump to the UK?"LM: "Yes, its the right thing to do b/c Girl Power" 
Ní neart go cur le chéile, so says Tusk for the EU. And he’s right, he means Ireland will have final say on progress of Brexit talks. Nach fearr sin na béarla cliste na Sasamach!Remember that”is ar scáth a chéile a mhaireann daoine” and that’s it sorted!   
Why, it's almost as if David Davis is looking for any excuse to take his name off of negotiating a Brexit that will damage this country for a century!?!  
Shame on FG’s Brian Hayes playing politics with #Brexit on #EuroNews What the hell is he doing? Has he completely lost the plot? This is the worry with Leo as leader. Leo needs to reign in his MEP. Crazy stuff. Get you acts together FG.#marian @campaignforleo 
The government is betraying #British #fishermen with their outrageous plan to keep the terms of the disastrous #EU #CommonFisheriesPolicy after #Brexit. Stop this madness by sharing and signing @mikehookemmep's petition at   #BBC #SKY 
EU will refuse UK's Brexit demands if Ireland is not happy with plans for border, says Donald Tusk  
David Davis has threatened to resign if Damien Green is sacked...  so he has either:1) finally realised his utter incompetence at negotiating #brexit and wants to leave his position as national laughing stock2) he also watches porn at work 
Norway option was one of the 'cake & eat it' options touted pre-vote by Leave politicians.You know,before they started pretending to have a mandate for Hard Brexit or No Deal. 
Catalans have voted 13 times since restoration of democracy, and will vote again end December. Shame on irresponsible independentist government that convince people that illegal referendum is legal 
They want us to shut up and back Brexit, we ask them why, they just say ‘I just believe it will be better’ it’s just a toxic mix of ignorance, jingoistic fervour, xenophobia and wishful thinking.  Even to say it’ll be worth it in the long run is bollocks, no-one can say how. 
.I said, well over a year ago, that #Scotland #Ireland & #NorthernIreland have the power to save us ALL from BREXIT......I think I may be right  too!.  
Brexiters shocked to discover that they're not dealing with a tiny island of  demented stereotype Paddies, but with the entire European Union.Let's see how that runs.#Brexit 
Don't forget the water canon vehicles for crowd control that never got used. Yet more millions wasted @BorisJohnson What a shambles.  #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexiters promised us £350 million a week extra for the NHS if we left the EU. But now the Tory government is going to pay £50 billion to leave the European Union. That's £50 billion less for our NHS.Join the @LibDems campaign for an exit from Brexit  
"Rees-Mogg: A Familiar Story"  
With no government in Belfast and the border issue unresolved, could Northern Ireland be Brexit’s biggest casualty? @YasmeenSerhan takes a look  
*whispers* the brexit papers are in the frozen banana stand    
Brexit offer 'must be acceptable to Ireland' -  
Because Brexit is an unworkable shitshow and someone spunking on their desk is more acceptable than fucking the entire country 
You encapsulate my thoughts entirely, especially your point about Brexit, which Corbynites seem to think is somehow not that bad. 
Ok, I now support Brexit  
The whole negotiation charade is soft #brexit. It's been dressed up as essential & was never needed. We shldve just LEFT & let the EU beg 4 every itemized damn £ they believe we owe (excl these OTT pensions) & v our investment in their assets 
‘The Budget measures will provide some short-term support to the economy.’ Read UK Chief Economist @MarkGregoryEY’s thoughts on the Budget and what this means for Brexit  
Absofrickinlutely right ..... how? 
Brexit impact papers ? Anyone ? @Conservatives #stopbrexit #toryfacistregime #brexitcoup #revokeA50 
I'm not surprised David Davis wants out though. Think about it...Best case scenario he delivers #Brexit & only half the country hates him for doing it.Fail to deliver and the whole country hates him - half because he failed and the other half because he tried.#2shittyends 
Can your 8 yo do Brexit? When he's tidied his room obv.  
Just what we need #Brexit games !  
'No, no!' EU mocked in hilarious BBC sketch over its CONSTANT refusal to negotiate Brexit  
THEY SHOULD BE SACKED ON THE SPOT. They have no right to thrawt #Brexit especially not in this underhanded way   
Brexit climbdown is not what leaving the EU was meant to look like  
Davis, we don't seem to forget who divided our country & who exported food from our land whilst millions died of starvation . Even if the Irish treat the British very badly during Brexit talks , the Irish treatment will be insignificant compared to 800 yrs of British torture 
'This is nonsense. Wake up!' #brexit #brexitshambles 
The chance of a disorderly Brexit has fallen to 25 percent from the 30 percent chance given in an October poll. 
This analysis is spot on. Hard Brexiters will willingly agree to any EU conditions to ensure Brexit happens, and is irrevocable. Voters can find out the cost later...  
Dublin holds the keys to Britain's Brexit future, warns Donald Tusk  
UK warned on cost of 'hard Brexit'  
cloistered brexit 
Make your voice heard, a legal brexit not an awful brexit! 
482 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣇⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀ 
Brexit is 11592 hours away. #brexit 
we must strive for a purring, chief and quickest brexit 
Happy new year to you all. Let 2018 be when we stop Brexit & get our country back on track. We need constitutional reform for a responsible democracy: the Brexit debacle has ripped the mask off a system that must be made to work better for all of us. 
We should actually thank Grayling, Heseltine, Adonis & their ilk.Their Referendum-denying, anti-Brexit histrionics & invective have revealed to all the sheer extent to which this country’s elites tolerate mass democracy only for as long as it delivers the results they want. 
Very sad. A business closed down because of brexit. I fear, one of many.  
New Year's ResolutionsBe nicer to Brexit peopleTalk more about pubs, there is loads of good stuff to sayProcrastinate in a more structured wayDo an Olympic triathlon Happy New Year both of you 
Calling it now, in 2018 the government is going to legalise weed to pay for brexit 
Totally agree. Ditch Brexit 
New Year Message : 2018 will be the year during which the "brexit" delusion is finally and definitively laid to rest , and British Democracy is restored 
Remember, brexit is a chaos theory function. Absolutely anything could still happen. My resolution for 2018 is to be the butterfly whose wing-flap triggers the hurricane that BLOWS AWAY BREXIT#FBPE 
Welcome 2018, the year that Brexit dies a painful death and takes the damned Tories with it. 
It is only the will of 37% of the electorate given in an advisory referendum. Unions could not have a legal strike with such a small percentage yet May thinks it is OK to make a major change in our constitution. The whim of Rupert Murdoch more likely. 
Says The #BeastOfBrexit  who regularly supports and votes with the Tories on Brexit.Who does Skinner he think he's  kidding?  
#WritePoemsAbout2017You took the blue pill, Hoping to wake in 1951With your blue passport under a pillow as white as your neighboursBut you just had visions of your corrisive xenophobiaAnd woke in 2018More bitter than the pill, and Brexit further away 
Not sure but when I reminded Owen Jones that sounding like Arron Banks earlier this morning & being patronising because Lord Adonis resignation was during a skiing holiday he blocked meStopping Labour Following brexit would best thing for UK & LabourHappy New year to you all  
Happy New Year to you all. Wishing you all much love, life and laughter. Except you cunts who voted Trump and Brexit. 
#WritePoemsAbout2017If you can keep your headwhile Tories lose theirs and blame each otherIf you can trust us when we say Brexit will failIf you can accept a progressive coalition is what Britain needsYou will be be prime minister @jeremycorbynand which is more, May won't 
Happy New Year to everybody from the Chair, Committee, and members of Greenwich for Europe.Wherever you are from, whatever language you speak, and whatever your background, we hope that you have a prosperous 2018.Here's to the year that we will beat Brexit. #FBPE 
Happy new year, Frances. There is no Brexit that can work for working people.  
2018 will be the last full year of EU membership for our great country.Let's celebrate another year closer to leaving the EU.Roll on March 29th 2019.#Brexit #Conservatives #BrexitDeal #ByeBye2017 
Business owners fear Brexit could affect livelihoods in a French village popular with expat Brits. More from @ReutersTV:  
Passing UK border control today, I noticed that the displays had a Blue Screen of Death.I know we're going to get blue passports after Brexit, but this is a step too far.  
@Jon_Danzig @Reasons2Remain Border farce for Britain after Brexit Mark Serwotka, general secretary of the Public and Commercial Services@pcs_union which represents Border Force staff, warned the plans were "risking this country's security on the cheap". 
There are many many people out there and even some Tory politicians  who share your sentiments Andrew and admire your courage to speak out against hard Brexit madness. 
Have a feeling Brextremists are already beginning to dread 2018 and the inevitable ending of Brexit.#PEFB 
Remoaners as you call them, do stand up for their country. They want what's best for the UK, which is withdraw article 50 and steer away from the disaster that is Brexit. The Tory government is a laughing stock and the EU have them in a headlock. #FBPE @MarieAnnUK @A50Challenge 
.Yeah - Stopping BrexitBut let's face it, you're not interested in helping anyone JohnYou're just interested in achieving your OWN political goals at everyone else's expense.  
I have been asked to help supporters who not only want a prosperous post-Brexit Britain but also a revival of fair and principled values that made Britain great and proud. Join us!Wishing you all a fabulous 2018! #Sovereign 
Remember that Brexit is not inevitable. This act of self-harm & insanity can, must & will be prevented. Brexit is so absolutely crazy that when it comes to the crunch it will not happen. Too many people of good will are working to prevent it. #StopBrexit2018 #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Happy New Year! God Save the Queen. We’ll be up at dawn working against @PutinRF_Eng attacks on the UK and America. #Brexit #NoSleepTilMoscow 
Embarrassing Phone Calls:PR Guru: "The new year message"May: "I explain food banks, falling wages, police numbers, bribes, scandals and the NHS?" PR Guru "No Prime Minister, we talk about the positives such as Brexit"May: "But we're still Leaving""Yes, Prime Minister" 
2018 will be the year that determines whether the UK prospers or wilts under the International embarrassment that is Brexit 
Our Taoiseach went as far as to go to another country to campaign in an internal referendum. Government politicians denouncing private citizens of the UK for speaking at an event in Ireland is just ridiculous.  
UKIP's Diane James's Brexit poll didn't go quite as she expected. #2017Remembered 
But what happens when those who oppose Brexit decide they can’t support a pro-Brexit party?  
I believe there are strong, wise, tough candidates, if they would only step forward fearlessly and make up for the unbelievable waste of time and lead GB through Brexit as soon as possible, taking pride in being British and not afraid to show it. Let's make Britain great again! 
Happy new year, everyone! 150 years from the founding of the TUC, the world of work is changing fast. In 2018 we'll keep fighting for great jobs, decent pay and a Brexit that works for working people. #TUC150 
I voted tactically. Your idiotic brexit policy means I will never vote Labour again. Up to you. Change or vanish. 
#WritePoemsAbout20172017, ive had enough,Trump, brexit and ToriesHave given me the HoughMagic moneytree Bungs to the DUPAnd AusterityHomelessness UpPoverty UpThey don't seem to give a F**kWhen will this madness endGive us what we needPM @jeremycorbyn in 2018 
Excellent thread. I’m one of the dissenters Simon refers to at 15 (because of /para 49 of the phase 1 agreement and because I just don’t think the Parlty majority is there for hard Brexit, and that will be determinative at the crunch).  But I’m a lawyer, not a politician.  
Boris Johnson could be moved from Foreign Secretary to a more “supercharged” Brexit position. It is believed Boris would strongly resist such a move.Surely not because he'll be forced out of his bunker and into the Brexit crossfire?#StopBrexit2018 
‘Remoaners’. Pathetic. In July 1932 37% of Germans voted for Hitler. That doesn’t mean they were right. Or in Germany’s national interest. Opposing Brexit whilst accepting it will happen is what Democracy is about.  
All-round idiot Digby Jones hopes there will be a Brexit benefit in "100 years time"  
Whitehall warned there can be no 'excuses' for going slow on Brexit preparations - including no deal  
In our most popular cartoon of 2017 @kaltoons offered his thoughts on Theresa May's plans for Britain's post-Brexit trade  
Whilst divisions remain over Fox-Hunting, Brexit and many more that are bashed at on Twitter.We can all be united, surely, behind one thing.Today, I found this Gull on the North Sea. Wrapped in plastic. Dead.Let’s make 2018 the year plastic dies.Now, carry on celebrating.  
#WritePoemsAbout2017First to hold Trump's handDodgy Saudi dealsMeeting other tyrants May's post-Brexit dream revealedSnap election calledLandslide and infinite powerRejected - your shaken tower Falling, like letters on a wall  
Where will Brexit be? Will Trump stay in power? Who will win best picture at the Oscars? Our journalists look at the year ahead  
#MAGA4⃣5⃣ #USA #Brexit #BanIslam #NoShariaKatie Hopkins - Get Furious and Fight Back #GodBlessKatieHopkins 
2017 can't hold back regeneration much longer. You hold on 2018... let's get this right. Be kind, help one another, enjoy a vegan wrap and mention Brexit and Trump less. Love muchly and ensure to live your short human lives to maximum extermination. 
I'd like to thank all my followers & fellow #FBPE & #StopBrexit2018 gang for keeping me sane and supporting me & our cause in 2017. I truly believe that, with determination & energy, we will disrupt Brexit in 2018!Meantime, to #Theresa_May & 2017, I give you this  
Ok! Simple new year's resolution list for 2018:1. Stop BrexitThat is all.Happy New Year everyone! 
In 2018 their chaotic and clueless Brexit will finally hit the skids but they will still continue to pursue it. We've got to be agile and self preserving, Scotland. The lifeboat awaits. 2018 will be when it all begins to change. 
Hopefully Tranmere go up, England have a great World Cup, I run 5k in under 22 mins & Brexit is overturned. Here’s to a healthy 2018. Thanks for the follows & RTs. Happy New Year all. 
As we move into 2018 there is a sense of people coming together to #stopbrexit. Most people are clear, they just want this Government to fall & a #finalsay referendum. 2018 is the year when that happensHappy New Year #fbpe People & all those fighting for a better UK in The EU 
Watched #Dunkirkmovie last night. All I can say is that millions of brave souls died in 2 world wars so that we may be free. They’d be turning in their graves to see the way the left have hijacked both our sovereignty & our identity. @Brexit must be executed ASAP 
Warning: Brexit will leave Scottish NHS in ruinsANOTHER REASON FOR #indyref2 & A 'YES' VOTE!!!YOU YES YET??? 
To the libtards, snowflakes, saboteurs, rebels, remoaners, resisters, mutineers, malcontents, mischief-makers, honest journalists & principled politicians - all those fighting Brexit, Trump & other forms of intolerant nonsense:I wish you all a very #HappyNewYear! X#Resist! 
Typically thought provoking column by @MatthewdAncona As a Brexiteer I find the sneering at @Andrew_Adonis from all sides pretty ugly. He's expressing his view, which is what we do in democracies.I may be a one man movement: Centrists for Brexit  
“The problem that Theresa May has is that those who defended Brexit have never explained to the British people what the consequences are.” -French President Emmanuel Macron.#StopBrexit2018 #StopBrexit2018 #StopBrexit2018 #StopBrexit2018 
Had a lot of respect for the London Labour MP for Tottenham David Lammy for what he said following the 2011 riots in our capital city. I now have very little respect for him due to his attitude to Brexit. Judge people not on their skin tone, but on the quality of their thinking. 
"In 2018 we will continue fighting for our values. We will offer an exit from Brexit, investment in our NHS and more affordable homes."Sound good? Join our team and help make it happen:  
#2017 was an incredible #stopbrexit whirlwind! Thank you everyone who made it amazing!  Here's hoping #2018 is another brilliant #Brexit bashing year! #StopBrexit@MrDominicBuxton @mikegalsworthy @guyverhofstadt @acgrayling @dimbleby_jd @BobGeldofFans @superEUgirl 
@TwopTwips Stuck for fancy dress ideas this NYE? Go as Brexit, by shitting yourself on purpose, and pretending it's beneficial to everyone. 
I am European. For 50 years I've moved, lived and worked all over the EU. I want to retain this right and to know my children and theirs can also enjoy it. I'm a lifelong Labour voter and current party member but I will not give them my vote until they stop supporting Brexit. 
To you all may 2018 bring you all health,happiness,love,joy and hopefully a Referendum  
SCOTLAND IN UNION - a form of 'Astroturf' deception. Please check this clip from 'London Calling' for an example of BBC Astroturf during Scot referendum. Scotland in Union - Poisonous corruption by the swine that are the British Elite.  
If Brexit stumbles under the weight of its own contradictions, you might have won the ear of a swing voter or two. And if Brexit happens, your time won't have been wasted. 
So much energy expended on who or how to argue against Brexit. But are these more than mere engaging distractions? 
This is going to unravel in the spring or summer when the EU is revealed not to have been bluffing in phase 1. Full regulatory alignment means full regulatory alignment, and that means May's Brexit is toast. That might be a good time for Labour to move in for the kill 
Goodbye 2017What an absolute shitshower it's beenBrexit and TrumpBoth gave me the humpAnd completely exhausted my spleen#writepoemsabout2017 
2016: Labour need to oppose BrexitCorbynites: Corbyn is playing the long game!2017: Labour need to oppose BrexitCorbynites: Corbyn is playing the long game!2018: Labour need to oppose BrexitCorbynites: Corbyn is playing the long game!2019: UK leaves EUCorbynites: Oh 
Except the only party committed to reversing #Brexit won 7.5% of the vote. And in case you’ve forgotten #Corbyn imposed a 3 line whip to get article 50 passed Oldies won’t die quick enough for you & there are too few youngsters whether registered or not. #PlanetRemoaner 
Scotland voted overwhelmingly to Remain, we have every right to moan about the disaster that is Brexit and will continue to do so 
Brexit so far...  
Matthew d’Ancona ‘gets’ me. Being sensible doesn’t mean being weak! We need strength & resolve to fight Brexit! Only quibble: I’m not a centrist. I’m a radical!  
The EU ref was gerrymandered, run in such a way that millions of votes could be & were obtained by Leave for the Norway model which was never available. These votes aren't transferable to Hard Brexit #Gerrymandering #NothingToDoWithDemocracy 
Happy New Year everyone. I don't know who this lady is in the video but what she says is exactly what I feel about #Brexit - Many thanks to her for speaking out.  #Brexit #StopBrexit #StopBrexit2018 #ExitFromBrexit #ExitBrexit #StopBrexitNow #FBPE 
#WritePoemsAbout2017 They fucked it up yr Sun & MailThey brought a Brexit for the fewThey filled you up with lies & hate(with a bit of help from Russia too)Brexit hands on misery to poorShafts welfare & NHSSo hold tax dodgers to accountAnd treat as shit the shit Express 
But apparently fine to sneer at the people who voted for #Brexit. Endlessly.  
My @guardian column: It’s a mistake to sneer at centrists. Adonis’s stand on Brexit shows why  
This chart shows the impact Brexit will likely have on the NHS.In green positives, in red negatives.This is the work of healthcare professionals who want the NHS to thrive.It is impossible to be pro-Brexit and pro-NHS.Scrap Brexit, save the NHS.#FBPE #JC4PM 
Many Brexit supporters in London find they can't be honest about their views in the workplace or at study. @londonleavers is a network for them to find friends and encouragement. Support it. BrexitCentral podcast: The state of Brexit  via @BrexitCentral 
Hey all my #FBPE friends and co resistors, 2018 will be huge for us, I wish each of you the absolute best wishes for 2018  have fun and recharge, for it’s time for us to unite, stand tall and stop the madness that is brexit!It is down to us because #WeAreTheOppositionNow 
In reference to Brexit and sacking Boris Johnson: He is essentially an arsonist who wants to come back dressed as a firefighter. (Ian Hislop 2017) 
I believe #Brexit is a monumental error, but as big a mistake is ignoring the reasons for it. In 2018, we need to #StopBrexit and put our energies and £££ into creating a UK without the inequalities, improve our public services and re-build our damaged communities. #Happy2018 
Tories would love nothing more than for Lab now to embrace no-Brexit. Would offer May perfect distraction. Right now all she can do is criticise Labour's ambiguity- which isn't much harming them.Political calculation created Brexit, and only political calculation can destroy it 
Yasmin basically thinks it was a referendum on whether you like pasta  
Rather poignant article by @OwenJones84 about the failures of Adonis and the "Stop Brexit" brigade. Worth reading, especially if you're still fighting to remain. 
2018 is the year the whining and sniping over Brexit must finally stop, says Tony Parsons  
#honestpoll Will #brexit hasten the end of the #nhs ? Please #vote and #retweet.  Comments welcome.#fbpe #health #poll #uk 
Another thought on 'stop-Brexit-now': if Lab endorsed, Tories/tabloids would suddenly have 'traitor' red meat & hammer it relentlessly. Right now they can't. They have no focused lines of attack while their project fails in open sight.When time comes, let's hope Labour's ready  
Still time to “offer people the choice of an exit from Brexit”, says @vincecable.More and more MPs and leaders making the case to #ExitFromBrexit or #StopBrexit.Let’s make it #StopBrexit2018. #FBPE. 
I started this year moving from No to Yes; from Scottish Labour to SNP. Never easy. As this year draws to a close the realisation that Scotland must take control of her own destiny has never been more evident against a Brexit dystopia. Bring on 2018 #Scotland 
Just a thought...Out of 55mn adults in UK, only 30mn vote at General Elections!!If we all voted, we may’ve..-avoided decades of neoliberalism-avoided multiple illegal wars & multiple financial crisis-avoided Brexit-ensured much higher living standards for all#Happy2018 
London's overcrowded. Can I ask the die-hard Remainers here, who were screaming about leaving the UK because of Brexit, to get their walking boots on please. 
What complete, unmitigated tosh. Brexit was driven by ordinary British people who'd been disempowered by the legions of Cultural Marxism. It wasn't driven by toffs, or millionaires but by the desire to retain or bring back our liberty, sovereignty & national identity. #WeHadaVote 
We have been asked for the source that @DavidDavisMP says Brexit may not happen:  
Brexit's secret weapons;ObamaJunckerGeldofAdonisThank you folks!  You done good! 
WATCH | Another referendum #throwback, this time to Leave.EU's all-time most watched video, 'Brexit: The (animated) Movie'.Happy New Year from the Leave.EU Team See you in Credit to Piffle TV:  
There’s nothing being argued about in this thread. Simply stating two facts. What Goldman Sachs predicted would happen last November (ie a forecast made after the initial post-referendum fall). And what actually happened in 2017.  
The Daily Mail didn't just try to demonise the intellectuals by attacking the "chattering classes", it aimed its bile at the "North London chattering classes", and we all know what that means. Nazi then. Closet Nazi now.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
2017 tweet highlightsHow people thought Labour MPs were voting at the 2016 EU referendum vs their actual positionSource: NatCen  
The Brexit department raise a toast to a successful 2018  
I agree with this. Most people believe that Brexit is inevitable because the legal mechanics of A50 and politics of EU27 are too rarely explored. If we hammer home repeatedly that the EU will let us stay - which they will - then our task becomes easier  
#Brexit is an exercise in the abuse of democracy. An advisory referendum mis-sold as mandatory. A 37% vote of a gerrymandered electorate for a catch-all hand-waving 4 word slogan, based on a torrent of hate & lies. Claimed to be the "Will of the People"#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Will Hutton and I planning our anti-Brexit book - at Keswick station, alas closed. The Lakes Express to Euston went from this platform!  
I don't have any grand pronouncements on the year past or the year to come, other than these:  support democracies & *real* journalism; fight Brexit; and recycle your plastics! ;-) 
As a non-EU citizen I can holiday in any European country freely. So can Brits post-Brexit. Love Europe, hate EU   
If I was new to this Brexit milarky, I would first follow these:@GuitarMoog@EmporersNewC@jerryhogg@IanDunt@faisalislam@davidallengreen@MikeH_PR@JolyonMaugham@spaceangel1964@remain_central@MarieAnnUK@weloveeconomics@BrexitRecord@BrexshitTrade@BritishInEurope#FBPE 
The domino effect of Brexit is now all over the EU Mr Verhofstadt, the very foundations are shaking.Don't lecture the British on freedom, democracy, peace and the rule of law in Europe, it was our forefathers and their allies that died to give it to you. Proud #Brexit 
As @jacchohan pointed out:48% knew exactly what they wanted, but vast majority of the 52% were voting for different and undefined #Brexit options. The only option with the greatest majority is the 48%.In reality, the democratic will of the people is the 48%. 
Broad problem for the Remain fundamentalists is that their single-minded focus on reversing Brexit means they're only offering a return to a status quo that was failing most of Britain 
What a stupid comment. Brexit is about who governs us - the U.K. government, which (for better or worse) we elect, or an self-interested authoritarian body accountable to no one.  The majority of voters chose the former. What we drink or where we go on holiday is irrelevant 
Too simplistic a response: vote Labour and you get Brexit rebranded   
I’ll also be talking about how I have no time for toxicity and/or bad energy because by not engaging, those things disappear, and my ambivalence will make the world a better place  @realDonaldTrump #brexit  
Theresa May is rumoured to be planning to reshuffle her Cabinet, including moving Boris Johnson to a Brexit role. Is change in her Cabinet needed?  
Theresa May’s and Jeremy Corbyn’s Joint 2018 New Year Resolutions9. We will resign should the UK fail to secure a trade deal with the EU or should the deal secured not lead to the UK economy growing faster than the EU’s post-Brexit & a greater role for the UK on the world stage 
Theresa May’s and Jeremy Corbyn’s Joint 2018 New Year Resolutions5. We will be honest with the British people and confirm that the best way to help the ‘Just About Managing’ and to secure a jobs-first Brexit is for the UK to stay in the Single Market & the Customs Union & the EU 
David Cameron:"It will be your decision whether to remain in the EU... or whether we leave.YOUR decisionNobody else’sNot politicians’Not Parliament’sNot lobby groups’Not mineJust YOU.You, the British people, will decide.And it will be the FINAL decision"#Brexit #EU 
Thought: reason it's difficult to talk coherently about class & Brexit is because any 52% of the population must, by definition, be diverse 
This is the worst kind of ignorant nonsense. Not only was the EU referendum a mockery of democracy - a restricted electorate, 37% of which voted Leave yet treated as a massive majority! - but the institutions of the EU are way more democratic than those of the U.K.  
If it can survive Shona Robison, Brexit will be a skoosh.  
Raise your glass tonight to usher in the final full year of British membership of the EU, be confident this nation will come out of it better and stronger. For that is the British way. #Brexit  
No-one pretends the ref never happened. What they have pretended is a shabby advisory ref was a mandate for Brexit. It was not. Tories hijacked it for reasons best known to themselves & Corbyn was happy to go along, because he is a Brexiteer. We the hapless people pay heavy price  
So let’s stick together, folks! And let’s keep pushing. Never forget that Brexit isn’t inevitable (at least not quite yet). Wishing you all a #HappyNewYear 13/13 
.@JolyonMaugham for his speeches at rallies, legal expertise, and for challenging Brexit at every turn. #EUheroes 6/ 
The most dishonest meme of late 2017 is becoming the ‘X is the wrong person to lead the doomed fight against Brexit’. 
#BecauseOfTories  Government figures for how much WORSE OFF families will be each year due to Brexit.  £2,600 in the case of EEA membership £4,300 in the case of UK-EU agreement £5,200 in the case of No Deal#FBPE #ToriesOut2018 #StopBrexit2018 @spaceangel1964 
Andrew Adonis, a lifelong Labour man with a distinguished ministerial career, attacks the Tories over Brexit, wasting public money & not nationalising a railway line. Naturally, he then gets attacked by Owen Jones...  
Looking back at the trump and brexit double-barrelled clusterfu*k of 2017, these folk have been the best follows of the year..@sarahkendzior, .@RVAwonk, .@JYSexton for trump..@IanDunt and .@mrjamesob for brexit.Really hope they become less essential in 2018! 
When did democracy get defined by populist plebiscites? One thing we've had to relearn (since the 30s) is that democracy relies on proper representation, an informed electorate and the preservation of individual rightsAll three are absent from #Brexit  
Anyone naive enough to think that #Brexit can simply be stopped must remember that starting it in the first place took years of detailed planning, culminating in this complex document:  
A reminder of the meeting schedule of the European Council in 2018. UK has got 7 weeks to work out what its aims are for the transition period. #brexit  
Brexit putting arts and creative industries at risk.They’ve been big drivers of growth over the last 20 years. But now 46 out of 50 creative leaders say Brexit ending free movement would have a negative or even devastating impact.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Natural if regrettable instinct in arguments to say “I can’t wait for events to prove you wrong.”IMO w #Brexit there’s a qualitative difference in how bad that is.Brexiteers can’t wait for success we anticipate.Remoaners salivate at the prospect of their country doing badly 
Quite a short non-work related side hustle to do list for 2018:1. Fight Brexit 
Absolutely pathetic, if you want diving and fake injuries, piss off back to Spain. This is route one, hard brexit, no single market football  
They say that a week is a long time in politics. Imagine how much havoc we can wreak on Brexit in a few weeks or months. Celebrate the start of 2018 tonight - the year we #StopBrexit2018 
Irrelevant, or just plain daft?  Just because I drink EU wine or holiday in Israel doesn't mean I want to be governed by Brussels or Tel Aviv (and after Brexit, Chilean or Aussie wine could be 30% cheaper!).  I have a Swiss watch, but that doesn't mean I want Swiss citizenship.  
This Cartoon captures 2017 perfectly.#Brexit#JC4PM#ToriesOut 
This Brexit is not of merchantable quality and it is not fit for the purpose for which it was sold.  
Outside of the bubble we Brexit pundits are talking about trade strategy, global standards & regulations, UNECE, possibilities in UK energy, alternatives to customs union, SPS risk assessments, Indian food safety rules and other adult concerns. But you carry on. Don't sweat it.  
Stop howling and castigating others and do your bit to explain why Brexit is a disaster for the poor and disaffected.  There is no such thing as the "Stop Brexit crew"; there are people of different political views who agree on one thing and its urgency.  Add your bit to that.  
How is it 'undemocratic' to have another referendum once people know what they're voting for? Those who still think Brexit is a good idea and still believe it will mean £350m more a week for the NHS can vote Leave again. Anyway, 52-48 is "unfinished business" according to Farage.  
2018 To Do List:Eat lessDrink lessWrite moreStop #Brexit 
Why 2018 will be good for go-it-alone UK as we edge closer to Brexit Britain  
If you had been educated beyond CSE woodwork, you'd know that predictions by experts don't require clairvoyance or magic, but merely knowledge, experience and reasoning. The very things that you most resist being brought to bear on Brexit, because the result is always the same.  
10% of Britons say Brexit was the best event/development of 2017.10% also say it was the worst of 2017.via @YouGov 
Strong symbolism. We know that Michael Heseltine can help to defeat Brexit.#FBPE 
Remainers need to read this kind of thing. Yes, Vote Leave was a pack of lies. Yes, we need to expose them. But simply shouting we should cancel Brexit immediately won't help. Need to love-bomb Leavers, listen to their concerns, highlight Brexit's damage to their daily lives  
Scotland in Union: Nothing's wrongMedia, thinking: Unionists are splitting off into groups over Brexit. Your secret letter campaign is unmasked. Data wasn't password protected and shows you're largely funded by millionaires and Lords outside of ScotlandMedia, out loud: Okay 
Hope the new year brings an end to all this bitterness and bickering!! We live in a democracy, we had a referendum and are going with the will of the majority. That’s life - let’s just move on and get on with getting the best deal possible for our wonderful country! 
Isn't war over? How are they refugees? Why don't they rebuild their own countries? It's time the people had a say in Immigration. Immigration by referendum. #SCHEER4PM 
The pure ignorance of most Remoaners is staggering. They seem to think they know everything, the cause of Brexit, the effects of Brexit, but it's just nonsense they make up to try and feel better about losing the referendum! Embarassing really. 
Brexit only makes me feel shame @theresa_may Only the abandonment of this lunacy and showing the UK to be a tolerant, positive, open country and taking a leading part in the EU will ever make me regain pride. There are millions who feel the same. You ignore us. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
2017 has been a great year for Unionism in Scotland. Since the referendum win in 2014 the lack of progress has been frustrating. However 2017 saw the start of the fightback with many separitist representatives dumped. Looking forward to continued progress in 2018. 
As we head into the new year, here is a brief recap of the first phase of Brexit negotiations:EU won.Leavers lost.Get over it.#HappyNewYear2018#StopBrexit 
Brussels has passed every single EU law Britain has opposed since the Brexit vote  
My predictions for 2018:1. Brexit will continue to be a balls up.2. Panic will set in across the UK.3. Brexit will be cancelled.Have a #HappyNewYear2018 #StopBrexit 
New Year messages: PM vows 'renewed confidence' in UK. #Corbyn moans about #Tories again.Brexit was discussed by #TheresaMay and Sir Vince Cable in their messages - but Jeremy Corbyn avoided the issue altogether again.#TheCorbynCon#TeamTory 
Key line in this is that civil service can't deliver the impossible policy of hard Brexit (leaving SM/CU) without massively damaging the economy, however loudly Brexit Ultras declare otherwise. Cakeism meets reality 101.  
Brexit was the  old generations' last splutter - by @edwest 
After racking up a small fortune in private dragon transport docking fares at the Volantic ports of Brexit, he came home and appointed eight Naijarosi from the grave, to join him in governing the Kingdom. Eight men who had either become white walkers or whose watches had ended. 
#despitebrexit Despite all the vitriol and anger of the #brexit extremists, people are changing their minds and swinging behind the idea staying in the EUWe need a further vote  with all the facts on the table and with politicians warned off lying by Electoral Commission  
Using the term "Brexshitters" is a new low for someone who is called on by MSM to discuss Brexit in a serious debate! Take Note of her rudeness & contempt @SkyNews @toryboypierce @piersmorgan @BBCNews @afneil @itvnews 
And as winter got even colder, King Buhari dug in, ordered even more warm fur and extended his stay in the more yet less United Kingdoms of Brexit, several thousand leagues away, on account of failing health and the presence of Maesters more suited to treat his condition- 
There is 1good reason for a second referendum.We’d bury you.There are 3very good reasons against.1) It will make our politics even more poisonous.2)Just WTF would be voting on,status quo ante, Cameron’s deal or the Schultz/Juncker/Verhofstadt plan3)It wouldn’t lead to closure  
Have a happy New Year, everyone. 2018 will be busy, but we will finally see the end of Brexit, if we all work hard, and most importantly, work together. See you in the new year! 
Keep doing polls until you get the answer you want @LordAshcroft? Is that it? The tide has turned, you won't be getting the answer you want unless you pay for it. The answer is clear, we don't want Brexit.  
We now go live to Brexit  
THIS IS BREXIT!  
As usual @mrjamesob is spot on.History will not be kind to May's tenure at the Home Office.Future historians will also regard #Brexit and her elevation to PM as one of the most damaging periods of governance for the UK.  
Even bravery won’t help the nightmare of Brexit’s new world  
Ousted Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont demands Madrid reinstate his regional government, which was deposed after an independence referendum that Spanish courts judged illegal  
Remember when the Queen told us all exactly how she feels about Brexit?  
Australian High Commissioner: "Bloody well done on Brexit, ma'am!"Queen: "I know, right?"  
Brexit cannot be delivered in a way that doesn't harm the poorest in our country, and cannot be reconciled with yer man Corbyns vision for the UK. Doesn't add up. Can't be done. 
Can you blame Adonis, Clegg, Blair, Hesltine for stepping up in to the vaccuum left by the absence of a labour stance on Brexit? Do you really think highlighting their wealth or education is right or helpful, when they are trying to steer us from disaster? 
Well said Tony. You only need to look at the @UKLabour voting majority to see that they are being let down badly by their leaders. Borrowed votes will not get them into power as their core will not put up with the daily decline in livings standards as a result of toxic #brexit 
This is the @UKPolice normalizing child abuse.It is an unequalled act of treason.We have to resore Civilization: the immoral left, globalists, #sjw, femininazis have destroyed it.#Brexit #Nexit 
8) a respected Labour figure made a blistering attack on the Tories & #Brexit yesterday.  How broken is the Labour Leadership if the result is Labour commentators attack that figure, to undermine him & the message?End/ 
Here’s my last map of 2017 - the Brexit result (a little late I know & stolen from Wikipedia).According to almost every tweet & newspaper article I have read in 2017 the blue on this map is called “Burnley & Oldham.” It’s quite a big place!  
6) anti brexit voices are calling attention to the cynical, unprincipled manner in which a small cabal of senior Labour people (and enablers like Jones) are orchestrating attacks on Pro Labour remain voices, "Centrists", Liberals & anyone who takes away attention from Corbyn 
Correction: Did not happen YET. But it will when the extraordinary success of the UK after a Hard Brexit is there for all to see. And you can take no credit for freedom, democracy, peace, rule of law. The opposite in fact.  
On #Brexit Labour, or rather most of it, has abandoned its principles, and is willing to sacrifice the welfare of the many in a desperate attempt to hang onto votes.A sad response of a once great party to the most important issue of our times.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
5) so lets be clear, the Anti-brexit coalition celebrates the fact that most of Labour is anti-brexit.  We welcome strong voices like Lammy, Adonis & others.We recognise Starmer is doing some good workWe're not attacking Labour at allWe're attacking about 5 people at the top 
This couldn’t be further from the truth. And you know that, Jeremy, I’m sure. That makes this even worse. For as long as you continue to support Brexit there is no future for the many because the negative effects of Brexit will make that impossible. Stop lying to people.  
I disagree with you, Tom. Brexit is the biggest deception perpetrated on the UK in my lifetime. Families & friends divided (sadly, I speak from experience) & the country split in two. I fear the next generation will be counting the cost for decades. 
1. Some interesting points Owen, but you haven't provided any suggestions on what would be a better way of opposing Brexit; you're just criticising those who are trying, which is very easy. 
No, Daily Mail - this is not a ‘Brexit Boom’. This is what happens when Brexit crashes your currency. Be honest with your readers and #StopBrexit. #FBPE. @StopFundingHate. 
Hold on, Lord A. You’re actually going for a second referendum on a vote on whether we should go for a second referendum?! 
This kind of grandstanding is so counter-productive. Whatever else it may have been, the Brexit referendum was an infinitely more vigorous display of democracy than anything the EU Commission have ever sponsored.  
In my humble opinion we need to . . .Attack Jeremy Corbyn’s stance on Brexit but *NOT* attack Jeremy Corbyn.Support the Brexit stance of Clegg  / Campbell / Ken Clarke etc regardless of how we may view their other politics.Brexit is bigger than Left / Right.#StopBrexit 
Welcomed Our National President Sri @AmitShah to @BJP4Karnataka Meeting in Bengaluru by presenting him the book "Politicshock: Trump, Modi, Brexit and the Prospect for Liberal Democracy" by Meghnad Desai.  
Here's my howl of despair, as a Remain voter, over the numerous failures of the Stop Brexit campaign, and the refusal to acknowledge, let alone deal with them. Give it a read: I'd love to hear your thoughts.  
Adonis on Brexit: ‘No mandarin backs May. Government has broken down’  
I will feel pride in 2018 when government reveals the true impact of Brexit. When parliament comes to it's senses & admits that Brexit is not in the best interests of our country. When the Left and the Right come together to do what is right for our country. Then I will be proud.  
There were few pro-Brexit economic forecasts but the Minford et al one was as wrongly optimistic as the anti-Brexit forecasts were overly pessimistic — if not more so (look at gdp and wage predictions).  
Thinking of the 3265 women who had to travel to the UK for abortions last year, and the hundreds of thousands who’ve travelled in the past. The UN says Ireland’s law is “cruel, inhuman and degrading”. Hopefully 2018 will bring a referendum & #repealthe8th #healthcarenotairfare 
He falsely claims Lord Adonis is a “living caricature of the liberal elite”. Anthony Adonis was actually born on a council estate. So he perpetuates the false claim and then claims A Adonis is disqualified from commenting on Brexit because of the false claim. 
Boris Johnson is cutting funding to foreign embassies to pay for more diplomats to the EU . Cheaper solution just get rid of Johnson then you won’t need thousands of extra staff to try to repair the UK’s tarnished image.Simple stop Brexit.#FBPE 
Our article, ‘Why #Brexit is madness’, has achieved a reach on Facebook of almost one million, making it our most noticed story of 2017. Now published on @Jon_Danzig’s blog. Please share widely. Link:  
Brexit was never a working class revolt. It was driven mostly by panto toffs, offshore money & unhappy right-wing, middle class people too proud to admit that they’ve ended up on the wrong side of inequalities they’ve always blithely voted for. Immigration was always a scapegoat. 
Seriously bad idea, but shows just what an utter farce the Tory UK Government has become and how ill-prepared UK is for a ‘Hard Brexit’. And these Tories are some of same, self-satisfied talking heads that had the brass neck to criticise Yes campaign in #Indyref! 
Refreshing intellectual honesty from David Davis, who has admitted Brexit may not happen. As he himself once said: if a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy #ExitFromBrexit 
If you care about our #NHS, then you might care about this: an assessment of all types of Brexit; undertaken by Health Professionals & peer reviewed for reliability. Still want Brexit at any cost? @TheLancet @NHSChoices @theRCN @NHSMillion @UKLabour #StopBrexit2018 #FBPE @sj4shaw 
Britain might not leave the EU, David Davis 'privately admits'. Brexit Secretary 'secretly says decision could be reversed'.Brexit can be stopped. Keep up the campaign to #StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
Andrew Neil makes a really good point here about how Brexit has helped the £ rise from $1.50 all the way to $1.35  
Do you, like me, want to #stopBrexit if possible?Can only happen if there is a 2nd referendum and we win it.So, let’s work hard to persuade those who don’t agree with us - using reason and not insults: because insults never persuade anyone. 
The Daily Mail is undermining democracy with its deceit. When lies rule, reasoned debate ends, and broken promises destroy faith in democracy. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn says that Labour are "not advocating a second referendum". As a matter of fact, neither are the @LibDems. We're advocating a first referendum on the facts once the Brexit deal has been negotiated. There's a difference. #ExitFromBrexit 
The Brexit domino effect that nationalists expected did not happen. But we should not be complacent. Freedom, democracy, peace and the rule of law in Europe were hard fought for. In 2018 we must continue to defend our European values. That will be our mission #WeAreEurope  
.@VinceCable responds to David Davis admitting Brexit may never happen  
Wetherspoons employs between 2,000 and 3,000 staff from other EU countries. Their Brexit backing boss is now afraid of losing them. "Two pints of hypocrisy and a packet of crisps, please."  
“The referendum cost 6M€, the Catalan foreign offices abroad, 12M€. The Spanish police operation which beat up voters cost 100 million euros. These are the ‘priorities’ of PP, PSC, and Cs.”  
.@Theresa_May I will not be feeling pride in 2018. What is there to be proud about? You have divided Britain with #Brexit and England has become a nasty racist little country. You may feel proud, but I certainly am not. #48%  
So Theresa May’s #NewYear message is Britons will feel a renewed sense of pride? Because nothing says ‘proud’ quite like a buckling privatised NHS, a xenophobic referendum, a government forcing the disabled to work, childhood diseases of poverty & unaffordable housing. 
But I think that a lot of people are letting the fact that the moment they realised Brexit was gonna happen was when Sunderland voted hugely colour how they analyse what the Leave vote was about and where it was from. 
My wish for the next year is that Corbyn doesn't get the blame for everything from Brexit to someones cat missing the litter tray.He did not call a referendum and it's not his cat. 
What is the point of a second referendum. If the government ignore the first then they can just as easily ignore the second- A second referendum is absolute proof of a failed political system. 
“I thought it (Brexit) was the single stupidest thing any country has ever done but then we Trumped it.”  
Andrew Adonis: "I have huge admiration for Jeremy as a politician, even though there are areas of policy where we do not see eye to eye. What I hope Jeremy will do is come out for a referendum on Mrs May’s final deal". It's becoming sad now... 
Today’s Brexit visual metaphor  
2018: Trump is impeached, Bowie is resurrected, giant companies pay all their taxes, Brexit is reversed & there are unlimited new episodes of Luther, Young Pope and The Crown.Shut up. It's what is keeping me going.Happy New Year to all of you, Especially *you* xx 
Fishing's not just a totemic Brexit issue- it's a way of life & heritage that's suffered immeasurably. Public support to #SaveBritainsFish & see injustice righted for coastal communities is brilliant. Take 10 min for a glimpse into what we're fighting for  
Any type of Brexit will have a negative effect on the NHS. From a recent impact assessment by @TheLancet written by experts & peer reviewed. 
Why it’s important for @LabourUK to shift its position on Brexit and be open to staying in the EU if that’s what people want@BestforBritain 
Notable abuse being directed at @Andrew_Adonis today not just from rabid Tory Brexit right but also from figures prominent in Momentum and on so called left. Common fear of effective pro European Labour social democratic message ? 
If you ever want to win over Leave voters *you have to stop talking about taking on brexit* Why is this so hard to understand?  
The Stronger In Remain campaign indeed failed because it lacked passion & sincerity. But what that gave rise to was a genuine pro-EU movement which has gained momentum as voters realise Leave's referendum campaign was a right-wing con, & will continue to do so in 2018 #StopBrexit 
Still time to 'offer people the choice of an exit from Brexit' says Cable  
Owen Jones thinks:- The leave campaign were all elected MPs like Nigel Farage and that's why they won- Nobody should oppose Brexit unless they holiday in some kind of toilet  
I agree. Maybe a referendum on the eventual Brexit deal.  
You can't have a liberal, tolerant society if people with powerful voices (Murdoch, Dacre etc) are relentlessly spouting torrents of lies and hate with impunity. So a liberal society cannot be entirely tolerant of illiberalism.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
My 6 hopes for 2018:1. Trump to be impeached2. Brexit to be reversed3. May to resign4. Corbyn to grow a pair 5. Putin to lose his internet password6. Scotland to win something. Anything.Happy New Year everybody  
The most important political case to make right now is the one that explains how Brexit will actually help us. I can't make it, because I don't think it will. Yet the people who *do* think it will don't seem willing or able to do anything other than attack the likes of me. 
'Labour is abandoning its working-class Brexit-supporting base and cosying up with middle-class Remainers - it's a historic error', says Brendan O'Neill  
BREXIT: Even taking into account the Mail’s regular habit of manipulating a story to trigger readers into apoplexy, this is still a remarkable piece of deliberate misreporting. Mind you, it’s goaded the extremists into threats of violence so job done, I guess…  
Western Europe's youngest democracy still has lot to learn: #Spain's witch-hunt reaches new levels of absurdity as Catalan school reported to police for choosing class delegates in a #referendum  
I haven’t been able to afford a holiday for five years. Am I sufficiently non privileged for my views to count? I agree with everything Adonis said about Brexit in his resignation letter. 
6. @Owenjones84 is utterly wrong in imagining that @Andrew_Adonis a silver-spoon toff; also wrong in believing that Brexit vote was largely poor northerners 
Exactly.Cultural differences exist. And they are enormous.US Military posted in musIim countries are told to ignore child abuse as ‘it is their culture’.Because of that we must #CloseBorders and remigrate them. Asap.#Brexit  
The notion of the "Will of the People" serves as a seemingly ultra-democratic justification for placing ever more power in the hands of the ruler who claims to be implementing the people's will. It is absolutely toxic to democracy.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit latest: If Andrew Adonis had been careening down a slag heap on an old tin tray instead of a skiing in Austria last week then his own description of his own experiences in Whitehall would be credible.But he wasn’t so they’re not.Happy New Year! 
If anybody else is having second thoughts about #Brexit this #NewYearsEve, it’s still not too late to speak out. I voted Leave in 2016, but it’s increasingly clear we were manipulated by some very dishonest and self-serving people. I’m a #RemainerNow. Let’s #StopBrexit in 2018. 
My main prediction for 2018 is that Brexit continues to be used as a basis for endless proxy cultural wars leading everyone to get further entrenched in their tribal identity. 
Shall I remind you that while she voted and campaigned to remain, she said the “sky wouldn’t fall in” if we left the EU? As all politicians should, she had respected the democratic will of the British people and is working for a good Brexit deal. Be more like Theresa perhaps?  
In today’s episode of Brexit Bullshit Exposed... pic.twitter.com/TeWt6oKQNq 
Andrew Adonis - son of an immigrant waiter and lived in a council children's home until a grant paid for school - is acting entirely with his conscience in speaking out against #Brexit. Yes we need a more diverse set of campaigners like him - I welcome them too.  
Good to see that the #brexit secretary is keeping an open mind. As David Davis once famously said "If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy."  
Brexiters will trumpet the report that the U.K. Tops Forbes' Best Countries For Business 2018. It won't occur to them that it's occurred after 45 years of EU membership and while we are still in the EU. So why leave?#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
There's an ELEPHANT  in the room, Labour. Pretending won't make brexit go away.  
Do Leavers not know that Mini, Land Rover, Jaguar, Bentley and, yes, even Rolls Royce are foreign owned?British industry is highly dependent on foreign investment and Brexit will damage it.Those car manufacturers can always build their factories elsewhere. 
Stripping Poland of its voting rights could be a bigger threat to the EU than Brexit 
#Throwback to a classic referendum video. Theresa May is hellbent on keeping us in the filthy EU hatchery, where nothing grows and everything stagnates. The PM wants to Leave in name only. For her, Brexit is a damage limitation job, not the golden opportunity we voted for   
No one talks about it in France. Our politically inclined friends here are incurious about Brexit. I find it sad because I’d hoped it would matter to them, but it doesn’t  
Primarily it demonstrates what a destructive force Brexit is and how it has already undermined democracy in the UK .... but hey, let’s just ignore that bit, right?  
Social media giants face sanctions if they don’t help parliamentary investigation dig up proof of alleged Russian interference in #Brexit vote  
.@JLongworthLML: Why 2018 will be good for go-it-alone UK as we edge closer to Brexit Britain  
Let’s build Teaser May’s vision for the New Year and build some Pride back into 20181) stop Brexit2) Ensure there is never a Tory Government ever again3) Bin The Corbyn Death Cult and their misery for the many4) prosecute worst Brexiter criminals and pack rest off to the USA. 
18 months ago Britain was sold #Brexit saying it would save us £355 million a week, would be easy to install and have all the current facilities. Now it’s costing £50 billion, is a nightmare and doesn’t work. Do we want this rubbish, NO 
Brexshit the Movie is ready..A year in the making.. it’s 3hrs 30mins long.. I hate Brexit.. this is a social document pic.twitter.com/koOouXjAKX 
“In 2018 we’ll persist with our holier-than-thou, moral superiority despite our:Rampant anti-semitismPandering to IslamLinks to terroristsRelentless liesCollusion in UK child abuseBrexit betrayalAbusive knuckle dragging #Momentum thugs@UKLabour is morally superior, ok?” 
Oh thank goodness, @theresa_may must be planning to cancel Brexit.  That’s the only way that I’m going to feel pride in Britain in 2018 #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Dear MayBot @theresa_may, I have just told my wife about your New Year's day message, that Brexit negotiations will be successful and bring confidence and pride to Britons. She said NO. Off to Brexit re-education camp with her? 
Here's Jonesy to demonstrate the current anxiety levels of your hardline remainer gimps 18 months after the EU Referendum.  
Nobody but media commentators care that Andrew Adonis was on holiday skiing when he wrote his anti Brexit piece, and it’s pathetic valorisation of an imagined monocultural underclass to imagine otherwise. 
What the @britishchambers tells the Observer about its’ members frustration with the government’s handling of #Brexit is mirrored by what businesses, large and small, tell me in #Lambeth 
Without Remainers like Adonis and Clegg to hate, wtf would most Brexit MPs and pundits even talk about? Can't remember the last time I heard any of them say anything remotely positive about anything Brexit might do. 
This by Adonis: "I do not know a single senior civil servant who thinks that Brexit is the right policy, and those that are responsible for negotiating it are in a desperate and constant argument with the government over the need to minimise the damage"  
The Prime Minister says in her New Year message "Most people just want the government to get on and deliver a good #Brexit”.  Not only is that untrue  in Scotland (& increasingly in England too) it is also impossible - there can be no such thing as a “good Brexit”. 
GET A GRIP:James Norton (an actor) reveals that his “heart breaks every morning” over Brexit & feels Britain is “spiralling out of control”.  
2017 has been an absolute shocker. Brexit is all the gvmt can do, but it doesn’t know how and rejects advice. Let’s reject them before they completely screw us over.#NoCompetence#NoConfidence@LibDems @UKLabour @TheGreenParty #HappyNewYear 
It doesn't matter which way you voted in the Referendum, or even if you didn't vote at all - what matters is that all those who want the best for the UK unite and campaign together to #StopBrexit2018  with a #FinalSayForAll! Join us & Happy #NewYear2018 @pestononsunday @MarrShow 
Flying back to Brexit Land today. 2018 will be the year we will destroy Brexit before it destroys Britain. #FBPE 
The country should be allowed a vote on the final deal which includes the option to remain. Democracy doesn’t begin and end with an advisory binary referendum. #BrexitShambles 
Take a look back at 2017 as told in graphics, covering the U.S. economy, Brexit, rising China, and much more   
Absolutely right. 2018 will be pivotal, do we want a new open, progressive, outward looking politics which tackles the real issues facing us or do we continue to go down the #Brexit cul-de-sac full of hatreds, bitterness and illusory dreams of past glories? pic.twitter.com/rYcLVgkE2Y 
To think that the civil service is simply waiting indeed praying for Brexit to collapse, just about sums up the foolishness of Brexit and the lamentable state of our government. #stopbrexit #fbpe 
Interesting. Professional pundit child of a Uni lecturer criticizes son of Cypriot waiter who grew up in care and has been the sharp end of politics since the early 90s. But hey, he skis and has a foreign name so let's ignore his advice. Welcome to Brexit Britain. 
Scottish unionism has shown itself to be smaller, more fragile than it pretends to be, and Brexit is challenging unionists' commitment to staying with the UK. 
Hogmanay 2017. [Thread] We have a dangerous and out of control government in London, Brexit has become terrifying, and we're still not independent. In 2018 we have a job of work to do. #Referendum2018 
Stop voting with the tories for Brexit then FFS 
What's the Labour Brexit position today? Is it still basically to be as ambiguous as someone reading tea-leaves at a fairground? 
Startling but interesting article on #Brexit : 'No civil servants want to work for Brexit ministry' & they are waiting for Govt current policy to collapse. Suggests civil servants & govt essentially at war over Brexit policy.    
Anna Soubry's role in #Brexit fascinates me. In 2011 she wrote “The EU has become a huge, overly costly, bureaucratic organisation, lacking in both democracy & accountability to the many millions of people who pay for it through their taxes and who are bound to live by its rules”  
Ok. So what are you doing to change their minds instead, Owen dear? Because I can’t believe you would support A change which will put so many out of work? Would you have supported Thatcher who had a much bigger majority than Brexit, because “well that’s democracy”? 
Lord Adonis: Good government has essentially broken down in the face of Brexit. Normal standards of conduct are not being observed. Independent advice is being dismissed because, remember, experts were supposedly part of the problem.#StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit 
"The govt is falling to pieces as it directs all its energies into dealing with a Brexit conundrum it cannot solve. Civil servants who had doubts about a hard Brexit are not being listened to.Advice is being ignored.Ideology is trumping good governance."- #LordAdonis#StopBrexit 
2018 and Brexit  
The year of ;TrumpBrexitMiddle East TurmoilMultiple incidents in London and Manchester Grenfell tower Fire Attacks in France and Belgium STILL Gun Crimes in america Rohingyas genocide Mugabe finally steps down 2017 HAS BEEN A MAD YEAR 
2017SNP                                  ToriesBaby boxes                      AusterityFree Prescription             FoodbanksFree Hospital Parking     HomelessFree Uni                            Brexit                        Mitigated Bedroom Tax  Tax Breaks 4 The Rich  
Makes perfect sense to me.All Brexit supporters have left is the 52/48% split, which is powerful, but not enough, because a majority voted for a pain & cost free #Brexit, not this dog's dinner.Brexit just makes no sense, almost nothing promised will happen  
Should’ve thrown him out and screamed “BREXIT!” 
Does anybody really think these Tory hard Brexit charmers have the best interests of the British people at heart, or are they out purely for themselves and their friends ?It's that simple.#FBPE#StopBrexit#NoBrexit 
Brexit: the truth about our passports - Mrs May's blue passports are her equivalent to buying off the natives with baubles and beads...  #Brexit .  
6)In result of this, governor offices, IRGC and Basij bases were targeted and burned.People don't want violence but peaceful transitional in Iran. They are asking for a #referendum. A democratic way of solving issues.This is the path they want to take and not violence. 
Chris Riddell on the Brexit beast blocking path to progress in 2018 – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Good to have an inside voice now unconstrained on the outside...finally we may start to get some realpolitik & truth instead of Tory bluff, bluster & BS...& Labour disingenuity. #FinalSay to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit 
Remainers have been looking for a leader. It seems Andrew Adonis is willing to step up to the crease. Thank you @Andrew_Adonis I especially like the phrase "the campaign to keep the UK in the EU". No talk of pointless Soft Brexit. #StopBrexitSaveBritain  
A growing political gulf between central Europe and western EU powers represents a far greater risk to the European project than Brexit.  
According to reports on the MailOnline: 'David Davis has allegedly privately admitted Brexit might not happen'. If this is the case his analysis and assessment of the situation should be given due recognition, it does appear to be more likely by each day. 
People are waking up to the reality #Brexit could happen but it can't be made to work which will leave us poorer & with fewer rights...they also know the Labour version is little different from the Tory. There is no softer Brexit...just harder in waiting. We must #StopBrexit. 
What’s saddest about all of this is that if Corbyn came out against Brexit tomorrow morning Owen would be a staunch lifelong Remainer by lunchtime. 
.A rift in the Brexit family......  
Owen you’ve gone way off piste on this. Brexit voters don’t care about Adonis going skiing. They do care about their jobs, living standards, NHS, education. All of those things will be adversely affected by a hard Brexit. 
Seven years of Conservative rule has led to falling wages, crumbling public services, NHS in crisis, failure to plan Brexit, nurses using foodbanks, unaffordable housing, higher tuition fees, rough sleeping doubling and national debt almost trebling.That's the #TeamTory record. 
Davis “admits Brexit might not happen”. So let’s keep up the pressure to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
“I voted for Brexit but some Lord who failed in their attempts to be elected as an MP and got appointed by the Tories to an unelected post resigned in protest whilst skiing in Austria”“I’ve changed my mind!!!” 
If you want to take on Brexit, *you have to convince people who voted for it that you are on their side, and not confirm the caricature many have of you*. Why is this so hard to understand? 
Puigdemont demands Madrid reinstate his regional government after it was deposed following an independence referendum  
Think a Tory Brexit is a disaster? Sure, sign me up. Having unelected Lords talking about resigning from Tory-appointed posts whilst skiing in Austria appointing themselves as tribunes of the people against referendum results? Is Nigel Farage *paying* Lord Adonis to say this? 
Ireland, Ireland Thinks poll:Should the Republic of Ireland and Northern Ireland unite to one state?In favor: 47% (+14)Oppose: 32% (-1)Don't know/neutral: 22% (-12)#Brexit #Ireland 
Everything that is wrong with the "just pretend the referendum never happened and overturn Brexit" summed up. Yeah, this is the sort of figure that'll convince the Leave-backing voters of Oldham, Burnley and Rochdale to change their mind. I mean, wow.  
Adonis on Brexit: ‘No mandarin backs May. Government has broken down’  
Hey @blairmcdougall  A corrupt British State willing to kill anyone who stands in its way. Little doubt that our #Indyref was rigged by MI5. Don't ever tell the people of Scotland that they have had their independence referendum! 
‘Adonis calls on Grayling to quit and slams broken Brexit government’  
Brexit will be great for Britain's economy. This is Britain's future outside of the EU.  
I couldn’t care less if your Labour, Lib Dem, Tory, SNP, Green or Monster Raving Looney Party #FBPE is about being Pro EU & Anti Brexit. 
Brexit means staff are transferred to EU embassies from embassies in the rest of the world  I didn't realise that would how it worked. Did you vote for that? 
How can people who voted Leave in the referendum have known what they were voting for? 18 months later and our government still can't decide what Brexit actually means... 
'Brexit frees UK from German occupation!' EFTA campaigner SLAMS Germany's control over EU   
Key paragraphs in the Guardian piece on Adonis. The Brexit negotiations are an elaborate hunt for a Snark. Almost everyone in Whitehall knows it but the government has set itself up to find this invisible Snark and show it off to the world.  
When Brexit arrives and the shit hits the fan, as this stupid Country faces up to the reality of the biggest mistake in it's history. The Tories will "STILL" be blaming the previous Labour Government! 
This is significant for us - a major figure name-checks our community and congratulates us for getting our vote out - forget the #FBPE troll rubbish for a moment -this is a major success ...no wonder the Brexit establishment are turning their fire on us!  
18 months since the referendum I have yet to hear one argument, backed up with evidence, that our country will be stronger as a result of Brexit. 
How do you negotiate Brexit? We asked an expert earlier on in 2017  
."The senior civil service is now totally drained physically & psychologically by attempting to deliver the impossible with Brexit.". 
After 10 years in power it’s clear the SNP Scottish Government only have Brexit as an excuse for their total mismanagement of our Scottish NHS. Who was it who cut the number of Scottish student nurse places ? That’s right Nicola Sturgeon...  
We begin the New Year with a Govt stricken with a plague called Brexit, reeking of decay, mad, wicked, and destroying everything it touches. 
Brexit quote of the century? David Davis on referendums in 2002: 'We should not ask people to vote on a blank sheet of paper and tell them to trust us to fill in the details afterwards.' 
Even The Brexit Secretary Doesn't Believe Brexit Will Happen  #SkyPapers #Brexit #StopBrexit 
And the British Nationalists say MI5 was not involved in rigging Scotland's independence referendum!  lol 
Thousands of people on the streets Falling wagesOur NHS being sold off No Brexit plan Food bank use through the roofThat’s not a record to be proud of #TeamTory 
“There is no magic money tree*”*excludes £1bn to DUP£39bn for unnecessary Brexit100s of millions to shore up dodgy failed privatisations etc etc  
Nigel Farage rips into 'EU FANATICS' during FURIOUS response to Lord Adonis' Brexit attack  
"David Davis admits Brexit might not happen" ~ #SkyPapers 
Our front pageBrexit will leave Scottish NHS on deathbed #tomorrowspaperstoday #scotpapers #buyapaper 
Lord Adonis calls on Grayling to quit and slams ‘broken’ Brexit government  
Growing divisions between east and west Europe set to be 'bigger worry than Brexit' for EU  
AC Grayling is absolutely right in his assessment here:“One of the largest ever Twitter polls conducted on #Brexit180k votes, 20k RT's and from a public figure, not some bot buried deep in some echo chamber.67% for a second referendum on #Brexit.”A resounding result.  
If the nation's conscience  sleeps when the government announces that  it's  going to corrupt its minors, like it happened in Britain, then this nation has reached the end of the road. Nothing else to add really.  #Brexit or no Brexit, the curtain has fallen. 
OK Google,Using a visual metaphor, how did the Brexit negotiations go in 2017?#FBPE#StopBrexit 
What a horrible, horrible lie!“Rape gangs have been part of the West for centuries”No, you treacherous lying leftie.Show me historic proof of rape gangs raping and killing white children, from the 1500 till 1960s.You filthy traitor.#BrexitSHARE  
It’s good to know the UK government is fully focussed on the challenges of Brexit - and not, for example, wasting time arguing black is actually blue.  
Number of votes for Brexit: 17,410,742Number of votes for Lord Adonis: 0 
Not sure how this result can be dismissed as somehow rigged by Remainers. A sample size of over  180,000 with more than two thirds wanting a 2nd referendum on #Brexit. Interested in how the “conventional” poll goes. The tide appears to be turning at last. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
I went sale shopping today in Leicester. I was looking at every face and thinking to myself do you understand what is happening to Our wonderful Country our blessed NHS. Please please wake up and smell the stench of Brexit. 
Result 67% respond positively to question about wanting a second referendum... on a Brexiters' twitter account.  Just 28% say no.  
THE OBSERVER: Gratling must quit says Adonis as he slams ‘broken’ Brexit government #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I’ve just held a second referendum and I’m afraid to report the result is still Leave   
PAPER: EU east-west schism 'bigger worry than Brexit'...  
Just heard that nicola Sturgeon refuses to accept the result of a legal and binding referendum - now I hate her all over again  
I have published a (lengthy) post on how Brexit developments in December affect the chances to successfully conclude transitional arrangements after 29 March 2019  
The tragic outcome of 2017: thanks in large part to Murdoch & the media moguls who "imposed" Brexit/Trump & rising nationalism, world peace & progress never more imperilled. We  MUST fight for a fair media in 2018. 
"Australia’s priority is to trade with the EU" - Australian Foreign Minister on the opportunities and impact of Brexit  
1/ Question.Apart from the obvious, what do Heseltine & Adonis. the two prominent Europhile ‘Liberal’-Elite Remainers who’ve both had spectacular public meltdowns from Brexit Derangement Syndrome this week, have in common? 
Opposing #Brexit might be the best strategy for #Labour in 2018, says @eloisetodd in @LeftFootFwd : 
Labour has repeatedly voted with the Tories to ensure a hard Brexit. Corbyn has whipped the PLP to vote against amendments to keep the option of keeping membership of both the SM & CU as options.This is not fake news, it’s fact.You remember facts don’t you?  
Here is my article today @ft surveying the #Brexit agenda for the year ahead and why #2018 is the time to look before we leap....  
Paul, Corbyn does NOT want a hard Brexit. Please do not spread disinformation on Twitter. Please.  
PM promised when she ran to be leader of Tories, on steps of No 10 when she first became PM, and in 2017 Election Campaign she would address economic inequalities in UK.  So far nothing of substance.  Until economic inequalities are addressed the Brexit divide won't heal. 
Do you want a second referendum on #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
In 2017 we passed legislation to hold a referendum that will give British Columbians the power to decide #HowWeVote. Share your ideas about the upcoming electoral reform referendum at  
THIS is democracy. Persuading people round to a different point of view, and giving them the opportunity to change their minds. Not telling people "you lost, get over it", and calling them saboteurs if they campaign to stop Brexit.  
Good idea let's see hundreds of "Brexit Will Make You Poor" in every town in the country #Stopbrexit #FBPE #Brexit #GuyVerhofstadt 
Let’s be abs clear-majority of young who voted #Labour were conned believing #Corbyn will stop #Brexit. He won’t he’s a lifelong #Brexiteer 
#jumpedtheshark It’s almost disturbing to note how many remainers have, one by one, lost the plot over #Brexit. Someone will study this phenomena one day  
Hard Brexit Harry Maguire made a good tackle early on but overall wasn't very good today. Very unusual. I bet his dollybird made him eat some Coq au vin last night and it put his Brexits all out of kilter. Hill running tomorrow so the boys are ready for Monday. Cheers bob 
British government & even @hmtreasury surely understand we cannot both increase UK diplomacy in Europe post #brexit and pursue new global agenda within same and already much reduced @foreignoffice budget. #notrocketscience 
New Royal ship post-Brexit to sail into foreign ports playing the Big Ben bongs and selling British whiskey and fish. #Telegraphheaven 
The unique complexity of leaving made this inevitable. But those of us who've been pointing it out since before the referendum have been poo-pooed as bleating bureaucrats.  
We will all be poorer in 2018 because of #Brexit predicts @Telegraph Yet it remains staunch #Brexit supporter. What unpatriotic contempt it has for the British people @EK_EuropeanMove 
Plunging the country into financial dire straits and chaos ain't going to inspire Britons to make dinners for the elderly, Pete. In fact, Brexit has only divided the country in ways I haven't seen anywhere else. Enough with the Blitz Spirit bullshit.  
"On even the most optimistic assumption, the process of scoping, negotiation, ratification and implementation of the new relationship will take a minimum of five years from 2018. "-@FT#Brexit#HappyNewYear 
Voting for Brexit is not an 'extreme' position. It's simply a desire of ordinary British people for self-government. #Brexit  
Retweet if you think that he isn't able to name even one tangible, proven benefit of Brexit. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
In ten years you won't be able to find a single person who supported Brexit. Tories will deny it due to the damage it did to the economy and Labour because of the damage it did to society. Yet, as we sleep walk into the abyss, where is the opposition now when we need it? 
You’ve nailed the failing of the entire referendum here. People are more active when challenging the status quo. Thanks for running this poll. It demonstrates very clearly why the Brexit vote was flawed. Should have been a super majority requirement. 
Actually could it be that people are starting to realise that #Brexit will mean the end of the NHS ? Definitely not what they voted for. 
A little bit sick of people telling me to "Face the FACTS and accept Brexit" when their "FACTS" are completely groundless and unsubstantiated.  
The real Brexit challenges facing the UK in 2018  
You are entirely clueless. And wrong. Tactical voting took place on a massive scale in order to achieve the primary goal of stripping the maybot of her majority. It worked.Next step is to destroy brexit. 
From the time Trump's tweets disappeared to David Davis's Brexit diary: satirists take on the news  
The anti Brexit sentiment isn't just on Twitter. It's out there in the 'real' world. #FBPE 
I fear Labour. Maybe they fear me, because I report on their  forums. They discuss Brexit a little, the NHS once in a while, but mainly it's like this.  
John, my 2018 strategy is: persuade people that Brexit is wrong, precipitate a referendum on Mrs May’s ‘deal’ in a year’s time, forge a bold Attlee-style approach to tackling the social crisis within Britain, & keep us in the EU. I’m not contemplating national self-mutilation.  
'EU has sky-high unemployment crisis!' Brexiteer MP SLAMS claim that Brexit hurts the poor  
Andrew Adonis visited Barnier only a few months ago, in a deliberate attempt to stop Brexit thus undermining the negotiations... and he says the govt tried to silence him. He should have been sacked.   
Enoch Powell, the unsung hero & prophet of the UKIf we had listened to him,UK would have been a better place than it is today.After 44 years we are finally taking his advice and leaving the EU.Heath took us in on a pack of lies and WITHOUT a referendum 
Brexit will collapse under the weight of its own internal contradictions | The New European  
We all remember the Brexit lies on the side of a bus. So let’s get the truth out there. Every little helps for this big red #StopBrexit bus crowdfunder - please RT to spread the word: 
I've been arguing for much of the year that public opinion on #Brexit will not shift in a major way because it is an issue rooted in values.I will leave this here.  
I think that @mikegalsworthy has got it spot on here. We are a liberal (small 'l') community horrified by the extremity if the Government's brexit position. Within that, there will be a range of views, but we are only strong together, and must focus on what unites us.  
Strengthening Embassies in Europe for more bilateral work post-Brexit makes sense. But cutting Embassies in Asia is myopic. @BorisJohnson shd be fighting for a few % of the £3bn Hammond has set aside for #brexit!  
Labour are anti- Scottish. They are unionists exactly like the Tories. They are not our friends or comrades. Scotland stands alone against Austerity, Trident renewal & Brexit.#indyref2 in 2018 please.  
Forget 48%...the real majority is now for #Remain & the Ppl must be allowed a Democratic #FinalSay in 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit. We're with you & other Democrats who still believe in the right to rethink & change minds. 
This evening in Tehran. People chant Down with Khamenei. They also call for a referendum. Source @hra_news 
#DespiteBrexit The pound is now only down 8% since the EU referendum, previously the IMF said a fall of up to 11% would be beneficial for the UK as it was overvalued.Where's our crisis?  
Brexit was not the voice of the working class nor of the uneducated – it was of the squeezed middle  
Werritty, Werritty I say unto you, 2018 will be the year Brexit disappears up its own sizeable posterior. 
We need to start calling those who want to stop Brexit, “extremists”. They represent only a fringe of angry elitists.  
As a former @UKLabour Party member I never thought I'd think so highly of Michael Heseltine as I do now. #Brexit #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #FBPE #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll #StopBrexitHour #StopBrexitSaveBritain #StandUP4aFirmRemain  
“Referendum, referendum,” hundreds of people chant on the streets of Tehran. Also: “Down with Khamenei.” Deep dissatisfaction. Powerful words.  #Iranprotests #IranianProtest 
Farage's response to my letter shows why Brexit is dangerous, not foolish. His words on Russia and EU ‘imperialism’ beggar belief. This is the sub-Trump who has done a reverse takeover of the Conservative Party & is now in effect co-Prime Minister!   
#Brexit zealot who never misses an opportunity to spout bile about "Remoaners", which is one of her favourite ways of expressing how much she despises so many of her fellow citizens. That's #Brexit patriotism for you, folks.  
Britain's global diplomacy set to be an early casualty of #Brexit if @BorisJohnson unwinds @WilliamJHague policy of expansion in growth markets #globalbritain #myfoot 
So predictable after @Andrew_Adonis' letter today. Every time a politician or public figure stands up against Brexit, the thugs rally round to smear and threaten them.Time for those who oppose this damaging Brexit to stick up for each other, and work together  
 From the mass demonstration in favor of hosting refugees to the October 1 referendum, find out the main #events of this especially intense #year in #Catalonia in a one-minute video 
We will defeat Brexit in 2018.  Yes? 
Little damages our nation more than the poison and lies of the Lemoaners who, even though they won a dodgy referendum by the skin of their teeth can't stop whining and waving pitchforks, perpetually outraged at everyone the Daily Mail tells them to.  
But if Labour came out fully against Brexit it could be stopped in short order, along with the steadily increasing damage it is doing. Corbyn, McDonnel & Milne are obstacles to this. It’s no good to blinker ourselves to the fact that they are aiding & abetting the Tories.  
The referendum result is irrelevant, the  solution to the problems caused by Brexit is to cancel it, that’s the answer, whether that’s a popular answer or not really doesn’t matter, the truth doesn’t depend on opinion polls. 
The most successful post of @StandUp4EU in 2017?This cartoon. Because of reasons.#Brexit #StandUpForEurope 
Brextemist wish list for 2018- Brexit donors pay no tax at all - Privatisation of NHS- Murdoch acquires Sky- Peerage for Adam Werritty 
Hmm. Greens winning 6 x as many seats at Lab and LD 20 x better. 6 months after 1992 election Lab 20 points ahead of Cons. Today Cons and Lab level-pegging. Are we all certain Ooh Jeremy Corbyn making breakthrough esp with anti-Brexit young voters @MattChorley @JohnRentoul 
'Andrew Adonis’s resignation means the fight against Brexit may be turning into a campaign to rejoin the EU'  
Dad spent 37 years working in a Yorkshire coal mine. Mum was a miner's daughter & school "dinner lady". My sister & I both graduated and went into teaching. Nice to know that voting #Remain means we're now part of "The Elite"! #OrdinaryPeopleRemain #Brexit 
Ahh yes, remind us of those Brexit ‘facts’ again Julia. £350m for the NHS, how about the easy trade deals, the sunlit uplands, and the imminent collapse of the EU?  
Brexit won’t happen. It’s just too much of a stupid idea. To everybody getting sucked into negativity and bickering, feeling disheartened,n o need. Be confident. #stopbrexit #FBPE 
The Brexit vote has caused a significant rise in prices, especially food  
Remainers of all parties are planning to keep the UK in the EU, and they believe they will win. @georgeeaton on the plot to stop Brexit: 
Four million people signed the petition for 2nd Brexit referendum in 2016. If just one million people across the EU sign this citizens' initiative, we will be a step closer to the possibility of permanent EU citizenship for those in the UK who want it. 
Lord Adonis resigned from his infrastructure role, claiming the Brexit bill is the 'worst legislation of my lifetime'. Do you agree with his comments?  
Who said it was all doom and gloom. As someone who will happily admit I was anti #Brexit all the doom and gloom made me change to pro. The future is not written and it's up to us to make the best of it. So far a lot of the 'experts' have been wrong! Here is to a great 2018   
#BBC continues to plug the non-story about Lord Adonis resigning, repeating his absurd attacks on #Brexit and his ridiculous assertions that the Labour government he had served in had integrity and coherent policies. That was the most corrupt and inept government in history. 
A post-Brexit Corbyn (a post-Brexit ANYONE, for that matter) would face such a financial firestorm, he wouldn't have two farthings to rub together and be doomed to utter failure before implementing a single policy, purely because of circumstances. It would not matter what he did. 
Mitchell also said Brexit "will historically prove to be a major error on the part of the people of the UK"  
'A nervous breakdown across Whitehall'. Not just any Remainer here, but one who's worked at the heart of the govt and civil service since Brexit. Adonis in un-punch-pulling mode:  
Yes, there should be a second #Brexit referendum  
Brexit is a 'nationalist spasm': Lord Adonis resigns as infrastructure tsar  
Since last year’s referendum vote every EU measure to which the UK was opposed to or abstained from – 17 out of a total of 102 – has been passed into European Union law  
Whether we have a hard Brexit, a soft Brexit or no Brexit at all,  migrants will continue to be targeted by politicians and the media, and attacked physically and verbally in our streets.  On 17 Feb we want to say no to that.  Who will stand with us? #1DayWithoutUs 
Theresa May’s “infrastructure czar” has quit, saying Brexit has caused a “nervous breakdown across Whitehall” and “conduct unworthy” of the government.  
"Unscientific" - rather like an advisory referendum then ? 
In 2017 I interviewed:- Prime Minister Theresa May- Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson- Defence Secretaries Gavin Williamson & Michael Fallon- Brexit Secretary David Davis- Attended Lancaster House & Florence speeches- Authored 1000+ wire reports on UK politicsA good year. 
Brilliant @Andrew_Adonis letter shows Brexit is linked to other issues.  He knows his history as well as his trains.  
As the Mail knows perfectly well, the FTSE 100 high reflects mostly foreign companies priced in $ so that the £ ‘s fall flatters it. Post Brexit economic news is mixed, but Dacre does his readers & staff a disservice (again) by only printing / distorting the good news  
It is outrageous that the UK is still forced to obey all EU laws we oppose 18 months after the referendum and perhaps for another 3 or more years. Read my comments on @BreitbartLondon 
Take a wild guess what my new year's resolution is going to be? I bet the same as many of you! #StopBrexit #FBPE Come and join the #resistance and lets kick some brexit ass this year. Respect. X pic.twitter.com/3hPgY2bxw6 
An extraordinary story which proves that the  “global Britain” reason for #Brexit was a myth (or lie as it should properly be called)..” Asian embassies cut by Boris Johnson to fund EU diplomats | News | The Times & The Sunday Times  
Pour @nnougayrede dans the Guardian aujourd'hui, Macron est uniquement placé "pour renverser le Brexit"Maybe wishful thinking, but an interesting read :)  
Macron had a good year. In 2018, he could even stop BrexitIf the French president reaches out to the British people, perhaps the disaster of leaving the EU could be averted.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
Hardline brexiteers can't argue with the substance of Lord Adonis's arguments.... instead they resort to personal attacks."... if they attack one personally, it means they have not a single political argument left." Margaret Thatcher.#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
#BBC interviewer to Lord Adonis“The country voted decisively for brexit” ...No it fucking didn’t, a tiny majority of votes, 37% of electorate and 26% of population is not fucking decisive#StopBrexit@acgrayling @RemainerAction @nickreeves9876 
“Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty’s government." My letter to the PM. 
Senior DExEU source blames Brussels troublemaking for reports about Brexit secretary’s role in negotiations  
#Brexit voter realises his fruit farm empire faces ruin without EU migrant workers. (Maybe he will pick the fruit himself)  
Only thing that's worse is you complaining about "remoaners" complaining.How about tweeting the benefits of Brexit? 280 characters will be way more than enough.  
."Despite all of Boris Johnson's hot air about 'global Britain', the reality is Brexit is DIMINISHING our country's presence on the world stage.". 
A photo & caption from @NBCNews ‘2017 Year in Pictures’. Although @marianorajoy said there wasn’t a referendum, @Sorayapp said the process was ‘kaput’, and of course there aren’t any political prisoners, despite more than 750,000 people protesting for their release in the photo.  
David Davis refreshes his Brexit negotiating team, ready for 2018.  
Lord Adonis  FB page.  Thanks to followers for cascade of support. Sorry I can’t reply to all personally. 2018 is when we end the Brexit nightmare & regain public confidence in the capacity of the state to tackle our social crisis without scapegoating Europe & foreigners! 
Jobs at Risk and Costs Spiralling as Tories Fail to Block Any Unwanted EU Laws Despite Brexit Vote  
The deadliest threat to our prosperity, happiness & national unity is not Brexit, Trump, Putin or terrorism. It's the corrosive culture of hysterical outrage, nurtured by the hard Left, amplified by social media & increasingly entrenched at universities.  
10 Bonkers Things Adonis Said About Brexit  via @GuidoFawkes 
In that case Phil I look forward to no more Remainian “reporting” on the disaster that Brexit will supposedly be. Or is it only you guys who are allowed to debate the future? (And PS, City = awesome)  
Here is @MikeAmesbury lying to his constituents. @CWaCTory requested a referendum. @cwaclabour blocked it. We have never had one. This man is quite prepared to make things up in order to score political points. Mike, will you join me in demanding Labour give the people a say? 
London’s stock markets finished the trading year in style last night, shrugging off jitters over Brexit to bow out at record highs  
It's welcome to see @SimonHarrisTD stating that misinformation is unacceptable in the referendum, but his belief (based on the recommendations of #8committee) that there's a clear line between fatal and not-fatal foetal abnormality diagnosis is inaccurate 
Round of applause to whoever put a sign saying "Brexit Will Make You Poor" by the roadside coming off the motorway to #Sheffield  passing too fast to get a photo, but it's very visible. So many must have seen it! #StopBrexit 
Business owners fear Brexit could affect livelihoods in a French village popular with expat Brits. More from @ReutersTV:  
On referendum morning I walked out to see the sun rising over the Thames, glinting off the water. A new day dawning in every way. - Iain Duncan Smith  
Where the fuck is my MBE for services to the kebab industry and social media Brexit-bashing? 
Andrew Adonis quits saying that Theresa May has "no parliamentary or popular mandate" for her Brexit decision-making, “a populist and nationalist spasm” 
FATA Grand Alliance & Fata Supreme Council workers protest in Islamabad. They displayed banners & chanted slogans, “no fata merger into Khyber Pakhtunkhwa without a referendum”.  
.@AyeshaHazarika is fed up with Remainers being silenced by the argument that Brexit is "the will of the people" and urged them to continue to question the government's position.  
'People will change their minds over Brexit'  
Take a look back at 2017 as told in graphics, covering the U.S. economy, Brexit, rising China, and much more  
Austerity has been linked to 120,000 premature deaths. Brexit is the new excuse for Austerity.  
Thanks to followers for cascade of support. Sorry I can’t reply to all personally. 2018 is when we end the Brexit nightmare & regain public confidence in the capacity of the state to tackle our social crisis without scapegoating Europe & foreigners! 
Snowflake Adonis claims "Very few of the people who voted for Brexit voted...to make themselves poorer". Similar condescending words as used by Osborne.This scaremongering treats British voters like idiots. It didn't work in 2016 & will not work now!  
#Brexit has been a great exercise for weeding out those not mentally strong enough to BE in Westminster.If they don't feel they can govern the UK, without being overseen by unelected drunkards in Brussels, perhaps they are just not up to their chosen profession? 
A knock-out defence of @LibDems 2010 coalition by @tony_nog & how tribalism perpetuates Brexit & is killing UK. Should have millions of likes/RTs but after all this, tribalism & populist prejudices are alive & well in British politics, even among but-oh-the-tuition-fees Remainers  
Number of votes for Brexit: 17,410,742Number of votes for Lord Adonis: 0 
Adonis quits from his role advising the UK government: “Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump”  
All's fair in love and war: the "españolista" hysteria against #Catalonia's teachers reaches Himalayan levels: one school has been reported for holding a referendum in it... for the pupils to choose their own delegates. Literally.#LlibertatPresosPolítics 
 you couldn't make this up! #brexit vision of 'global britain' looking more and more like 'little britain' - people are allowed to reconsider as facts like this emerge @Open_Britain 
Managers say it's becoming more difficult to attract new workers as well as hold on to their current ones.There are concerns, the lack of clarity over future EU #citizensrights in the country after #Brexit is putting off applicants. 
‘@EmmanuelMacron  can really make a difference in becoming the first, strong continental voice to make the case for stopping Brexit’s collective wrecking ball. If that happened, 2018 wd be a Fr-Brit success story, not a messy divorce. En marche to that!’  
.@UKLabour are spreading #FakeNews on the #NewYearsHonours list & linking it to Grenfell for political point scoring#Labour have lied on Universal Credit, Blue Passports, the Economy, & #Brexit in the last few weeksTime to start holding them to account 
Is Lord Adonis the ‘Luke Skywalker’ of Brexit? Possibly!  
#Brexit is what will benefit the establishment. It's a rouse to avoid the new tax laws the EU are bringing in the day after brexit is supposedly happening. #Remain 
My Brexit supporting, Tory voting daughter and her partner, both in their mid twenties bought their first home before Christmas. No help from parents. Saved, economised and didn’t listen doom mongering snowflakes. 
Did the Government get a solid and overwhelming mandate for #HardBrexit? Hell no! A half hearted majority of 4% should not be interpreted as a solid mandate.A soft Brexit (if not associate membership of the EU) is the least compromise the Gov can make! 
Yep..it's that simple...if you consider #Brexit is going to wreck our country economically, morally & globally the use #FBPE proudly..defeat the trolls ..it's working..Binding #FinalSay 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit & #Remain & save the Best Ever Deal rights & control! 
Most ludicrous BBC article of all time? "How Western civilisation could collapse" mentions Brexit (!) as a threat to the West, but does not mention Islam even once. It also blames the Syrian civil war on "climate change" and capitalism!   
Yes - certainly - welcome to any #lurkingleavers or #RemainerNow tweeters - or anyone who may be somewhere between. We welcome all to our discussions about the disaster that is #brexit. Always happy to have people help us #stopbrexit 
O-Neill is right. Adonis is having an 'aristocratic spasm' over Brexit. The Labour party (wrongly) is "increasingly distancing itself from its traditional grassroots base who arelargely pro-Brexit & siding with its more middle class remainer urban base"  
Also worth bearing in mind that British workers are currently entitled to do an 'Auf Wiedersehen, Pet' and go and work in any of 31 other countries in Europe.Unless Brexit was to go ahead. Then they'd be stuck in Brexshitland. Thinking of the workers are you? 
Gina Miller started 2017 with a groundbreaking Brexit victory. She ended it getting her way again  
People are already changing their minds 'cos we've been sold a pup. The increasing stridency of Leavers and their lack of any argument for Brexit means they know it too.   
Brexit is a perfect British situation. An outcome of corruption, the state scrambling to fix it without ever admitting it was corruption, hoping no-one notices. #dysbrexia 
My letter to The Times re @PCollinsTimes “Labour delusions about stopping Brexit” - not published!  
There are small companies all over the UK buying and selling goods and services all over the world, when you hear idiot politicians say we will be isolated after brexit they are talking absolute cobblers, everything will be fine. politicians don't understand how business works 
Congratulations to @nick_clegg on his knighthood - the father of Brexit!  
His letter was spot on; every word - not just the stuff about Brexit but also the dispicble behaviour of the idiot Grayling. 
Unlike the #Brexit supporting press barons who hide their money overseas.  
Britain's drive to turbocharge its global trade links after Brexit has passed a crucial milestone with more than 100 experienced trade negotiators hired to strike new deals around the world  
Liverpool away, Anfield a place I've dished up many wallops over the years. I'd play the big Muslim lad Salami with Vardy and get Hard Brexit Harry Maguire to kick it long. Grab a goal and do some tough defending. 1 nil to us, up the city! 
Lord Adonis resigned after describing Brexit as "a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump". This is the epic response from @nigel_farage 
Hi Rick, in the last week I've come across so many Leave voters claiming they made a mistake. Thank you for speaking out. It takes guts to admit you've made a mistake. Brexit is a fallacy, supported by the likes of Farage, Banks, Trump et al. Rich people with their own agenda. 
@remain_central @BestForBritain @Labour4EU Help us call out brexit lies- we are 80% there to fund this project.  Please can you support and RT to your followers  
I would argue she is no more ‘leading’ the country into Brexit than somebody who spills their pint in the pub is ‘leading’ their beer over the table and onto the floor. She is, at best, fumbling us into Brexit.  
Isn't science brilliant?More than 90% of uk scientists oppose Brexit. Our scientific research is world-leading in large part due to the soft power we gain from EU membership.If you like and value science, #StopBrexit! 
If #Macron really is the saviour of #Europe he wants to be, then he should say something to help stop #Brexit. ( my hope for 2018)         
It’s inevitable that Brexit (if it ever happens) will only be temporary. Of course Britain will rejoin the EU, just on worse terms than we enjoy now. This is the legacy of the brexiters, wreckers of our United Kingdom. 
Happy New Year, Jeffersonians. Thanks for keeping everyone in touch with the wonderfully innovative and rocking world of British manufacturing in 2017. Next year is going to be great. #Brexit 2019 will be better still !  
Great letter that sums up the Brexit shambles. We need more senior voices to be heard before it’s too late.  
At least ten records were set over the course of the year, including new highs for old people, women and ethnic minorities in work, defying claims that the EU referendum result would mean a jobs bloodbath... 
Our 52 MPs who voted against A50 were right; Brexit damages our country politically, economically & socially.All 6 MPs from Leave seats were returned at the GE; most with increased majorities.Here's hoping many more stand up for the good of the country in 2018. #StopBrexit 
The thread is even more bizarre than the original tweet. Brexit as social engineering, bringing about a laissez-faire paradise. Like that's never been tried before.  
What's in it for us is cheaper goodsThe EU isn't a capitalist or socialist club. It's a union which we can mould, formed out of bloodshed. We had control already & the problems the UK faces are mostly due to our policy. There's a reason the right wing are far more pro Brexit  
Adonis. Heseltine. Mandelson. Lloyd-Webber. After Brexit, the Lords has got to go next. 
Yes. Triggered by problems that have nothing whatsoever to do with the EU and that Brexit will actually make worse  Brexit is a 'nationalist spasm', says Adonis after resigning as infrastructure tsar  
Let’s pop over to #Brexit and see what’s happening...  
The UK’s drive to turbocharge its global trade links after #Brexit has passed a crucial milestone. @LiamFox has announced more than 100 experienced trade negotiators have been hired by @tradegovuk to strike new deals around the world#ThankEUGoodbye 
If the only way you can make progress is through lies and deception, you’ve already admitted you’ve lost the argument. No wonder they’re so desperate to avoid another independence referendum.~~#weegingerdug 
Clegg you are an utter failure...liberals are in tatters because of you....you were voted out of your seat.....you have lied about EU.....& now you & a bunch of other "has been" losers are trying to overthrow the result of a democratic referendum  why should we call you Sir 
How many of these young people’s future are you sacrificing by advocating the same Brexit as the Tories? Hypocrisy #StopBrexit 
UK Wages, Economic Output Rise Despite Brexit Concerns  
Most foreign investment comes into Britain because of our Single Market membership. Without that Britain will need some other means to attract investment. The Tory Right know what that is - low taxes on business & wealth, low regulations & low welfare.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
“If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children's generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction.”  
This is Neil.Neil believes that ppl who voted #Brexit are ‘coffin dodgers, dunces & paupers’.Neil also believes that we should accept lots of immigrants bc they will all be brain surgeons & save our lives.Neil also owns an old, grey wanking sock that smells of his chihuahua.  
It appears that Hard Brexiters see any economic decline as worthwhile collateral damage to “get their country back” and “take back control”. They are deluding themselves. Economic decline is a loss of control and the only thing they are getting back is another recession.#Brexit 
What Labour and Britain needs is a leader of the stature and integrity of Andrew Adonis. What we have now are opportunistic and self-interested charlatans who have so little honesty they can't admit that Brexit is a mistake.  
Useful that someone reminds the Lords of their lack of democratic legitimacy as they prepare to consider Brexit legislation.  
There is no such thing as a Brexit consensus. Brexit is division. We should be building a Remain consensus.  
'Demeaning, snobby and sneering'Brendan O'Neill on Lord Adonis and his description of Brexit as a 'populist spasm'.  
As I said before Christmas, once we get Brexit done it will be time to reform the House of Lords.  
Great summary of a great letter. Pls RT, and write to your MPs to ask them to respond. We are all watching the measured scrutiny from the rest of the House of Lords. Brexit is madness and we need to keep shouting it out. Thank you, thank you @Andrew_Adonis @LibDems 
I am offering the British people an in / out referendum, once in a lifetime. Gov leaflet to every household - leave means leaving the SM/CU  
.@Andrew_Adonis one of few political figures willing to work on cross party basis. Not compatible with #Brexit hardliners who dominate government. He should work with @LibDems to secure #ExitFromBrexit . 
Compare the reaction of the media, right wing Labour MPs and other members of the Establishment to:- The Russians possibly buying a few Facebook ads during the EU referendum Vs- The British intelligence services planning TO KILL the Irish Prime Minister 
They're denying us a #FinalSay referendum, so the local elections on May 3, will be our only chance to vote to express our opposition to #Brexit. EU 27 nationals can vote, so lets make sure pro-EU parties get the maximum support. It is our only opportunity!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Politician's resignation letter to Theresa May goes viral because it goes to the heart of Brexit  #LordAdonis h/t @robdgill 
To commemorate his contribution to Brexit, a dog shit bin in a Rochdale park is to be named after Nigel Farage in the New Year’s Honours list.#NewYearsHonoursList 
Surprised by the fuss being made over trolling of #FBPE. Did anyone honestly think this wasn't going to happen? We've got them rattled, and they want to bring down any attempt to get in the way of their Brexit fantasy.Let the trolls come. 
"You have got to realise the present government is supported by large numbers of people as opposed to Brexit as I am. How long will they remain within the tribe and loyal to the party?"  
The resignation letter comments from Lord Adonis on Brexit have struck a chord with Remainers and Leavers alike. People across the spectrum are fed up with the Tories’ incompetent drive towards an ideological, hugely damaging ‘hard’ Brexit for which they have no mandate. 
"We all have a duty to give our view," says Lord Adonis after the senior adviser to Theresa May quit over Gov't Brexit plans. He added "the British people are in charge"  
Lord Adonis thinks Brexit is an act of 'self-mutilation'.  No, uncontrolled mass immigration for decades is the act of 'self-mutilation'. 
Dancers, singers and awful politicians who enabled Brexit get honours over people who saved lives in the terror attacks and Grenfell disaster. #NewYearsHonours 
Adonis says he had to resign because a) Brexit bill is coming to the Lords that he'll be arguing against day by day b) the bail-out of the Stagecoach/Virgin 
Labour’s Lord Adonis quits as infrastructure tear because I’d Brexit. Who knew he was infrastructures tsar? No loss 
Our leader today is on the importance of the truth in the upcoming referendum  
Adonis: "Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall"Yes & beyond Whitehall too. The problem even pro-EU politicians don't see, yet some of us do, is there is no fudge to resolve it. Soft Brexit is a worse version of Remain, not a compromise. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I strongly support the Remain Labour MPs. Also Remain Tory MPs. I am not partisan on Brexit.I don’t like or trust the Labour leader 
I'd like a knighthood for not punching the dimwit who, on hearing my Irish accent, interrupted my brexit conversation with a friend in a cafe to ask me 'whats it got to do with you?'. A display of unparalleled self-control worthy of a sir, don't you think? #annointyourselfaknight 
Remember, those who tout a "Soft Brexit" REALLY want us to remain. The ONLY acceptable Brexit is a complete one. 
Please read this article and Andrew Adonis’ letter and tell me why the Labour Party’s Brexit policy does not match it’s spirit and clarity.   
Disgusting and outrageous!! Tory MPs who backed Brexit are awarded knighthoods in “doled out favours” but the heroes of Grenfell Tower, Manchester Arena and London Bridge are overlooked and excluded. The system is broken!!! It must be fixed!! #NewsYearsHonours 
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  129, 543 Signatures for the #Brexit we voted for. No knighthoods for our leaders or those who inspired us with a mission for our country. They pretend to ignore us. RETWEET NOW! 
Lord Adonis, Government's Infrastructure Tsar, has quit citing Theresa May allying herself with UKIP & the Far-Right over Brexit. He called Brexit a "national spasm worthy of Trump" and flagship Brexit legislation the "worst in my lifetime" #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit #r4today 
BBC News - Ringo Starr says people voted for Brexit so "get on with it"  
A responsible government would be leading the British people to stay in Europe while also tackling, with massive vigour, the social and economic problems within Britain which contributed to the Brexit vote. Unfortunately, your policy is the reverse.  
Hang on, Ringo Starr has been knighted, despite supporting Brexit (and despite famously not being a very good drummer)? It’s almost as if Nigel Farage’s claim that he’s being denied a knighthood because of his support for Brexit is just self-interested, self-pitying whingeing...  
The government's become "hypersensitive to any criticism" which is a symptom of the "#Brexit malaise sweeping Whitehall", says Lord Adonis, who's quit as infrastructure adviser  
Macron had a good year. In 2018, he could even stop Brexit | Natalie Nougayrède  
NOW I’VE HEARD IT ALL!!! @BorisJohnson is cutting embassy staff outside EU to bolster representation in EU countries. ‘Global Britain’, therefore, is reducing its presence in emerging markets & other areas where Brexit is meant to increase trade! #r4today 
Andrew Adonis calling the Brexit vote "populism" is a brilliant example of missing the historical context under which the demos had no say in the ratification of the SEA, Maastricht, Nice, Amsterdam and Lisbon treaties. That is the accumulated driver for Leave winning. 
The Labour Party's founding principle and on-going mission is to fight for the interests of society's most disadvantaged. Brexit will hit them the hardest and longest and must be stopped. Welcome @Remain_Labour to the fight. 
Plenty of focus on @Andrew_Adonis’s damning words on May’s vision of #Brexit. I want to know more from him about the “full facts” of the Stagecoach/Virgin bailout which he claims could cost Grayling his job  
Devastating resignation letter from Andrew Adonis. Rightly argues that after narrow referendum result the govt should have sought a form of associate membership of the EU.  
Brexit Explained  
A good programme editor might commission a series of pieces over the next week to evaluate what Adonis claims about government - for each big department, is Brexit hobbling work on the day job?But no, Monday will bring us new trivia and spats.#r4today 
Lord Adonis interview. Is it my imagination, or are John Humphrys' chunterings about "the 17.4 million" becoming less and less effective as the full horror of #Brexit unfolds? 
4.7 million women got paid holidays for the first time because of the EU Working Time Directive. The Treasury predicts up to 820,000 job losses because of Brexit.  Left wing Brexiters should think about this if they want to leave the EU to protect workers rights.#Lexiters 
No idea what @Andrew_Adonis was on about, saying Norway regretted not joining EU. Most recent poll had 66% of Norwegians against membership & only 16% in favour. We’ll end up similarly grateful for #Brexit within a decade as EU’s 27 member states fail to agree reforms #BBCR4today 
It’s clear that even if the second referendum Adonis desires were held he would only want the result implemented if it went his way. #r4today 
Cytuno / I agree with Lord Adonis. There was no need to go for the most extreme, damaging form of Brexit. It’s populism and it’s ugly.  
John Humphries accuses Lord Adonis of saying Leavers did not know what they voted for. Of course that’s true - the present government divisions and backtracking shows that NOBODY knew what Brexit meant when they voted for it, least of all leave campaigners. #r4Today 
#LordAdonis live on BBC radio 4 Today programme:People in leadership have a responsiblity to speak out against Brexit.Tackle social problems and not break off all our trade ties.Brexit will make us poorer.Brexit has not happened yet.#StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit 
For any Brexit supporters marvelling at this, I'd just like to mention that the professor leading the work is a Spaniard working at a Scottish university, supported by  European Research Council funding.  
It is no coincidence that both “progressive” and conservative German economists are so worried about Brexit. They speak about rights, income inequality, peace (issues on which they are divided), but what really unites them is their desperate wish to sell more and more German cars 
About to speak, unmuzzled, on @BBCr4today on why I resigned - Brexit, bailouts of rail billionaires, nervous breakdown across Whitehall, attempt to suppress criticism from @NatInfraCom. Where do I start? 
"Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump."  
George was right to set up @NatInfraCom and he respected my independence. Mrs May’s government undermined it, sacking Michael Heseltine as commissioner for opposing Brexit & then trying to silence my criticism of Grayling’s bailout of Stagecoach/Virgin. So sad.  
Thanks Ben. We have huge job to do next year to persuade the great British people not to go with the Brexit fraudsters 
So the BBC have seized on the Adonis resignation as his anti Brexit message suits their agenda. No one has ever heard of him So two hours of drip drip #r4today 
Over the break Brexit is banned in my family as a topic of conversation says former Brexit minister @DavidJonesMP 
Hats off to Andrew Adonis for telling @theresa_may the truth about the madness that is Brexit and the continued folly of HM government in pursuing our exit from the EU 
Sorry, but after Adonis’ garbage on ‘3 month holidays’ for academics in the summer, I’m not celebrating his nice words on Brexit..... 
Theresa May's infrastructure tsar has quit, delivering a scathing verdict on the Prime Minister's approach to Brexit  
Remember when FTSE100 was up after Brexit, remainers said ‘the real story lies in the FTSE250, more British based, that’s hardly benefited from Brexit.’ FTSE250 is now booming, no mention of this from remainers and the Brexit effect. 
The Mail is spot on. I am indeed the ‘Brexit-hating Lord Adonis’  
I was delighted to read the resignation letter of Lord Adonis. The criticisms of Brexit therein are completely justified. They needed to be expressed. So tragic that any adverse comment is dismissed by Brexit supporters without any consideration whatsoever of its merit. 
I’m a remainer who will not use the #FBPE tag against my name. Brexit is a huge colossal mistake, but I will not form temporary alliances with Blairites or Tories. The priority for me is overturning austerity and Jeremy Corbyn at No 10. 
Time to remind ourselves that the referendum was about a Tory leadership struggle. It was a travesty of democracy in which an ill-informed xenophobic electorate were manipulated by unscrupulous politicians and toxic anti-European billionaire press barons. 
The battle has only just begun! 2018 is the year the British people realise that Brexit is a dangerous populist fraud.  
BREXIT BOOM: UK to TURBOCHARGE global trade links as HUNDREDS of key negotiators hired  
This is a brilliant thread on journalism and Trump - and it applies by analogy to Brexit  
Bernie's not at all most popular.  Moving to reglular campaign, he has a lot of skeletons that would have come out.  Only plus he had is being male. A lot of this campaign was a hate referendum on women. Including in media, unconsciously. 
Brexit infecting government, says Lord Adonis  
Brexit is a political class distraction, the real demon is capitalism itself,not the EU. Debt, poverty, food-banks, inequality and lack of decent housing, has been put on the back burner, as our political class wallow in their own Brexit bullshit. Which they created. 
Those of us who’ve tracked the Rise of the Right in Europe (Farage and Hannan agitprop) since 1999 would describe Brexit as classic Falangism - a movement which walks across parliament and becomes the state, its media and its message 
The past 12 months have seen continued Westminster cuts and the damaging impact of a Tory Brexit - but the SNP has chosen a different path and delivered for everyone in Scotland.  
Farage and the Brexit bullies are just humiliating us. We should stop this now and walk away. #FinalSay #FBPE #stopbrexit 
Since the inception of the modern democracy and the end of Empire Britain has demonstrated two great national traits. The ability to defend our island and managing decline. Post Brexit, both these traits will be in high demand. #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Iran before the 1979 referendum.  
Lord Adonis quits government role with Brexit attack."If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children's generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction.” - Adonis to May.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
How long before another Jo Cox? This time it's Lord Adonis. Just another traitor String him up* tweeted someone who goes by the twitter handle of *nice guy in blue*. This isn't just an odd instance. This is Brexit Britain. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
My advice to simply ignore or laugh at Brexit Ultras - those who believe in Brexit at any cost, including no deal - seems to have annoyed some of them. Odd, as they've ignored at least 48% of the electorate for the last 18 months. 
Wales is going to be hit really hard if #Brexit happened. So many areas blighted by Thatcher shutting coal mines have been subject to EU investment and regeneration. Then there's farming. Again, Wales will be hit badly if the UK quits. #StopBrexit #FBPE #FinalSay 
If you sell services to the EU, Brexit will be a double whammy.Not only will losing Free Movement of Services make it extremely difficult for you to sell your services there, if you DO manage it, the loss of Free Movement of Capital means you'll get charged more from your bank 
When is this going to stop? There never was a mandate for Brexit. There was an inept effort to quell Europhobes, which failed. It unleashed the bile which was the reason to quell them in the first place. Like The Fog, fascism comes on little cat feet. But it doesn't just move on.  
Spanish information war "experts" admit to British MPs they have "no evidence" of Russian meddling in Catalan referendum. After they'd spent months scaring Spain with tales of Kremlin referendum-meddling bots [ignore wacky muzak]  
Lord Adonis quit as the Govt infrastructure tsar because Brexit is a "populist & nationalist spasm worthy of Trump". The English Brexiteer tweeted that he is a traitor. Fat Cat responded with a gif of Adonis being hanged, which English Brexiteer retweeted #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
My experience is Brexit has given people permission to be more hateful 
Hats off to Adonis for stepping up against Brexit and calling it out for what it truly is. It's an embarrassment that we haven't seen much more of this sooner. Finally, the tide is turning. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
I am going to donate 1 million euro, err pounds (cheaper) to the first guy who can give a satisfying and logically consistent advantage of the Brexit for the UK as a whole. Corbyn & fans welcome.  
Was v taken by comedian’s description of the U.K. Brexit negotiation team as the kind of people who’d end up paying full price for a dfs sofa. 
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist  
#NickClegg #NewYearsHonours Lost the referendum, lost the election, lost his seat, lost his marbles.....give him a gong. #Lizillfixit 
Are you reading this @UKLabour and @jeremycorbyn? Your Conference was unanimously anti-brexit when it was allowed a vote. If you want power you need to listen and act. NOW.  
Nick Clegg is why people voted to leave the EU, Nick being awarded is why even more people would vote to leave the EU. Lord Adonis is why the House of Lords should be abolished. #Brexit happened because we are sick of these self serving parasites who think they no better. 
2/2In essence, the LibDem's arguments against Brexit have all been proved right. Yet LibDem's seem afraid of saying "We told you so". The party is far too polite. It needs to brag a little and distance itself from the Tory/Labour Brexit sheep.This ☟should be your argument now  
Record number of Irish passports issued in UK because of Brexit  
Andrew Adonis is absolutely right; as the ‘older’ generation, which millions of us are, we are guardians of the UK, and should be protecting its future health, wealth & wellbeing on behalf of our children & their children. Brexit: no impact assessments = no positive guarantees.  
By far the two best books I have read this year are ‘The Road to Somewhere’ by @David_Goodhart and ‘The New Minority’ by Justin Gest. Anyone seeking to understand Brexit, Trump and the growing rupture between politicians and the working-class should look no further.  
... you just couldn't make this whole debacle up ... #Brexit is the dumbest most misguided decision ever taken by a modern democracy being implemented by buffoons and conmen ...   
Just maybe there should be a hiatus on #newyearshonours until Britain rights itself from self destruction over Brexit thanks to many of the entitled who crave these honours. 
"If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of  our children's generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction." @Andrew_Adonis resignation letter: 
Dear Cult of #FBPE,Cheers for putting literally dozens of Leave voters in touch with each other today.Your efforts at helping build a grassroots network of dedicated Brexit defenders on Twitter has been truly outstanding.  
Lord Adonis: "Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty’s government.".Why is Lord Adonis alone in stating the hideous truth about Brexit and everything else that May's govt are doing to destroy our country? 
I lost the will to live after about four paras where he dismissed the biggest democratic vote in our country’s history in these terms:“Brexit is a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump”Adonis needs help.  He’s deranged.  
We now face 3 months of a Brexit phoney war as the EU prepares for P2 negotiations. Meanwhile the UK continues like a headless chicken towards oblivion. What could possibly go wrong?#stopbrexit #FBPE 
So Tories cosying up to Ukip over brexit match made in heaven Both have had leaders of mass destruction Both seek to reward themselves Both have shown complete arrogance and apathy for publicBoth get rich quick merchant s 
Strong words from Lord Adonis, another who has quit this Govts mayhem. Describes Brexit handling as “a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump” & accuses Theresa May of becoming the “voice of Ukip”  
There are surely millions who agree with Andrew Adonis: “A responsible government would be leading the British people to stay in Europe while also tackling, with massive vigour, the social and economic problems within Britain which contributed to the Brexit vote.”I am one.  
Lord Ashcroft's poll goes from bad to worse (for him). 66% of 76,000 voters want a #FinalSay referendum. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Lord Adonis quits government role with Brexit attack @UKIPNFKN @nickreeves9876 @BrexitBin @JamesMelville @JeanneBartram @BeamaBeorg @EUflagmafia @TheNewEuropean @kmqkatie @MarieAnnUK @BrexshitTrade @dontbrexitfixit @stop_brexit @StopBrexit17 @Mcr4EU  
“A responsible Government would be leading the British people to stay in Europe.”No, Andrew, we had a second referendum. We voted to leave - it was the largest mandate numerically in British political history.You are anti-democratic, out-of-touch and, frankly, classless.  
“Brexit is a nationalist & populist spasm worthy of Donald Trump” Andrew Adonis resigns from Infrastructure Commission saying what millions are thinking - Tory gov has become UKIP  
And more than likely Scotland leaving the UK. This senseless brexit must be stopped. #cancelbrexit #stopbrexit #FBPE #FollowBackProEU 
My new year’s resolution is no more Trump or Brexit tweets. Buts it’s not the new year yet, so - 
Incredibly frank, honest, accurate analysis. The full text should be widely reported. Brexit is dangerous, the EU Withdrawal Bill is the worst piece of legislation in his lifetime and the bailing out of Virgin + Stagecoach are dodgy financial dealings. Read this. 
Anti-Brexit Lord @Andrew_Adonis says Britain needs a “radically reforming government in the tradition of [Clement] Attlee” Here’s Attlee setting out why he’d disagree with Adonis on Brexit:  
Lord Adonis quits, calling May the “voice of Ukip” - @guardian.Brexit “a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Trump”. EU withdrawal bill “the worst piece of legislation of my lifetime” - @Andrew_Adonis. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. #TomorrowsPapersToday. 
Dear Prince Harry and Meghan,Signed: @realDonaldTrump #PrinceHarryAndMeghan #Brexit #UK #TrumpTrain #DrainTheSwamp #BuildTheWall #MAGA #POTUS #LockHerUp by #queengost 
BREXIT BOOM: UK to TURBOCHARGE global trade links as HUNDREDS of key negotiators hired  
When you switch from Black Mirror to the 10 o'clock news about Brexit and can't tell the difference.  
We need to #StopBrexit and stop the causes of Brexit too. Agree with Lord Adonis @Andrew_Adonis - this should be the Government’s priority, not a destructive hard Brexit:  
Well this baby boomer for one loves his kids. I want them to prosper & enjoy all the benefits that I have for the last 40 odd years. This poll, like the referendum itself, is utter, total and complete fucking arse. Lies, damn lies & YouGov fucking polls. 
This poll is attracting a lot of attention. Let Lord Ashcroft know if you want a second referendum & then RT.  
Brexit is proving to be a disaster and it’s time for a disaster recovery operation in the form of another vote.  I voted to leave and wish I hadn’t so anyone who voted against will you change your mind please. Mine was a vote against arrogant leadership not the EU was yours too? 
The answer which allows us to retain our democracy is ‘yes’ people have increasingly called for a second vote following fallout from the referendum and the negotiations. These wishes should be granted by the government or faught for by the opposition.  
It’s strange to me that the British public are watching Brexit like a soap opera. It will destroy country, yet we just sit back and wait for the next episode. 
If the #EURef result is not valid because 'the people were lied to' or whatever, joining the EU is a thousand times more ILLegitimate - the British people were not even asked if they wanted to join.#Brexit  
just a reminder, which the Brexit cabinet would prefer to forget or delete  
Julia, you seem to have been confusing objective facts with your subjective opinions. You seem to manage to do so all day, every day of the year. Maybe one day you'll manage to tell the difference between the two.  #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Brexit is falling apart. David Davis has effectively gone. Boris and Gove are keeping their heads down. No one wants it and No one will fight for it. It is like an embarrassing smell after Farage has left the room - because he has gone too. All over. Gone. Forget at will! xx 
These positions are not in contradiction.#21stCentury#LordAdonis#Brexit 
Lord Adonis resigns as a Govt adviser. Long overdue. His stance on Brexit is an obscene attack on democracy itself  
I'll be on BBC4's The World Tonight in a few minutes talking about the German view of #Brexit. The gist of it: we still don't really understand why Brits thought it's a good idea. 
"Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty's Government". Lord Adonis' resignation letter to the PM. Pulling no punches. Where are the other honest brokers? Speak up!#StopBrexit#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
10 people who have been driven mad by #Brexit 
"I'm picking up a hashtag captain!""On screen!""We are #FBPE. The referendum was advisory. Resistance is futile"  
Theresa May's infrastructure czar quits, lashing out at Brexit  
If only the Labour front bench could show this courage & stand against Corbyn’s irrational desire for a hard Brexit. #StopBrexit 
This Brexit headbanger and serial pollster (and poll deleter) isn't having much luck.  Will he “respect the vote”?  Of course not.  #fail 
"If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children’s generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction." -Lord Adonis, respected, non-partisan Lord resigns from Theresa May's government.  
It is “clearly in our national interest to remain a member of the European Union” … Theresa May 2016#StopBrexit #brexit #remain #bremain #leave #fbpe @theresa_may 
This, final in a thread, applies to Brexit just as much.  
I can’t decide whether Ringo Starr’s biggest crime is supporting Brexit or ruining side A of Abbey Road with Octopus’s Sodding Garden. 
Adonis's position was more or less untenable not only over Brexit but also after he accused transport secretary Grayling (not unfairly) of "fiasco" on East Coast line  
I thoroughly disagree with @Andrew_Adonis on #Brexit (and heated way he’s saying it) but can only admire his overall contribution to national life over many years. On education, infrastructure and vice chancellor pay, most recently, he’s advanced public policy. 
Lots of sniping from No 10 about Adonis personally.  Nothing on Brexit or rail issues he raised in resignation letter.  The PM always conveys through her spokespeople or personally a total lack of confidence in her case. Does she appear like that in Brexit negotiations? 
'Global Britain' - What a joke.Hopes, dreams and aspirations burnt on the altar of Brexit without the flicker of an eye. Solidarity @WeAreTheMU#WorkingInTheEU 
#LordAdonis is 100% correct. To call #Brexit "a #populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald #Trump".-Is the only way to begin to make sense of it.Then it joins #MAGA; #Afd.... 
LBC host Andrew Pierce BRILLIANTLY dismantles Remoaner for 'distorting' Brexit figures  
Adonis compared Brexit to appeasing Hitler among other things... explains why even most Remainers aren’t pushing his barmy letter.  
This is Lee.Lee calls himself a #Remainer but not a #RemoanerLee just tweeted me this Don't be like Lee.If you think it worthy, please Block Lee.I know I have. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll #Remain 
10 Bonkers Things Andrew Adonis Said About Brexit:  
Yet every American comedian had something to say about brexit.....lol I'm giving an outside opinion 
This is from Lord Adonis's resignation letter and it should scare you ... because he has access into the world of government. #Brexit#Brexiteers will say he is  scaremongering. 
Theresa May is the “voice of Ukip”, says her infrastructure tsar.Andrew Adonis quits as chair of National Infrastructure Commission over Prime Minister's management of Brexit #ToryMess2017 
Agreed. Not agreeing with a democratic referendum is a direct attack on UKs democracy. If Brexit is stopped then democracy is dead.  
Sad to see @andrew_adonis step down, but on Brexit he's right. May is caving to UKIP fringe and failing the U.K.  
Here's a laugh. I've been told today that 90% of the population support Brexit and we're just a Twitter bubble. Dream on. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
#LordAdonis' authorized version of his resignation letter via @guardian".#Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald #Trump...  I am told, by those of longer experience, that it resembles Suez ...”One for the ages..@Andrew_Adonis 
This woman wants a feminist Brexit, whatever that means, but remains stone cold silent of FGM, forced marriage, grooming, and mass rape and sexual harassment. She just referred to Cologne as if it were a wolf whistle on a building site.  
May this blue revolution bring lasting change for the Iranian people. The growing numbers of brave Iranians taking to the streets fills me with hope that this can lead to a referendum and ultimately the system of governance they choose. #FreeIran 
The arrogance of unelected peers, who’ve never won a democratic mandate in their lives, presuming they can set aside the referendum result, the largest vote for anything in our history.  Despise them 
Oh dear! The Queen of right wing jingoism and bile accuses the Remoaners of same! It's too funny for words, we've got them rattled, Brexit on a knife edge, can Brexit survive the humiliation to come? #stopbrexit #fbpe 
‘A responsible government would be leading the British people to stay in Europe while also tackling, with massive vigour, the social and economic problems within Britain which contributed to the Brexit vote. Unfortunately, your policy is the reverse.' My letter to the PM. 
Given @Andrew_Adonis 's personal interest & commitment to ensuring UK has right infrastructure for future, this will not have been as straightforward a decision as it might appear.His analysis of May's Govt & #Brexit, is, of course, accurate and incisive.#ExitFromBrexit 
“If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children’s generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction.”   
The resignation of Lord #Adonis is a classic Westminster bubble moment. It’s supposed to be a big deal but isn’t.He’s #Labour who are not in power. He’s a peer so unelected and once likened #Brexit to the appeasement of the Nazis in the 30’s!And he introduced student fees 
Full extraordinary @Andrew_Adonis resignation letter from Chair of UK infrastructure commission over EU Withdrawal Bill - “worst legislation of my lifetime” for a “Ukip allied Brexit ..fraught with danger” and “indefensible bailout” of East Coast Mainline:  
Also, if it's compulsory to vote (another Australian here) we get a more 'central' government, even though ours has skewed extreme right recently. In the coming elections it'll balance back out. Non-compulsory voting and you get Brexit and Trump. 
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that 
Britain's problem today is a crisis of political leadership. In my letter, I describe the PM as the heir of Churchill, Attlee & Gladstone. None of them would have led the country into something as damaging - and internationally dangerous - as Hard Brexit. 
I voted leave but given the hash that the government is making of it, our better option now is to stay in. At least when the facts change I change my mind. Unlike the ‘we’re leaving, get over it’ lot. #brexitshambles #brexit 
My mentor Roy Jenkins resigned as Labour's Deputy Leader when Wilson agreed Tony Benn's demand for a referendum...  
‘Remoanabore’ I know sticks and stones won’t break my bones but words and labels matter. Small issues like the border might be boring to you. To others it’s critical. The right to oppose Brexit isn’t boring. It’s a constitutional right. Which I and millions are exercising 
Surely Remainers wouldn't do this... Remain Donors Funnelled £1 Million to New Campaigns Set Up in Weeks Before Referendum - Guido Fawkes  
As we move further and further away from the original EU referendum, people are entitled to ask if they are being given what the Leave campaign promised.  
Adonis not just damning of Govt over Brexit. Also spells out compelling reason for Grayling to resign over East Coast/ Virgin bail out  
Adonis sounds frankly unhinged in his condemnation of Brexit. The one good thing to come from all this remoanery is it’s flushed out into public the anti-nation, anti-democracy contempt that has existed for too long in the establishment  via @MailOnline 
Lord Adonis to Theresa May:"If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children's generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction.” Hard to argue with that. 
#LordAdonis is a badly named whining Socialist remainer who has been trying to undermine the government on #Brexit for 18 months. #GoodRiddance 
Someone asked me what #FOFSHT stands forI began my answer with Brexit, but it's more than thatIt stands for not being a Muggle. It stands for fighting The Drumpf.It stands for reading some effing Orwell.It stands for Follow Orwell Fan Simon Hedges Twitter 
.And just imagine how Labour's lead would grow if the party opposed Brexit!. 
I listen every day to different opinions. I also get inundated with abuse every day almost ENTIRELY from people claiming to be Remoaners trying to stop Brexit. I am simply calling it out. Feel free to unfollow if you don’t like “facts”. 
“Brexit is a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump.” “Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty's Government."Extraordinary stuff from Lord Adonis. 
From Lord Adonis' resignation letter: "Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty’s government. I am told, by those of longer experience, that it resembles Suez and the bitter industrial strife of the 1970s ..." 
Andrew Adonis in his resignation letter says that Theresa May has "no parliamentary or popular mandate" for her Brexit decision-making  
A **Must Read**, especially for @UKLabour :  The Disastrous Brexit Plan You Knew Nothing About. Not a day goes by now when we don't get more insight into why we must all #TakeBackControl of the future of the UK and #StopBrexit  @Keir_Starmer @Labour4EU 
Please vote and retweet as to whether you want a second referendum on Brexit & follow @RemainerNow #Brexit #ExitFromBrexit 
Unelected Lord Adonis quits government quango calling #Brexit 'a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm'. This Remoaner cannot stop himself from insulting the British people.  
BBC News - Lord Adonis quits government role with Brexit attack  Good riddance you subversive socialist bore #LordAdonis 
“Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump.”No, @Andrew_Adonis, Brexit is democracy in action. No one likes a sore loser... #GoodRiddance  
I like @Andrew_Adonis and respect him. But his resignation as Infrastructure Tsar has been inevitable for some time. A lesser PM would have sacked him. But shame on him for this "Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump." 
2018 is the year that Brexit gets real and the year for getting real about Brexit. My latest blogpost just up: . H/t @jonlis1 @paulwaugh 
Hello Twitter! We are #RemainLabour - we believe Brexit can be stopped by the Labour Party. We are campaigning for a change in Labour policy, to support full EU membership, before Article 50 expires. Read our mission statement, share & please get in touch!  
Lord Adonis quits as chairman of the Government's National Infrastructure Commission because: Brexit is a "populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Trump". The Sun call it a *rant*. But hey, I thought The Sun liked Trump. Could see it as flattering 
"Brexit is causing a nervous breakdown across Whitehall and conduct unworthy of Her Majesty’s government." 
This is why it drives me mad when #Remain folk say "I respect the result of the referendum, but..."NO! Let's **NOT** respect the result of this flawed, unjust, undemocratic, fraudulent, shambolic & therefore irrelevant #Brexit referendum!!  
Lord Adonis 'quits government role' with Brexit attack  
BREAKING: Chair of National Infrastructure Commission - Lord Adonis - has resigned.Says @Theresa_May is "Pursuing a course fraught with danger" on #Brexit. 
Lord Adonis quits as Theresa May's infrastructure tsar over Brexit & East Coast trains bailout. Proud to call @Andrew_Adonis a friend. Speaks truth to power in his zinger of a resignation letter 
In the week after the referendum Remainers chastised ppl for noting the FTSE100 was doing well and said to watch the FTSE250 instead which wasn't. The FTSE250 closed on a record high today #DespiteBrexit 
The resignation of an unelected peer from some government quango because he disagrees with Brexit will have zero cut thru. If it registers outside SW1, it’ll be to reaffirm that the wrong ppl oppose Brexit 
I meant what I said in my resignation letter about the PM’s courtesy. Which makes it sad that ‘No 10 sources’ up to dirty tricks. Tomorrow’s Times will make clear why Hard Brexit plus Chris Grayling’s conduct gave me no choice but to resign. 
**POLL**Please vote and retweet for a larger sample.Do you want a second referendum on Brexit? #Brexit #EU #Remainers #LeaveEU 
“A responsible government would be leading the British people to stay in Europe while also tackling, with massive vigour, the social and economic problems within Britain which contributed to the Brexit vote. Unfortunately, your policy is the reverse”.   
Great letter from @Andrew_Adonis to 'the voice of UKIP' - "If Brexit happens, taking us back into Europe will become the mission of our children’s generation, who will marvel at your acts of destruction" 
It's good that Remain is now the majority voice in the UK, but only from the practical point of stopping Brexit.Even if only one person still believed that Brexit can and should be stopped, that person would be right. Facts don't change to suit the majority. 
' Brexit is a populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump ... by allying with Ukip and the Tory hard right ... you are pursuing a course fraught with danger' : @Andrew_Adonis I salute and thank you sincerely. What a brave, patriotic man of integrity you are . 
1/2 Sorry #LordAdonis has resigned. We should be building a #Brexit consensus not perpetuating/deepening division. 
Lord Adonis - Theresa May has become 'voice of UKIP' - #Brexit is a dangerously populist decision worthy of Donald Trump.#FBPE #StopBrexit 
Lord Adonis is quite right. It will be the mission of future generations to rejoin the EU. Brexit is a lost cause but they don’t know it yet. 
Like you give a damn about women’s rights, Nigel. I don’t hear you campaigning for a Brexit that extends our rights, jobs and opportunities, safeguards funding for specialist services and offers a place for those fleeing violence. Your argument here is pathetic.  
Except he does. He is complaining at decision “to rupture British membership of Europe’s key economic and political institutions”..  nothing “hard brexit” about leaving political union. Let’s not just, you know, spin.  
Well done @Andrew_Adonis on putting country before career. Hard Brexit the only priority this government has. Must be opposed 
Remainer Adonis’ exit ? As a democrat it is always good to have an unelected peer to tell the people  how their referendum vote was wrong and he knows better than over 17.4 million voters. Carry on Theresa and deliver for the people and their sovereign decision. 
No, Adonis does not say that Brexit lacks a popular mandate. He says that *hard* Brexit - i.e. one that "ruptures our essential European trade and political relations" - lacks a popular mandate. Let's not just, you know, lie. 
No. They voted against Theresa's Brexit means Brexit. That's why she lost her mandate and had to tear up her manifesto. 
Ouch....Adonis accuses Theresa May of becoming “the voice of Ukip in her Brexit policy." 
.@Andrew_Adonis says Brexit doesn't have a popular mandate. Er, he must have missed June 23rd. And yes he is an unelected peer...  
Commonwealth citizens were allowed to vote in the #Brexit referendum - a vote denied to EU 27 nationals & 16-17 years who had vastly more at stake. 16-17 years were denied a vote to appease the Tory right. An unfair, unjust, gerrymandered referendum!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Lord Adonis quits as chairman of National Infrastructure Commission over Brexit plans  
Labour peer Lord Adonis has resigned as chairman of the Government's National Infrastructure Commission in protest against Prime Minister Theresa May's approach to Brexit 
Liberals cry babies in the UK say the same about Brexit. Truth iswe're doing fine and looking forward to our exit.Just wish we had Trump as a leader. 
Adonis says Theresa May has become “the voice of UKIP and the extreme nationalist right-wing”?? And bizarrely claims Brexit doesn't have a popular mandate. (Yes he is an unelected peer...)  
If you wanna stay in the EU, theirs 27 other Countries that will welcome you #brexit 
Another Referendum isn't the way to go. Parliament needs to do its job: to stand up for what they know is best for the country, not for their individual parties, and put a stop to this embarrassment. 
#StopBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #Referendum2018 #brexit  the only good Brexit is #NoBrexit 
Perfectly put by Lord Adonis in his resignation letter #Brexit  
Lord Ashhcroft has a poll on whether people want a #FinalSay referendum.Let's give him a clear responsePlease RT#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
#MEK network in #Iran, reports: Protesters in #Qom demanded that the Mullahs should shame and leave the country alone and also shouting “referendum is what people demand” #FreeIran #RegimeChange #Reuters #AF #ZDF #Iran #News #CNN @AP @POTUS 
Lord Adonis - 'Brexit is a dangerous populist and nationalist spasm worthy of Donald Trump.Chucked his dummy out of his cot, big style !  
Corbyn is not the anti-Brexit figurehead I would have chosen. But he's the only one we've realistically got. I think we can acknowledge how far Labour has come while continuing to apply pressure for all it still needs to do  
Please vote and retweet as to whether you want a second referendum on Brexit:- 
I reject the result of the Scottish referendum. 
Have you got a spare fiver to help get a red bus on the road with the truth about Brexit, rather than a lie? Only 9 days to go for this to be funded, so please give what you can & share. #StopBrexit  @stopbrexit17 @Labour4EU @LibDems 
What’s next for Brexit talks? @D_Blanchflower has this analysis on Bloomberg Markets  
The idea of a path along the front is a good one. BBC News - Don't let Brexit talks 'mute centenary' of Great War, historian warns  
Remind me again about how Brexit was going to cause a financial apocalypse?  
The FTSE 100 has finished 2017 21% up on the day of the EU referendum. The pound is 9% down, having started the year 18% down.  
MPs have demanded that Facebook and Twitter provide details of Russian activity around the EU referendum last year  
More than £1 million of Remain donors’ money went to new campaigns set up in the weeks before the referendum  
All types of Brexit damage our NHS. @UKLabour cannot be the Party of the NHS and a party to Brexit.  
Record number of Irish passports issued as Brexit vote spurs demand  with #brexit & leaving the single market seeing Brits losing their free movement rights this is hardly surprising. If this is not what people want, they are allowed to change their minds 
Irish passports are in demand as U.K. prepares for life after Brexit  
#Brexit - Brighton University has received almost quarter of its research grants and contracts from the European Union since 2012 - ‘How Brexit will cost us millions in grants’  
WORLD: what would you like to order?2017: i’ll have a large covfefe for brexit.that comes with a free oj, right? 
1,000 negative brexit related articles in just one document with links. Absolutely brilliant piece of work. Please RT widely. Has anyone seen 1,000 brexit good news articles? Nope @BrexpatsAPPG  
Call 4 elections in Libya,on what bases? LPA not adopted yet by HoR? Salame proposal refused by SC?current Constitutional D not predicting new transitional P? draft Constitution pending referendum? a simple law by HoR? Call for Elections pure and simple today is fooling Libyans. 
From my limited first hand experience Brexit has, for first time in over a generation, engendered real sympathy in Irish republic for northern nationalists. Remarkable feat  
1. With GE, you can vote again after 5 years 2. GE aren’t permanent 3. GE results carry legal power; referendums carry none4. No GE has ever produced a government as bad for us as Brexit would be 5. No GE has ever been the result of so many lies  
Would you believe Boris Johnson if he told you today that Brexit would mean a huge boost to NHS funding?RT for largest possible sample.NB: in case you wondered, £350m a week would equal £18.2bn a year 
I never voted Remain altruisticallyor because I fully understood the EU, I just wanted to keep the freedoms & protections it gave me in 28 countries. What an educational experience it's been since then. Come on, own up, who really knew all about Euratom?  
Dear Brexiters,The young people of the United Kingdom have a few words to say about Brexit Britain.Starting with @Femi_Sorry.#OFOC 
Record number of Irish passports issued as Brexit vote spurs demand - 80,000 from N Ireland alone. Plus number of UK born registering as foreign born Irish doubles   
Record number of Irish passports issued as Brexit vote spurs demand  
The reunification of Ireland.Achieved by Brexit where bullets and bombs failed?  
Quarter of Labour voters could ditch party amid confusion over Brexit stance - poll  
Little damages our nation more than the Quitterazzi denying us the right to disagree with a democratic vote. Nothing damages our nation more than being denied the right to change our minds as we recognise Brexit is not in the best interests of our country.  
Whatever you might think, MPs have not assented to Britain leaving the European Union. That leaves the UK in dodgy legal territoryMPs did not properly approve Brexit—so the triggering of Article 50 was invalid  via @prospect_uk#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Record number of Irish passports issued as post-Brexit demand soars  
Wrapping up a talk on how the Spanish state censored the web during the Catalan referendum, arguably the biggest such internet censorship case in the EU so far #34C3 
Bloomberg’s 100 Best Photos of 2017Demonstrators wave Catalan flags while marching through Barcelona to protest against alleged violence by Spanish police during an illegal referendum vote on Oct. 3. Photographer: Angel Garcia  @angelgarciafoto 
Brexit will collapse under the weight of its own internal contradictions.MPs “have got to find the resolve to overcome the petty tribal affiliations of party politics to save the country” - @acgrayling.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE.  
Bloomberg’s 100 Best Photos of 2017A woman tends to her injuries in front of riot police near a school being used as a polling station for the banned referendum in Barcelona on Oct. 1. Photographer: Geraldine Hope Ghell  @GhellHope 
NEW POLL for FRIDAY 29th Given the state of things in #Brexit for the UK Should the UK still continue with #Brexit? Help #RecycleElectrons in order to #StopBrexit with the #FBPE 
REVEALED: Remain campaign spent DOUBLE the legal limit during EU referendum  via @Your Brexit 
Or capitalist vultures lick their lips at Bargain Bin #Brexit Britain, there's assets to be stripped! Reports @rmilneNordic 
In 2018 I would like to see the UK govt., lead on a big international issue which concerns us and others, bringing a coalition of states and actors together to solve a difficult problem in a new way. That would give lie to the view that Brexit has diminished the UK 
Why should anyone believe that Labour will move to a pro-EU stance, when there is precisely zero evidence to support that belief? Yes, support pro-EU Labour MPs, but Labour as a whole should be treated as pro-#Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Boundary issues: Brexit threatens to rekindle tensions in Northern Ireland  pic.twitter.com/h4Z4sL9Dsm 
Tonight @talkRADIO 7pm #Moats #CharlesHaughey #Ireland #UVF #MI5 #Pandas #Thatcher #Brexit #Trump #RoyalYacht Don’t miss it 
Nothing rotting in the fields in this part of Norfolk. And for your information I can not remember any kind of crop being left to rot. Also, our company, since Brexit, has been doing very well, thank you. 
.Even The Sun can't deny it anymore - Brexit WILL bring about a United Ireland & end The Union ¯\_(ツ)_/¯#HowzatForTakingBackControl 
Don't let Brexit talks 'mute centenary' of Great War  
Aviation and the European Common Aviation Area: what are the five options for an aviation deal with the EU after #Brexit?  
Unless the Tory rebels or the DUP vote to bring down their own Gov (which won’t happen) the next election will be post Brexit. Now talk to me about a long game again... 
Billionaires: Bamford (JCB), Barclays (Telegraph, the Ritz), Chandler (hedge fund), Edmiston (Subaru), Murdoch; Millionaires: Farage, Banks, Odey (hedge fund), Marshall (hedge fund), Hoare (private banking), Barbour (magazines). These people funded Leave. Brexit is for the elite 
The price of Brexit? Support for United Ireland SOARS after border talks chaos  
**VOTE & RETWEET POLL**Which is the only party in the UK currently fighting for a fairer #Brexit and representing the views of the 48%?#Brexit #LibDems #Labour #Conservatives #Remain 
Do you have experience in project management, , HR, fundraising for youth NGOs & want to work for oldest Federalist non-partisan youth NGO in times of #Brexit + #EP2019? @JEF_Europe is recruiting a new Secretary-General! Cc @Youth_Forum @EMInternational #jobs #Brussels #vacancy 
We've reached two new sections now. One called 'Duck's Bill', and the other 'Wibbling'. Maybe... maybe we deserve brexit? 
My favourite memory of the referendum was the 'Punishment Budget' says John Redwood  
People generally accept election results, so why are so many of us unable to accept the #Brexit referendum result? Because we see through the lies, disinformation & manipulation that resulted in a Leave victory.  We recognise our democracy has been debased & this is why we fight. 
I'd like to point out that every democratic country requires a supermajority for an important change from status quo. That's why this referendum was advisory, i.e. checking the opinion. The opinion was a very slight inclination to leave on one day. Not a democratic mandate. 
Tony Blair THROWS MASSIVE TANTRUM as Nick Clegg is due to receive a knighthood  via @Your Brexit 
Record year for Irish passport applications - 779,000 in total.  In the first full year since the Brexit vote, 20% of the applications came from the UK.   
Harry Hall voted leave but now he has realised the benefits of EU immigration and how vital it was to his business. Another #remainernow let’s have a #FinalSayForAll - Brexit: Leave voter realises his fruit farm empire faces ruin without EU migrant workers  
We already know that Remain used misleading state sponsored propaganda during the referendum. Now it turns out they may have cheated on an even bigger scale with funding too.   
Harry is a fraudDisregards #OBAMA threat to place #England “at the back of the queue” if they vote #Brexit &Like #Obama believes interfering in foreign elections TWICE is honorableObama sent to Israel a battery of political consultants, pollsters&funds to beat #Bibi#MAGA 
I've seen enough of #FBPE to realise that, once Brexit dissolves, we'll return to bickering over party politics.But, even if for a brief moment while our country faces its greatest threat for a generation, what a peace to be a part of. 
Before #FBPE there were large numbers of Remainers on Twitter producing excellent tweets who had very few followers. That has changed radically. #FBPE is a great success.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Evidence piles up that #JeremyCorbyn 's #brexit strategy will not help @UKLabour in the next #generalelection . A clear plan to #StopBrexit might, and not only in Scotland. @Labour4EU 
Mike, Labour is a pro-Brexit party (albeit less extreme than the Tories) and until (if ever) it changes that position it is just as much an opponent of the #Remain cause as the Tories. Our policy must be to prevent either Lab or Cons gaining a majority.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Dear @theresa_may Would you help a small business to profit from #Brexit by promoting our new 'Iconic' (not a) 'Passport'?Kind regards#RainbowPassport 
Schopenhauer has faux, pride-filled #Brexit fans by the balls. They are entirely vacuous with nothing personal to be proud of.#stopbrexit #FBPE 
This call from a Remainer advocating a second referendum descended into chaos when Andrew Pierce accused him of “distorting” figures about the UK economy  
An insight into the gritty mechanics of how a political negotiation slowly grinds forward (this from 'talks about talks' in NI the early 1990s). Reading this, it's hard not to have a degree of sympathy for anyone involved in either the Stormont talks or the Brexit negotiations.  
Beware the rise of #nationalism: This is no longer just about #Brexit, writes @Jon_Danzig in his blog. This is about what kind of country #Britain is to become. Please re-Tweet. Link to blog:  
From "we had a full debate on Brexit" to "you lost, get over it" in a few tweets.#Brexit arguments just don't stack up anymore, like any cult of faith all positions turn to fog when examined.Support for Brexit can only decrease#StopBrexit #FBPE 
#RETWEET & #SHARE: 17,410,742 Brits voted to #Leave the #EU completely @theresa_may, not half leave but to LEAVE do you UNDERSTAND #MrsMay..? We demand to #Brexit now! #BBC #SKY @daily_politics @Conservatives @ConHome #TORY #Conservatives #UK #EU #NEWS #ConservativeParty #Labour 
#Brexit's biggest blunders of 2017.  
Lying to obtain #British citizenship should be enough to get you deported.RT if you agree with this.#Brexit #ForBritain #LBCLIVE #skypapers #bbcdp #bbcqt #skynews #FridayFeeling 
Kenya's economy is larger than Bulgaria's.Africa's eighth largest economy Kenya seeks a post-Brexit free trade agreement with the UK.  … … pic.twitter.com/DPGpBVyF5K 
#brexit is a factor since uncertainty is bad for investment.  10 years ago GBPEUR was 1.02; it's above that now. Once again - the referendum move is not a major feature on a 10 year chart.   & as I & IMF (for what they're worth) suggest it was over-valued. 
The case against the #EU is clear and the intellectual case for #Brexit is overwhelming. How can the entitled elite justify their ignorance?  by TFA Council Member Rev Peter Mullen via @tfa4freedom 
UK to sink to bottom of OECD wage growth index in 2018.British workers to be worse off among wealthy nations as Brexit inflation diminishes pay, analysis by @The_TUC shows.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
(2) @MrBrendanCox urges UK readers to look beyond #Brexit and towards the retreat of liberal democracy in central and eastern Europe #underreported  
A recent British Council report identified Mandarin Chinese as the second most important language to learn, after Spanish, for Britons to master as Brexit approaches. French ranks the 3rd, followed by Arabic and German.  @OULanguages @PeterHorrocks 
Big Ben silently watches the year fade out as the shreds of prosperity whirl down the toilet pan of Brexit. Ms Leadsom still quiet as she stalks her prey, only sharpened teeth for weapons, blue woad on her face. Black pudding for breakfast, its bloody tang the keynote of our days 
Labour MP Graham Stringer tells LBC his party is "trying to have it both ways" on Brexit and "it’s a very dangerous position to be in"  
Jordan's economy is larger than Latvia's.  Former Jordanian Deputy Prime Minister Jawad Anani has said Jordan and the UK will start negotiating a bilateral free trade agreement after Brexit.  … pic.twitter.com/w9M5vfbm1X 
EXTORTION: EU passes EVERY law Britain's opposed since Brexit, costing UK taxpayers around £63m. Britain needs to leave right now. 
Brexit is a far-right driven project. Supporting it on the off-chance that you can turn it into something else at an unspecified point in the future, particularly when the right are in power now, is crazy. 
Holyrood will not vote supporting Brexit. The UK will press on regardless. The Nats will howl at the moon about the UK parliament ignoring Holyrood and the will of the people. Polls will still oppose a 2nd ref. Nicola Sturgeon's Groundhog day.  
Corbyn fails to rule out a second EU referendum  
24% of Labour voters could switch party by the next election because of #Brexit, a proportion which will undoubtedly grow when the 32% of Labour remain voters who believe Labour is “completely against Brexit” finally realise the truth.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Jeremy Corbyn has failed to rule out a second EU referendum if he were to become Prime Minister. What should Labour’s Brexit policy be?  
If there is a general election the best thing for Remainers to do is to aim for a hung parliament with a larger number of LibDem & Green MPs than now. And the way to do that will be to follow the suggestions made by #Remain tactical voting organisers.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Lies did win the EU referendum, lies on an industrial scale on everything from Blue Passports to the £350 M.Bizarre that anyone would deny this at this point  
Due to popular demand, we've created a real version of the #RainbowPassport - and they're now available to buy!Why settle for a digital meme when you can get a physical one to wave at leave voters?(All proceeds go to making The Brexit Comic better) 
Hey #Conservatives - how about a lottery to put Sprinklers in to high rise tower blocks? You can fund it by not going ahead with Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
In early 2018, we will file our new #Calexit independence referendum. It will qualify in the summer of 2018, pass at the polls in November 2020, and then an independence referendum will be held on May 4, 2021.California will become an independent country. 
It is not the SNP's job to save rUK from BrexitIt is the SNP's job to save Scotland from Brexit  
Be careful though. I am anti-Corbyn's stance on Brexit and consider it my right to express that within the dialogue of Brexit. I don't do that to sow discord among #FBPE, but because I don't believe we can win unless the opposition leadership changes its stance. 
Brussels passed EVERY law UK opposed since #BrexitGisela Stuart ‘Fact is Brussels already ignores our concerns & this will only continue if we remain answerable to #EU law.‘This is why we must take back full control of our laws & deliver a clean Brexit’ 
Guido Investigation: Remainers registered FIVE new campaigns in the month before the referendum, allowing them to spend an extra £1 million  
Thanks to #brexit induced inflation, UK will be bottom of OECD wage growth next year and workers will be poorer. It doesn't have to be this way. People can change their minds as new evidence emerges.  
EXC: More than £1 million of Remain donors’ money was funnelled to new campaigns set up in the weeks before the referendum, as the official Remain campaign approached its maximum spending limit  
Remain Donors Funnelled £1 Million to New Campaigns Set Up in Weeks Before Referendum:  
Countries are queuing up to sign deals with the United Kingdom post Brexit they said. Brexit would lead to ‘sunny uplands’ they said.Brexit wouldn’t cost a penny they said.All lies. Every one of them  
Thanks to brexit-inflation, UK workers will be worse off next year and worst-performing salary moves in whole of OECD. People are allowed to change their minds if they want @Open_Britain 
*Brexit Update*  
The Express AGAIN reporting what might be seen as negative #Brexit news. Ireland now more willing to take the financial hit of taking on NI. Unionists - time to #StopBrexit? 
Delighted to comment on Tory MPs daft plans for a new Royal Yacht Britannia Lotto & dragging us back to the 50’s - the 1850’s that is! Are they trying to distract us from the foundering of HMS Brexit?   
Meanwhile, in the alternate timeline where Miliband won in 2015, @charltonbrooker's new episode of Black Mirror, titled 'Brexit', is dismissed as unrealistic. 
Unlike the pack of lies promulgated by George Osborne's Project Fear in the EU Referendum campaign, the warnings of the Leave campaign that the EU was hurtling towards becoming a United States of Europe have proved to be true.  
11. A clue comes from the political developments of the past few weeks.They are predominantly anti-Labour, while often pretending to be Labour supporters.It's fertile ground for them, given the intrinsic dislike of Labour's Brexit stance for many.They're onto a winner here. 
7. Soon after #FBPE started a large number of new 'Remain' Twitter accounts began to appear - all identifying as #FBPE.Many of them were low quality, bot-like or programmatic sharers of other accounts' content. They just added noise. Others were genuine new anti-Brexit people 
6. 'Barry' wanted me to stop amplifying them. I guess I was perceived by someone as an 'influencer' whose retweets of and engagement with these people was inconveniently promoting their strong anti-Brexit messages.I will post our exchanges one day, but back to Fake #FBPE now 
Figures uncovered by Labour reveal civil servants are spending more than a million pound on a rival Brexit department.“What on earth is David Davis actually doing?” @JennyChapman 
Margaret Thatcher, you say? Heroine of the Brexit-at-any-cost contingent... Oh yes, her.  
Brexit cannot be considered the will of the people until we know which people from which country willed it upon us  
On R4 Today Farage MEP condemns “career politicians”(not him!) for lacking “clarity” & praises “plain speaking” Trump (ha, ha). Asked by John Humphrys if he would like to be in the Lords, Brexit’s plain speaking hero answered “ not particularly.” 
"The opinion polls, the Tory rebels, the Electoral Commission investigations, the stirrings within Labour… all of these things give me heart that Brexit can be overturned."   
We shall miss @giles_fraser. Not always right (cf #Brexit), he’s always stimulating & knows how to make religion interesting.  
.Brexit Means .... A United IrelandPolls on BOTH sides of the border now show majorities in SUPPORT of a United IrelandIs THIS the 'Taking Back Control' the Brexiters meant?. 
Clear from previous statements by @DavidDavisMP that he claimed QUANTITATIVE analysis was being carried out on sectoral & economic effects of Tariff/No-Tariff outcomes of #Brexit. Have seen Papers now - NO SIGN of quantitative analysis of #Brexit impact at all. Where are they?  
Only 3 countries will have negative growth, Italy, Spain & UK and we're the worst. Read the article and you'll see both @The_TUC & @CBItweets  both cite cause as #Brexit. And we haven't even left yet. Time to #TakeBackControl & #StopBrexit. 
The pound is 20% down against the Euro, Andrew. Before the Referendum, the euro/sterling rate was around 1.42. Today's rate is 1.12, so the pound has been devalued by slightly more than 20%.Jessica is exactly right. @JMPSimor 
Britain is set to have the worst real wage growth of any wealthy nation next year, ranking behind Italy, Greece and Hungary, according to analysis by the TUC. Real wages had finally started rising, then along came #Brexit. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Remember, we've already won the argument. It's accepted, even among Leave groups, that Brexit will leave us worse off. We don't need to keep having that debate with extremists who won't listen anyway.What we need now are numbers. Pure mathematical strength. [1/2] 
This article repeats 3 major flaws:1》It believes soft Brexit is possible, when it isn't.2》It only concentrates on British interests, not on the red lines of the EU.3》It misrepresents a Leave vote in a Labour constituency as a Labour vote to Leave. 
"British workers are expected to see their earnings decrease by 0.7% in 2018 when taking account of inflation..as a result of the pound’s weakness since the EU referendum, pushing up the cost of importing food and fuel" #stopbrexit 
Unfortunately #Brexit is sidelining Britain not just Davis...  
》Home Office admits it can't recruit enough staff to register EU nationals.》Each caseworker needs to process 1,500 of 3 million applications.》With 275 workdays left until Brexit, that means each case officer must process 5 APPLICATIONS PER DAY!  
Why bother with Labour in Scotland, what do they stand for? It was Labour who ensured zero hour contracts were reserved to WM. Labour is both for and against Trident, both for and against Brexit, both for and against a second independence referendum  
Brussels has passed EVERY law UK has opposed since Brexit vote  via @MailOnline 
Scotland’s vital food and drink brands must be protected after #Brexit. 
OK Owen, now do a forensic take-down of Jeremy Corbyn’s pre-EU referendum ‘support’ for Remain. - Are you attacking Remainers to fig-leaf Jez by the old ‘distract them’ ploy?‘Sir’ Nick Clegg? A true sign of how Britain’s elite rewards failure | Owen Jones  
What most infuriates about critiques of "hill & heather Scottish nationalism" is that this is *actual financial value*, in terms of Scotland The Brand. The logic of #Brexit needs to eliminate/subsume this. Good to see @Feorlean stepping up. 
Don’t let this fly under your radar. Trump wanted to be called Mr. Brexit for a reason.  
"ARRIVIDERCI TO ITALY’S PARLIAMENT" - Prepare for EU-rocking elections in 9 weeks. Anti-EU sentiments bubble & EU elites start worrying. Full story: #brexit  
Always remember:Labour have NEVER won a general election without taking Scotland.The only way Labour can get back into power now is therefore in a coalition.Labour Leavers have already formed a Brexit coalition with the Tories.All other possible partners support Remain.  
BREXIT:Remainers are quick to tell us that if we stay in the EU we can use our "influence" to improve the organisation. However, since the Referendum in June 2016, we have been forced to accept ALL seventeen EU diktats that we have opposed.  
This is about right. For Brexit to be cancelled, we almost certainly have to a) reach no-deal scenario, b) temporarily extend A50, c) have a referendum to confirm people want to abandon it. V hard to imagine Tories surviving a) then agreeing to c), but these are interesting times  
Nigel Farage, “Mr. Brexit”, attended  Republican Party’s convention, for Trump’s nomination and he brought is closest aide, an offshore investment expert who had boasted on the dark web of his global money laundering, including in the United States.   
The idea remainers can have a cup of tea and wait while Labour inch towards a principled position on Brexit is fantasy.This is a tug of war not a pre-ordained path to victory.They will shift only if they must: support for Labour before they get there = letting go of the rope.  
This sense of entitlement and perceived exceptionalism is what got us into this Brexit mess. Of course they want their tax bills cancelled.  
We need to change face of local government electing Green, Lib Dem,  Plaid,SNP and pro EU independents. Brexit IS a local issue as EU funds regional projects and opportunity #MakeMayMassive #FBPE 
The reality is this, Mike: Around 80% of Labour supporters want UK to Remain in EU. The vast majority of Labour MPs want the same. The Labour front bench wants hard Brexit. But it can't say that, because it's afraid of losing Remainers.So both statements are fundamentally true.  
Exactly what is the pound down 20% against since the referendum?  
Fake news, Leave lies, spending irregularities, produced a vote of 37% of the total electorate for Brexit. By what madness is Brexit even contemplated? Add the mounting damage it’s already causing: by what double madness is it still happening? 2018 is when we stop it. Fight on! 
#Brexit: Britain is set to have the worst wage growth of any wealthy nation next year, ranking behind Italy, Greece and Hungary  
The price of Brexit? Support for United Ireland SOARS after border talks chaos . The breakup of the UK probably not part of the Tory plan but the cost of pursuing Brexit with the will of the people argument.Brexit is destroying cohesion.#FBPE 
Brussels has passed EVERY law Britain has opposed since the Brexit vote 'adding £473.3m to the EU budget'  via @MailOnline @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
In November, with Senate Judiciary, HSPCI, SSCI, SC, and UK ICO closing in on the data operations of Trump and Brexit, Flynn-flipped, pleading guilty to lying to FBI. It was time to collect his SCL links in a thread. 
Tonight, while @MmedeBeauvoir was asleep, it started snowing here, so I put on my coat, used my phone as a torch & went for a walk around the grounds of our house in St Macaire, Listening to the animals in the woods, thinking how lucky we are, and how insanely stupid #Brexit is. 
After much deliberation on the 8th amendment the oireachtas committee recommend the referendum question to be on unrestricted abortion in the first 12 weeks of pregnancyThe first poll is in today's Irish Daily Mail reveals a majority to be in support:  
I'm about to lose it with all the well meaning anti brexit folk down south. Oh for the love of. When will you all come to realise, they're in it for themselves, they don't care, this is nothing to do with governing a country, it's to do with self. 
5) meanwhile nothing else is getting done.  The NHS, education, policing, public services, there's no time for these to be addressed because all the Government's time is being sucked up trying to square #Brexit circles.It just doesn't make any sense anymore#StopBrexit 
4) d) and finally, the #Brexit impact reports which had to be kept under lock & key read like a junior school project ("fishing tends to occur near the coast") with zero value& this is just the last 2 weeksThe UK is making a fool of itself, why on earth are we doing #Brexit ? 
2) b) our main representative in Europe, having got almost everything wrong previously, has been sidelined in #Brexit negotiations 
Mueller investigating Cambridge Analytica...this could get interesting for Brexit too... @helenyg @Hayleeee1848 @MatthewGreen02 @acgrayling @Hil67 @kmqkatie @LibDemPenguin @Kean1S @pickledpuffin @dontbrexitfixit @JeanneBartram @JoRichardsKent @jcm247 
Port of Rotterdam reveals scale of Brexit challenge.Double customs checks? Infrastructure that won’t be ready in time? May hasn’t thought through the impact of leaving the single market and customs union. #StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
Discontent among Labour voters over Brexit puts Corbyn under pressure to back second referendum.Time to listen to Labour voters and members, who overwhelmingly want to Remain in the EU.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
The Shady Money Man Tangled Up With Brexit, Russia & Trump#DemForce 
When Corbyn comes on Reel Politik we're not gonna ask him a single question about Brexit just to wind up all the most tedious people on both sides 
Theresa May's government holds back publication of secret files relating to creation of the EU  
Brexit: isolation is not an option - no matter what happens when we leave the EU, our future lies in the process of globalisation...  #Brexit .  
In June 11 , 2017, a referendum was held and  97% of Puerto Ricans voted for statehood! Thank you for our recovery wishes ! God bless 
the spiked crowd are coming out more or less openly as a far right group since Brexit.  
I voted Remain. I now support Brexit.I think that many people are fighting an identity battle rather than fighting for the EU itself 
If you are genuinely concerned about the NHS why do you slavishly back Brexit?  
Ok @CherylGillan as I seem to have your attention, what is your response to this? How can you possibly support Brexit when the consequences for all are so blatantly catastrophic? 
When Corbyn’s socialism includes Brexit, which it has done since the days of Tony Benn, and devastation for the poor, we are not of the same stripe #Brexit.  
The answer to the failed right wing ideology of Austerity isn’t a far left wing ideology & the answer to a Tory Brexit, isn’t a Labour Brexit. It’s pragmatism, uncool, unsexy, pragmatism. 
We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit  
Oh deary me, it seems another far-right leaver has had to delete his Brexit poll.... I was reading some of the comments on it earlier. They appear rather perplexed that #Remain keeps on winning their polls.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
FARAGE, like Banks is a Russian agent.  They are both going to jail, as wil @BorisJohnson @ @michaelgove if they are linked to the dark Brexit money.  Brexit is a Treason, a fraud, if @theresa_may does not stop it, she is also guilty of Treason 
The Remain campaign flouted Electoral Commission rules so it could overspend by up to £7.5million during the referendum  #Brexit 
Actually, it was only about 30% of Labour voters who backed Brexit. Many because of the NHS funding lie on the side of a bus.  
Not buying this at all, sorry @jonlis1! Also not in the market for: a majority of us being prepared to settle for a soft Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn exclusive interview. The Labour leader speaks to The Independent about the next general election, Brexit and what’s in store for his party in 2018  
Not really Dublin’s Brexit grab.  More a case of the great Tory Party Giveaway.  Good on Dublin might as well pick off the good stuff as little England flounders in the deep end with no water wings to keep it afloat  
Brexit hasn't happened yet.  
I belong to the Remain Party until Brexit is cancelled as the mistake it is. I don't belong to the Soft Brexit PartyPostpone Brexit Party, orFudge Brexit PartyThe EU isn't perfect. Let's work with our partners to make it better. Beats cutting off our nose to spite our face. 
Telegraph echoes Trump's "build a wall and make THEM pay for it" as they say it's "absurd" that France looks for UK contributions to increased Brexit Border controls:  
Meet ‘Posh George’: The Shady Money Man Tangled Up With Brexit, Russia, and Trump  via @thedailybeast 
Ironic, Conservatives like Heseltine, Clarke and Grieve are proving the most eloquent challengers of #Brexit. 
Brexit will collapse under the weight of its own internal contradictions, but left to itself, the process will involve wasted years and much damage 
"i want an exit from brexit'... It doesn't matter which party you support. If you're a remainer, sign! The RT.  #FBPE 
.Hmmm.....I hope you're right @jonlis1 but I'll keep kicking him away from the Brexit ciff-edge in case you're wrong. 
Facebook and Twitter confronted over #Brexit vote Tomorrow’s Guardian  
."Labour should respond to public opinion & back a 2nd referendum on EU membership, a Welsh [Labour] MP has urged.". 
David Davis lies about impact studies, Green lies about his porn, Fallon admits harassment, Stephen Crabb sends ‘explicit’ messages to a 19 yr old & lies, Mark Garnier calls his secretary ‘sugar tits’. All keep Tory whip. Heseltine tells truth about Brexit & must lose the whip 
Tory MPs call for new lottery to fund new Royal Yacht Britannia to 'showcase' UK after Brexit  
Important trend 1. percentage of @UKLabour voters who still support #brexit continues to decline2. Those that still do wouldn’t all stop voting Labour on that single issue 3. Other voters would swing behind #Labour if it opposed #Brexit  
34/ And the last year has shown all Brexit has really delivered so far is a divided nation, a deceitful Government and a country that is ill prepared for 29 March 2019. 
The Irish border plays a key role in the post-Brexit world. Here's a guide  
Because borders are notoriously only one sided.☞ France expected to make 'absurd' demand that Britain helps fund Calais border controls after Brexit' | via @telegraph 
All you need to know about #Brexit in 80 seconds.  
Don’t forget #supporting republic of Biafra freedom will help liberate Indigenous people of Biafra from facing serious dangers in Nigeria, and standing with IPOB will also help us stay on the right track for freedom to calling for #Biafra #Referendum  
Mac on Michael Heseltine and Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Laughable: "Taking back control"?It seems that a civil servant has replaced David Davis as "Brexit negotiator".  
This fascist Leaver, posted a reply to me and then blocked me before I could respond, so I thought I'd post the main photo on his profile. Leavers say they are patriots. This one clearly is not. #BrexitBetraysBritain#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Both major parties have been hijacked. Who has the courage to admit that #brexit no longer has a mandate? The people need to vote on the deal. If it's #Bremain then so be it. 
Brexshit the MovieComing Soon!!Laura Godfrey Isaacs speaking at the womens march london Jan 2017 on Trump and Brexitpic.twitter.com/Ad8L7XCKSX 
RT All 27 EU countries are asking this question @SkyNews @BBCNews @LBC @bbc5live #Skypapers #bbcpapers @itvnews @DailyMirror @toryboypierce #c4news #r4today #brexit @UKLabour @theresa_may 
Here’s a nice warm knob hat for all of the remainers & lefties to keep their heads warm. After all, there’s nothing going on between their ears is there.#Brexit   
Brexiteers argument that EU is ran by non elected officials up in smoke as non elected civil servant Oliver Robbins revealed as actually leading Brexit Negotiations and not @DavidDavisMP #yesofcourseyouhaveyourcountryback lol 
The result of the 1st EU referendum was based on emotional responses to lies and hunches. It was a non binding advisory vote on no details.As such, there should be a 2nd EU referendum on the final Brexit deal. This would be a legally binding vote based on the actual details. 
Facebook and Twitter could face sanctions if they continue to stonewall parliament over Russian interference in the EU referendum  
Is there only one man in this country with the guts to say it how it is? Well done #MichaelHeseltine #brexit will completely destroy this country. #StopBrexit 
I’d give my right arm for a decent Labour government. Unfortunately Brexit Labour isn’t the Labour I grew up with. RT if you agree 
Yes, there should be a second #Brexit referendum  
Graeme Souness thinks systems don't matter, players just have to do their job and the Arsenal players have to "stand up and be counted" tonight.Graeme also thinks that the music young people listen to today is "just noise", social media is for "cowards" and Brexit means Brexit. 
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  129,353 Signatures for the #Brexit we voted for. RETWEET NOW! 
This alone confirms why Brexit is one thing and one thing only: absolutely crazy.  Port of Rotterdam reveals scale of Brexit challenge  
Whenever a Brexiter says, “Brexit is the will of the British people” - this should not go unchallenged.The EU referendum was an advisory poll where 63% of the electorate and 73% of the population did not vote for Brexit. 
“A 2nd EU referendum? Er... no...er... maybe... perhaps... I’ll ask Len... definitely not... 100% yes... whatever Diane says... yes... no... I’m a weapons grade wanker... er... maybe... I haven’t got a clue... maybe... I’m @jeremycorbyn... I’m confused... and I always lie” 
FFS, there are 65 million English people, only 5.5 million of us Scots.How the hell can they blame us for their crap?We pay more into the Brit treasury than comes back to us!It is time to leave the corrupt, xenophobic, Brexit voting English electorate to themselves.#indyref2 
It's very clear: Remainers voted to Remain at the EU Referendum; Remoaners are Remain-voters who refuse to accept the democratic verdict of the EU Referendum result. 
As economists become more & more optimistic about BREXIT so vocal remainers become unwisely desperate in claims & comment.  
**Your updated reminder that stopping Brexit is minority view**"Stop Brexit = closest to your view"Con voters 5%Working class 10%Pensioners 11%National 16%London 16%Middle class 20%18-24 yrs 22%Scotland 23%Lab voters 27%Lib Dems 30%Remainers 33%YouGov Nov 29-30 
Tory MPs propose a £120m lottery for a new Royal Yacht. The kind of costly & wasteful piece of national self-glorification that characterised badly run banana republics in the mid-20th century.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
The absolutely comedy of Brexiters being upset that business is relocating because of Brexit. What did these idiots think was going to happen? They expected unicorns & instead got turkeys. Idiots. Absolute grade A idiots.  
Brexit still feels unreal. The government isn't building anything. No new port infrastructure, no lorry parks, no customs posts, no ANPR cameras, no new systems. Not even plans or budgets for them. It's as if no one thinks it's really going to happen.  
Well, of course, one of the "Bad Boys of #Brexit" is a convicted money launderer in America.  
“Brexit would never have happened if Clegg was still in government after 2015!” 
It's a real shame 2017 is probably going to be remembered for Trump getting into power, Brexit, Ariana Grande Manchester arena terror attack, London bridge attack, Spain terror attack, Grenfell Tower fire, Harvey Weinstein. Here's hoping for a more positive 2018 
Not much point in having a poll if you only want Leavers to take part? Let’s have a proper one. We could call it a Referendum. 
So, the much-promised sunlit uplands of brexit future will in fact be a return to the desolate wastelands of the 70s.People, I think those wealthy brexiters  have been lying to everyone.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
If we stay in the EU, we will have £20bn per year more to give to our NHS. Let's quit Brexit and support our NHS instead.  
This is what is wrong with #Britain today.RT if you agree.#Brexit #BBCnews #Christmas #skypapers #itvnews #skynews 
The World Cup of Shite ThingsTHE 2017 FINAL - PENALTY SHOOTOUT coz it’s a DRAW.Who (or what) do you think is most shite?RT if you think BREXITFAVOURITE if you think ORANGE MARCHESYou have until 8.30pm tonight#wcofshite pic.twitter.com/yp8j2MFEjO 
Of course, in the case of #Brexit there was no need for online conspiracy sites, the lies and disinformation were spewed out by the right-wing tax-dodging billionaire press and right-wing politicians. 
The wisdom of Gracchus applied to Brexit:“I think he knows what Brexit is. Brexit is the mob. Conjure magic for them and they'll be distracted. Take away their freedom and still they'll roar.”#StopBrexit 
The best-case Brexit scenario leaves the average family £2,600 a year worse off.I wonder: how many average families currently manage to save that much from their income each year?Or half that amount?A quarter?  
Last time I looked, French ports are on French soil...The Times: France will demand that Britain pays for new customs infrastructure at its ports after Brexit. 
Exactly. Does no one in parliament have principles anymore? If #Brexit is wrong, it doesn’t become right just because some people have unpleasant & misguided views about immigration amongst other things. Stop the electoral calculus now & fight for what is right.  
Police report for judge lists over 100 Catalans for possible referendum charges  
Here’s another regretful #leave voter & #remainernow - Anthony described it as naive optimism that led to his #leave vote, maybe that’s because @BorisJohnson & friends pretended #brexit would be easy & not ridiculously complex! Anthony It’s not too late to #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Goldman Sachs picks Dublin for asset management unit... . Just another 6,000 jobs leaving the City. Plus all the firms that service Goldman Sachs. Don’t know why the Daily Mail is complaining, surely that’s what they have wanted, mad Brexit.#FBPE 
Heseltine should be lauded the length of the land for speaking truth unto the People & putting country before party...more than our deceitful, lying, autocratic Govt is doing in its blind pursuit of a ruinous #Brexit..#FinalSay 2018 #StopBrexit 
Yes, there should be a second Brexit referendum:- A majority would now vote Remain. - A majority now think the 2016 result was “wrong”. - And 50% vs 34% want a final deal referendum.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
Many of you will be familiar with this story and the poems Michael quotes here, but this bears re-reading in the light of Brexit's implications for Ireland.  
I say it again - If you support #Brexit and think that the country is still behind you, you should not be scared of a second referendum on the deal. If you are right, you will win. 
In the New Year, the Government will set out its plans for our post #Brexit immigration system. This could be our chance to end indefinite immigration detention for good. Add your name to send a message to @theresa_may:  
Clarity on Labour leader's position on #Brexit means that Labour won't be opposing Government's line on leaving the #EU or giving voters a decision on terms. Jeremy Corbyn: Labour will not support a second Brexit referendum  
Also.....We pride ourselves on being a compassionate nation, but we are failing some of the most vulnerable children in our society because of the @jeremycorbyn relentless support of Brexit.  
The honours lists calculated snub to brexit supporters will only go to increase the support out there on the street. Remain are the gift that keeps on giving  
Uh -oh.Went digging on Brexit -launder biz, Upsilon, & got an unexpected hit.I have some new Qs:1. Why is FRMT Ltd. (insurance & risk management 4 fraternities) in the offshoreleaks database?2. How many people R involved?  
A positive #Brexit story! After weeks worrying that we would suffer abuse if we spoke German in public (wife Austrian), on two occasions shop assistants enthusiastically broke into German to offer assistance. Heartwarming. Obviously #FBPE folk .... 
It's really pathetic how many twitter Remainers go on as if lies had won the EU Referendum, instead of the EU, for decades, taking a path the UK could not follow. Some (Lord help them) may even believe that's true.  
James Melville is absolutely right. Traditional UK politics is no longer fit for purpose, the new technological age has challenged the way democratic processes operate & Brexit and other international elections have been undermined by hidden influences. New approaches essential.  
But they - and indeed Leave voters who are revaluating as the Brexit facts become clearer - must be given the opportunity to reject Brexit altogether and choose Remain, not just ‘settle’ for soft Brexit which, even if least worst, is still not a patch on Remain  
I am #Europe. And #Brexit will never take that identity away from me. #EU loud and proud!  
Do you want to #stopbrexit? Me too And it is possible - but very difficult Can only be done if a 2nd referendum Will only be a 2nd ref if a clear public demandSo all who want to stop Brexit need to persuade as many fellow citizens as possible and to do so urgently 
As a young person, all I have to say about this is...Bollox! Bollox! Bollox!#Brexit is not an era of opportunity, it is stealing opportunities from us.It is damaging, it is divisive, it is dangerous.Corroding our national pride and destroying years of work towards tolerance.  
Hard Brexit - who will really gain? Surely not those promoting it? That would be corrupt wouldn't it?  
Despite the overwhelming evidence that Brexit will make the many poorer and the few richerYou are full steam ahead with BrexitAnd everybody's laughing at you  
BREXIT: It’s all about looking on the bright side, you see.  
Brexit: Corbyn is playing a clever long game that could benefit us all  
The underlying problem is the lack of vision. Brexit is being approached as an exercise in damage limitation rather than as an opportunity, writes @DanielJHannan 
Yet more proof that Labour cannot be trusted with #Brexit, or to follow out the directives of the British people. Jeremy Corbyn fails to rule out second EU referendum if Labour gains power  via @telegraphnews 
Check their tweets:some #Remainers  never attack the Tories for #Brexit but only attack Labour. Curious in that it was Tories who called EU Referendum,Tories who misled Voters&Tories who R in Gov't.Using #Brexit 2unfairly attack Labour#NewYearsResolutions read between the lines 
#Brexit: SNP calls on Labour to keep UK in single market  
#MerkelThe murderer of Europe.The childless mother who brought terror to our homes.The bringer of rape and downfall.#merkelmussweg #EUmussweg#abmerkeln#Brexit #Nexit #Orban #AfD #Kurz #ÖVP #FVD #PVV#EUisTheProblem 
Will 2018 see Fence-Sitting Corbyn forced to declare on Brexit?If he declares FOR Brexit ---- he loses votes!If he declares AGAINST Brexit ---- he loses just as many votes!!If he stays on the fence he looks like a spineless fool!!!Happy days.  
Dublin's #BREXIT GRAB: Goldman Sachs 'moving London hub to Ireland' after Britain leaves EU…  #News #Politics 
THE First Minister is preparing to publish a key document setting out a fresh economic case for independence, as expectation grows of a referendum before 2021. 
A row has broken out over chocolate prices after the SNP blamed Brexit for “bombshell” cost increases despite its own support for a sugar tax and a clampdown on unhealthy foods.  
Oh dear, oh dear!Workshops for children to ensure that Brexit is seen as "the beginning of a new era of opportunity"These posts have been deleted due to protests.#StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit 
This enthusiasm for the EU and contempt for #Brexit shines through the reported decision by the liberal establishment to give a knighthood to Nick Clegg. A knight is meant to be a defender of the realm. Such words could never be used about Clegg.  
Jeremy Corbyn fails to rule out second EU referendum if Labour gains power  
Yes, the Leave campaign funding billionaires, disaster capitalists, will take their profits & blame the EU. Recession following Brexit will make poor poorer & UK will lose influence on the world stage. All people who know warn us. Man in pub holding Daily Fail ignores #StopBrexit 
The overriding impression we got from people we spoke to was that #Brexit was a lousy idea but was now unstoppable. This is very depressing. Outrage at the usurpation of an opinion poll was muted to non-existent.#StopBrexit 
Meet "Posh George," the shady money man tangled up with Brexit, Russia and Trump  
Yes Labour is anti-Brexit, but Corbyn isn’t!  
It matters because Monday June 27th 2016 was the first day back in America after Team Treason finalized their “social media targeting” with Russia and Cambridge Analytica, plus complicit U.S. media executives, in Scotland right after #Brexit  
ICYMI: 25 Labour MPs write to Philip Hammond, demanding the release of Treasury's Brexit impact assessments.  
A fantastic betrayal by Corbyn. Run out the clock to 2022, assist & abet the Tories in trashing the country meanwhile - it’s time the PLP left him & saved the country from Brexit & the madmen of left & right alike. 
Trump/Brexit providing enough blues to last a few generations 
No, Universities will be less able to make scientific breakthroughs because of Brexit - as academics have consistently warned. Blaming 'safe space' culture (which related to Students' Unions, not Universities) is a smokescreen.  
He also added this piece which is one of my favorites and builds on crowdsourced journalism on @Patribotics - that the social media hack of America was finalized in Scotland the day after Brexit. @TeaPainUSA found damning evidence here  
The cabinet on #Brexit delivery.It’s awful.We are paying for this.We will pay for this.#MontyPythongoverns 
Do we need a £120 million yacht to "showcase post-Brexit Britain"? Instead, I propose a video montage including: long, winding queues at food banks pensioners flicking the V's across the channel arseholes proud of their blue passports, but not using them to go anywhere  
Just imagine how bad he thinks brexit might get, for him to say that...  
With a heavy heart, Tory grandee, Michael Heseltine, is effectively saying that voting for Corbyn / Labour is a better option to serve the national interest than a Tory-led Brexit.All credit to him. He cares more about his country than his own party.  
UK, YouGov poll:Labour (S&D) VotersStop Brexit: 63%Proceed with Brexit: 22%#Brexit 
David Davis has been seemingly sidelined in the Brexit negotiations. His former permanent secretary is now in effect running the negotiations. What a #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Emmanuel Macron to demand Britain pay for French ports after Brexit  
Patrick Blower on the fortunes of the Brexit Secretary  - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
You only have to look at Macron’s plan to see the trouble Brexit Britain will be in.  
My saboteurs amis , I love you all , for your courage , wit , stamina,  intelligence , patriotism & stunning saboteurness. I don't CARE what your politics are as long as we stop brexit first. Register to vote & vote for pro remain and let's make 2018 our year . #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Sitting on a plane for a reason that isn’t to film documentaries for the 1st time in ages. I’m going to Japan on me holibobs. I’m so excited. It’s been so long I’ve forgotten how to holiday and will automatically start interviewing people on the street about Brexit once I arrive. 
Brexit Britain enjoys fastest business growth since 2015  
A promising sign: plans being made by the government’s Department for Transport for airports etc make no mention of Brexit. They know it’s not going to happen. 
Meet ‘Posh George’: The Shady Money Man Tangled Up With Brexit, Russia, and Trump - Nigel Farage sidekick George Cottrell boasted about money laundering and was busted by the FBI in July 2016 
I can't help thinking that Hazza and Megan Sparkle shouldn't be inviting a Man to their wedding who went out of his way to threaten Britain during the Brexit vote("If you vote to leave the Eu...when it  comes to trade with the U.S.A. you will be at the BACK OF THE QUE!")#obama 
Posh George: A Shady Money Man Linked to Brexit, Russia, TrumpThe indicted Farage aide who attended 2016 RNC & has ties to money laundering banks: Cyprus' FBME, Catalonia's BPA, Russia's VTB & Alfa [FBI probing Trump links] →just cut a deal w/FBI#Maddow  
This is unbelievable. Please examine this data @afneil @montie @DanielJHannan @IainDale @NickFerrariLBC.  Time for HMG/the opposition to set out a new deal - funded by an exit from Brexit.  Source here:   
The sensible thing would be a second EU ref with what we know now. More democratic and empowering. And I'll point out to euroskeptics, you also campaigned for a referendum on membership. Us remainers deserve the same. 
NEW POLL for Thursday Given the state of things as they are now  Should the UK still continue with #Brexit? Help #RecycleElectrons in order to #StopBrexit with the #FBPE 
“Supporting Brexit will destroy UK. Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories” - said Tory MP. Time Tories put our country…BEFORE THEMSELVES 
How has the UK government performed during the #Brexit negotiations? Do vote and retweet for a larger sampling.#Brexit #Politics #Poll 
Scottish Independence Referendum Poll #scotrefAlmost 2000 people voted in this poll on when a new Independence Referendum should be held.76% of respondents voted Scotland should have a new #indyref prior to the uk leaving the European Union on 29/3/19 
What pisses me off more every day is the 48% who voted Remain in an Advisory referendum have been completely ignored. We barely get a mention from anyone in Government & they think we'll just shut up and go away, no chance. 
UK, YouGov poll:United States of Europe by 2025Support: 19%Oppose: 81%#EuropeanUnion #Brexit 
I am a @UKLabour voter but Brexit is bigger than party politics and so I’ll vote for anyone who’ll stop it. Tell your @UKLabour buddies this simple fact. They will lose unless they #StopBrexit #FBPE #WeAreEurope 
The big question we have to ask ourselves here is what do we hate more, (insert party/politician here) or Brexit.. Because I'm more anti Brexit than anything else.. I would vote Tory if I thought they would abandon Brexit. 4/x 
Corbyn: “We’re not advocating a second referendum.... we are formally leaving the European Union, of course, and that is the position”Theresa May doesn’t need to pick a new No.2 to replace Damian Green, she’s got Jeremy Corbyn already. 
I'm just going to leave this here.I will never vote for a party that supports a Brexit designed for the few. Oppose it or you will never get my vote again.#StopBrexit 
Michael Heseltine row: Remainers and Jeremy Corbyn supporters join forces to back Tory grandee in Brexit row | talkRADIO  via @talkRADIO#StopBrexit #FBPE 
For me in 2018 there are 3 priorities generated by @theresa_may’s Brexit policy:1. Fight her tooth & nail #A50Challenge #Stopbrexit 2. Campaign for EEA membership3. Prepare to leave the UK, reaquire EU citizenship & campaign to rejoin the EU#FBPE 
**THREAD**What is the most iconic image of Brexit from 2017? Post in Reply below to create a thread and 'Like' your favourites. Whoever posts the top image at midnight on 31st Dec will win a signed copy of @albawhitewolf's book 'Adventure in Europe'! #FBPE Please RT! #StopBrexit 
John Redwood supports Brexit, but - in his private 'commercial' life - advises clients to move their money out of the UK. No discipline from his party.Michael Heseltine doesn't support Brexit, makes statement on people changing votes. Complete outrage from party.  
Pete North is interesting: underneath a veneer of careful rational argument, there is a seething mass of anger and resentment. For example, he thinks the devastation which he argues a no-deal Brexit would wreak, would be good as it would cleanse the country of its moral faults. 
2017 marks the first full year of covering the reality of Brexit. I took a look back at the year's biggest Brexit moments, through the lens of Britain's popular press 
Labour had no choice as good democrats to genuflect to 2016 Brexit vote & back Article 50. Now public opinion has moved Labour's way. Time for 2nd vote. 
There is no need for a “Royal Yacht”. But there is a need for a state of the art Clyde-built “State Yacht” called Britannia to sail the seven seas showcasing us, our language, our culture, our expertise. And our determination to make the whole world our Oyster post #Brexit 
So they *do* want public to pay for the Fantasy Trade Yacht Britannia - fortunately now just public who want to take part. But seriously - our Govt are overstretched with Brexit & crisis but they faff over Big Ben's gongs, blue passports & royal yachts: 
Brexit really is the gift that keeps on giving  
Even the Remoaner CBI is having to eat its own Christmas cake and accept that Brexit Britain is outperforming its own gloomy forecasts! 
I wrote Article 50 – and I know this government can reverse Brexit if it wants to 
I watched some of Corbyn's many speeches - online, they mostly weren't shown on TV. They were the best, most intelligent and nuanced pro-EU speeches of the referendum campaign. 
Project fear was wrong about Brexit as UK looks set to overtake France. Centre for Economics and Business Research also says Brexit "fears were exaggerated"  via @telegraphnews 
Looking back on 2017 - can’t help but feel that Scotland is destined to suffer with Brexit - while Ireland benefits from it - precisely because Scotland has never managed a clean break with British imperialism. 
Remain groups coordinated messaging, campaign plans, data, materials and donations during the referendum, causing them to overspend by £7.5 million - more than double the legal limit:  
Remain campaign flouted Electoral Commission rules so it could overspend by up to £7.5 million during the referendum:  
Follow Back Pro EU #FBPE is not to be sneered atIt's a wave of people across Twitter determined to stop Brexit, it's cross-party because brexit is biggerDenigrating it's followers only shows its growing power.Join us add #FBPE to your profile so we can find you#stopbrexit 
‘I will not put any party before my country.’ Peers get ready to scrutinise Brexit  
Britain’s manufacturers are struggling to keep up with orders  
RT if you agree that @Nigel_Farage deserves a Knighthood for services to his country.#LBCLIVE #skynews #Brexit #Bluepassport #Christmas #FarageOnLBC #Farage #bbcdp #bbcqt #BrexitDay 
New post: The impact of Brexit on UK asylum law: part two  
Interesting front page of the Mail in Belfast today. Wonder if this consequence of Brexit made the English edition?  
BBC News - Heseltine 'should be sanctioned' for Brexit comments "Tory MP Daniel Kawczynski, a Bow Group board member, said: "His lack of respect and loyalty towards the Conservative Party is deeply regrettable."Haha, comical. #hypocrisy 
UKIP Brexit spokesperson still struggling with simple concepts like travelling with ID card rather than passports. Glad that they are not in charge of the negotiations. And I thought the Tories were bad.  
France is asking the U.K. to pay for new French customs posts post #BREXIT. If France wants new Customs posts they should damn well pay for them themselves. @UKIP  
The Tories created - and are now implementing - Brexit.Removing the Tories from office is a necessary precursor to dealing with Brexit.Attacking Labour does not help remove the Tories from office.What part of this argument is hard to understand? 
If @HaiderAlAbadi’s failure to talk to the #KRG continues, and if he “refuses to comply by the #Iraq|i Constitution, then any demands for the implementation of the [independence referendum] are more than justified.” #SupportKurdistan @WashTimes 
Brexit is already improving our international status (not).   
This thread demonstrates exactly why Brexiters (Tory & Labour) are so desperate to avoid a second referendum. Because they KNOW they would lose now that their lies have been exposed.  
An explicit request to all MPs: have you read the #HMTreasury analysis? If so, why are you still supporting Brexit? If not, why not?Please RT this & tag your MP today & keep doing so until we get an answer.@CommonsEUexit @UKLabour @Conservatives @HouseofCommons #FinalSayForAll  
Things that won't get you kicked out of Tory party:- lying to parliament- gross incompetence- using the n word- jacking it at workThings that could get you kicked out- having a sensible opinion about brexit  
In 2018 I hope the masks drop and people see the real agenda behind Brexit  
Want to trigger a Remoaner? RT the latest #Brexit news...- FTSE 100 climbs to record high after Xmas break- YouGov poll shows a 9 point lead for leave voters- CEBR admits it was wrong to say UK economy would slow down. Now predict we’ll overtake France by 2020. 
Great video from the Department of Trade on what having the freedom to do our own deals means and how it will help our economy prosper.Building a country #FitForTheFuture#Brexit  
#Tory Legend #NormanTebbit calls #LordHeseltine a "Backstabber" & should be “kicked out” of the #ConservativeParty & “if he doesn’t resign he should be sacked!” for trying to derail #Brexit, urges @theresa_may to withdraw the whip.   
SNP invites opposition leaders to summit to fight hard Brexit.Cross-party talks called to help safeguard membership of single market and customs union.Labour needs to stop sitting on the fence and oppose Brexit. #StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
I voted Labour in the snap election. Despite having my admiration for your personal efforts in the fight against #Brexit (thank you!), the #Libdems will have my vote hereafter unless the #Labour leadership establish a clear position of ACTUAL opposition. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Peter Shore, a fine socialist and arguably the greatest leader Labour never had, arguing passionately for a No vote in the Common Market referendum in 1975.  
The Europhile peer has been a constant critic of Brexit, and was sacked as a Government adviser in March after leading a Lords rebellion over Brexit  
If large numbers of people have changed their minds on #Brexit then I see no reason why a second referendum can't be a real option. #FBPE 
“ATTENTION!I ‘rule out’ a 2nd EU referendum.I’m quite happy that I was a lifelong EU sceptic, betrayed my principles by voting Remain, undermined British negotiations, nurtured a purposely opaque @UKLabour policy on the EU & lied to our core voters on #Brexit.I’m an idiot”  
Let's be very clear on this. We *will* #StopBrexit. The people have seen through the lies and turned against it.But we won't do with Corbyn's help. For all that his apologists' claims he's softening his stance, he himself continues to be clear he supports the Tories' Brexit.  
"Project Fear" Architect Now Thinks Brexit Will Have "Limited Impact" On UK Economy  
Yes, but there is no greater betrayal of ‘leave voters in the Midlands and the North’ than Brexit. Labour must confront cynical populism not pander to it!  
Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds .  Exposed for the lying fakes they are. No credible policy’s, just shamelessly vote harvesting from the gullible. @BBCNews Fancy running this story @bbclaurak ? 
68% of Scottish public now back Remain. SNP should lead in demanding halt to brexit not a powerless 'soft ' brexit  
"It's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled" - Mark Twain #Brexit  
Anecdotes that happen to precisely fit political outlook of the storyteller are not reliable evidence. Several robust survey data sources suggest views of imms in general, and EU imms in particular, have become more positive since Brexit. Among Remainers *and* Leavers.  
The FT today: UK output is now about 0.9% lower than if the country had voted to #Remain in the EU. That's almost exactly £350m a week lost to the economy. It's what #Leavers promised would be available to the #NHS if we went for #Brexit. It's time to #StopBrexit. 
It's going to be a "Jobs first" Brexit apparently.Which is akin to a "nature first" napalm strike on an animal sanctuary.  
In conclusion. A Trump loathing anti Brexit pro Labour Bishop critices Trump and the BBC thinks this is news. It's not - but it is further evidence that the BBC needs marginalied and unhooked from Licence Tax. 
David Davis sidelined as civil servant Oliver Robbins takes over #Brexit negotiations  
There's hope for 2018 in the fight against Brexit.  
Yes. And those “leaders” used lies and stirring hate to achieve what they wanted, capitalising on the suffering of even more people. One reason why I will never respect the result: there simply isn’t anything to respect about a referendum conducted in this way.  
Surge in support for a United Ireland in the Republic. Even with a negatively worded question. Undoubtedly an impact of Brexit process. via @ireland_thinks 
If you failed to predict Brexit or Trump's victory, this pessimist's guide to 2018 and beyond is required reading, Written with the help of Bloomberg's crystal ball.  
UK must pay for French ports after Brexit, Macron to tell May  
In order to get themselves a #BrexitTaxHaven the tax-dodging billionaire press barons & their right-wing Tory lackeys have whipped up the demons of nationalism & xenophobia, cynically & deeply dividing our country.They are criminals. They are traitors!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
The highest honour for any Remainer a full scale attack from the Daily Mail. Heseltine is getting to the establishment big time. Thank you. God’s speed in destroying Brexit.#FBPE 
Labour need to show courage. Yes, many Labour voters voted for Brexit, but it’s Labour’s *job* to convince those people that Brexit is not in their best interests.Don’t fear losing votes at next election. Fear losing votes forever for not doing what is right for the nation.  
Brexiters spent 40 years trying to sabotage Britain's place in the EU, pressing British governments to adopt confrontational bargaining postures which would make it difficult to build coalitions with other EU countries.We owe them no loyalty. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The way this Brexit is being handled is a afront to parliament, to law, to democracy. It is also embarrassing. And bad. 
Heseltine is of course right to point out that a government only lasts 5 years while #Brexit is long term and irreversible. Which is why it is criminally irresponsible and a betrayal of the country to treat a 37% advisory referendum vote as a Brexit mandate.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Tory MPs show allegiance to the alter of privilege & ignorance of suffering caused by austerity. 50 of them pushing for a new lottery game - to scrape money from the poor & deliver it to the Royal Family in the form of a yacht - because Brexit!?? #NastyParty #BrexitShambles 
If the best and most persuasive argument for 2016 and 2017 was for me to get behind Brexit is to "get over it", then I have little hope that 2018 will bring any more of a persuasive argument. I will continue to campaign to #Remain until we do, or I start the campaign to #Rejoin. 
A similar point, incidentally, could be made in the U.K., about certain politicians who pretend to be on the side of “the working man”, and the utter dud of a pup they sold them in the form of Brexit 
Emmanuel Macron 'will force Britain to pay for the cost of setting up customs posts at Calais after Brexit' . Exactly what the French said before the Referendum.Brexit is getting dearer by the minute.#FBPE 
Mr Davis @DavidDavisMP and Mr Hammond @PhilipHammondUK are both in possession of documents detailing the effect of Brexit on you and your future. Do you think they exist and if so their contents are: 
As we come to the end of 2017 it is clear that Brexit is hurting Britian. It has already cost the economy around £350 million a week. That hurt will continue costing the economy even more a week in 2018 unless we #StopBrexit 
The twitter rage & disowning of family over Brexit is entirely one way. Not one instance of a leaver showing the same intolerance, disdain and anger towards relatives who voted remain. The Left Liberal outlook : authoritarian, self absorbed, infantile.  
The vile, hateful abuse meted out to Lord Heseltine and the 11 Tory MPs who rebelled suggests that the Brexit zealots are fast becoming as intolerant and potentially dangerous as Islamic extremists. 
About time those unelected bureaucrats took back control of Brexit  
#Corbyn must LEAD on Brexit. He needs to lead the nation away from this Brexit catastrophe and leave the Tories holding their toxic baby. It's a massive opportunity for #Labour. Do they have the courage the will, the ability to pull it off? @ChukaUmunna @LordCFalconer 
If you're a Tory calling for Hezza to be expelled you've gone bananas. He and Stop Brexit crowd had bad year. It's happening. Be magnanimous 
People like Ed Sheeran and voted for Brexit. You can't trust people, Jez  
“Take back control from unelected bureaucrats in Brussels” and give it to unelected bureaucrats in London.#Brexit  
.@MollyMEP hits nail on the head here. Either Davis lied to Parliament and must resign, or is guilty of dereliction of duty and must resign. Brexit is failing miserably enough as it is. He has only ever made a bad situation worse.  
Labour voting Brexiteers are starting to realise how they were shafted during the GE, buying the lies of Fantasia & ultimately putting Brexit at risk. #PennyDropped Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds  
The ‘let’ in this headline is beyond Brexit.  
I wonder how #Tory Remainers can look at themselves in the mirror knowing a maj want to #Remain & live with the disastrous future they're consigning us & the UK to. They shame their calling they betray us. #FinalSay 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit. 
NEW YouGov poll: Labour faces a greater political risk among both strong and wavering supporters if it is seen to be supporting Brexit. Constructive ambiguity on Brexit must end in 2018 - clarity is crucial.  
Pressure mounts on PM to withdraw Tory whip from Heseltine over ‘disloyal’ Brexit comments.Tory grandee Lord Tebbit even questioned his former colleague’s loyalty to his country adding he should now be banned from the Conservative benches in the Lords  
The route to a change of heart by Labour on Brexit is through local elections.A Labour Party that is haemorrhaging Councillors to Pro-EU parties at a local level will change course at a national level.Support your local #fbpe party candidates 
Lord Heseltine is a bigot on Brexit says Stephen Glover  via @MailOnline 
Time for labour members to realise leadership needs/uses them rather than listens to them. Jeremy Corbyn denies claims Labour's Brexit stance is 'confusing' as he rules out second EU referendum - Sky News 
I've voted Labour all my life, I'm a Labour Party member and I won't vote for them if they remain unopposed to Brexit. I will transfer my vote to whichever party clearly says it will try to prevent this fraudulent, monumentally stupid act of national self-harm. 
Wake up, Mr Corbyn: ‘Labour needs to move from ambiguity in 2017 over Brexit to clarity in 2018.’  
The SNP want to take action to avoid a hard #Brexit - but will Corbyn join? 
PLEASE withdraw the whip from Hezza...it will show - yet again - what a vile party the Tory party is...and it will get Hezza really going over Brexit. He’s been restrained, measured in his comments up to now, but just wait!  
Lord MacPherson, former Treasury chief and architect of Project Fear, says  Brexit will not be so harmful.  Is his change of heart to do with all time high Stock Market @ lowest unemployment since 1974 
Good to hear Corbyn has finally seid ; a second Referendum is not needed as the vote has now been accepted.That should shut up all those running around with the silly acronym; FBPE. 
Pressure mounts on PM to withdraw Tory whip from Lord Heseltine over ‘disloyal’ Brexit comments  
EU's PLANS FOR 'UNITED STATES OF EUROPE' go down like a lead balloon across northern EU.  Full story from #Brexit Santa & his elves at Facts4EU:  
Senior Tories call for Lord Heseltine to be kicked out of party over Brexit remarks 
The vulture capitalists who funded Brexit are now circling, waiting to pick Britain's carcass. #StopBrexit via @FT 
HMG Treasury Brexit analysis. The analysis finds that the annual loss of GDP per household under the three alternatives after 15 years would be:£2,600 in the case of EEA membership£4,300 in the case of a negotiated bilateral agreement£5,200 in the case of WTO membership 
Jeremy Corbyn: "We’re not advocating a second referendum" - but the Lib Dems are.  
Well said Lord Tebbit ;Strip Heseltine of whip for Brexit jibes, say top Tories  via @MailOnline 
Labour should end its pro-Brexit stance & join @TheGreenParty and others in a cross-party campaign for a ratification referendum.  
Brexit taking good jobs from London to Dublin  
Things we will have to accept  this year so we can focus on important stuff:1. May is probably better than the alternatives in the Tory party.2.  Corbyn is pro Brexit3. Trump won't be resigning or going to prison before 20204. Creme Eggs will be in the shops from today. 
Another gem from @DavidDavisMP & his secret Brexit impact documents: "There is a concentration of fishing activities in coastal towns". They've really thought hard about this. 
A @YouGov poll shows that a quarter of @UKLabour voters could switch party if they continued to back #Brexit. Two thirds of those who voted #Remain said they would be disappointed or angry if Labour said it would proceed with Brexit. 
The top secret Brexit impact documents revealed - "Electricity is a fundamental part of modern society". However much we are paying this people, it's way too much.  
The Centre for Economics and Business Research has said it was wrong when it claimed that the economy would slow down after the Brexit vote. Is this more evidence against Project Fear?  
SNP lays down olive branch to rivals in bid for soft Brexit  
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist, So...1) Davis lied, is in contempt of parliament so must resign2) Davis is telling truth, guilty of dereliction of duty so must resign3) Davis continues fucking up #brexit 
Yesterday, Michael Heseltine, a Tory Grandee of the first order, said that a Corbyn Government would be less damaging than Brexit. I agree, but don’t remember a senior Tory ever turning so decisively against his own party. 
Corbyn, the leader of a democratic party, dismisses a 2nd referendum. He's a Leaver. His views couldn't be more 1975 even if they were sung by Don Estelle and Windsor Davies. (HT @hendopolis) 
It does not make sense to vote Labour if you are anti brexit. There is really only one choice if Remain is your driving criteria. Leaving the EU is a major derailment that will affect generations in an already indebted nation that can ill afford it.#StopBrexit#VoteLibDem 
Nigel Farage joins Boxing Day fox hunt?I would expect as much from #Farage I wonder if #Theresa joined him? "84% of the population oppose #fox hunting" Soon 84% of the population will oppose #brexit when they realise it is equally cruel and obscene  
I bet most Americans following the data story here don’t realize Cambridge Analytica’s regulator is investigating them (SCL) in the UK. I also bet they are being less than cooperative there as well. Trump and Brexit are linked thru SCL Elections Ltd.  
Many voters could spurn Labour unless it abandons equivocation over Brexit. If he wants to be PM, @jeremycorbyn must heed Remainers  
Not a snowflake’s chance in hell of Australians voting in a referendum to change section 44- just obey our law   #auspol 
As we are on the cusp of the 8th year of #ToryAusterityUK is bottom of wage growth league in EU, but only mid table when it comes to EU immigrationNOT to do with #BrexitEverything to do with AUSTERITY4EVERThe Tory Dogma of Punish The Feckless 
2017′s final injustice is that “The Forcefem Discourse” is a legitimate and tangible thing that is going onPerhaps it is just a cute, queer thing on a website and it is not a life-or-death Referendum On Transness 
Ditch Corbyn.Win an election.Stop Brexit.Stop Austerity.  
Good☞ Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds 
The U.K. parliamentary election was a historic own-goal. Conservative PM Theresa May called an election 3 years early thinking she’d massively expand her majority & instead *lost* that majority thanks to Brexit despite running against a Labour Party led by Jeremy freakin’ Corbyn  
In the GE17 campaign, both Tories & Labour avoided talking about Brexit. but @nick_clegg gave some startling figures from an HM Treasury Impact Assessment, published before the referendum. No-one headed, It is wanton self-harm, but oh! the tuition fees.  
Hard thread to read.Logically I know we need to make it easier for #Brexit regretters but understand the pain of EU citizens who were thrown under the bus by the 52%.Don't know what to say  
#BritNat Tory MPs have urged the Government to create a new Royal Yacht Britannia to “showcase” post-Brexit Britain after Labour decommissioned Royal Yacht Britannia in 1997.Would you buy a ticket? 
Last couple weeks I'm getting a lot of new followers like this. No pic, ordinary Irish sounding names or genetic international, no followers, usually no tweets. But who they follow? Almost all the same "lefty" Irish.  I'm suspicious. Something gearing up for #Repeal referendum?  
“Seventy Labour councillors from south London have signed a letter to the shadow #Brexit secretary Keir Starmer, urging a shift in the party's Brexit position.”#LabourFail 
- None of the concerns that people voted leave for are being helped by this Brexit. - The worst off will be hit hardest.- Nobody could have possibly known quite how badly this would go. We were promised it would be easy. 29/ 
Heseltine 'should be sanctioned' for Brexit comments  
This does not mean “accepting” a soft Brexit. It is not being disloyal to discuss the SM+CU. It’s about making sure the very worst and most damaging options are off the table for good while also trying to stop Brexit.  22/ 
We have to be realistic - Brexit might happen. Denying this possibility doesn’t help, and it doesn’t help mitigate the damage to our friends and families it will cause if it does. 20/ 
If Brexit is stopped, and I hope it is, it wouldn't change my opinion about independence. The fact that Scotland COULD so easily be dragged down a path it didn't choose is reason enough for me. 
Thank you I'm glad it's not just me  And honestly because all brexit has caused is loads of annoyance and stress and I don't see any benefits at all to it and it's been on my mind for a while to say something but was only now I decided too say anything  really  
God help us. The sooner Labour supporters realise this guy is a disaster for our Labour, the better. He is, quite simply, a disaster, on #Brexit , on anything. We are doomed under this bloke   
These are the figures that actually matter @afneil @IainDale @NickFerrariLBC @SirSocks @DanielJHannan   Mismanagement by UK politicians - not by the EU.  And the position is only set to get worse with the inflation and loss of FDI that will come if Brexit happens.  
Seems to me Mike that between the Tories and Jeremy Corbyn @jeremycorbyn we have the choice of a Blue Brexit or a Red Brexit. All my fire is focussed on no Brexit. That is ehere my vote will go. 
Goodbye @Uklabour it was nice voting for you but you have turned out to be as stupid as the Brexit Tories. If @jeremycorbyn really wanted to protect British jobs and workers rights he support a second vote on Brexit. Forget #Labour. Together we can still #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The amount of resonance that this tweet found caught me completely by surprise. I'm saddened by the number of people whose family ties have been put under severe stress by Brexit. I hope people can find ways to patch things up and find common understanding before jt's too late. 
We now know that the  “counter  insurgency” techniques honed by the British Army in Africa were used in  Ireland. This is a history of the British State and it is no accident it’s being destroyed at this time, at this moment:  #Brexit pic.twitter.com/AmCRD86DQ0 
The Brexiteers are trying to destroy the rights of the British workers and they are using Brexit as the vehicle to achieve their aims. The people that voted Brexit have been betrayed and lied too. Time to take back control and #StopBrexit 
Brexit boost for Theresa May as German foreign minister calls for bespoke deal  
Corbyn and McDonnell haven’t been opposing Brexit but trying to capitalise on it to fulfil a lifelong dream of an independent, socialist UK, further to the left of even EU social democracy, and now they’re being found out.   
Jesus wept-just when you think #brexit Britain has lost its ability to plumb new depths of embarrassment it does it again. Tory MPs want to set up lottery so desperate poor people can fund the new royal yacht to impress foreigners so they sign trade deals. @christopherhope 
Ok, stop the vote. I actually did something much better: I offered to take a photo of him & his 7 friends with the sunset. When I took it, I said “Everyone say ‘Brexit’.” Oh, and I’ve had another cocktail. Natch.  
These are my, ahem, “nieces”. They come from Germany to visit me every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013. According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, they won’t be able to after #BrexitDay b/c they don’t have passports. They’re my only family. Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas 
YouGov poll  poll shows "a quarter of Labour voters could switch party by the next election and more than half would oppose Labour backing Brexit." Anyone surprised? Hugging May close on Brexit not very appealing @gabyhinsliff @jennirsl @Kevin_Maguire @Andrew_Adonis 
Decision time is nigh for Labour to swich to an #ExitFromBrexitIf Corbyn & McDonnell won't shift, then Starmer & Thornberry need to pull the rug.If they don't, Labour are likely to be the biggest electoral losers from #Brexit 
Every day I see a  that, so far as the rest of the world is concerned, Brexit has killed. We’ve got to get the word out it’s not dead yet 
I find myself concluding that #JeremyCorbyn is, intellectually, a Little Englander. #Brexit 
I’m a liberal conservative voter. I would vote Labour - even with #Corbyn - if they went anti #brexit or unambiguous pro soft #brexit. I will also vote Labour if Tories lead very high over Labour whatever EU policy to avoid too big hard brexit majority 
Corbyn backing #Brexit can no longer be portrayed as him appealing to Labour's traditional voters.His backing of the Tories on #Brexit can now only be attributed to his own political dogma. Labour need to switch to back an #ExitFromBrexit 
Hilarious swivel eyed lunacy. We need a royal yacht to sign the trade agreements lost with Brexit!  Self parody, one assumes, at its very best. 
LOL CONS want to EXPEL Lord Heseltine for saying a Labour Gov - Corbyn would be better than Brexit.... tee hee 
Lord Heseltine says he would be 'torn' if faced with a choice between a Labour government or Brexit  
We haven't forgotten how you snubbed us, Obama dear 'friend' #BackOfQueue #Obama#Brexit  
On Brexit he has whipped to abstain or voted with the Tories at every critical vote. He waved through Art 50 without a word. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: Everybody in Govt said they would implement the result of the EU referendum.Remoaner: But it was an advisory referendum, there is no need to implement Brexit.JRM: So you want politicians to lie?Says it all! #Brexit  
Refused to resign after saying he would if Green was sacked, now apparently sidelined as a civil servant takes over Brexit negotiations from him h/t @hendopolis 
There is one thing the Brexiteers don't like; THE TRUTH. The Tories are turning on themselves and in particular they are turning on Lord Heseltine for saying that even a Labour government would do less damage than Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Heseltine: "We've survived Labour governments before. Their damage tends to be short-term and capable of rectification. Brexit is not short-term and is not easily capable of rectification”.  
Nothing to see here, just a former Conservative Deputy Prime Minister virtually advocating voting for JEREMY CORBYN as PM. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/hURvDEPo8L 
Brexit DemographicsDegree-educated people voted Remain. People who didn't hold passports voted Leave.  
Nick Clegg lost his parties respect lost the referendum and lost his seat but the elite see him fit for a  knighthood which proves our politicians are fit for nothing 
Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds | Politics | The Guardian  
Free speech to be imposed only on students and universities when Tories demand Michael Heseltine’s expulsion for his Brexit worse than Labour comments. Loving the irony 
Toblerone finished. Xmas is over. Bloody Brexit. They used to last until New Years Eve. 
The UK risks losing its place in the G7, Brexit going well? 
Surprise, surprise! Who would have thought it!EU moves ahead of Britain on opening trade talks with Australia and New Zealand. UK faces delay of at least a year before it can open its own talks #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Yes, there should be a second Brexit referendum  via @ 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
This is my father. He comes from France to visit me at home every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013. According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won’t be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he doesn’t have a passport. He’s my only family.Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas 
You had better start opposing Brexit Jeremy...  
What a sad state of affairs when Brexit dictates our Royal Family must massage the ego of a narcissistic sociopath like @realDonaldTrump 
Time for Labour to make a decision on its Brexit stance and give the country a real choice on Brexit  
No, you are a city in England.Scotland is an ancient European nation, one of the oldest in the world. Older then England.Scotland has has had Tory Govs foisted on us by the English electorate for many decades. We want independence from the corrupt, Tory, Brexit, xenophobic UK  
When asked whether he would vote Labour (if he wasn’t a Lord) if it helped prevent Brexit, Michael Heseltine tells us “I’m torn”. @itvnews @anguswalkertalk 
The sticking plaster holding together the 2 wings of the Tory party is being stretched to breaking point over #Brexit! If @iancolintaylor is voicing this, the split could be about to become irreparable.Many have already left the Tories, looks like many more could follow them. 
The Brexit financial apocalypse intensifies.  
U.K. Treasury Asked to Reveal Its Own Analysis of Brexit Impact @UKIPNFKN @nickreeves9876 @JeanneBartram @JamesMelville @chunkymark @Rachael_Swindon @EUflagmafia @TheNewEuropean @Mcr4EU @eurosluggard @BrexitBin @dontbrexitfixit @MarieAnnUK 
Why does Britain like tea so much?Because tea leaves. #Brexit   
Without any debate, the new chair of the parliamentary committee looking at section 44 of the Constitution, is already pushing for a referendum to change the constitutionPeople applying for a $200,000 p.a job should get their paperwork in order & not blame others#AusPol #s44 
'Brexit will NOT damage the UK economy' Former Treasury boss hits out   
Yanis Varoufakis: Insurgencies often end up betraying the ideals that motivated them – Brexit seems no different 
65% of Labour voters want to stop Brexit. When will Labour listen?   
Should @jeremycorbyn & @UKLabour now come out and say they will commit to stopping #Brexit?Please vote & RT. 
Scots actor John Hannah backs Indyref2 after Brexit  
I’ve joined other @UKLabour colleagues today demanding the Chancellor publishes #Brexit impact studies on the economy - yet more evidence the Government is hiding the true costs of @Brexit - good piece covering by @GuardianAnushka 
So important to never forget the referendum was ADVISORY people. Why was there never a proper analysis of the impact the options and a clear decision taken??. Based on fact analysis not fiction. It’s not too late to think and  #StopBrexit 
Proud to have signed this letter with fellow @lewishamlabour Cllrs. Brexit is a threat to our community, and to our country. Our future is not fixed. Labour must give voters the opportunity to change their mind  
The Treasury Yield Curve Is Crashing Most Since Brexit  
"The public have a right to know what the impact of Brexit will be for them and for their families"   
It is worth remembering that @barackobama strongly opposed Brexit and warned the British people they would be at the "back of the queue" for free trade deal with the US if they dared vote to leave the EU. Hardly the words of a friend.  via @YouTube 
32% of Labour remain voters believe Labour is “completely against Brexit”. 31% of Labour leave voters believe Labour is “completely in favour of Brexit”.Some Labour voters are going to be very disappointed with Corbyn soon. 
Pay attention, Mr Corbyn! #Brexit @Labour4EU @UKLabour 
POLL SHOWS MOST VOTERS OPPOSE LABOUR'S BREXIT STANCE: GUARDIANSo everyone in the UK opposes everything? 
The time has passed for @UKLabour ambiguity over Brexit. It is no longer constructive for the Party, and more importantly for the country.#StopBrexit for the Many 
If #Brexit Britain wants a trade deal with India then it will have to accept more immigration from Britain. I'm sure most Leave voters weren't told about that. And so much for taking control of our borders. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Globalist Brexiters, like Daniel Hannan, who dream of some kind of buccaneering low tax (for the rich) north Atlantic Singapore haven't bothered to mention that such an economy requires high levels of immigration. More #LeaveLies.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
The US bank's decision is part of its moves out of London after Brexit  
Liam Fox on his recent attendance at the WTO Ministerial Conference; “What was interesting...was the great interest in the United Kingdom...We weren’t short of bilateral meetings, everyone wanted to talk to the UK about Brexit and our plans post-Brexit."  
#Brexit: @BritainBitesBac says: I voted to completely leave EU. Retweet if you did too. Below retweeted: @adrianakirk33. #Brexit now. (@erikak58, @christina300949 @UKIP, @Camelot_1966 @Bolddigger52 @Brexit59 @EUVoteLeave23rd @Dr_Nahil @TheresaMcMeekin @DavidHadley1973 #UKIP_) pic.twitter.com/hrgRjUUffE 
I take it the Brexit negotiations aren’t going so well then.  
Labour's chaotic and contradictory position on Brexit will catch up with them next year. Incredible they've got away with it so far but the road's running out now.   
Labour has actively encouraged Remainers (especially the young) to join. To do this, it fudged the Brexit issue. High time it came clean on its stance.  
Ollie is very agitated. He wants #FBPE to surrender and help deliver Brexit, because his side haven't got a clue how to deliver it in the manner promised and they're worried that ordinary people might change their mind & get angry when they work out it's all a scam! Poor Ollie.  
The Trump campaign’s data operation worked closely with Cambridge Analytica, the Robert Mercer-funded mass manipulator that helped make Brexit happen. Why does Mercer’s big data company always seem to do what Putin wants?  
Slightly aghast to have returned to London to find people are STILL talking about Brexit. Rather assumed everyone would have moved on by now 
I agree, we need a second referendum. Now we've decided to leave the EU, we need to do the same with the pointless, corrupt, hostile & racist UN.  
Hello @andrewrosindell we're not left wing...labour seem to be pro brexit remember. Merry Xmas from all remainers X  
"We got it wrong about Brexit" admit project Fear doom-mongering so-called experts. You did, because you exaggerated, distorted and twisted the truth for political ends.   
WINNING: Support for Brexit surges to 9 point lead.  
LAB voters could abandon party over Brexit stance - YouGov poll  
The City of London is so worried about Brexit that the FTSE100 closed at a record high, 7% above 12 months ago.Go figure...... 
‘63% of self-identified Labour supporters say they would be “delighted or pleased” if #Labour said it would stop #Brexit and stay in the EU... By contrast, only 22% said they would be delighted or pleased if Labour said it would proceed with Brexit’  
Nick Clegg heads a party of remoaners to Brussels to thwart Brexit & gets a knighthood, has government sunk this low?? 
Corbynistas: “We hate Brexit, so let’s put a Eurosceptic in charge of opposing it.”In other news, shepherd puts wolf in charge of looking after the sheep.  
Today I sat on my own at a table in an incredible busy cafe with my empty cup of tea I'd bought 3 hours before, while tired families searched for a table to eat at. Why did I do this? Because I'm a selfish fucking Brexit pensioner twat. 
If so, she will find so many Tories abandoning the Party we have served for so long..Theresa May faces calls to withdraw Tory whip from Lord Heseltine over 'disloyal' Brexit comments  via @telegraphnews 
I’ve been saying it for 18 months and I’ll keep saying it: Brexit is not about “new exciting opportunities”, it’s all about harking back to the past. A past that looks less and less attractive. #StopBrexit #Remain 
For anyone interested in the #Brexit open letter quoted by the @guardian today, here is the full text:  
% of Labour voters who'd be "delighted or pleased" if the Labour Party said it would...Stop Brexit: 63%Proceed with Brexit: 22%via @YouGov, 17 - 19 Dec 
63% of Labour voters oppose @jeremycorbyn over current pro-Brexit stance, YouGov poll finds. The tide turns against #Brexit 
Theresa May is facing calls to withdraw Tory whip from Lord Heseltine over his 'disloyal' Brexit comments; should she bow to pressure?  
Must-read results of our @BestforBritain polling suggesting @LabourUK would be wise to shift its stance on Brexit: Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds  
Osborne, Clegg and Toxic Tony all saying Brexit is a mistake yet recent polls show support for Brexit is up.  
READ: 25 Labour MPs write to Philip Hammond, demanding the release of the Brexit impact reports. Please RT: 
Conservative Brexit Reality.  
Time to listen to Heseltine. If a Tory tells you that Brexit is worse than a Labour Government then you know it is going to be really bad, especially if it was one of Mrs Thatchers front bench. Time to stop the Brexit madness and #StopBrexit 
And as for “dumbing down” Brexit has dumbed down politics and parliament to the point that gasbags like you think it Ok to write rubbish like this. 
.@uklabour are under pressure to clarify their stance on #Brexit, after polling showed that 25% of voters could switch party and more than half would oppose Labour backing BrexitWhat an utter mess @jeremycorbyn has got #Labour into. #LabourFail 
Two CUP party councilors have been arrested for failing to appear in court to testify over their part in the independence referendum on October 1  
Labour voters could abandon party over Brexit stance, poll finds  
.    "A quarter of [Labour's] current voters could switch party by the next election & more than half would oppose Labour backing Brexit". 
The Raft of Brexit by Dave Brown - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
."While the govt has become more religiously orthodox on Brexit, the people have given the issue MORE thoughtA majority — in 4 straight polls — NOW think Britain was "WRONG" to vote to leave". 
The Raft of Brexit... my cover for yesterday's @Independent Review of the Year, after #Gericault 
Most tweeted words by Scottish politicians;Nicola Sturgeon(SNP): Scotland, music, politics, love, culture, BrexitAnas Sarwar(Labour): Anas, SarwarMurdo Fraser (Con): SNP, Sturgeon, Rangers  
They helped create the conditions through being part of government whose main platform was austerity and turning a blind eye to right wing xenophobia in govt that allowed for leave to win the referendum.  
'Brexit will NOT damage the UK economy' Former Treasury boss hits out   
Damning Treasury analysis of the costs of brexit. Please RT widely. NB @theresa_may, @jeremycorbyn you cannot pretend this one was not done. @libdems should highlight. 
December poll shows 9 point lead in favour of Brexit. Politicians must not block the will of the people! Read more here:  
My father visits the UK, from France, every day as he’s trying to learn how to eat a bacon sandwich. As he hasn’t got a passport, he’ll be unable to learn now, thanks to #brexit. Thanks Leavers. x  
Britain desperately needed someone to speak out about Brexit. Michael Heseltine has risen to the challenge, he’s intelligent, focused and a formidable opponent. He is Brexit slayer of 2017.#FBPE 
Britain SHOULD get bespoke Brexit deal in DEFIANCE of EU insists Germany   
For several years Putin gave Assad military support; not enough to win, but enough to send 11 million people fleeing from their homes, some of whom appeared in Farage's 'Breaking Point' poster. Just one way in which Putin interfered in our politics.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
MPs demand Chancellor releases secret Brexit studies.The public have a right to know what the impact of Brexit will be for them and for their families. @PhilipHammondUK should release the reports.#StopBrexit. #RemainAndReform. #FBPE. 
#brexit doesn't mean #brexit it means less spending, less tax raised, seasonal workers laid off earlier & UK declining reports @ChrisGiles_ 
.@LibDems have responded with incredulity to reports that Home Office will have to recruit staff from Europe to admin #Brexit"This is an utter farce presided over by a government that doesn't have a clue what it is even trying to do” says @thomasbrake 
I am sick, SO SICK, of this narrative that working class people voted Brexit because being working class makes you hate foreigners. Or being poor makes you hate Muslims. It's so self-serving. 
If Carlsberg made Prime Ministers... "f we Leave under Article 50 without a deal under UK, EU and International Law we owe NO MONEY at all, not a brass farthing!"#MoggMentum #Brexit  
Brexit WILL destroy the Tories, the remain voters will not forgive the treachery. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The hypocrisy of leaving the Senedd to claim a Brexit golden handshake from the European Parliament is mind boggling.  
If a UK/EU couple retire (or move in any capacity) post Brexit to a Member State *other* than the EU citizen's state of nationality  (ie an Irish/UK couple retiring to Spain) then EU free movement law will apply.  
Let's focus on what we're trying to do with #FBPE.We will never convince the dogmatic Brexit extremists. Princess Diana herself could come back to life, glowing with a golden halo, point out how wrong the Daily Mail is, and even she'd be horse whipped out of town. [1/5] 
#BREAKING: Two councillors of pro-independence party @CUPReus arrested by Spain's "justice" accused of "hate against Spain's police" for denouncing the brutality of the occupation forces during #Catalonia's independence referendum  
Immigration & border control for UK citizens after Brexit: what will the new UK passport *really* mean? @StevePeers explains:  
So our government is frightened of infuriating Trump. I thought #Brexit was going to give us back control!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Good point. Moving to retire to the EU will be up to national law of each Member State after Brexit. I will add a sentence to the blog post (pinned tweet).  
New twist to saga over government #ImpactAssessments on the economic costs of #Brexit - they have done some after all (in #Treasury) but don’t dare reveal them! Don’t we deserve to know cost of #BrexitReality ? 
Almost half of Scots would back an independent Scotland that remained in the European Union, if a second referendum was held in early 2019, a new poll suggests.  
There is nothing more Brexit than salad cream, is there? 
If a second referendum on leaving the EU were held today, would you RT or Like this unrepresentative tweet about this clearly far-fetched scenario?RT for RTLike for Like 
Merry Brexmas: So much for Remain having an 11-point lead; support for staying in the EU has collapsed to 39 per cent! #Brexit  
The Treasury’s study of Brexit’s impact says - it will be a disaster. 
Link to @Independent's report on our open letter to @Keir_Starmer, calling for a shift in @UKLabour's approach to #Brexit:  
Theresa May faces calls to withdraw Tory whip from Lord Heseltine over 'disloyal' Brexit comments #premium 
A Brexit effect:  
It does. But I’m afraid so does reference to “British expats living in Australia” in this piece .... They’re not expats - they’re migrants. Failure to recognise Britons abroad as migrants says as much about Brexit as the colour of the passport.  
The row over blue passports sums Brexit up perfectly  
Eject Tory Arch Remainer Heseltine for Backing Corbyn, Calling to Stop Brexit: Think Tank  
"The European Union’s Common Agriculture Policy (CAP) has driven up food prices by almost 17 per cent in the UK, a report has revealed. "Another justification for #Brexit 
Australia was one of the first countries to call for a free-trade deal with Britain right after the Brexit vote. New Zealand even offered to send us trade negotiators to help future global trade deals. These are our true friends. They are our kin. #Brexit #NZ #Australia 
@BrugesGroup President Lord Norman Tebbit  has called for the expulsion LordMichael Heseltine from @Conservatives after Heseltine implied that a Corbyn led Govt would be better than the current Government #Brexit@ConHome @The_Bat_Gotham @CamillaTominey @_katedevlin @CalgacusEd 
One of the most enraging things about #Brexit is how it has revived the careers of Farage, IDS, Howard, Paterson, Redwood - certainly on the BBC - and boosted those of Moggers & Johnson. All the more reason to #ExitFromBrexit 
"while some might try to argue that any new difficulty for UK citizens moving or travelling to the EU after Brexit would constitute some form of ‘punishment’ by the EU, this would be profoundly dishonest." @StevePeers blog on post Brexit travel & migration  
"The UK would be permanently poorer if it left the EU".How can anyone defend Brexit in the face of this??  
Labour councillors sign open letter urging party to change its Brexit position  
The Bow Group is pleased to announce that our President & former Conservative Party Chairman Lord #Tebbit alongside @ToryProgress and the @brugesgroup has joined our call for #Heseltine to be expelled from the Conservatives in the House of Lords.#Brexit  
Tory grandee Lord Heseltine has said that a Corbyn led government would be preferable to Brexit. Do you agree with the Former Deputy Prime Minister's remarks?  
Without the votes of racists and fascists Leave would have fallen short of a majority. So now the government is pandering to these extremists. A healthy democracy keeps such extremists out on the margins.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Good grief. I'm a Remainer and a Corbyite. I want Brexit stopped but I also want the @UKLabour manifesto implemented in this country. If #FBPE is simply used to attack Corbyn, I'm out! Tories caused this mess, not Labour! 
NEW POLL SHOWS 9 POINT LEAD FOR THOSE IN FAVOUR OF BREXIT!               #fo2eu ! 
Please read & share this analysis of the impact of Brexit. It's not #FakeNews, but prepared by our own #HMTreasury. Particularly important that those who voted Leave see this, as it may convince them to shift position.  #StopBrexit #FBPE @LeaveEUOfficial 
Lord (Michael) Heseltine, Lord (Andrew) Adonis, Lord (Peter) Mandelson and all other active members of the House of Lords did not vote in the EU Referendum as they were prevented from doing so by law. 
I ain't retreating one step...preparing for D-Day (Defeat #Brexit Day) we can start by not voting for Brexit supporting parties in the local elections May 3rd 2018...We have to get them to support a #FinalSay in 2018 with a #StopBrexit option! 
CRACKERS: Now pro-€  Lord Heseltine suggests PM Corbyn would be better than Brexit.  
When I was young, Britain retreated from east of Suez, now it's engaged in a confused and disorderly retreat from east of Dover (or is it Lowestoft?). But why quibble? It's just another downward stumble in the long decline of a once great nation. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
“We Need To Talk About Those Who Would Gain From A Hard Brexit”By .@WillBlackWriter 
Dear @jeremycorbyn You can either change the minds of millions of people who want to #Remain & #StopBrexit or you can change your own mind. Which is easier? Which do you think you can achieve before it's too late? #Brexit #FBPE @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer 
Brexit smells of wee. 
How do we re-unite the United Kingdom in 2018?Brexit split families. Many don't even mention politics anymore.The one thing we can ALL agree on is: who Brexit will affect more.#HappyNewYear #Hello2018(Full version: ) 
Dear @jeremycorbyn ,A word in your shell-like.Whilst we may echo your support of the fox hunting ban, surely there is a far larger animal in the room being ignored?Yes, the Brexit elephant.Please let us know when you are going to stop supporting this Tory govt & #StopBrexit 
So it turns out my wife's grandfather was Irish. We are both Remainers and Indy Yessers.Our New Years resolution is to get my wife, our 3 children and I registered to get Irish Passports.Something tells me the EU will offer us more Human Rights in a Brexit UK than the UK will 
Independence is NOT about the English, that's Brexit.Independence is about US, Scotland.  
I'm so f_cking fed up with constant left wing, anti-Brexit, anti-Britain, pro-anti bias in BBC Radio4 'comedy'. The BBC is utterly dominated by Cultural Marxist thinking. BBC TV is sometimes so PC & engineered that it is unwatchable by a free thinking independent person. #Liberty 
Falling real wages in 2017 are forecast to be replaced by 'zero real wage growth' in 2018 which will be worse than any year in the three decades leading up to the financial crisis.And this is all due to #Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I'm so f_cking fed up with constant left wing, anti-Brexit, anti-Britain, pro-anti bias in BBC Radio4 'comedy'. The BBC is utterly dominated by Cultural Marxist thinking. BBC TV is sometimes so PC & engineered that it is unreachable by a free thinking independent person. #Liberty 
‘Rather a tough #Brexit deal than too many concessions’: despite exports already falling German business wants integrity of EU Single Market protected, says head of Chamber of Commerce  
Before Brexit had a fabulous business would answer all call outs at all times. Even finished a job when wife went into labour with their first baby 
THREAD: Brexiteers look away now but I'm sharing a story from a Polish friend (with his permission) of life since Brexit. First some background, came here unmarried, worked 14 hour days picking fruit, trained to be a plumber, married local girl + have two lovely kids + on way 
Let's be clear on this - if you're voting for Labour in Scotland, you're voting for Brexit:  
This is damning stuff. Before the referendum the Treasury pulled a report together that made clear #Brexit was economic suicide. Why did the PM and ministers vote to trigger A50 with this knowledge ? 
Can you imagine someone being so stupid that they think , after Brexit with your blue (bigoted) passport, you won't be able to travel anywhere? Oh hang on, she writes for the Guardian.  
A Government run by Laurel and Hardy supported by a cabinet of Loony Tunes characters wouldn’t be ‘as bad as Brexit’.   
So our unemployed former Deputy Prime Minister Mr Clegg is to be Knighted...for what? Leading his party into oblivion? Saddling every student with a lifetime of debt? Losing a referendum? Services to the Tory Party? Makes a joke of the entire system! 
Brexit Boys #UnwantedBoyBandNames 
Brexit-Is-Iccumen-In: The Wicker Man & Britain in 2017, by @AdamScovell 
Heseltine: “Labour would have a negative effect on the UK – but Brexit would be worse”.‘We have survived Labour governments before. Their damage tends to be short-term and capable of rectification. Brexit is not short-term.  
“... xenophobic tone of the 2016 referendum campaign did serious harm that needs to be repaired...”  
Liberal, green, socialist, conservative: The #FBPE cause is bigger than party politics.But our Brexit opponents likewise reach across party lines. We must be willing to question the role of all elected representatives in facilitating this debacle, or it'll all be for nothing. 
Truth 1: The British people have decided to leave the EU.Truth 2: Those British people who were permitted a vote and voted expressed a marginal preference for leaving the EU (a hazily defined term with multiple interpretations) in an advisory referendum.Truth is complicated. 
I entirely regret voting leave in the Brexit vote i panicked and honestly didn't know enough to vote remain #regret #brexit #brexitshambles #brexitsucks #mybad 
Yes, we do have traitors in our midst. Tories who want to see the destruction of the EU. The ERG is a traitorous organisation that demands nothing short of a hard Brexit. Members of the ERG are doing Putin's business and every one of them needs outed - NOW! @acgrayling @mrjamesob 
The latest World Economic League Table states that Britain has recovered from an initial economic blip after the vote to #Leave and now looks set to maintain its position in the rankings and improve by 2020 after #Brexit. 
There are three things we need to achieve in 2018. And they're all interconnected:1. Stop Brexit.2. Remove Corbyn.3. Bring down the government. #StopBrexit  
Just a quick reminder to urge anyone wanting to #StopBrexit to #FBPE (Follow Back Pro Eu). Together we can stop this nonsense and #ExitFromBrexit RT spread the word and let's make #Brexit something we look back on as something that didn't happen.  
New poll shows 9 point lead for those in favour of Brexit  
Hilarious watching intolerant Remainers who habitually demand that voting rights be stripped from everyone over 50 now fawning over the increasingly bizarre anti-Brexit ramblings of the incurably Europhile Heseltine, 84. . . . 
I've seen some dreadful/rude/condescending comments regarding #Brexit but this takes things to a new low. Some people need to take a long hard look at themselves.  
In reality, #Brexit is not allowing people to take back control. Time for @UKLabour to offer voters the chance to reconsider. Our open letter to Keir Starmer, and report by @HuffPostUK:  
Michael's crime is to understand his own party. @jeremycorbyn is main reason most #Tory #Remain MPs frightened to revolt on #Brexit  
"IF we are still subject to the European Court of Justice, we have not left the EU."#MoggMentum#Brexit  
Tory grandee Michael Heseltine says he would rather have a Jeremy Corbyn government than Brexit 
Heseltine on #LBC: "If a Labour Government had caused the devaluation of the pound that was caused by #Brexit the right-wing press would be hysterical." He's not wrong! 
“Michael Heseltine says a Jeremy Corbyn government would be less damaging for Britain than Brexit” Conservatives should be furious! Indeed, “it's about time Tarzan hung up his loin cloth”.    
Former Deputy Prime Minister Lord Heseltine has suggested a Labour government led by Jeremy Corbyn could be less damaging than Brexit. Is he right?  
Lord Heseltine says Brexit will be worse than CorbynHe has finally flipped, dementia set in?  
Like Tony Blair, Michael Heseltine's Brexit views are typical of a globalizing political elite who choose to write off the wishes of the British people as being stupid and irrelevant to their preferences. Why? Just follow the money.  
I know that's what the nos say but watch out for those generalisations. I'm 64, a hard Remainer, & I'm joined by many other over 60s that are passionate & active in the fight against Brexit. We're not planning to die just yet, & I don't suppose the Leave voters over 60 are either  
MA... MA... MA... We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit  via @MailOnline 
This thread needs RT, and thanks go to Jo, we need more like you holding to account our government,who thinks it doesn’t need to scrutinise the Brexit debacle it is hell bent on doing - whatever the cost to the country and us all. #costofbrexit 
.@VinceCable on @LBC Brexit special this morning pointed out that we know Conservative Brexit deal will be expensive - £40bn and counting. The British people deserve a vote on deal when they know what it is - what are Brexiters afraid of? 
Lord Heseltine suggests a Corbyn government would be better than leaving EU. Time for @jeremycorbyn to heed a Tory grandee and oppose Brexit in the name of workers who will suffer its consequences 
I've tweeted before and I'll tweet again, remove Corbyn and both Brexit and Tory government collapses.  
I’m one of 25 Labour MPs who’ve written to @PhilipHammondUK demanding the public see documents examining the range of outcomes of #Brexit  
The referendum may have ended, but it is not for the BBC to declare that the political battle over #Brexit has ended, or to obediently parrot the government's line that it is over. Conflict over Brexit continues and it is the BBC's job to reflect that. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
In 2018, we are going to have to make a choice.Do we continue to give @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn the benefit of doubt when it comes to Brexit, or do we accept Labour are a Brexit party & they no longer deserve our votes or trust.After all, Brexit is now only 13 months away. 
Here's @bbcnickrobinson saying the referendum battle is over & those who think otherwise are like deluded soldiers who keep fighting after the war has ended. That is what the government wants the #BBC to say. Completely biased, not a thread of impartiality. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
This is my father He comes from France to visit me every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013.According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won't be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he does not have a passport.He's my only family.Thanks Brexiters. 
"The public have a right to know what the impact of #Brexit will be for them and for their families"  
End year chart showing trend in YouGov's Brexit tracker  
The Sikh community has given many benefits to Britain SHARE IF AGREE 
Is Brexit more damaging for Britain than a Corbyn government? Yes, says Lord Heseltine. He's right...  
Has Lord Heseltine, 84, finally lost the plot by declaring Brexit will be worse for Britain than a @jeremycorbyn govt. join me @lbc from 10am 
Simply unacceptable that Ministers are STILL withholding the truth about how #Brexit will hit the public & economy. Treasury officials will have the data - it’s time for @PhilipHammondUK to do the right thing and share it. #ImpactAssessments 
Petition: Stop the Common Fisheries Policy being adopted into UK law post-Brexit.  43,932 Signatures to regain British fishing waters. RETWEET NOW! 
Labour councillors call on Keir Starmer to give voters chance to change their mind on Brexit  
Tory grandee Lord Heseltine has said that a Jeremy Corbyn led government would be better for Britain than Brexit. Is he right?  
Seventy Labour councillors sign open letter urging party to change its Brexit position  
California independence 1 step closer as AG paves way for potential 2018 ‘referendum’ 
This. This. This.All anti-Brexit groups *must* support each other and all of each other's efforts. This is not the time for anyone to be a Prima Donna.We *are* stronger together.We need to #StopBrexit 
The public face rising prices after Brexit unless UK can replicate trade deals negotiated by the EU with 73 '3rd party' countries. Brexit the gift that keeps on giving...bad news #BrexitShambles #r4today #StopBrexit 
Things being smuggled in under cover of Brexit will damage so much of what we hold dear in UK.A cabal of tycoons would see their wealth & influence turbocharged, while for the mass of the population their prosperity, security &, ultimately, their liberty dwindle away.-Gina Miller 
MPs demand release of further secret #Brexit impact studies.Just how much is being hidden from the public.....and why?? 
"#Passport Control"I HOLD IN MY HAND A PIECE OF PAPER...Book only 12.50 inc p&p from #SneeringElite #BluePassport #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Sweden’s technology powerhouse shows Brexit Britain a positive way to fix its ailing economy  
#Brexit boost for UK: Germany wants 'clever' deal that could become model for other non-EU members' | via @telegraph Sigmar Gabriel, the German foreign minister hinted that the EU might be prepared to offer Britain a bespoke arrangement for future trade:  
Productivity was just described by #r4today in the intro to a piece as "the biggest challenge for the economy; bigger even than #Brexit". Hmm. 
Philip Hammond urged to publish Treasury's #Brexit impact studies  
Doom-mongers admit they were “too pessimistic” about the immediate impact of Brexit on Britain and the world...  
There’s a reason that U.K. pharmaceutical companies are raising their voices about getting a @Brexit deal done: leaving the European Union has the potential to disrupt almost every aspect of their business. 
We are all waking up to the reality of "the longest fall in living standards" thanks to those who led us in to #Brexit Not a worry for Boris IDS or Mr Mogg though! 
Man interviewed on @BBCNews re #BluePassports Man: "It's just nice to be different"Reporter: "What if I told you about 80 countries have blue passports?"Man: (Laughs) "I didn't know that"......Surprising what people do with no information eh? #brexit #referendum 
MPs demand Chancellor releases secret Brexit studies  
There is no way this deserves a referendum. The rule should stand as is - or strengthen it! It's not hard to follow, and meeting such a ridiculously low bar to enter in parliament should not be removed. Maybe it's time to add an IQ test or morality test for MPs? #auspol 
Seriously? Federal politicians want a referendum on citizenship section in S44? This affects a grand total of 226 Australians. And they want to fast track it & get 15 million people to vote. Meanwhile, indigenous aussies are still waiting on that fast tracked recognition #auspol 
Study: Brexit Not Driven by Racism, Public Want Immigration Control and Criminal Checks  via @BreitbartLondon 
22) ultimately, Labour Leadership is engaged in the greatest "propping up" exercise I've seen in my lifetime.They are supporting the Government on virtually every aspect of Brexit.  Saying this is "tactics" or "being pragmatic" whilst attacking LD history is just dishonestEnd/ 
21) but no party is offering a fair deal to all those impacted by tuition fees, not even Labour.  And only the LDs along with Greens etc are being straight about #Brexit 
ERG to the Right of them, Momentum to the Left of them,#Brexit in front of them,Subverted & plotted...Ours not to make reply,Ours not to reason why,Ours not to decry;The Govt of our UKDenies us a #FinalSay& Rides roughshod o'er our Democracy. 
Christmas and Boxing Day in the magnificent English county of Norfolk - visiting the northern coastline and seeing some spectacular views and countryside - a Brexit county too!  @NorfolkCC @SaveOurChurches @NorfolkTories @normanlamb @NorthNorfolkDC  
This holds good as an argument if, and *only* if Labour come out wholeheartedly and unequivocally on the side of stopping Brexit altogether. No ifs. No buts. No maybes. No fudging. 100% clearly and written in blood that they will #StopBrexit 
One of the best things about Trump, Brexit, Putin, and all the mess in Central Europe, Turkey, and the Middle East, not to mention rampant global wealth inequality, is that nobody ever says they're not interested in politics anymore. Particularly if they're under 35. #Newyear 
."SEVENTY Labour councillors from London have signed a letter to shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer, urging a shift in the party's Brexit position.". 
Sir Nick Clegg will be remembered - if at all - for Destroying trust of a generation in politics by betrayal over tuition feesSupporting cruel and pointless austerityPaving way for referendum and BrexitA weak man whose personal ambition brought disaster to the UK 
Labour councillors sign open letter urging party to change its Brexit position  
"The Democrats don't actually need a message. It's a referendum on the party in power." @SteveKornacki on Dems strategy for 2018. #Hardball 
If the next great national debate is having a multi million dollar referendum because MPs are shit at paperwork it's going to be a long year  
Stop laughing, there's as much evidence for this as there is for Russia interfering in the US election and Brexit.  
Half my family voted leave. The problems that prompted them are real & the causes are complex, but their solutions never lay in a binary in/out referendum.  The leaders of the leave campaign never wanted to solve their problems, they just wanted to capitalise on their suffering. 
When the Treasury know the damage that #Brexit will do to the economy, why on earth can’t the public see the details? #transparency #ImpactAssessments 
Britain to surge past FRANCE in economic rankings as Brexit impact 'less than feared'  
Brexit means Brexit. A red, white and blue Brexit.Red, for the POPPY.Blue, for the PASSPORT.White, for the... well, can't talk about anything white anymore or you'll get chucked in the gulag.All the best for 2018. 
21 #Catalan teachers are being threatening with legal action for discussions in class following #1Oct attacks on voters in self-determination referendum. Hundreds upon hundreds of Catalans are likely to be prosecuted by Spanish authorities for all kind of offences. Maybe me too.  
Scottish Labour opposed the devolution of employment law after the independence referendum. The @scotgov *could* be doing something right now about this, but they can't. They are treating people they're idiots. They never change. 
Thread: The hard right have adopted a very effective rhetorical strategy - lying blatantly & relentlessly on an unprecedented scale. It renders reasonable counter-argument impossible, for you cannot debate with someone who just fires back more lies. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  /1 
2018 is going to be the year the country turns against #Brexit. It's already started. Get involved. Let's make history. You don't need to roll over and let these fools ruin our country. Stand up for what you believe in and be counted. WE CAN WIN THIS. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Don't watch the news, so I don't know if Scotland's legal action to reverse Brexit has been announced, but I get the impression that MSM will be reluctant to mention it in case the English Brexiteers start pushing Scotland away. 
Michael Heseltine says a Labour government led by Jeremy Corbyn would be less damaging than Brexit.  
A Labour government might not be as bad as Brexit, claims Heseltine  Wrong Wrong Wrong on every level. Kick #Heseltine out of the Conservative Party. 
Please read this thread and tell me that the UK is not in dire straits? You have the power to stop this. Take responsibility for the #Brexit Monster you have created. @Anna_Soubry @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @theresa_may @DavidCameron_MP @LeaveEUOfficial @nigelfarage #StopBrexit 
I always felt a sharp slowdown was unlikely, since UK growth is consumption-driven and a majority of consumers were positive about Brexit. My view in June last year: downturn within 2 years of vote, and longer-term, slow decline. That is still my view.  
There’s only one strange oily creature farmers will want to put down after brexitGOVE 
No-one has ever said that. But at present, Brits have the RIGHT to study, work or retire in the EU27. After Brexit, they will no longer have that right. They will have to obtain permission, just as Canadians do.  
It is really hard to understate how disastrous IndyRef would have been. The idea that Scot Nats get to sit in judgement of the cost of Brexit is laughable  
Sadly true. EU migrants blamed for lack of housing, low wages and job insecurity despite being net contributors.The EU itself is blamed for not giving us the prefential trade deal promised by deluded Brexit politicians.It's always someone else's fault apparently... 
Oh Fuck Off. Your true colour is prick. #DailyMail #BluePassport Fuck #Brexit pic.twitter.com/RnJpMeAhTu 
"Brexit is not short-term and is not easily capable of rectification." Extraordinary from Heseltine on grave damage that #Brexit will inflict on UK and belief that Labour government is preferable to Brexit. Are you listening @jeremycorbyn? #StopBrexit 
For betraying millions of #students, losing 50 of his party's seats at the GE, losing the argument in the #EU #referendum & then losing his own seat in #Parliament... I hereby make @nick_clegg a #Knight! A National DISGRACE @theresa_may...! #BBC #SKY #UK #BREXIT #LibDems #TORY 
Philip freedom is taken for granted in UK maybe because UK hasn’t experienced an oppression in recent times. Brexit is all about far right ideology & tax haven. Classic fascist propaganda by right wing media over 40 yrs & leave campaign is endemic & dangerous  
I agreed and donated a £1m after the European elections where they came first. It forced the referendum from a terrified Cameron  
This is my father. He comes from France to visit me at home every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013. According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won’t be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he doesn’t have a passport. He’s my only family.Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas 
#NewYearsHonours You couldn’t make it up Nick Clegg wrote a book How to stop Brexit !!!! Nick Clegg & Tim Farron the dream team from hell. Getting knighted for trying to stop Brexit everyday. Why bother any more with people getting knighted waste of time today.     
those asking who Big Narstie is and says hes ruining it are those who voted for Brexit & got coal in their stocking this Xmas #bigfatquizoftheyear 
Oh dear Denis. Presumably you have forgotten it was Clegg who originally called for an in/out referendum. R does that not fit your narrative?  
A knighthood and parliamentarians vote Clegg's How To Stop Brexit as book of the year - the gap between the public and politicians has never been so wide  
The use of "traitors" and "saboteurs" is not odd. The people orchestrating this know that Brexit may be failure for most people. They are preparing the ground for casting blame when most people realise they are not getting what was promised. 
Brexit unleashed an English nationalism that has damaged the union with Scotland for good As a system of beliefs the new nationalism is much more appropriate to an English nation state than to a more diverse United Kingdom 
So there are #Brexit impact papers. But, surprise, they’re secret...Tomorrow’s Guardian  
To those asking for my source or questioning whether Nick Clegg ever called for an in out referendum on the EU:  
There are 42,000 Chileans living in Spain, 16,000 in France and 10,000 in Germany. Anyone claiming that Brits cannot study, work or retire in the EU27 after Brexit is talking utter nonsense. 
We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit  They say they got it wrong as if it were some honest mathematical error. The truth is it was not an error. It was a deliberate lie designed to frighten and mislead the electorate. 
Britain's brand has been damaged by Brexit says the boss of the world's biggest advertising firm . The hatefulness of Brexit is destroying Britain’s image around the world and for what? Empty promises and lies.#FBPE 
I'm  against #Brexit but judging from the tweet below some remainers are just as vicious & radicalised as some who support brexit - that should worry us all. Moreover it seems that some who fight for remain are fine with austerity for ordinary folk and that isn't winning hearts  
Well, the other Brexit studies were as much use as a chocolate fire guard, very pleased @UKLabourMPs are requesting the real ones.HM Treasury, funded by the tax payer, need release them. We need to know more than fishing is done by the coast. 
Excellent thread illustrating the dangerous and febrile atmosphere surrounding Brexit and why we must continue to fight it, with a recent example from modern world political history #FBPE 
People born in Scotland back independence 52% to 48%  but 32% of Remain voters would rather leave if the alternative to Brexit was Scotland taking charge of its own affairs. So? Free train to Kings Cross on the @scotgov  
There are 60,000 Canadians living in France, 16,000 in Germany and 4,000 in Belgium. Anyone claiming that Brits cannot study, work or retire in the EU27 after Brexit is talking nonsense. 
Yeah Nigel missed out; missed out in the same way Hitler missed out on the Nobel Peace Prize in 1945  Fuckin' deludes. 
Laurie ending up with Amy instead of Jo was the original Brexit #LittleWomen 
Not that it matters, but here it is anyway.More Brits now want to leave the EU than did on the day of the Brexit vote.  
A Labour government might not be as bad as Brexit, claims Heseltine  
The first person to offer an in-out referendum on the EU was Nick Clegg. He organised a national petition in favour of it.  
I’m French and I’ve been living in England for a long time. I’m not worried about Brexit and neither is my family back in France. Stop all the ridiculous scaremongering please 
If Mike Leigh did a film about Brexit, it would look something like this.  
It definitely wouldn’t & the sooner the @Conservatives are gone, the better:Michael Heseltine, a senior Conservative: ‘A @uklabour government wouldn’t be as bad as Brexit’ 
This is my father. He comes from France to visit me at home every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013.According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won't be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he doesn't have a passport.He's my only family.Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas pic.twitter.com/Ww4oV2bJRJ 
Billions being wasted by our #Brexit government and untold billions wasted by industry. The impoverishment of Britain while the NHS and other vital public services crumble. We have to end this madness in 2018!  
Pls RT: Merry Christmas to all #FBPE folk. This is a great time of year to take stock, and spend an hour writing to your MP. Only by MPs seeing the weight of public opinion against Brexit, will some of them change their position. Go on - do it, and help #StopBrexit in 2018. 
."Philip Hammond has come under pressure to publish ANOTHER set of HIDDEN documents relating to how a series of possible Brexit outcomes will impact on the economy". 
A Labour government might not be as bad as Brexit, claims Tory Heseltine. #ToriesOut  
Seems to be a new trend on Twitter. People are declaring they are reformed leave voters. (Interesting there is no evidence of pro Brexit campaigning on any timeline) I’m a leave voter and I’m more convinced now than prior to the vote that I have made the correct choice.  
TREACHEROUS  Heseltine BACKS Dangerous deceitful CORBYN as he says Labour government could BLOCK Brexit  @theresa_may 
That's my father. He comes from France to visit me at home every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013.According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won't be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he does not have a passport.He's my only family.Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas 
Ok. You Brexit males writing in indignantly: when you were little you NEVER wanted to try on female clothes. Perish the thought and your fragile masculinity. 
The “blue passports” fiasco is emblematic of Brexit:Create a myth the EU forced us to have burgundy ones (they didn't). Claim ‘reverting’ to blue ones (we never had) is  a symbol of our independence (it doesn't)Denounce anyone who points out the facts as unpatriotic remoaners. 
As a British Citizen born in Hong Kong, with family in China, I find the whole branding remainers who are "talking down #Brexit" as "traitors" and "saboteurs" disturbing and odd. Especially coming from those who insist this is to defend democracy. 
We’re spending £350m/week on Brexit, let’s scrap it, save our economy and end the revolting poverty that leads to this.  
What do Leave voters think is the priority post-Brexit? It's restoring the death penalty, closely followed by blue passports!Brexit isn't about economics, it's about a powerful dislike of liberalism and social change. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit /1  
Corbyn pinned his colours to the brexit mast when he waved through Art 50 on a 3 line whip, sacked 3 Labour MPs on the single market & abstained on the LDems repeal bill amendment to the repeal bill to give option of remain on final deal - His Silence on Brexit has been deafening  
Oh dear, not again...Project fear was wrong about Brexit, global economic ranking concludes, as UK looks set to overtake France.  
We're kidding ourselves if we think going along with Brexit will ease the division in our country. Brexit is a doorway to the type of society @UKLabour was founded to end.Stop Brexit now @jeremycorbyn 
Project Fear was wrong about Brexit, a major new economic report has concluded  
George Osborne,Today prog, boasts he got it right on Brexit ref. But no contrition though his austerity-1m public service jobs lost, £12bn working benefit cuts- caused 'left behind' to rebel by voting Brexit. Scrooge without redemption:here's my take -  
Why are we cruel to @nick_clegg? He wasn’t the government; he was in a coalition. Mistakes? Point me one politician who hadn't make a mistake? And if Clegg supported Tories policies, what we should say about @jeremycorbyn? Brexit is his and Tories dream. 
The EU is deeply immoral: its tariffs and regulations harm the poor by pushing up living costs  #Brexit 
My mum’s a lifelong Tory, and a regular Mail and Telegraph reader. But yet she actually asked me which way she should vote in the referendum as it was my future she was helping to decide. Massive kudos to her. 
Some Tory MP on Radio 4 PM saying saying we must have #Brexit or Leavers will riot. Honestly, there is no point in continuing with the U.K. if we submit to mob rule. #FBPE 
Congratulations @nick_clegg You sacrificed your entire manifesto.Lost 2/3rds of your voters.Lost your own seat.Have the blood of thousands of austerity deaths on your hands.Helped destroy the nation's economy.Created disharmony that lead to Brexit.Arise Sir Wanker. 
Another day, Another #EU CRISISGerman farmers angry over changes to bloated EU Common Agricultural Policy (CAP)CAP leads to massive food oversupply & food waste.The €58 Billion taxpayer-funded CAP subsidies could be far better spent elsewhere#Brexit 
Where was THIS Brexit on ballot paper?It wasn’tThe vote was narrowly against something, but FOR nothing in particularLegitimacy, much?  
Remainers trying to stop Brexit  
Australia is Britain's second largest Wine import source (after Italy). The EU imposes tariffs on wine imports of up to a massive 32%. How much cheaper would a good Aussie red be if you we didn't have such sky-high tariffs?#Brexit  
The #EU isn’t punishing #Poland. It’s protecting its integrity as a bloc. (As in the #Brexit negotiations)   
May's approach to Brexit is like a child playing Buckaroo. Sooner or later she’ll be a tad too rough – or pile an item too large – and everything will be hurled to the floor.  
'We want a deep partnership' Finland wants even CLOSER relationship with UK after Brexit  
Come on, @jeremycorbyn wake up and smell the putrid stench that is #Brexit .#FBPE#StopBrexit Your voters will NEVER forgive you if you don't. It's not a passing phase - it's elemental & fundamental. 
Pleased to learn that @jginorton touted as the next James Bond has told The Big Issue that his “heart breaks every morning” over Brexit. Online report   You can have a lot of influence, James. Please join the twitter resistance. We can #StopBrexit Thank you 
Weren’t we told that foreigners “felt less welcome” because we voted for Brexit?Funny old world. #despitebrexit 
So the @Conservatives, the party that had an MP writing to Universities to demand to know what they were teaching students about Brexit now, per @JoJohnsonUK, wants a free speech regulator to combat safe-spaces and no-platforming.Can anyone else see this going very badly wrong? 
We got it wrong on #Brexit gloom, economists admit: Buoyant British economy is set to power past France by 2020: via @MailOnline 
Not long! I left the Tories in disgust over their pro Brexit stance and joined the LibDems instead. I couldn’t go for Labour either due to their Brexit views... I will never return to the Tories and will do all i can to ensure they’re hammered in the next election. #stopbrexit 
To understand and perhaps stop Brexit the Lib Dems have to accept & admit that when they were in coalition with the Tories they weren't restraining a   monster; they were the monster. #NickClegg 
A majority of the public wants Brexit, parliamentarians lap up a book on how to stop Brexit. The gap between the political class and ordinary people is enormous right now. If Britain is to remain a democracy, then public opinion must prevail on this matter.  
Heseltine says #Labour might abandon Brexit, and leave the Tories ‘holding the baby’. Fine if they do, but when? Renowned for acting at the 13th hour! 
After #Brexit it'll be so much easier to get trade deals.It is obvious.Far easier to get a trade deal between two countries.Getting a trade deal that 29 countries agree on is a nightmareThat is why EU has NO trade deals with the major economic powers in the world.@AMDWaters 
The more time I waste on Brexit on Twitter, the more I'm persuaded of something fundamentally ominous about the support for Brexit. It goes beyond deceit, dishonesty, ignorance and propaganda, and looks increasingly more like a real conspiracy. 
Brexit promises vs Brexit reality:  
United 0-2 Burnley. Brexit means Brexit. 
Sadly Gina Miller represents 2017's culture of the Establishment's intolerance of a fair democratic vote; legalism over democratic process; advocacy alongside George Soros, Tony Blair, the IMF et al; wilful deception and an absence of integrity #brexit  
If you want to come and live in Britain then learn English, accept British law is sovereign and integrate into our society. It really is that simple.#Brexit #skypapers #Christmas #BoxingDay 
The Conservative peer said Labour might abandon #Brexit, and leave the Tories ‘holding the baby’  
Economist Richard Wellings - "British consumers are forced to buy expensive EU produced goods rather than buying cheaper goods from the rest of the world. And it impacts enormously on poor families." #Brexit  
Brexit. The legacy of baby boomers. 
Dear @jeremycorbyn I have strongly disagreed with fox hunting all my life but this won't destroy our economy, break up the UK, cause a crisis in Gibraltar and Northern Ireland & Ireland. #Brexit will do all of these. Jeremy, #StopBrexit #exitfrombrexit #FBPE #FinalSay 
MAJOR BREAKING: The Spanish government has ordered the withdrawal of thousands of Spanish police officers displaced to Catalonia to prevent the October 1 referendum; official. 
George Osborne has claimed he didn't want a vote on Brexit because he believed Leave would win.  
You can't move a supermarket to Frankfurt. That's why Brexit is a mess for British retailers  
Latest YouGov poll (removing unsure/not vote) Leave  - 55.17%Remain  - 44.83%Support for leaving the EU now higher than in 2016 Referendum. #Brexit 
Shadowy donor group that gave the Democratic Unionist Party £425,000 during Brexit referendum campaign has links to the former Director  General of the Saudi intelligence service – also the father of current  Saudi Ambassador to the UK, Trust the DUP?   #brexit  
A Labour government wouldn't be as bad as Brexit, claims Heseltine  
Secretive DUP Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service | openDemocracy  
So many Corbynites eager to accuse @nick_clegg of enabling Tory austerity, while simultaneously refusing to accept any role for Jeremy Corbyn in enabling Tory Austerity II: Brexit Boogaloo. 
We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit  
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist  
Police report for judge lists over 100 Catalans for possible referendum charges  
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a guide  
A reminder that if the country wasn’t so obsessed with Clegg hating, and Remainers pragmatically voted en masse for Lib Dems in last GE, we would be here on Twitter cheerfully debating about music and books, as Brexit would have already been stopped. 
Given the state of things as they are now  Should the UK still continue with #Brexit? Help #RecycleElectrons in order to #StopBrexit with the #FBPE (AGAIN) 
#EU paid SCUMBAG @nick_clegg proving once again that being a Treacherous #LIAR and a complete political #FAILURE! is no bar to getting a #Knighthood! #Political Honours should be abolished! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @ConHome #TORY #conservatives #UK #Brexit #LibDems #NickClegg 
“Stop being so paranoid - of course parliament won’t try and stop Brexit” 
The greatest #Tory since #WinstonChurchill was #EnochPowell. It was a shame the @Conservatives chose to elect the defeatist #TURD #TedHeath who gave #Britain away to the #EU! instead of a genuine #Patriotic #Conservative like Powell!  #BBC #SKY #BREXIT #UK 
Fun fact - when I was at Warwick we had a referendum on whether to keep the No Platform policy. I led the campaign to keep it, George Eaton led the campaign against. Students kept it. 
Aside from Brexit name a key objectionable Tory policy that wasn't legislated between 2010 and 2015 
Wages and productivity both fell when he was deputy PM. His non-entitiness enabled Brexit; the welfare state was massively rolled back as a % of GDP; home ownership went down; homelessness went up.  
#EnochPowell predicted #Brexit! : "When they saw behind the facade, when they penetrated to the realities,  they stood up to fight for the continued existence of their nation -  and that is what will happen"  #BBC #SKY #UK #EU @ConHome @Conservatives #Tory 
Much like #BREXIT, it appears #KANEXIT was a failure.The grass wasn’t greener, and it cost people a lot. 
Now can we do the same for voting in a referendum please?  
The Establishment is surpassing itself today, with Nick Clegg getting a knighthood + Parliament voting as 'book of the year' his tome on 'how to stop Brexit”. A big up-yours to the voters. 
#Brexit seems to be all about stunts and soundbites. Where is the serious leadership? We stand to lose our research success, manufacturing industries and current trading freedoms. For the hope of some new deals?  
Furthermore, we are not going to get a leftist Brexit, however desirable you think it would be. We're going to get a hard right, bonfire of rights, tax-reducing, harms the worst off Brexit. Fighting for Lexit, even from good motives, is to aid and abet this. 
If the government wants to tackle free speech, maybe focus on the politicians, journalists and public figures branded 'traitors' for daring to admit they still don't believe in Brexit - and the poisonous tabloids who seek to silence them every day with fear and threat 
Britain to surge past FRANCE in economic rankings as Brexit impact 'less than feared'  
Wah ha ha ha ha ha@UNHumanRights They smash their grandmothers in the face with batons and lock up people who organise a referendumSpain's seat on the Council makes you a joke (again)Your 20th Century organisation is a joke  
It's facts like this that confirm the UK public should never have been trusted with a referendum 
Terrible Boxing Day Brexit row in the house over the salad we’re serving with lunch. 48% - romaine. 52% - leaves. 
Never will so much be sacrificed by so many for the lies of so few Give People the #FinalSay on #Brexit Deal in 2018 @DavidLammy 
Here is what the Croatian passport looks like. It is blue. They are in the EU. It's amazing the things you learn when you move out of Brexit Town and live in reality.  
Is it any shock that the government is totally betraying us on #Brexit when it's stuffed to the brim with TREACHEROUS #Remain campaigners? We need real  leadership in this country! #BBC #SKY @Conservatives @CCHQPress @ConHome #TORY #conservatives #CONSERVATIVEPARTY @theresa_may 
What an outrage inviting the anti royalty globalist Obama to the Royal Wedding. Put this to a referendum if you want to see a 100% No vote. What an offence to the current president. 
How can a man who fails at most of the things he attempts be #knighted?  #NickClegg betrayed millions of #students, lost 50 of his party's seats at the GE, lost the argument in the #referendum and then lost his own seat in #Parliament  #BBC #SKY #NEWS #UK 
' I want an exit from brexit' nearly at 80,000 names  please sign and share. RT #FBPE 
Brexit studies were 'being prepared a year before Davis said they didn't exist, so if they do exist Dodgy David Davis lied to Parliament & he must resign. If they don't exist he is in dereliction of his duty and must resign  
Poor Wings Over Scotland.Spunked the christmas club money on a poll with a Brexit question and still never managed to get his silver bullet.  
I wonder where all your detractors below will be in a few years when Brexit will be seen to have been Britain's greatest moment since 1688. Probably the same place as all those who insisted we had to stay in the ERM or join the Euro. None so blind as those who refuse to see. 
We’re getting out just in time! : EU could use Brexit to forge deals with Turkey and Ukraine 
"You must choose between a million food bank users or a million food bank users plus Brexit. This is the politics I offer you."  
Warnings of post-Brexit price rises unless UK can copy EU trade deals  
‘EU is DEEPLY immoral!’ Economist says Brussels regulations impact the POOR the mostBRITONS will be free to purchase cheaper goods from around the world after Brexit and escape the European Union’s “deeply immoral system”,    @theresa_may 
Project fear was wrong about Brexit, global economic ranking concludes, as UK looks set to overtake France #premium 
13 Catalan school teachers called to declare in court for allowing in class a discussion on the 1-O police repression during the referendum. Ideological depurations like in Spain's darker times.  
Make no mistake had there been no lib dem coalition with the Tories in 2010, we would not be dealing with brexit today. #NickClegg's lust for power at any cost set the wheels in motion for our present nightmare. 
#EU regulations impact POOR families the most.Biggest cost of EU is British consumers forced to buy expensive EU goods instead of cheaper goods from rest of world.It impacts enormously on poor families.So EU is a really deeply IMMORAL system#Brexit 
Tesco launch their new range of post brexit fashion @Tesco #fbpe #stopbrexit 
Delia here decided to talk about her #brexit regret first thing Christmas morning. She sets out her reasons for her #leave vote in a number of tweets which I will thread below. All good reasons but now wants to #Remain - reason 1  #FBPE #stopbrexit 
Brexit deal could be template for EU ties to Ukraine, Turkey, Germany's Gabriel says  
Millions of workers could face even longer working weeks. No-one voted for Brexit to hand power over to bad bosses.  
Vine savages Remoaner-in-Chief Tony BlairJeremy Vine: “When we ask the question if Blair should continue to give his opinion in public - then our listeners freak out."“Nobody, really NOBODY wants to EVER see or hear from Tony Blair again.”#Brexit #EU 
George Osborne claims he didn't want the EU referendum in the first place.  
It turns out London's bankers are more reluctant than anticipated to move abroad  
Brits are being systematically brainwashed by govt, Corbyn Labour, & the media into believing that Brexit is 1) a fait accompli2)  the democratic *will of the people*Talk of it being wonderful downgraded to *won't be a disaster* (maybe). Even if it were true, why choose it? 
The Royal Navy defends Britain. Meanwhile the Tory government hands Putin a huge victory by pressing on with #Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Rees-Mogg spot on again: Many forecasts are honestly wrong, but unfortunately many of the forecasts around Brexit were politically motivated.We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit  via 
."The dying kick of Ulster unionism, hastened by the disastrous British government Brexit policy, is the biggest Irish story of 2017 or any year". 
Britain predicted to overtake France in world economic league table says Centre 4 Economic Studies. another powerful endorsement for Brexit 
I completely agree with Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn on this. It would be great if @UKLabour were to oppose this barbaric 'sport', as a Labour government to ensure this is permanently ruled out. Trouble is, Jeremy's position on Brexit permanently rules out a Labour government.  
.@melouise5 here voted #leave in #euref but is concerned that you cannot trust this govt & is worried for what the #brexit future will bring, she is another #remainernow - she is not alone & people like her should be applauded for speaking out & encouraged to take positive steps! 
Poor @Nigel_Farage.  No #knighthood, dumped by both wife and mistress, and only a fat EU pension to live off.  Here's a cartoon to cheer him up. #Brexit #StopBrexit #NigelFarage #NickClegg #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE 
The rich #brexit donors who bankrolled the #LeaveEU campaign now want an exemption for the tax they owe: 
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist  
Until fairly recently there wasn't much support for my tweets criticizing Corbyn's #Brexit stance. Now they are just as popular as my anti-Tory tweets. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
The sixth most-read Spectator article of the year: James Bartholomew on the liberal elite’s reaction to Brexit and Trump  
FARCE: Nick Clegg to be awarded a knighthood whilst Brexit hero Nigel Farage misses out?  
Should @Nigel_Farage have received a knighthood for his services for Brexit? - Nigel Farage snubbed for a knighthood for services to Brexit - again  ' | via @telegraph  @FOR_UKIP @UKIP RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
If Blair & Clegg think Brexit can be overturned then why does a parliament with a majority of remainer MP's not overturn it? The answer is simple, it can´t. Parliament gave the people the right to vote and they have voted. The result is cast in stone. The idiots will continue tho 
We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit: Buoyant British economy is set to power past France by 2020  
BREXIT GLOOM: Britain falls another place in world economic rankings to seventh as India soars / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Disgusted how the establishment are rewarding the anti Brexit brigade. It shows the sheer contempt they show for us . pic.twitter.com/AvNvHJ8b0p 
“When considering its overall brand, the UK also ranked third out of 50 nations, a position it has held since 2011 despite...Brexit “ Good old financially failing @guardian 
"Isn't it amazing that so many of the things that Brexit supporters claimed were motives for their vote to leave are turning out to be 100% correct ? The truth is slowly coming out.." — @ JohnLongstride   
How on hell is Nick Clegg getting a knighthood, this man constantly goes against the British public and put all his efforts into reversing brexit, having treasonous meetings with EU officials to subvert the will of the people. what an insult to the British people this is. 
Nick #Clegg gets a #Knighthood for destroying the LibDems, helping to destroy a coalition government, losing millions, losing a safe seat & helping to sabotage #Brexit. Missed anything? @nick_clegg 
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist Great story from @rowenamason 
Parliament votes #NickClegg book “How to stop Brexit” the book of the year. The Establishment to give #NickClegg a knighthood. Do you see how it is them vs us? 
Turns out Brexit 'independence' will be bending over backwards to not offend the fragile ego of the Big Orange  
"The modern Telegraph is obsessed with Brexit because, in a very real sense, it was the incubator for it."  
Lefties slagging off Nick Clegg this morning: how is this demented Brexit Tory government, unmitigated by his influence, going for you? 
Many people voted Leave in the genuine belief that it would add £350m a week to NHS funds.Now they know that was a lie.Brexit is already losing the NHS staff and funds, paving the way to its being sold off. Those who voted Leave to support the NHS are changing their minds. 
Project fear was wrong about Brexit, global economic ranking concludes, as UK looks set to overtake France' | via @telegraph 
Is this the political equivalent of the hokey cokey?! Whether they exist or not they must. We need the #Brexit Truth the whole Truth & nothing but the Truth. Davis is either a liar or an incompetent which seems to be standard operating procedure. #FinalSay  
Brexit actually helped the economy!  
This is Jo, she voted #leave in #euref but she sees the harm #brexit is doing to the UK & regrets her vote! @Wilson2008Mrs thank you for having the courage to publically say you made a mistake, the key thing is MPs are made aware there are so many like you! #FBPE #remainernow 
How can a man who fails at most of the things he attempts be knighted? Nick Clegg betrayed millions of students, lost 50 of his party's seats at the GE, lost the argument in the referendum and then lost his own seat in Parliament.  
From the govt which sought names and addresses of academics who spoke against Brexit....  
About that "first big win" for #Brexit supporters ...#BluePassports #BluePassport #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE 
Seems a fairly balanced analysis but neither the Canada option nor the EEA offer beter than we have...why the hell is the UK throwing away the Best Possible Deal?!Binding #FinalSay 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit & #Remain 
Nick Clegg who knows absolutely nothing about the EU despite having been an MEP. Everything he said during the referendum was either a bare faced lie or inexcusable ignorance.Farage on the other hand has been proved RIGHT on every aspect.  
This was the year Brexit began to bite  pic.twitter.com/SkbupIFwp4 
Has the penny dropped yet? Great article by .@JolyonMaugham making sense of the ‘inheritance’ tax story. Immensely wealthy men standing up for immensely wealthy men in a paper owned by immensely wealth men. That’s #Brexit for you.#StopBrexit 
OMG, Brexit Basher Nick Clegg gets a knighthood from the Queen, while Nazi luvvin' Nige ("please make it be me") gets the Royal snub. I'm even going to use emojis #StopBrexitSaveBritain #StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow 
"I was always quite gloomy about the referendum."@George_Osborne talks arts and politics with @TamaraRojo1 Download the full interview here:  
Wrong. @UKLabour members & voters overwhelmingly anti #Brexit. Unions increasingly worried about impact. Even Unite. Check out TUC statements 
Why do people keep claiming that the turnout at the EU referendum was anything special?It was 72.2%.#r4today 
#Brexit - Leave & thrive. We got it wrong on Brexit gloom, economists admit 
Great new way to start your day...sneer at a picture of the new blue passport and remember that its taking away all the strength,freedoms and rights of your present EU one.Then wonder why our idiotic Govt is pursuing brexit! 
Oh Charlie. I speak as a British person, Mr Obama only spoke the truth about Brexit, the red carpet would be well and truly laid out. As for Donny, he will see in February by his lacklustre welcome at best, outright protest at worst, how unwelcome he is. 
We were WRONG! Doom-mongers finally admit to being TOO gloomy on Brexit in major U-turn  @theresa_may 
I think 2017 has been a real referendum on the importance of great coaching, and also an exposé on how little of it there is in the NFL  
Fair enough, I just think singling out 1 politician who actually tried to portray the EU as a positive as being responsible for creating Brexit when both major parties have blamed it for UK problems *and* have both lied about "sorting out immigration" seems a little unfair 
We can only be the nation that drives the reform if we stay in the EU - currently though our government are running away from a challenge - a flight that started with Cameron and that stupid referendum - such cowardice feels very un-british to me. 
Britain Has a Delusional View of Itself on the Global Stageby Patrick Cockburn#Britain #EU #Brexit @UnzReview pic.twitter.com/TDAgsL7EBe 
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist  
Devastating stuff from @thatginamiller. This fight is not just about Brexit. It's to stop self-interested extremists destroying any positive values in politics and society.  
Seriously, are you ill? Nick clegg is a catastrophic political failure who fooled a lot of people and then betrayed them all by becoming a Tory poodle who facilitated brexit, austerity and the destruction of our public services. If he any guts he would refuse this 
Awe never mind - Corbyn will be remembered for the politics of appeasement on Brexit as he voted with the Tories - with 3 line whip on Art 50 and even sacked 3 of his own MPs - or abstained!  Biggest betrayal of the Nation.  
I left Labour for the same reason. Corbyn was a breath of fresh air in UK politics. How sad that he is willing to destroy the UK economy and standing in the world because he supports brexit.  
"Murdoch, Desmond, Rothermere, the Barclay Brothers - Professors of Political Communications at Loughborough University analysed the referendum and found that 80% of these media were for Leave and only 20% for Remain" 
Great Christmas news from the Daily Mail! Everyone who isn't an idiot is a member of the elite!#bluepassport #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
I think this is only fair. After all @nick_clegg is as responsible for Brexit as any other leading politician   
Brexit studies were 'being prepared' a year before Davis said they didn't exist  
Clegg's knighthood is doing a great job of irritating both the Brexit gammon and the far left, and therefore must officially be declared a Good Thing. 
UK society goals 2018. Add your own.1) Tories out 2) Daily Mail gone3) Trump out.4) Brexit reversed5) Labour in 6) Tax on corps raised 7) Welfare budget increased8) NHS services fixed9) Critical thinking mandatory in primary curriculum 10) 16 yr olds vote11) Scot indy 
That Nick Clegg is to get a knighthood tells you everything about the cosy backslapping set-up of the crooked British political elite. Sold the country out to be in cahoots with the Tories and his behaviour over Brexit is a disgrace.  Deserves ignominy not recognition. 
Brexit will destroy our car industry.  
@thatginamiller describes for us the malign forces behind Brexit. There is nothing British about Brexit. There is corrupt influence, self-interest, profiteering & lies. #StopBrexit #FBPE  
How on bleeding earth is Nick Clegg getting a knighthood , this man has constantly gone against the British public and put all his efforts into destroying brexit and treacherous behind closed doors meetings with EU officials, what an insult to the British people. 
Farage wins the referendum gets nothing. Nick Clegg loses, frustrates democracy and is knighted. #NewYearsHonours are way beyond a joke now 
Brendan O'Neill on why the steadfast Brexit voter is spiked's person of the year: 
I vehemently disagree with Nick Clegg on Brexit and his hypocrisy around Britain's relationship with the EU, but he took his party from one of protest, putting political point scoring aside, to act in the national interest. It's for that I think it's right he gets a knighthood. 
In 1983 Blair pledged to leave the EEC (EU) WITHOUT a Referendum.Now Blair wants a SECOND #Brexit Referendum to keep us in the EU.Consistency is not one of Blair's strong points.  
Blue passports are the beginning of the end of Brexit. Nothing is more dead in politics than a policy that has started to evoke titters. 
#MrsBrownsBoys voted best British  sitcom of 21st century should give a huge clue to the #Brexit vote.  
@NadineDorries “take back control of our passports”. Brexit goes full on parody 
Poor Nigel. Rejected for knighthoods. Forced into poverty. Living in a bedsit. No friends. No family. Can only afford a tiny tv. Brexit’s been rough on him.  
Brexit’s other looming cliff edge – The loss of EU funding used to help poorer parts of the UK has had far less attention than other ill effects of Brexit. But it will soon be hard to ignore the problem.   
EU's chief Brexit negotiator shoots down Nigel Farage's blue passport joy in one tweet  
A woman celebrates after casting her vote in the Catalonia independence referendum in October. See more of our pictures of the year here:  
A telly on the microwave and too much whisky for 3pm. Increasingly I feel Brexit was one man's existential cry for help.  
Exposed: this shocking example of the vile, crude and relentless Leave lie machine that helped to tip the balance in the rigged referendum. We need to spread the word about this book.   
A major British celebrity actually cited their desire for going back to incandescent bulbs as a justification for Brexit, since the EU adopted efficiency regulations, and people didn’t like the early transition technologies like CCFL. 
I'm safe folks. I'm down from the motorway, as I watched those cars speed by, the light hit me (full beam). I'm an alpha male, ex-forces, a tough man. Suicide isn't for me, I've got a Blue Brexit passport coming. Up the Granite Brexit, up the city! 
Siri, show me a visual metaphor for how sad and lonely Britain will be after Brexit  
'We want a deep partnership' Finland wants even CLOSER relationship with UK after Brexit - Express  
With 80% of under 25's now saying they'd vote 'Remain' in a 2nd referendum, I would suggest you put Money on your being Wrong. 
Now imagine how you'd feel if we'd won a constitution-changing referendum off the back of that claim  
Gosh, now you know how Remainers feel watching your show when you allow a Brexit spokesperson to spout some utter bollocks unchallenged  
Far from bringing the NHS £350m extra funding, Brexit will lead to its breakup and privatisation. This the US model, which has one of the most expensive, and one of the worst, health systems in the developed world.Above all, Brexit is a con trick on the NHS. 
Stood your ground. Showed aggression. The queen would be proud. True brexit brawler. Will have a pint on you tonight. Carling. British brewed. PB 
Remember all the times #Leave leaders promised we wouldn't leave the Single Market. They were lies designed to win over wavering voters and win the referendum by deceit.No mandate for a #Brexit built on a mountain of #LeaveLies.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Christmas day and still seeing rows over the monarchy and Brexit  Even the English and Germans came out the trenches for a kick about together Have a fucking day off will ya 
#honestpoll Can #Labour deliver on #NHS whilst still supporting #brexit ? Please #vote and #retweet. Follow me for more. 
'I have no choice but to become French' | Latest Brexit news and top stories - The New European  
That's my father. He comes from France to visit me at home every 3 months since I moved to the UK in 2013.According to post #Brexit #ImmigrationBill, he won't be able to do so after #BrexitDay because he does not have a passport.He's my only family.Thanks Brexiters. Merry Xmas 
– Keep Boris Johnson in Foreign office by the time #Brexit is completed, Britain will be in total isolation - 2017 was the most embarrassing year for Britain abroad on all levels - A Circus on tour! 
Economists: The only Brexit positive so far has been an increase in tourism due to the weak £.Brexit MPs: Hold my Egg Nog.  
Hey, you, that's right, you. That £20 you got from your racist Brexit uncle is dirty money. Why not donate it to us instead & we'll clean it for you 
Blind Bulgarian mystic who 'predicted 9/11, ISIS and Brexit also forecast two major events in 2018'  
. we will b e able to live and work in the EU after Brexit if we have got something to offer. more importantly we won't be overwhelmed by Eastern Europeans looking for bar work  
David Jo Brexit: the infamous Russian troll account. Just sayin’  
If Scottish voters had elected a government that wanted a referendum, Westminster refused, the Scots held an advisory referendum, W/minster sent in armed cops to beat up voters and Scots politicians were imprisoned then yes, I'd expect the EU to intervene if we were still members 
Threw the #Brexit grenade into the middle of Xmas dinner. Waited until the wine and cheese (Spanish and French respectively). Oh dear. Not a good idea. 
No Brussels with my dinner today. Brexit means Brexit 
Y'know that thing about never discussing religion or politics? #notetoself check political persuasion of in-laws before opining on #Brexit over Christmas dinner  
."The xenophobic tone of the 2016 referendum campaign did serious harm that needs to be repaired". 
Britain's brand has been damaged by Brexit says the boss of the world's biggest advertising firm  
Yawn. Of all the lies that were told over Brexit, this is by some margin insignificant. And at least it was rectified. Haven’t seen you tweeting so much about the outrageous and far more consequential and damaging  lies  from a Sec of State relating to the Brexit Impact studies. 
Nigel Farage upset he hasn't received a knighthood for services to #Brexit. In other news, continuing anger at lack of honours for those who started the Great Fire of London and The Black Death 
This Christmas, @NicolaSturgeon gave Scotland Baby Boxes, ambition, hope and the promise of independence.This Christmas, Theresa May gave Scotland Brexit, austerity, despair and the threat of direct rule.#Referendum2018 
I've said before I know full well there's a real possibility Remain may not win this, that Brexit will go through.But right now we're still in and for a ton of us who had little to begin with fighting to stay in makes sense. 
If you're in a position to have already moved to the continent over Brexit and are suddenly declaring that people must see Remain as a lost cause and fight for your right to your new life, please stop and think why that might get people's backs up. 
How #Brexit will damage UK through weakening US investment  @RANDCorporation backs up @CEP_LSE FDI research 
Brexit Christmas dinner coming up. No Brussels. 
The author claims Brexit ruined Christmas dinner, citing the reduction in net migration to the U.K. by 103,000 in the year to June 2017 as bad news. Speak for yourself! I have thoroughly enjoyed my Christmas dinner & am having a great time with my family.   
People talking about dividing your families by talking Brexit over Christmas dinner. Listen, some of us are ethnic. We’ve had 6 screaming arguments over correct rice cooking tekkers by midday. 
As Brexitic separatists attempt to drag Britain back into a new era of splendid isolation, let’s take a moment to appreciate every person who is fighting tooth and nail to keep Britain Great. If you oppose Brexit, you must join the most important fight of this generation. 
After talk of the blue passports returning we ponder what else we could bring back in a post-Brexit Britain...  
Will we discuss Brexit over Christmas dinner? One of my sons may bring it up – he usually tells me to get a move on with it says @GiselaStuart  
There is no point in Corbyn and Labour claiming to be opposed to Murdoch and Dacre, when they support a #Brexit built on a mountain of right wing press hate and lies. If you want to oppose Murdoch & Dacre you have to oppose their prime project.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
"The Liberal Democrats. . aren’t democrats at all. And they’re only ‘liberal’ until the electorate makes a decision they oppose".Great piece by @LiamHalligan on the Unreconciled Remainers' continuing determination to derail Brexit. 
In 2018 I hope the masks drop and people see the real agenda behind Brexit  
Farage runs through London screaming STOP BREXIT after visit from ghosts of Christmas Past, Present and Future   
Great stuff. I predict that in ten years time most remainers will lie and say they voted Brexit, so obvious will it be that it was the right thing to do.  
Anyone who says the #LeaveLies don't matter is wrong. The only reason for Brexit is that people were conned into voting for it. This is not democracy. #stopbrexit 
This time last year hard #Brexit was alive and well, this year it's been stuffed.Hard #Brexit is dead, maybe even Brexit is dead.The majority of people aren't stupid, support for Brexit is only going one way so let's welcome the regretters & see Brexit off in 2018Merry #FBPE 
The people of Swansea have changed their minds on Brexit and most now want to remain in the EU, says local MP Geraint Davies. He wants the public to get a final say.“People voted for £350m extra a week to the NHS but now we are losing that because of Brexit."- Wales Online 
How will Christmas  dinner be different after Brexit ? no  Brussels !!! 
Merry Christmas @theresa_may.You had a rough year, don't assume nobody noticed.EU made Brexit harder than necessary.UK media are all over you like you're Trump's nasty twin.MPs with alternate agendas are undermining you at every turn.It'll get easier, keep up the good work. 
BREAKING NEWS: following #Brexit the UK Govt have promised they will reissue the Austin Allegro.....as all other imported cars will become far too expensive.  
‘Brexit voters have been lied about, trashed and demonised more than any political group in living British memory. And yet they’re standing by their convictions. That’s inspiring’Brendan O’Neill on spiked’s person of the year: the unflinching Brexiteer 
Bit more #IndigenousX 2017 retrospective. Some late night reading (or Boxing Day reading) from Gary Foley that was published as part of our Sorry Day/Anniversary of the ‘67 referendum editorial of the Guardian AU opinion section  
Interesting how civilians actively help freedom fighters ('#India calls them militants') escape a raid. This is real-time, ongoing referendum where people overwhelmingly vote against a military occupation. #KashmirReferendum 
Jesus,born today,would’ve empathised on Brexit. He lost a popular vote against Barabas based on lies often written on the sides of chariots. 
2017 was the year of politcal Idiocracy. Brexit , Trump,  Erdogan. The more insane a political figure was,  the higher the chances of being elected. The ignorance of the people who helped elect these liars,  rapists,  extremists & racists is the biggest future threat for humans. 
Thank you for having the courage to be so honest. 2018 will be the year the Brexit lies won't work anymore.Together we are strong. 
What would Jesus do about Brexit and Trump? @campbellclaret spoke to the Archbishop of Canterbury. 
To all Leavers, Merry BrexmasTo Remainers, Seasons Bleatings#brexit 
BREAKING NEWS: following #Brexit Santa has asked to keep his EU passport as he feels the UK 'Blue' version will only delay his travel around the world!  
BREXIT: In 2018 I hope the masks drop and people see the real agenda behind Brexit / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
This was the year Brexit began to bite  pic.twitter.com/vf29i9e8Sn 
Russia interfered in the #Brexit referendum, but there's no evidence to suggest enough to swing the result. What is important is that politicians are knowingly helping Russia in its hybrid war on Western democracy by pressing on with Brexit.So much for patriotism!#StopBrexit 
My 12y old daughter bought this as a Xmas present for me in Germany. Its official....the UK is a laughing stock everywhere...even for 12y olds. #Brexit  
BREAKING NEWS: in the #QueensSpeech today Queen-Elizabeth-the-last will announce that following #Brexit the UK Govt will reissue Green Shield Stamps.....phasing out Britcoin & aiming to replace the €Euro by 2025.  
Toblerone for brexit I mean breakfast 
2 - Imran Khan say Military Regimes/Military Dictators Manufacture Fake Political Leaders and exactly that's why Imran Khan supported General Pervez Musharraf's Sham & Fraudulent Referendum in 2002 #ImranKhan #Musharraf #PTI #NayaPakistan #MartialLaw #Democracy #Pakistan 
Merry Christmas to everyone except Tories, TERFs, and Brexit voters!  xxx 
Merry Christmas to you all. Everyone of you. Brexit or Remain. United or City. Lancashire or Yorkshire. Aussie or Pom. Jedi or Sith. Heaton/Abbott fans or the tone deaf. CBA or MOJ. Every single one of you. Except Grayling and Farage. Not so much them. 
"This is our last Christmas Day with a proper man Doctor Who. I didn't vote Brexit for this shit, mate." pic.twitter.com/2Yl3OQiaBv 
Farage runs through London screaming STOP BREXIT after visit from ghosts of Christmas Past, Present and Future  
Legal action by Scots politicians to reverse Brexit gets go-ahead #StopBrexit #FBPE 
He’s definitely a keeper! My #ChristmasDay gifts arrived on a Brexit unicorn!! Now having a day off fighting to #StopBrexit & enjoy a family day of far too much food and booze! Merry Christmas one and all  
Four 2017 things about my 2017• featured in Breitbart as ‘the ugly face of Remain’• criticised by Remain as ‘the arrogant stupidity of Leave’• ‘outed’ by Mensch as a Russian Brexit shill• accused by Putin fans of being paid by George SorosMerry Christmas everyone  
'Tis the Season of Goodwill!I wish you all - even the miserable gloomy negative Remoaners - a truly Brexitastic Brexmas!Viva Brexit! 
Since Brexit vote, the UK has shot straight from being at the top of the range of G7 economies for growth.  
Swiss president urges referendum to clarify relations with the EU  
It's Christmastime and there's no need to be afraid. Apart from spiders, heights, burglars, muggers, Brexit, Trump, nuclear war, non-nuclear war, getting a foot sucked into an escalator, social anxiety and accidentally tweeting a DM. 
With a bit of luck no EU/Brexit bollox on here for a bit... 
Brexit also cost Nigel a Nobel Prize in Physics, it’s not fair. 
Philip is her husband Charles is her son,Teresa May is her PM,Jeremy Corbyn may yet become PM,Donald Trump is President of her country’s closest ally,David Davis is negotiating Brexit,Brexit may result in the breakup of the UK,And, she only has 4 cocktails a day?  
Cannot believe the priest tonight at Christmas mass thought it’d be a good opportunity to tell everyone to vote against the 8th amendment referendum because it’d be killing God’s children. Safe to say I’ll never be going back there xo #repealthe8th 
These few lines from Queen Elizabeth in 1972 really underline the foolishness and short-sightedness of Brexit is... and it doesn't even mention the economy  
DO WE NEED A REFERENDUM AFTER BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS?Both sides made it up before the #brexit voteOne even had buses they knew were covered in liesOnce talks end we need a three way referendum voteOn whether to...Accept the deal & goLeave with no dealRemain in the EU,# 
My thoughts are with talk radio presenters who will be spending all Christmas  eve/day talking to angry strangers about Brexit . Merry Christmas everyone x 
The reason your future is blighted is because of a Tory government and a Labour opposition helping them. You won't change the Tories but you can change Labour. Make 2018 a bollocks to brexit year even if JC thinks otherwise. 
Iceland has the Christmas tradition of alJolabokaflod, or the "Christmas Book Flood," where people give each other books on Christmas Eve and then spend the night reading.  The rest of us have the usual reading of anti-Brexit retweets. 
This Twitter account was born of #Brexit. Thanks to all the abundant #Remainer wit, smarts & intellect. I know I stand on the right side of the argument because of you all. To all open-minded #Leavers we won’t judge if you #Bregret. Merry Christmas all! 
Unashamedly re-tweeting this authoritative analysis of the demographic of Brexit voting because:a) it annoys Brexiteers;b) it’s factual and makes them uncomfortable;c) see a&b.Happy Christmas.  
Absolutely: “Given Labour’s standing in the national polls currently, the party’s position on Brexit could well be the crucial factor determining whether or not they taste victory at the next election.”#StopBrexit Labour Leadership. via @timeshighered 
2016 referendum, only one entails anyone losing rights and freedoms, and that was the outcome we got. Those who voted to Leave (if they get their Brexit) have taken rights from those of us who voted Remain.  Moreover, as stated above, Parliament has not consented to this. 7/n 
It is a distraction from the real issues and means politicians have an excuse not to tackle them. For example £3 billion ear marked for the brexit negotiations. Could that not be better understood helping the poor rather than paying lawyers? 
It's now Christmas Day. In the spirit of reconciliation and love, and the history of truces at Christmas, I'd like to reach out and say "fuck Brexit". 
Jesus Christ of Bethlehem. Good Brexit boy. 
Some people have queried why I compared @theresa_may with Hyacinth Bucket. All about Keeping up Apearances that #Brexit is going fine #FBPE 
The Prime Minister calls for unity & pride in Christianity while the Labour leader wishes for "the kind of society we want", whilst neither had the balls to mention the 60 ton elephant in the room, Brexit. The very thing to ensure disunity of our society. 
The Spanish state keeps them locked up for "rebellion". They just pushed for a referendum. I call it "freedom of speech".  
Brexit has not yet had a dramatic impact on pensioners' migration patterns, but the long-term impact is uncertain  
If Santa were real, he would bring me a pill, to stop the divided between leave & remain,  santa would decree that we should all just agree, that the UK must remain because brexit is insane 
Mine would be Brexit Judas O’Shakespeare.  
I don’t know if Phil Hammond is behind enforcing the taxation due by the billionaires who backed Brexit,but,if he is,he’s a political genius 
Ringo Starr backed Brexit.Ringo Starr is getting a knighthood.Nigel Farage isn't getting a knighthood because he is a nicotine-stained, racist, misogynist, duplicitous, deluded, self-important, anti-British fuckstick.  
British bureaucrats must 'kick addiction' to Brussels red tape after Brexit #premium 
“And I’m charging you double cos you voted for Brexit” 
What future for #Christmas in #Brexit #Britain ?- #Santa faces being held up by customs - elves no longer protected by #working time directive- #Reindeer no longer recognised as sentient beings (and their pet passports no longer valid for UK) 
The only thing good thing that Brexit might bring is that Colin Firth's dude might not have been able to do his work n maybe all the horrible deeds of Love Actually might not have happened. That film is a disgrace.  
My advice to HardBrexit patriots having to sit across the dinner table with remainer family members this Christmas is to act like winners. The victors DO NOT crawl to the vanquished. Our passports are blue, our brexit is hard & our Brussel sprouts have been renamed Brexit sprouts 
What to caption this Xmas tweet? "The Weiner Takes It All" perhaps? This party nibble's called "a pig in a blanket" but that seems a more apt description of Harvey Weinstein - the chauvinist pig in a blanket. Hope you all enjoy a happy, Trump-Brexit-Korean-missile-free Chrissy. x  
Merry Christmas everyone. Thanks to all our supporters and friends promoting a Smart Brexit. We planted a lot of seeds this year, next year they should grow and bloom. Have a great festive season.  
What's a Hard Brexit Christmas? It's eating goose not turkey. It's renaming Brussels sprouts to Brexit Sprouts (No British man eats a vegetable named after the European capital), it's having watery gravy and walloping a remainer family member if they pipe up. Best Wishes, Bob! 
What next! How can the UK treat EU citizens with such contempt.Brexit MPs suggest UK visa charges for EU nationals  via @NewsNowUK#StopBrexit #citizensrights #FBPE 
Just in case there's a conversation over Christmas dinner tomorrow...The EU Referendum was a UK-wide plebiscite where every vote, wherever it was cast, had an equal value. Votes were then counted and the result was:  17,410,742 Leave16,141,241 RemainA majority of 1,269,501 
It's a disgrace HMRC have felt compelled to respond to stories in Telegraph & other right wing papers regarding #Brexit donors' tax.2 Cabinet Ministers, Gove & Johnson, have helped put civil servants in this position.They should resign over this, but they won't!  
#Brexit Britain  
Excellent and informative thread on the EU democratic process (from tweet 3 onwards) by @GuitarMoog#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Almost two-thirds of businesses say changes to the jobs market will make Britain less attractive to investors  
Normally my suicide plans reach an advanced stage on Christmas eve. Some years my ex forces spirit pulls me back, some years the memory of my Maureen does. But this year its the thought of travelling to Benidorm with my pal Arthur with a Hard Brexit Blue Passport! Merry Christmas 
Dead right by @DanielJHannan:The current Brexit transition proposal would in effect turn Britain into a vassal state, a mere colony, of the increasingly authoritarian #EU.Which, of course, is precisely what the anti-Brexit Unreconciled-Remainers want. 
Brexit will make this worse.  
By that logic, millions were “marginalised” for over 40 years after being sold something by liar politicians and it manifesting into something altogether different.You lost the referendum. Get over it you whingeing child.  
United Kingdom says Nigel Farage supporting Brexit has cost them their livelihood. #FBPE #LBC 
The Post Office have unveiled the design for the Brexit stamp!  
And please, please, please can we have an election and referendum free 2018 ... 
Perhaps. But latest revisions put us joint G7 1st in 2016, contrary to every mainstream and Brexit-related forecast. And who knows where we’ll be when Q4 comes in plus subsequent revisions.  
Give the gift of helping to #StopBrexit.Join the Remaindeers and #FollowBackProEU #FBPE to build the network to sleigh Brexit... RT & a very Merry Christmas to all our followers.   
£72 BILLION: The cost of Brexit is already turning Britain into a second-rung nation  via @ what a waste imagine how many hospitals houses or schools we could build with that 
Remember Boris saying there was "not a sausage" of meddling in the EU referendum?  
Wishing you wonderful people a relaxing and refreshing break with family & friends. Let's recharge our batteries and return more coordinated and organised than ever before for the 2018 Big Brexit Battle. We can do this! #StopBrexit#StopBrexitHour#StopBrexitSaveBritain#FBPE 
So then, how are the Brexit optimists feeling now? Merry Christmas and Happy New Year Everyone!   Brexit is going to get even harder in 2018!  (10/10) 
“After Brexit, we should see a return to something like health for the ignored and enfeebled Foreign Office.”Oh. 40% cut to the FCO budget announced for 2018.(8/10) 
Marr: “whether or not Brexit can be made to work financially will depend to a large extent on our ability to strike an early UK-US trade agreement”Oh. How’s that looking?T.R.U.M.P.(6/10) 
This English town backed Brexit. Now its Polish workers are leaving  
Now you are totally delusional.  No one fears Corbyn.  He has just lost an election against the most unpopular government since end of WWII.  Labour is finished, they've played COPY the Tories on the KEY issue once too often - Brexit  
Nicky Morgan: 'I didn't enjoy being a Brexit rebel, but we are there for the 52pc and 48pc' #premium  
Wishing everyone a Merry Christmas. Unless you voted for Brexit, in which case, go fuck yourself x 
No Polish troops were allowed to take part the the London Victory Celebrations either. Seems "No Polish" is a way of English life. What a sick little country England is. #Brexit 
Brexit could be halted instantly if all the MPs opposed to it got together and insisted on stopping it. It's way past time our MPs did what they are paid to do. #FBPE #StopBrexit #RemainInTheEU 
Sadly we have no reached that part in our post Brexit oligarchy where civil servants have to defend themselves against The @Telegraph a paper owned by 2 tax dodgers hiding on an island from the tax man 
'We have to know in which direction to go': Swiss president urges referendum to clarify relations with the EU  
Merry Xmas all from SfEU! Enjoy your family time! It's been an Orwellian year, culminating in the weird Brexit myth of "blue passports" ... but on the good side, we've built a lot of community this year and we'll be championing science and British-European values in 2018!  
."Prominent leave campaigners who donated large sums to the Brexit campaigns during the 2016 referendum recently received tax demands from HMRC."#MerryChristmasOneAndAll  
Happy 'Try Not To Bring Up Brexit' Christmas  
If Guy, Donald & Jean-Claude had ever understood what was important to the UK, they’d have given Cameron a meaningful deal & avoided Brexit.  
Christmas Eve hot take: Brexit begins with Hugh Grant banging on about David Beckham's left foot in Love Actually. 
The idea that casting aside the advantages of the EU and plunging Britain into the brutal, jungle of unadulterated global capitalism will create some kind of socialist Britain is among the most utterly stupid of delusions.#Corbyn #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
The #Leave campaign was funded by vast amounts of money from the super-rich, £7.5m from Arron Banks alone. Our pro-EU campaign is all volunteer effort plus a little crowd-funding. We are the real popular, grassroots resistance!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
One of the best things about Brexit will be not having to pay any attention to the idiotic rantings of this prime prune.  
Michael Gove promised people that any plans they had to retire to other EU countries would be safe after Brexit.  How is this compatible with ending free movement?  
Wow. The Uk MoD sends a video w/ Xmas greetings, Scottish troops playing the anthem of Europe. (a subtle sign they are regretting #Brexit?)  
Nigel Farage won't receive Brexit knighthood  
Merry Christmas from Brexit Britain   
Even if that were true, despite spending vast sums on job creation, you do realise that Brexit is predicted to reduce GDP by 1.5% and 9%, depending on version of it, with a knock-on reduction of real incomes that makes those CETA figures look like a drop in the ocean. 1/ 
With corresponding  visa charges for the millions of UK nationals visiting the EU. Are these Brexit MPs mad? 
Mouthy lefty virtue-signaller James Caan deletes his anti-Brexit, anti-government Fake Passport News Tweet. Dignity destroyed, Fortune intact. Excellent example of socialism in action. Delete your Twitter account Caan.  
HAPPY CHRISTMAS to you all.With my love and thanks for a whole year of fighting beastly #Brexit. pic.twitter.com/32CJjC63pC 
Commonwealth citizens were allowed to vote in the #Brexit referendum - a vote denied to EU 27 nationals & 16-17 years who had vastly more at stake. 16-17 years were denied a vote to appease the Tory right. An unfair, unjust, gerrymandered referendum!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
True. Therefore I would expect @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer & @UKLabour to act to #StopBrexit which the Tories are pursuing & give a #FinalSay to the UK public, as I doubt the Brexit we will get is anything like the one voted for. @Labour4EU @CommonsEUexit @hilarybennmp 
A reminder: If the #Brexit referendum had the same electoral franchise rules as the Scottish Independence Referendum of 2014, then 16-17 years and EU 27 nationals would have been allowed to vote and #Remain would have won.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Britain's Christmas food and drinks exports are booming thanks to Brexit, with global demand for UK goods at an all-time high.  
Unprecedented: cabinet ministers Gove & Johnson attacking British tax authorities for trying to carry out its job of raising tax from tax evaders. The tax evaders financed #brexit  
In other news, the millionaires who backed #Brexit are upset about paying tax.  
When I was asked "Why do you want to be part of the EU?" it led to this open letter and 2017 Brexit roundup.   
Excellent work. Calling everyone Nazis is a highly effective technique that stopped Trump getting elected and won the EU referendum for Remain. Everyone who disagrees is clearly a Nazi and has nothing worth listening to.  
Of course. It’s just a total coincidence the brexit elite are all tax dodgers 
Flaccid Brexit #ThumbItIn 
TELEGRAPH: Pro-EU Establishment Snub Nigel Farage for Knighthood for Services to Brexit – AGAIN  
Brexit MPs suggest US-style ESTA visas for EU nationals  
People keep talking about how heartless 'Tory Britain' is. This is Brexit Britain where there is no money for anything but this fascistic project. It is why Labour has to be the party that offers an alternative to Brexit Britain. 
A reminder:WHY WE VOTED FOR BREXIT:It upset twats like David Schneider. Merry Christmas  
If ever there was anyone deserving of a Knighthood for service to his country, it is @Nigel_FarageWhat a great start to 2018 that would be.#Brexit #NewYearsHonours#LBCLIVE #skynews #Christmas #Christmas2017 #ChristmasEve 
This from @JolyonMaugham rather nails things:    Here’s what Brexit means: illegal bungs for the wealthy  
Confirmation that the Green Party, Lib Dems, Labour Party and SNP are antidemocratic.Legal action by Scots politicians to reverse Brexit gets go-ahead  
I had a chat with my mam last night about the upcoming referendum. It went really well. She will be voting Repeal. I urge you to have this conversation with your family.  
RETWEET if you Love Brexit and the UK and want it to be great again and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
What breathtaking arrogance,it’s statements like that that made people vote for Brexit.Why does my vote count less than yours because I’m older than you,but have,I suspect seen more of the world,having lived & worked on the continent,before you were even born! 
Exclusive: Nigel Farage snubbed for a knighthood for services to Brexit - again 
This..this..this..read & inwardly digest & think long & hard over the Xmas truce whether you support #Brexit or wish to #StopBrexit; leave comfort zones & hear what the World thinks.Bluff, bluster & BS won't win through. Honesty, open minds & options will 
Despite attack from almost everyone, Prime Minister Theresa May has stood firm.We at #OpenBritain applaud her tenacity and resilience, and wish @theresa_may a Merry Christmas.We look forward to more progress toward a full and proper Brexit next year. #Brexit #GlobalBritain 
Spare a thought for these sufferers of Leftism this Christmas.Millionaires living behind gates & fences who DEMAND that you:Pay more of your salary for their champagne socialismAccept unlimited immigrationReverse your Brexit voteWelcome regressive Islam to BritainTwats. pic.twitter.com/AU8sUds2tY 
Lovely to have Christmas visits from my Chinese, German and Polish neighbours and to receive marvellous presents from them. Such kind, generous people.  Sod Brexit xenophobes, this is what life in the U.K. is really about. 
UK cabinet ministers 'concerned over Brexit campaign tax demands'  
Office for National Statistics says exports now rising faster than imports with the trade deficit narrowing by £14.5 billion since the referendum result. Overall, UK exports of goods and services have increased by 14.5 per cent to £613 billion. 
In Alabama, Virginia and NJ, “I think what you are seeing is a referendum on Donald Trump” not fulfilling campaign promises to fight for working people, @SenSanders says, adding that if he were in the GOP he’d be worried about 2018. #SOTU 
Nigel Farage says he's been left off the New Year's Honours list because he backed Brexit 
Excellent from @JolyonMaughamBrexit means one rule for the super rich Brexiters and another for everyone else!  
The UK can still change its mind on Brexit - former Irish prime minister John Bruton.2018 will be the year to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
I can understand some of the Lexit arguments and positions. However, it should by now be clear to them (and everyone else) that whatever you think of EU as it is now, Brexit is an integral part of an entire hard-right agenda. Support Brexit, and you're supporting this agenda. 
Brexit means freedom, liberty and a better future for Britain - @RossThomson_MP answers our Christmas questions 
This guy Theresa May and their co-conspirators at the Daily Mail are at the forefront of spreading the most mendacious lies in UK politics from Brexit to Austerity from Public Services to spreading fear about ‘migrants’ .. this tweet is one of the most hypocritical ever  
Fortunately I don’t have to worry about Brexit arguments over Christmas, my entire family voted to Leave. 
Although I enjoy the rough and tumble of politics on social media, I just want to say that I have a few close friends who disagree with me on Brexit, the EU & politically.They're not evil, callous or moronic, just friends with different views. 
Ah, Lexit.  The far left rejecting the EU as a capitalist plot, and so simultaneously supporting an actual plot by deregulatory, low-tax, far-right disaster capitalists to destroy social democracy forever.. The scientology of the Brexit spectrum. 
The fact that   can retain Irish & EU citizenship when we lose FOM & other rights will make all GB cits #2ndClassCitizens in our own country. We have to get that #FinalSay in 2018 & rethink #Brexit with a #StopBrexit option 
Brexit could be HALTED in second referendum as support grows for a vote 
“I was a director of Vote Leave at the time of the referendum, and I can attest that we were aware of a certain amount of odd-looking cyber activity.”#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
Why is ‘I voted Remain’ always followed with a defence of Brexit & the regurgitation of right wing propaganda? 
READ: Average Christmas costs soars £80 due to Brexit hit to value of the £. Please RT: 
#WriteABrexitSectorReport The fishing industry catch fishFish are made into Fish and ChipsFish don't really have fingersKippers are smelly, they stinkCoincidentally Brexit stinks too 
All I want for Xmas is...#EuropeanUnion #brexitRETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Meanwhile in the other timeline, Prime Minister Miliband announces in his Christmas address that there will be a referendum on whether they should bring back Ceefax.  
Corbyn, Brexit, and Trump happened in 2017. But Corbyn happened again in 2016. 
After Brexit you could be eating chlorinated turkey and vegetables for Christmas. Mmm...   
Powerful piece on why people in Swansea are changing their minds over Brexit. It’s nothing like what they were promised.  
Brexit - You’re voting but you’re not sure what for, who for and when for  
"These unrealistic Leave-ers have no idea how much Brexit is going to cost", say Labour-Remainer MPs in Leave-voting constituencies who think changing the design of a passport costs £50 billion and will crash the economy.  
The Brexit transition proposal would turn Britain into a vassal of the EU #Premium 
Fishing's not just a totemic Brexit issue- it's a way of life & heritage that's suffered immeasurably. Public support to see injustice righted for coastal communities is brilliant. Take 14 min for an insight into what we fight for. Still a huge fight ahead  
Every time #EU gives you “free” stuff, remember, it’s just *your* stuff, repackaged minus their cut, taken by force and given back with fanfare.#Brexit  
Is it time for the UK and eventually a Independent Scotland to say goodbye to the Royal Family. Is it a outdate instution or a worthwile in your eyes to keep? Should we have referendum on this subject? 
Lord Lawson “[Mr Juncker] is very cocky & able to carry it off because Theresa May has, in my view, mistakenly allowed herself to become a supplicant & desperate to get a trade deal”France & Germany IS #EU "everybody else will just fall in line”#Brexit 
Merry Christmas to everyone on Twitter who made me feel I’d made the right decision by changing my mind about Brexit. Keep making the argument & pointing out the obvious. 2018 will be the year of the Great Mind Shift! 
‘That’s what the leaders of Brexit are saying. That you should fund unlawful bungs of money to immensely wealthy Brexiters. That’s how much they care about normal working people.’  
Labour campaigned against Brexit, people were misled by lying politicians into voting for it. Brexit will be calamitous for our country. All leads to one conclusion: Uncouple from it, let the Tories alone be seen to own it  
South East Cornwall MP Sheryll Murray: 'If France wants to sell us their wine they must buy our fish'. Sheryl Murray and Tiverton & Honiton MP Neil Parish want a better system for our fishermen post-Brexit.  … @fishingforleave 
‘Brexit Britain is a country where the Government thinks homeless children should be grateful they’re not sleeping on the streets. What’s not to be proud of?’ Coruscating, must read piece from one of Scotland’s finest journalists.  
And the 2017 *Brexit is BS* award for short film goes to @mikegalsworthy of @Scientists4EU for this video. Congratulations to all the excellent runners-up and wishing you all a Merry Xmas & a Brexit-free New Year.  
Nigel Farage hasn't twigged yet that being a lying racist Kremlin stooge only qualifies you to be in the brexit cabinet  
Not a shred of evidence that the referendum led to a loss of growth says @johnredwood  
We voted Corbyn to send a message to May, not because we thought he'd win. He's still unelectable as long as he's complicit in the Tory Brexit process  
RT If you to find out which of our elected officials are part of the Brexit Taliban.  
Number 10 tried to make political capital out of a standard contract renewal, and portray the colour change as being enabled by Brexit. What possible high ground are they standing on 
Churchill, who is admired by many Leavers, was a passionate advocate of a US of Europe which he believed would end the scourge of rampant nationalism. Brexiters are betraying him and the sacrifices of their parents' generation in WW2.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The nurses at the hospital, hearing his story (my cousin is a ward sister there) clubbed together and bought my niece some Christmas presents. The point I'm making is, this country is fantastic despite brexit, despite nationalists, despite torys. We'll be alright lads and lasses.  
"I was a director of Vote Leave at the time of the referendum, and I can attest that we were aware of a certain amount of odd-looking cyber activity."  
In 2017, almost entire political commentariat got Corbyn's electoral prospects wrongPreviously they got Trump wrongPreviously they got Brexit wrongIf they were in other jobs, they'd be sacked - but, hey, they are •still• "explaining" to us plebs what is *really* going on! 
2017 showed that both the Conservatives and Labour no longer make any sense. The Conservatives are hated in the City and Labour are scorned in the North. The Brexit spirit still has no outlet. The parties' days are surely numbered, writes Mick Hume.  
The truth is Corbyn has voted with the hard right Tory Brexiters on every major piece of EU legislation. Remainers won’t put their trust in him again. Labour could lead a great anti Tory/Brexit Movement but chooses not to. A tragedy for Britain. 
May you have a Trump-free & Brexit-free Festive Timeline and enjoy some prolonged stints of direct human interaction. 
A tweet on the story of Catalonia's now exiled leader voting in the October independence referendum was one of our most-shared of 2017:  
The British, or more likely the English, will become the laughing-stock of Europe and the butt of jokes around the world. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Soldier BLASTS Theresa May as troops handed £1 for celebrations.“They haven’t even sent us enough for a coffee.The Americans send in more money to feed the stray cats on their compound.”But £39 Billion for Brussels & Juncker's wine cellar.#Brexit #EU 
IT’S TIME TO DRAIN THE SWAMP 
Commonwealth-member Malaysia wants a post-Brexit free trade agreement with the UK. The south-east Asian country already has an economy that is larger than Ireland's or Finland's.The World Bank has revised its forecast for 2017 GDP growth in Malaysia to +5.8%, reports Reuters. 
Given that Brexit will be disastrous for the poor, I do care more than Corbyn does. Corbyn demonstrably cares very little except for his ambition to be Prime Minister.  
Brexit boost for Britain’s Christmas food and drinks exports as global demand hits all-time high.  
I wish a very merry Christmas to all of my dear Twitter friends, with heartfelt thanks for everything I've learned from you this year, for your reason and clear-eyed logic, your sense of humour and your indefatigable support of my poor efforts to put a stop to brexit.  
You want to hear from us? One simple, clear, emphatic message: stop Brexit. Nothing on your presents-for-everyone shopping list is affordable otherwise. So in case you’re still deaf to the clamour of reason: STOP BREXIT.  
There are millions of poor, desperate British people wondering why their own countrymen are pushing them in. If Brexit has done anything, it has exposed a group of very nasty, selfish, people in our midst - and a very nasty political party.  
*** CHRISTMAS EVE POLL *** Should Brexit proceed? 
One of the great delights of #Brexit is laughing at sad #Remainers having a collective breakdown over #bluepassports. 
Labour in "opposition" are currently more in-league with The Tories than the #LibDems EVER WERE while in the Con-Lib coalition government.There is NOTHING remotely socialist regarding Brexit. Corbyn's insular desire to isolate the UK smacks of NATIONAL socialism. 
He can comfort himself with six letters rather than three: Brexit  
Show people you care by holding a new Brexit referendum. 
#Brexit could be halted in second referendum as support grows for a vote  
Happy Christmas Mr Junker! France’s new opposition leader calls for a referendum on the future direction of the European project.#ThankEUGoodbye #MerryBrexmas 
Nigel Farage thinks voting for Brexit stopped him getting a knighthood.  I thought it was simply because he's a moronic arsehead.... 
A referendum on Irish unity is a key component of the GFA. The Government are constitutionally obliged to work for reunification. Coveney's leadership campaign slogan was "Uniting Ireland". God forbid the all-things-Irish hating, gay-lambasting DUP should be offended Andy!  
NEW Boris Johnson and Michael Gove ‘attack HMRC over Brexit donor tax grab’  
Johnson and Gove attack HMRC for implementing tax law on multimillionaire's bankrolling the Brexit campaign. Apparently this "impinges on our democratic values."  Getting people to pay the tax they owe threatens democracy? Let that sink in.  
Maybe @bbcnickrobinson you can explain why, now the referendum campaign is over, the opinion of a lazy MEP, whose party has zero MPs, should be so worthy of attention!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit metaphor of the day: 
Actors! Only 1 day until you even try and spark a Brexit debate with your family in an attempt to avoid awkward questions about your career. 
Had a conversation with a family member yesterday who is in here 50's & intelligent.Expressed surprise that her daughter had told her that the place where she works is worried about Brexit & the affect on employment & business.Seemed quite surprised.People just didn't think. 
There is a majority in parliament to stop a destructive, extreme Brexit.   
Poor Rev Stu.Sent his Christmas list to Santa hoping for the gift of Indy.Did not even get a majority on post Brexit Scottish membership:Sad. 
BREAKING NEWS: following #Brexit the UK Govt have promised they will bring back the Iconic Avocado Bathroom Suite.....phasing out the standard white European version.  
Lovely response to John Redwood's acid infused Little Red Riding Hood Brexit rewrite.  
Christmas wrapping done for the Brexit voting cretins within my family.Merry Christmas.#BollocktoBrexit#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Brexit really is the Friscal, Fistical, Fissical Policy de nos jours.  
A Yougov poll has revealed that the policy most wanted by those who voted for Brexit is the Death Penalty. Decades of progress and we are being dragged back to simplistic idiocy of yester-year. #SaveUsFromOurselves #StopBrexit 
I had a Blue Passport once and spent half my time applying for visas-back to the future indeed! Thatcher aide dismisses blue passports as a ‘nostalgic’ Brexit stunt  
Exactly! Turning the EU referendum into a racist, hate-filled, lie-ridden campaign has surely done nobody any good?  
Nigel Farage says supporting Brexit has cost him a knighthood  
Home Office tells British man he should go to USA because his American academic wife is being deported as she goes on lots of field trips. And people wonder why EU citizens living in the UK are worried?? #Brexit  
In Manchester for Christmas. Cannot believe how many homeless there are and we are fussing about passport colour. Photo from my warm hotel room. The what looks like bags of rubbish are people sleeping rough #notright #Homeless #brexit #brexitshambles 
“Britain has wholly lost its way in the world. And who needs a passport, of any colour, when you have nowhere to go?” - well worth reading this scathing Observer editorial on Britain’s embarrassing post-#Brexit descent into nostalgia for our imperial past.  
Another day, another hero saying "we were misled on #Brexit, I've changed my mind"Seeing more of these every day  
Brexit Facts presented in this excellent article: "The UK economy was growing faster on average before the Single Market startedThe EU's Single Market has demonstrably had no positive impact on UK growthThe UK's average annual growth rate has actually fallen since it started."  
And history shows us that once these steps are taken they are v hard to walk back. Therefore if you believe in a fairer, socially minded UK, you HAVE to stop Brexit. 
Brexit means... huge and illegal bungs for the wealthy, paid for by you.  
The loss of EU funding used to help poorer parts of the UK has had far less attention than other ill effects of Brexit. But it will soon be hard to ignore the problem.   
I never had a vote in last referendum but I will have next time and that will be a YES from me too.  
The Christmas episode of The @HistoryHit Podcast is now outWe talk Trump (obvs), climate, democracy, , Brexit and Mary Tudor.With legends @AnnaWhitelock @childs_jessie @peterfrankopan @hrcastor @sarahchurchwell:  
"The EU Single Market argument - Destroyed."  A Merry Christmas gift from the #Brexit Facts4EU team. Read the full facts here:  
Damn EU. Forcing us to all be the same ..... Look at how they dictate what our passports are like....  [This is SARCASM and SATIRE for anybody in doubt!]   #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Here’s what Brexit means: illegal bungs for the wealthy  
It is Sunday and Christmas Eve but it is still Brexit Hour. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Thank you @lawyers4britain for your excellent work this year, shining the #Brexit light of clarity and truth on the murky, legalistic, mumbo-jumbo put out by some politicians, commentators, and rich individuals. Merry Christmas to Martin & team.  
Is this REALLY the reason behind the frantic drive for a hard brexit? Exposure and censure of the tax dodgers and crooks and their serial looting of communities across the world using the UK as their pirate's lair?  
Thatcher aide dismisses blue passports as a ‘nostalgic’ #Brexit stunt  
The Observer view on enfeebled Britain’s place in the world - Please read, a devastating indictment of #Brexit Britain.  
Alongside the gerrymandering this statement by David Lidington during the 2015 Referendum bill contains the foundation of the Brexit coup. The opportunists, couldn't believe their luck, helped themselves accordingly. Massive failure by Parliament to protect the national interest.  
Freedom of movement ends with Brexit. So does free trade. That is not vindictiveness, it is simply the inevitable consequence of leaving the EU. Pretending otherwise is dishonest. Believing otherwise is stupid. 
T May has visited Erdogan, Trump & now Poland & has defended the Polish government's attack on the Rule of Law. She condemned the Article 50 appellants as trying to subvert democracy, and wants out from the ECHR & ECJ. The Rule of Law is central to democracy.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
My letter on the upcoming abortion referendum in today's Sunday Independent. #8Committee 
So because Salah is a Muslim he goes second ?? Ahhh I see brexit is in full force then  
365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017  
I'm Chair of the Cttee negotiating ETIAS in it's final stages, @StevePeers is correct  but it seems that Brexit MPs can say what they like & go unchallenged by broadcasters. UK citizens will face restrictions, there are no exemptions planned for UK citizens in the legislation.  
Little Englander Alert. In addition to UK based refugees there are 80 other countries in the world with a blue passports including; America, Israel and North Korea. Well played #Brexit  supporters, well fucking played.   
Why would I tell anyone in South America that I voted for Brexit? They'd think I was retarded.Merry Christmas.#stopbrexit 
#WriteABrexitSectorReport Farmers grow things like bread and apples. You can eat apples or make them into cider or pies. Some farmers grow animals like cows, sheep and chickens. Chickens shit a lot, this is called chickenshit. Coincidentally, Brexit is also chickenshit 
Quite incredible that we live in a country where someone can think that @vincecable has any equivalence with @Nigel_FarageOnly one of these people has any integrity, honesty, decency & it isn't the person who jets around the world supporting Fascism. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Our national will and decision is Brexit. The #bluepassport is a symbolic return to tradition. The next part will involve remainians being demoted to peasant status, as junior members of society. This is a nation of Brexiteers now, we have no time for saboteurs  
Dear @simoncoveneyI'm uncertain about how Brexit will affect citizen's rights in the north under the GFA & into the futurePresently I can access CHR & ECJ. It's very unclear how this will work out after UK leaves-can you clarify I will always have access?GrmaIrishCitizen 
."Those who led the charge on Brexit with NO idea how to deliver it need their totem, their amulet to protect themselves against the disaster THEY have created." 
Finally, a positive from Brexit. The passport nonsense made me listen to this for the first time on a few years. I'm not a jazz cat, but hell this is great!  
Please! In an effort to show unity and support for Brexit we need to choose a peoples' car for us all to dream of buying! Please vote and RT: 
Wolfgang Tillmans on Brexit: ‘a dangerous thing, happening at the wrong time in the wrong place’ (March 2017)  
Shipman's been upriver covering Brexit so long that he's basically gone native, like Dennis Hopper in Apocalypse Now.  
The year is 2030. It has been declared safe to exit your nuclear bunker. The United Kingdom is a wasteland. Freddos are £3billion. You gaze into the sunset, clutching your #bluepassport close to your heart and whisper, "Brexit means Brexit." 
You might think that #Brexit supporting patriates would be very proud to help our great country by paying their taxes...........  but read on:   
Quite incredible that we live in a country where the politician who said violence is the next step is not in jail! Quite incredible that the super-rich are allowed to try to buy #Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE  
So tweeps: I’m switching off for a little while. Thanks again for the ride this year. See you soon in our fight against Brexit. Merry Christmas again xx   
Wow. Since Brexit, which hasn’t actually happened yet last time I checked, ‘the world’ is buying more of our food, whisky and TV. Because a referendum was held? The search for finding any positives about Brexit is getting more desperate. pic.twitter.com/pUMaThVoUG 
Communications Director 10 Downing St condemns “fake news”! Obviously excludes the impact assessments that did/did not exist, which were in “excruciating detail” until released, or almost anything else UK has said on Brexit. Beyond parody  
Brendan O'Neill rightly on fire at @spikedonline:Their contemptuous fury over the #bluepassport revealed starkly just how much the Remainer-Elite despise the ordinary people whom they blame for Brexit. 
If you don't want to go down in history as the prime minister who severely damaged the UKs international relations, education, NHS, public transport, environment + social cohesion, rethink Brexit, @theresa_may. Pursuing such a stupid cause is a sign of political ineptitude. #FBPE 
BREAKING - After minutes of painstaking research, Brexit boffins unveil procedure to replace haemoglobin with haemocyanin to recreate the iconic blue blood that used to be present in British subjects before an undemocratic EU diktat standardised on red.#BrexitBlues #BluePassport 
Didn't Cameron spend £9m of taxpayers cash on the referendum , a few committed people balanced the argument. EU spend millions too  
Bits of the Brexit assessment just copied from Wikipedia....  
Have a brilliant Xmas all my followers around the world. Enjoy your Xmas dinner, all your presents  and all that drink. . Let’s all hope we get a great 2018. Be nice to everyone no Brexit talk FFS. Happy Xmas.  
"Services to Brexit" which involved running away at top speed the day after the vote result was known, and the actual work began? 
#Brexit: The Board Game  
A tragic Brexit paradox:- the EUref result finally made the UK’s political class aware that many people felt left behind  despite the UK’s booming economy (they were part of the 52%)- but it also made the already difficult task of doing something about it almost impossible. 
Thatcher aide dismisses blue passports as a ‘nostalgic’ Brexit stunt  
- Was never part of the official leave campaign because they thought he was too racist- Never successfully elected an MP- Helped create division like this country hasn't seen in decades- Can get fucked- services to brexit sounds like a dogging festival pic.twitter.com/hNDkAzxyZP 
By his own admission the sole “achievement” of Brexit so far is a promise to bring back blue passports, that’s not worthy of a gift voucher, let alone a knighthood  
The Romanian government considering referendum to re-establish monarchy  
Normally, you look forward to the new year with optimism. In Brexit Britain, it’s that gut sickening feeling of “what next” 
"Services to Brexit" isn't a thing, & if it were, lying through your teeth about it, then buggering off to get a German passport with your EU pension & openly saying you won't stay in the country when it all goes tits-up wouldn't count. 
As a retaliation to a perceived anti-Brexit meme tweeted by Ireland Simpsons Fans, an anonymous account stated tweeting people my home address and encouraging them to let me know how they feel. The internet is fucked up. 
If after 18 months your only tangible victory is a cosmetic change to passport colours (that could have been made at any time in the last three decades without leaving the EU) then that just goes to show what a lamentable shit-show Brexit is turning out to be, doesn't it?  
Brexit Aim: To isolate the British economy from the worlds largest trading bloc, situated in the most convenient of places at optimum terms for no reason. To do so via lies, distortion, obfuscation & deceit, without any plan or hope of success. #WriteABrexitSectorReport 
sorry - "services to Brexit" 
EXCLUSIVE in tomorrow's @telegraph: Nigel Farage snubbed for a knighthood for services to Brexit - again  via @telegraphnews 
Triggered: Hysterical EU Loyalists Claim Blue Brexit Passports Will Cost £500m, Get Squashed for Fake News  
#Exclusive: @Nigel_Farage snubbed for a knighthood for services to Brexit - again #premium  
Never mind Nigel I'm sure Putin could russle up an award for you. After all #Brexit is far more in the national interests of Russia than it is of the UK.It's those that deliver an #ExitFromBrexit that will deserve the nation's thanks. via @telegraphnews 
And the #Brexit induced slowdown of the economy, let alone a trade deal with the US makes privatisation of the #NHS much more likely. Right wing Tory heaven. But what about you @jeremycorbyn!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The country has turned against Brexit, the Tory government has not. It’s time to ask why! 
March 2019, the final Brexit deadline. The PM is about to address the nation.She looks out at a sea of uncertain faces. She clears her throat.“Maybe the real Brexit was the friends we made along the way.”Britain can now rest easy, finally knowing what Brexit truely means. 
Media coverage often makes light of Brexit impact. Today a man rang Radio 4. He & his wife can travel freely across Europe (ex in UK due to NHS cuts) as EHIC gives her access to kidney dialysis across EU. This will stop post Brexit & she will be virtually housebound. #FBPE 
Thatcher aide Charles Powell confirms it was Thatcher’s government who “chose” to ditch the blue passport in1980s, under no pressure from EU.Further confirmation that the #Brexit debacle results from internal Tory party squabbles.#ExitFromBrexit 
Dear @theresa_mayMy national identity as English & British does not need to be restored. As an EU Citizen my national identity was never taken away. On the contrary I feel it has been enhanced. We need to bring people together not divide them.#StopBrexit #brexit #Remain #leave 
Well done @Ross_Greer and others for pushing for clarity on this crucial #Brexit issue #StopBrexit 
@TheNewEuropean has 'lets exit brexit' wrapping paper. Cool. #FBPE 
Does the colour of your passport matter to you? #brexitpassport#brexit #passports #BluePassports#redpassportPlease RETWEET POLL after you vote for a larger sample. 
I live in NI, I can't vote for Labour, I don't vote Tory or their DUP proxies.  I don't care about Labour's election prospects, I only care that Brexit is stopped and they won't do that, waiting for the public to oppose it so they don't have to is pathetic cowardice. 
Damian Green (porn), David Davis (Brexit Impact Statements), Boris Johnson (£350m/wk NHS), Priti Patel (Israeli meetings)...Did I miss any?  
Thatcher aide dismisses blue passports as a ‘nostalgic’ Brexit stunt. FOR OLD PEOPLE! Tomorrow's Britons don't care about colour as log as it's an EU passport!  
A 300-year-old argument between Britain and Spain threatens to derail Theresa May's Brexit plans  pic.twitter.com/o33bBxyqSL 
Your handy guide to what is and isn't important in Brexit: 
No we won't, we will all come back fighting to #StopBrexit in 2018The Brexit effect: Pro-EU activists won't back down  via @FRANCE24 
EU's chief Brexit negotiator shoots down Nigel Farage's blue passport joy in one tweet  
“Tony Blair will splash almost £10 million on his newly-established anti-populism institute so he can “support” the bitter campaign to try and keep Britain within the crumbling European Union.” #Brexit 
  SMUG REMAINERS GOT IT WRONG.  Our growth top of the world with Germans.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #Brexit 
I was signed off for Christmas but just wanted to share this festive #Brexit video from @OFOCBrexit & @Femi_Sorry - highlights why it’s so important that we encourage all those who are #remainernow to come forward & take action! Merry Christmas   
The Brexit Labour want will destroy this country economically. It will hurt the poor. Ravage the NHS. Cost hundreds of billions.The hypocrisy of Corbyn is becoming unbearable.He thinks we will vote for him no matter what.He’s wrong  
1. Stop with this ‘jobs first Brexit’ nonsense. 2. Stop enabling hard right Tory Brexit. 3. While you’re at it, stop Brexit. 
These are the incipient fascists that Theresa May, in her desperation to fawn before the Brexit extremists, has lent her support to. What a sad joke she has become.   
Wait a minute, I just remembered that "EU" also means "Expanded Universe".Oh my god... there's a possibility that this meme was mistakenly appropriated by a Brexit supporter.  
Brexit: the Gif  
UK economy grows even faster post-Brexit vote than first predicted  via @MailOnline 
Farage for once is correct, the only concrete ‘benefit’ of Brexit is blue passports- this has to weighed against definite damage to the economy, definite loss of international standing and definite rise in overt racism in U.K.  
Turkeys and Christmas #brexit #stuffed 
Former advisor says it was "Thatcher’s government who “chose” to ditch the blue passport in the 1980s – under no pressure from the European Union" and May's stance is “part of the nostalgia on which the predominantly elderly Brexit constituency thrives”  
Dodging any Brexit conversations with half of your family during Christmas week like...  
Thatcher aide dismisses blue passports as a ‘nostalgic’ Brexit stunt  
Brexit: The Board Game  
|￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣|         BREXIT IS SHIT|＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿|             (\__/)  ||            (•ㅅ•) ||           / 　 づ 
It's ultimately about trust in institutions. I trust neither Brussels nor Westminster, but I prefer the corruption where I can see it - and where the media bothers to report on it. #Brexit 
"If we had known in advance that blue was so important.., we could simply have replaced our passports by this one" -@guyverhofstadt#bluepassport -AND #shade from #Brexit Coordinator for EU.2018-will be wild! 
Asombrados andan fuera.Manchester City manager Pep Guardiola being investigated by Spanish police over Catalonia referendum  
Removing Freedom of Movement will rob ordinary people of a Right & a Freedom. The rich & powerful won't be affected, they will gain an extra privilege relative to the rest of us. You'd expect Tories to support this, but so do @jeremycorbyn & @UKLabour.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
You had your chance to avert Brexit but when Cameron came to get concessions you gave none. Now you pay the price. 
EXCLUSIVE: Labour are plotting SECRET BREXIT BETRAYAL, claims eurosceptic MP  
I suppose there is some solace in the fact that the new Brexit #bluepassport will be the colour of the EU flag! #StopBrexit #FBPE #BrexitNotADoneDealButADumbDeal  
Didn’t vote #KANEXIT.Didn’t vote #BREXIT. 
Ricky Gervais on Brexit >"The average person is an idiot. On bottles of bleach we've got 'Do not drink' take that off for two years, then have a referendum"  
Or the British disaster capitalists and shady transatlantic lobbyists who deploy brexit to sell off our NHS and public assets to Trump’s cronies.  
TOP TIP:To fill those awkward silences with relatives at Christmas dinner, discuss organ donation and feelings about CPR and intensive care. Much more rewarding than talking about who voted for Brexit… 
Sadly @jeremycorbyn your support for #Brexit makes a mockery of all your promises.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Oh was a eureka moment when @AdamRamsay and I found that the DUP’s £425k Brexit donor had links to Saudi intelligence  
Ever wonder about all those reports that say BBC is biased against brexit? Well I had a dig into them, and how lobbyists can game media  
'The UK cannot be absorbed into a European state' Did Enoch Powell predict Brexit in 1975?  
Everyone else is doing it so...here’s a few stories from 2017 that think stand up reasonably well. First, *that* DUP dark money brexit funding revelation  
Imagine paying billions, causing millions of people misery, hurting your own economy, making your country an international laughing stock... just to get a blue cover for your travel card, while simultanteously making it invalid on 27 out of 28 modes of transport. Imagine #Brexit.  
Having engaged with a fair few Leavers (mostly bots) lately, it seems the new approach is “I voted Remain” or “I was 50/50 but now I think we should Brexit”.So I’m now going to say I voted Leave but now think we should Remain. Don’t tell them. 
Brexit trumps everything else, and everything is interconnected. Brexit will make austerity worse, it will make NHS crisis worse etc etc. There aren’t good and bad Brexits, only lesser evils. I prefer to keep taking a stand against the evil.  
There never was a shred of evidence that the referendum vote led to any loss of output growth in the second half of 2016. 
A lot of Brits now inspired to investigate the realities of Brexit  
Knock at the door and our new Polish and Australian neighbours are there with a hamper of goodies. That's it. I'm done with these people. Brexit now.  
Since I have been on #twitter I am coming across a lot of #remainer tweets R from ex #brexiteers who have realised that #Brexit is bad for their financial wellbeing. In a DEMOCRACY people can change their mind & therfore there will be another referendum #FBPE @labour_zone 
#Boris Johnson said that #Russia interfered in the referendum on #Brexit, but "unsuccessfully." I do not understand something, so Russia, according to Boris, was agitating the British for Britain to remain in the EU ???    
Brexit: UK car production slumps amid political uncertainty and falling real pay | The Independent  
10 starting insights from the Brexit impact assessments that were kept secret in the interest of national security pic.twitter.com/YGNNgn0WGz 
The rest of the world needs the UK more than we need the rest of the world. One of the more fatuous Brexit arguments - I use the term loosely!  
His @ handle tells a story too. “Took England Back” - not Britain or UK. England. Helps explain why, amongst other things, Brexit could be responsible for tearing apart the Union. 
I know I shouldn't but I am going to tell you my New Year's Resolutions:Drink lessGive up pork scratchings (my teeth can no longer cope)No more sweary rants on TwitterNot give in the fight against Brexit 
“Look at my amazing blue passport which stops me from living everywhere in Europe, apart from Little Britain! Hurrah for Brexit!”  
.@NicolaSturgeon has run the country expertly, kept .@PeterMurrell in line, conduct Brexit negotiations and read a library of books all in one year. Here’s me just happy I managed to keep my children alive and get the washings done. Seriously needing to up the feminist game! 
Of those who voted Remain in last year’s EU referendum, 68% said they would support independence while 32% would back the union.  
The trolls seem to be out in force today. They haven't got anything relevant to say, so they just hurl insults. The state of the #Brexit camp is pretty sad and pathetic. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
I find this woman most annoying,she's a regular guest on the BBC news where she puts her anti Brexit views across and now her anti Christian views! Why do the BBC and the media in general give this woman a platform to put her views across? 
You want to know what kind of future your kids will inherit in Scotland post Brexit, just look to the homophobic, racist, sectarian "Scottish" Tories. 
BUT .... unless @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour recognise that any form of Brexit will cause everlasting damage to the majority & to the UK economy, then fight to stay in EU there’ll be no money for Labour policies! @Labour4EU 
Is it round about now that Leavers and Remainers down their arms and hold an impromptu football match? Happy Christmas everyone, & for goodness' sake no Brexit over Christmas dinner. LFB 
I’m glad you want to hear from us. (1) For as long as you support Brexit there is no future for the many. (2) There is no jobs first Brexit. (3) You are actively closing opportunities for the young. (4) The purpose of an opposition is to question the govt, not to enable it.  
Well, at least they’re now admitting Brexit is nothing but a fairy tale.(Check out the thread. It’s phenomenal) 
A German, a French man and an Englishman walk into a bar.  The bar tender hands over two glasses of beer and a plastic cup.  “Why doesn't the Brit get glass like us two?” asks the German.  “Because he #Brexit,” replies the bar tender. 
Brexit could be halted in a 2nd referendum?  
You have opposed the people having a vote on the final Brexit Deal.You've whipped your MPs to oppose staying in Single Market & the Customs Union.You've enabled a Tory Brexit.When Labour becomes a Remain party then I'll vote for you.  
We must not forget that @ukip leads the way on policy and it still has purpose as a radical voice leading the way in British politics says @davidkurten  #Brexit #CulturalMarxism 
LABOUR Party is using Conservative rebels to undermine Brexit and keep Britain shackled to the EU, pro-Brexit MP Bernard Jenkin has warned.  
Gearing up in the new year for some major Brexit stuff, as well as increased output on the other side of the Atlantic. Hit the link if you want to help out, retweet, and consider it a Christmas present...   
I'm not sure Remainers sharing this stuff realise that it is actually a strong argument for why referendum was lost: a political elite missed chance for an easy win over anti-EU voices by just changing the colour and instead laughed like drains at how "silly" the request was.  
Government must come clean about the ‘Brexit bill.’ They cannot use it to fuel further hostility to EU, but should instead accept it is us, meeting our legal obligations. 
We lose the right to live and work in 30 countries, EU citizens lose it for one country. The #bluepassport will become iconic - as a global symbol of national idiocy.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit #bluepassports 
So Boris Johnson now admits Russian interference in #Brexit. From ‘not a sausage’ to ‘can I the eggs sunnyside up and the bacon crispy’: @carolecadwalla and @J_amesp vindicated 
Don't relax yet, Brexiteers – the drumbeat for a second referendum is getting louder, warns @LiamHalligan 
Triggered: Hysterical EU Loyalists Claim Blue Brexit Passports Will Cost £500m, Get Squashed for Fake News  
Our parliament has been sovereign throughout our membership of the EU.The government could have controlled immigration, but didn't.We could have had a Blue passport, but we haven't. We should be giving more money to the NHS, but we aren't.Tell me, Brexit, what is it good for? 
Spending this amount of money on changing the colour of a passport is outrageous and unnecessary when we have public sector workers on the breadline and thousands homeless. Whatever your views on #Brexit this is a travesty & waste of cash. #BluePassports 
UK (Scotland), Panelbase poll:Independence ReferendumStay in the UK outside the EU: 51% Independent Scotland inside the EU: 49%#ScotRef #IndyRef #Brexit 
Poland, Millward Brown poll:EU membership referendumRemain: 88%Leave: 12%#Brexit 
4. In Brexit Campaign, CA worked with hackers to dig out medical history of popular Pro-EU leaders including their confidential psych records to blackmail few of them. 
Toxic Theresa is a very dangerous woman. Her messianic zeal for Brexit is destroying our nation. SHE is the real 'enemy of the people'. We must redouble our efforts to 'Stop Brexit', and see her gone.  
Would you have argued that the majority of the electorate didn't vote to remain if remain had won the referendum? Would you be arguing for a second referendum if remain had won? I think we both know the answers.  
1. Road tolls = More tax.Govt knows it can't afford #Brexit...that it will cost it dear to try to plug the gaps as the econimy weakens..so it's borrowing or taxation hike..or prob both. By now you should have realised Brexit = All pain no gain.  
Legal action by Scots politicians to reverse Brexit gets go-ahead  
Not a Brexit tweet, but I just found out that a threadworm tablet that costs about £2.50 here costs about $300 in the USA, even with insurance.$300!!!! For threadworms!And this is the country our PM wants to emulate.(Okay, maybe it is a Brexit tweet.) 
The BBC’s relentless promotion of him despite his party’s failure helped push the Brexit agenda. That shifted the Tories and gave us the referendum. They’re still obsessed with him.  
Entrepreneur Peter Cruddas gave Vote Leave £900K and is now facing an 'inheritance tax' bill of £180K. Goldman Sachs, JPMorgan and other BIG banks gave the Remain camp similar amounts of money. They have not been slapped with similar taxes. What do you call this?#Brexit  
 On the first day of Christmas Brexit brought to me three servers to relocate to Germany.  
The more the challenges of hard Brexit become clearer in 2018, the more Scots will see what's being lost. The Scottish Govt has to be patient and let opinion rise - George Reid #49%  
Would you rather have a passport that allows me to live and work freely in 28 different countries with fewer customs checks and shorter queues, or one that is blue?Get an exit from Brexit instead:  
This New Year’s Eve, I will be performing the Labour Brexit Hokey-Cokey. You know how it goes .... 
#honestpoll Which do you want to see most in 2018? Please #vote and #retweet. Debate encouraged.#trump #labour #nhs #brexit 
How many times do I have to send you the same message.  Unless you come forward as the anti Brexit party you will never, ever get my vote.  TACTICAL VOTING  was against the Tories and was not a vote for you.  #StopBrexit 
A thing Leavers don't grasp or don't care about is that Remainers don't accept that 37% of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum for an option which said nothing about FOM is anything near a mandate to remove that right. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Dear Mrs May @theresa_may You could, if you wanted to, spend a £billion to tackle period poverty. But you gave it to the DUP instead. You could, if you wanted to, spend £40 billion on the causes of Brexit. But you are choosing to avoid the causes instead. Merry Christmas  
Coming next: 6. Teacher says to re-do my homework. Working.7. Who edited those wikipedia articles while I wasn't looking?8. I don't like this homework. It's depressing! This sucks.9. There is no homework! Also, blue passports, hurrah! English cheese, hurrah! Brexit, hurrah!  
Leavers should think what it's like to be burgled and how they would feel towards the burglar. That's how many Remainers feel about being robbed of EU citizenship and freedom of movement.#StopBrexit #brexit #FBPE 
The Brexit impact studies story, redux:1. I did my homework assignment but you can't see it.2. The dog ate my homework.3. What homework?4. You can look at my homework if you promise not to read it.5. Teacher: Homework was incomplete and appears to be copied from wikipedia. 
#Brexit Top Ten1) #BluePassports2) #Rickets3) #RationBooks4) #FoolscapPaper5) #PennyFarthing6) #Scurvy7) #Conscription8) #PublicHanging9) #WorkHouses10)# Suggestions welcome.... 
A former director of Vote Leave has said he was aware of “a certain amount of odd-looking cyber activity” during the EU referendum campaign.  
Johnson came out for Brexit to ‘restore some control to the people in this country.’ Unless he doesn’t believe in parliamentary democracy, that means increasing the power of parliament. Something he’s explicitly trying to avoid. 
Legal action by Scots politicians to reverse Brexit gets go-ahead  
Access to the single market is in no way the same as membership of it.  You simply don't keep the same benefits while not a member. Cornyn's support for leaving the single market has been hugely damaging for this country as we have no real opposition to Brexit. 
49% support for YES is expected to grow over the next 6 months and some speculate it could grow to 55% to 57% as Brexit hits Scotland hard. @IsThisAB0t @ScotTories @Scotland_future @Always_a_Yes #ScotRef 
Policies such as encouraging mass migration that leaves a massive limitation on the housing stock? Correct me if I'm wrong but he did support Brexit? 
Thread: Why the #bluepassport has nothing to do with making Britain great again, and everything to do with an English nationalism emerging angry and empty after 400 years buried under Britain and empire.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Worth watching @BBC Dateline London, as others see us. One foreign correspondent called #Brexit a slow motion car crash... 
Remain underpins most other arguments - from the NHS, to taxation policy, to economic growth that supports, well, everything!  Having a Labour Party that is anti-internationalism and actively supports the Conservative Brexit position is one that won’t win an election. 
The Cabinet tussle over which particular type of hard and destructive Brexit they want continues... 
The only thing that makes weird brexit fanfiction funnier is when you realise its author is an elected mp The British taxpayer is paying tory mps to literally write fairytales  
Thankyou @anne_atkins for explaining your Brexit vote on grounds that you 'hate centimetres'. I remind you that 'a formal govt policy to support metrication was agreed by 1965' - 8 yrs before we joined the (then) EEC:   Metrication_in_the_United_Kingdom 
A little thread on what’s awaiting us in #Brexit matters into 2018. Looking into the  is maybe foolish but I’ll have a go. (1/16) 
DM today: 'Having provocative opinions that challenge orthodoxy is what we expect from' our academicsDon't remember DM being so liberal when it 'enemy-of-the-peopled' some EU Law Profs incl. yours truly for their views on Brexit...  
EU has 'revenge mentality': Brussels will make Brexit Britain 'pay', Finland warns  
Can't support you as you support leaving the single market and ending our rights to free movement in our own continent.  I would discourage others from voting Labour and go for a truly anti Brexit party like the Lib Dems. 
Johnson remembered “a sense of personal loss and outrage” when blue passports were “taken away”1) They weren't @BorisJohnson2) Millions of us feel personal loss about our rights to live, work & study in 27 other countries & outrage at your Brexit lies 
It's not just the European Union at risk from Brexit but the United Kingdom too.  
Almost half of Scots would back independence within the EU in a second referendum held in early 2019, according to Panelbase polling.  
#Brexit Britain  
Given the state of things as they are nowShould the UK continue with #BrexitHelp #RecycleElectrons in order to #StopBrexit with the #FBPE 
“Most of the increase came from the UK’s dominant #services sector, ... 80 per cent “ of UK economy.@times#WTO does not cover services.Drink hearty and enjoy  over the holidays-but please don't drink the #BrexitKoolAid#Brexit 
EU bank accused of 'power grab' as it hoards cash as cost of Brexit hits home  
Ahead of the EU referendum last year Government spent over £9 million of taxpayers’ money on leaflets delivered to all UK homes promoting we remain; yet with this clear information, and falsely cited dire consequences, a largest majority of voters ever in history opted to leave.  
Without your pro-#Brexit stance you'd be miles ahead in the polls, you are totally undermining all of last year's good work. 
READ: Govt admits it could have changed passport colours without Brexit 
My daughter is 7 and we travel a lot in Europe. There were tears at Brexit in our house, amazing opportunities that I had experienced, taken away from her. Now I'm just angry. 
It’s not because you are foreign. Many many of us Brits are struggling to find the words to describe what is happening. Only silver lining #Brexit has activated many pro EU Brits. A massive pro EU grassroots is forming in the U.K. #FBPE #Bresistence 
I'm not sure it needed to be that way, but the post-referendum style of British politics has been distinctly adversarial and identity-based, with few attempts to reach out. 
The whole blue passport affair may be a sign we are reaching point of no return with a new form of Brexit-based negative partisanship: where politics is as much about dislike of opponents as actual policy wins. 
Rmainers are making such a big deal over the blue passport. One reason, of course, is that immigrants who have fake ones will be busted. Also, it heralds the distancing from the awful time when Britain was part of the illegally created EU. #Brexit 
  On the first day of Brexit, May spent for me…£490 million on #BluePassports£40 billion her #DivorceBill£350 million "promised" to the #NHS*£140 million on her vanity #GE2017 election And £1 billion on the #DUP#StopBrexit before it's too late. #FBPE*per week 
@SkyNews @Mike_Fabricant Responsible politicians look at facts & reality not shouting and cheap point scoring.  The world keeps moving on but some Brexiteers are stuck in the past.Britons may have to apply to visit Europe after Brexit  
While stuck in the queue at Calais (who says we don’t already have border control?) I listen to a French Radio discussion on Brexit. Adam Sage of The Times explains, in fluent French, why the EU will probably best the UK in negotiations. Good job Murdoch can’t speak French! 
Friends! I'd like to wish you all a - literally - Merry Christmas!But that would be Hate Speech, so I - literally - cannot.So: have a very Happy Winterval, despite Cliff-Edge Brexit and Tory Austerity! And I look forward to seeing you again on 2nd Jan!  
The Government could have changed the colour of British passports back to blue at any time regardless of Brexit.  
We Need to Talk About Those Who Would Gain from a Hard Brexit  
It's time for shy Leavers to stand up and be proud  #Brexit 
If May thinks that she's had a good year, can you begin to imagine what a bad year in her mind would look like. #Austerity #Poverty #NHS #DUP Theresa May responds to her 'Madame Brexit' nickname  
People back home would do anything to marry someone with a red passport. I'm sure after Brexit, they'll look at the blue passport and be like "Meh..."  IT'S UGLY AF!! 
Excellent news ! Many of us Remainers would be delighted ( & extremely relieved) if your optimism turned out to be correct, Andrew. What we still need is credible Brexit narrative not reliant on nostalgia, Tooth Fairy economics & consumer/stock market bubbles that must burst 
This outside my front door this morning. Happy Christmas to you too. I blame Brexit.  
Gibraltar accuses the EU of treating its citizens 'shamefully' over Brexit  
The Brexit 'impact assessments' do reveal one thing - that David Davis has done nothing to prepare for Brexit  
Up until now donations made to charities and political parties are exempt but now HMRC  has said payments from individuals to referendum campaigns are taxable!Scottish Tories / DUP did you pay Tax on the £450,000 #brexit donation,if not who should?  
When you apply for your #bluepassport you automatically get this too.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit  
Hilarious moment Polish translator accidentally dubs Theresa May 'Madame Brexit'  
I spoke to a distant relative this week for 1st time since referendum. He is angry at the lies he's been told re #Brexit & foolish for believing them. Says he naively trusted the Govt. He is writing to his MP to say #StopBrexit. #brexitshambles #FBPE #tideisturning @jeremycorbyn 
Born Catholic,now Anglican;repays Times for giving him a job by lying;knifes Cameron;adulterer. Mark my words. Johnson will disavow Brexit. 
Keeping Britain shackled to EU laws after Brexit would be madness:  
Nigel Farage - "I have loathed the fact that in trading freely with our neighbours, we have effectively got rid of our national identity. What’s happening here is we are getting it back, so happy Brexmas." #Brexit  
With her rhetoric about the "Will of the People" and "betrayal" Theresa May is reinforcing the entirely anti-democratic misconception that democracy means the dictatorship of the majority (a minority in the case of Brexit).#FBPE #StopBrexit #Brexit 
1. If we hadn’t always retained our sovereignty we would have had to ask the EU for permission to hold a Brexit referendum and we didn’t.2. The EU did not ask us to stop having blue passports.3. Brexit is utterly pointless. 
Brexit backers demand blue passports be made in UK as France and Germany vie for contract  @theresa_may @LiamFox @DavidDavisMP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
A little over a year ago I hadn't heard of you, David. You're one of my favourite politicians now (for very good reasons). Merry Christmas and THANK YOU for supporting your constituents - and everyone else in Britain - by opposing Brexit. 
‘Revenge of the Establishment’ – Brexit Donors Hit by Massive Tax Bills, Pro-EU Corporations Unscathed  
If you believe in evidence led not dogmatic policy making then you, like me, will be horrified that the government is making decisions about #Brexit and our future without any research into the impact of leaving the Single Market/Customs Union. 
The new British passport is going to be made in Germany. A huge victory and benefit for Leave and the British people. Brexit - the gift that keeps on giving.   
Brexit government finally forced to examine warranty on what they've bought. Imagine preparing for a big negotiation in advance! Pah, preparation is for snowflakes. Thank heavens for @JolyonMaugham 
.“Post-truth drove into our lives in the shape of the Brexit bus & its claim that the UK could save £350 million a week" by @CliffTaylorIT in @IrishTimes 
Any update on Labour’s Brexit position Jeremy?  
If you're still wondering why UK-US post #Brexit trade deal negotiations have to be conducted in secret.... the below is a helpful hint  
Completely iconic. What an icon. Definitely in the top 10 most iconic passports of 20th century. Absolutely unforgettable. What a colour. What a passport. What a time to be alive. Really the David Bowie of passport world. #iconicpassport #incrediblepassport #iconicblue #brexit  
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 23: the architect of Article 50, Lord Kerr, says Brexit is a reversible process if the British people change their minds. Please RT:  
Why is there more coverage of the new passport colour than there was of the fact that the government hasn’t done any impact assessments for Brexit 
#indyref2 #brexitshambles Spoke to English father and son living in Scotland who voted no last time. Both would vote yes next time. Reasons - Brexit. 
Telegraph urges HMRC to consider its ‘reputation’ and abandon its uppity plans to tax super rich Brexit donors.  pic.twitter.com/opttamI4Y4 
Theresa May in Poland looking help with Brexit after many Brits voted for Brexit to get the Poles out of Britain who were helping the Brits!  
Having now spent a while in America and seen politics from a different angle, my view on brexit has shifted from "we really fucked up" to "they really fucked up". 
EU makes it clear there'll be no free ride for Britain's financial services after Brexit  
Villain: the BBC News team and its Brexit coverage. Sorry but it has been imbalanced, poorly informed, and guilty of false equivalence. Its role in enabling this disaster will be a permanent stain on its reputation. pic.twitter.com/MTkIgi0YGo 
Low point: May triggering Article 50. Without a doubt the most stupid and damaging thing a British leader has done since… well, calling the EU referendum.  
“Tax ‘scam’ by tycoons who bought Brexit” might be an alternative headline  
So that’s all that Brexit has given us so far - apart from the over-exposure of this destructive twerp by the BBC.  
All these TV appearances from Farage calling the blue passport a Brexit 'victory', has anyone responded by pointing out it could've been blue anyway? Genuine question, maybe they have  
Let’s not kid ourselves - BREXIT is what’s damaging our national identity right now! #BluePassports 
Wait. Brexit was bankrolled by tycoons with questionable tax arrangements? Quite the scoop from the Telegraph. Perhaps not entirely intentional, though.  
If you want a Twitter feed with some great insight into the shambles that is Brexit - please follow @SamGhib. 
I was thinking about how, a few years ago, 2017 was heralded to be this huge year in Indigenous Affairs with a referendum to follow on from the ‘67 referendum, 50 years later, but how Indigenous Affairs has gone back decades instead, and so I wrote this.  
Time to axe the Remainers? Theresa May set for Cabinet reshuffle as Brexit talks intensify  
The EU want to force a superstate on Europe & have voted for an EU army remainers said was fantasy. The truth is if remainers had won the EU referendum UK armed forces would be under EU control & they would demand more integration e.g. UK joining the Euro  
You can keep your blue passport. It will be a symbol of a weak, inhuman and robotic leader, ham fistedly trying to deliver the self-sabotaging mess of a referendum that should never have taken place.  
Not just black; too big for pockets. Survey quoted on #TheLastLeg showed #brexitpassport is second to #hanging as #Brexit benefit from taking back control.  
The trouble @afneil is that the cost of a #bluepassport is not the main issue. The main issues are that such a piffling change is claimed to be hugely important, and that the new passport will not give us the right to live & work in 30 other EEA countries. #StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
One of the many pernicious aspects of #Brexit is the attempt to impose a #Britnat view of collective identity on a population with a myriad of identities. 
I just don’t get Guardian splash today. We are leaving EU. Our passports bound to change to non-EU. How can this cause extra Brexit issues? 
This passport nonsense is designed to reinforce the myth that Brexit is a done deal which cannot be stopped. ..and, of course, it serves as a distraction from the real horrors.#Remain #StopBrexit #passportgate 
Totally agree. May gets more 'disgusting' every day that passes. Her messianic Brexit zeal knows no bounds. It's actually very, very....odd seeing where she has come from.  
Why didn't you give us a vote in that stupid Referendum thingy? Just found out we're going to lose our pet passports. What will happen to us now when our humans go on holiday? #FBPE 
‘A striking feature of IDS’s ill-informed words was not just his ignorance of the facts, but the tell-you-a-thing-or-two-old-boy tone in which they were uttered.’ How very Brexit. 
Thread responding to @AndrewRosindell and @toryboypierce:British national identity and greatness is gone, along with Empire and Celtic acceptance of the myth of Britain. It's lost and no blue passports will ever bring it back. It's history.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit /1  
Been home one night. Had 5 arguments about Brexit, been told not to take a shower in the morning because I had a bath last night and it’s ‘bad for my skin’, discussed how I’ve been brainwashed for giving food to a food bank. Home for Xmas.  #lovemyfamily 
I'm looking forward to the debate (and subsequent referendum) on whether the new UK passport is blue & white or black & gold. 
I’m bracing myself for the inevitable footage of the Brexit Brigade camping outside the passport office on Blue Passport Eve, fighting for pavement space with all the people they’ve made homeless. 
One of EU greatest strengths has been encouraging ex communist East European dictatorships to enshrine democratic norms like judicial independence. UKgovt now actively undermining this process. #brexit ability to toxify everything in its wake continues unabated.  
Trying to predict anything in #Brexit is a mug’s game.But I’ve been thinking a lot about the transition period the UK is demanding.I’m pretty sure it’s *SO* complex to do that we’ll soon be arguing to extend the Article 50 process instead as it’s simpler. 
Why stop at #bluepassports ? Let's dare to dream: Spam, the three-day week, Rediffusion, the rope, Clause 28, the Sinclair C5, ration books, analogue TV, Spacehoppers and, yes, national service. C'mon folks! Brexit will be AS BOLD AS WE MAKE IT #MBGA 
You can’t do the same thing and expect a different result. Some call it madness, I call it foolishness! It is a referendum yes. We should at least go a step further this time; define the leadership we want. Only fools repeat the makes of the past!  
„Please name one single specific  advantage of #Brexit.”“We will get our blue colored passport back.”   
#Brexit is going sooo well, that after 9 months of negotiations, the first “victory” is something insignificant to many that we could have done whilst remaining in the EU. Still sure #Brexit is the answer to our country’s woes? #StopBrexit #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll 
1)The ridiculous triumphalism over changing the colour of a travel document is banal 2) That  this is being hailed as a great victory for Brexit shows how dreadful the process is going 3) Brexit continues to be an act of stupidity and harm to the UK  
#Lunch #LifeStories presents  The best of 2017With a selection of our favourite Life Stories from this year For the next 2 mins don’t worry about #bitcoin #brexit #NorthKorea or #Christmas #shopInstead get some #SaturdayMotivation that will help your Christmas Eve Eve 
Siri. Show me a tweet that perfectly encapsulates the backward-looking futility and sheer waste of time, energy and money that is Brexit. 
New Brexit blue passport shall mean more restrictions on travel Tory gov can’t even get “taking back control” right this shall mean less control of travel  Brexit still proving itself to be expensive unworkable nonsense 
Which ever side of the Brexit divide you’re on, what Poland is doing with it’s judiciary should scare you. And scare you enough that you don’t want to see it here. Unless you don’t actually support democracy and the rule of law.  
UK is placing itself on the wrong side of history and at the same time lending weight to the narrative that Brexit is not about a deep and special relationship with the EU but an attempt to destroy both the organisation and the liberal foundations upon which it is based 
Seeing this in a British newspaper, @soler_toni, the British public only wonder WHY the Spanish police would investigate Guardiola simply for declaring his intention to vote “yes” in a referendum or for attending a pro-independence rally. Er, why? That’s crazy. Isn’t Franco dead?  
Legal action over whether the UK can reverse Brexit gets go ahead #Premium 
Just a reminder that Brexit is not the will of the people.It is the will of a group of poorly-educated, low-income, elderly people who - incidentally - tended not to have a passport.They are the past.  Remain is the future.  
This is shocking. The current Polish government is a bunch of fascists who are subjecting their judicial system to their politics. The EU is  upholding its liberal values by censuring Poland. In siding with Poland May and her Brexit cabal grow ever more disgusting.  
I suspect that once we know the full impact of Brexit, It will sharply rise to well into the 60% mark. Folk can't stick their head in the sand any longer.Latest poll shows 49 percent of Scots back an independent Scotland in the EU over post-Brexit UK  
But blue passports is a great metaphor for #Brexit. We get something back that we never lost, it cost us money and brings no actual benefit whatsoever. 
Don't you know that Brexit is all about claiming victory for things we already had?"Now" we can change to the #BluePassport,"Now" we can set restrictions on immigration."Now" we can refuse to join an EU army."Now" we can say no to accepting refugees. 
Why EU is losing support in Italy - a lost generation on the dole.  Read #Brexit Facts4EU today:  
Obviously the colour of my passport is far more bloody important than impending economic gloom from Brexit. The Daily Mail, publishing bullshit year after year with intellect of a cat litter tray. 
The absurdity of the faux nostalgia in the yearning for blue passports perfectly sums up the pointlessness of Brexit. A new shiny blue #brexitpassport which will literally be a #passporttonowhere 
How gullible does @theresa_may think we are...Most people regardless of how they voted in the referendum see this for what it is.A distraction and a monumental waste of money.  
The Spanish Inquisition is alive and well, thanks to Rajoy and the PP:Manchester City manager Pep Guardiola being investigated by Spanish police over Catalonia referendum  
Nothing from Jeremy Corbyn or Labour about the Blue passports. He doesn’t want to confront the ugly nationalism inherent in Brexit because he knows it plays well with working class voters.  He’s trying to ride this all the way to No 10. Shame on him. 
One of the great discoveries of Buddhism is “Anatman” (non/self) there is no fixed unchanging self.To hold onto the illusion of an unchanging self  in an ever changing world is to invite suffering.This is Brexit, this is the blue passports, the anti immigration,the self delusion  
The #bluepassport has touched a raw nerve, going to the heart of #Brexit and #indyref2 The passport in effect, is the ultimate expression of nationhood and sovereignty. The holder has tangible proof, of belonging to the U.K, adhering to British values, admired around the world. 
We Need to Talk About Those Who Would Gain from a Hard Brexit " if those pushing for a hard Brexit have their way, then the tax-avoiding money hoarders could save a fortune... perhaps some newspaper proprietors would be beneficiaries.."Brilliant piece. 
Businesses WILL continue to choose UK over EU countries DESPITE Brexit, strategist says  
It is the year 2019 (3 AB after #Brexit) and the May Government Replaces ‘English’ with ‘Newspeak’ as the UK’s official language. The use of the words ‘Freedom’ and ‘will of the People’ is regulated by UK directive 1207b section 7 paragraph 12 also known as the Farage Clause.  
£2 trillion debt£250 billion Brexit fallout bill£200 billion Trident renewal£50 billion HS2Slowest economic growth in worldCurrency at all time lowU.K. Gvmt to spend £500 million on making our passports blue.But apparently independent Scotland isn't economically viable. 
Before #Brexit only the British passport was maroon.  After Brexit the entire UK will be marooned.#bluepassport #StopBrexit #StopFundingBrexit 
It symbolises none of those things @theresa_may, it’s a symbol of gesture politics which tries to distract the British people from the utter failure of your #Brexit policy.  
BRIAN LUCEY: Brexit is not a friendly act and we have to invest big  
RT Great News: Government facing High Court challenge to cancel Article 50 and halt #Brexit negotiations @SkyNews @BBCNews @bbc5live @LBC #r4today @UKLabour #Skypapers #Bbcpapers @itvnews #CancelBrexit 
Ah, here’s #RandPaul and #YuriVanetik That Yuri guy really gets around... #GOPRussia #GOPComplicit #TrumpRussia & #Brexit =#FarRightGlobalCoup #ImpeachThenProsecuteThemALL #Traitors #Resist  
Conservative Brexit Reality:  Lots of negatives, not many positives.#Conservatives#StopBrexit#Brexit#FBPE 
Manchester City manager Pep Guardiola being investigated by Spanish police over Catalonia referendum  
Even after independence if 18000 villages were without electricity it is a referendum on your governance of 60 years not on Modi’s 3.5 years.  
Happy Christmas. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Expect white dog poo to make a comeback post Brexit. 
This ‘British passports can be blue again’ story is complete nonsense - a) because it’s being presented as somehow a tangible positive & important consequence of Brexit and b) because it is not an EU stipulation that passports are Burgundy. We could’ve gone back to blue anytime.  
UK passports will change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  
Blue passports could have been re-introduced without Brexit, Government admits  
Ok! Now this whole #Brexit disaster makes sense! We get a blue passport!  
Six Tory ministers are members of a secret group supporting Brexit for their own reasons…  
P.P.S. This is all @acgrayling's fault. He told me not to give up fighting Brexit. What was I meant to do?  
Brexit project is surely one of the worst political decisions ever made by a UK government. It confirms the UK’s new global position as a small-minded island, soon to be off the coast of ‘nowhere’. No government should have allowed this mess to materialise.  
Roses are red, violets are blue...lets sack Brexit off and agree that we'd rather have the workers rights directive, environmental protection & the charter of fundamental rights rather than the good ole days of blue passports, Mellow Bird and casual misogyny/racism/homophobia. 
Special Thanks to (2): Everyone who keeps fighting and exposing the bad thing done badly that is Brexit. 
Persistent lie of the year: The PM is still claiming that an FTA can be done with the EU by Brexit day. It can't be. The EU have said it can't and won't be. What don't you understand? It's not happening. Why do you keep saying it will??!! 
I don't believe this, someone on Sky said for Brexiters the new passport signifies re-birth of getting away fro the EU. Brexit is far from being settled and it's only a passport yet look at the desperation for a ' success '. 
Britain will symbolize its process of leaving the E.U. by changing the color of its passports from burgundy to blue once Brexit is complete.  
I just supported this case.  via @CrowdJusticePlease share and donate what you can.  If you can't donate I would understand, please share and retweet. #A50Challenge #brexit  
And I though Brexit was a wholly wrong thing. But it brought me #knobchops and for that I will be eternally greatly  
British passports will change from burgundy to blue after Britain leaves the EU. Do changes like this make up for the stress of Brexit?  
Brexit is primarily a cultural temper tantrum of nostalgic imperialists. It has nothing to do with reality.  
‘I don't buy it!' Tory MP @KwasiKwarteng destroys claims of travel freedoms SHRINKING after Brexit  
No, the reason we have Brexit is 40 years of drip drip propaganda by the British printed media. Simply that, but also the cowardice of some elected politicians to face down that propaganda.  
Leave-backing Tories, including Jacob Rees-Mogg, are calling for Britain's post-Brexit passports to be made in the UK.  
Any doubts about May's backing for a #Brexit culture war were removed by her #citizensofnowhere speech 15 months ago; all she has done since, especially with today's #bluepassport nonsense, is confirm it. I don't want any of May's 'culture'. 
Says everything you need to know about Brexit  
Brexit voters least likely to hold a passport.But want it to be a different colour.Which it could be even without Brexit.Stop the madness. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
My dad pointed out tonight that EU member state Croatia also has blue passports and it didn't need to carry out a kamikaze referendum to get them, it just simply decided not to change the colour in the first place.  
.@BloombergTV can't believe that the UK is actually leaving a huge trading bloc- for whatever reason. They're capitalists.. and think #Brexit is ..insane.Especially now that Europe is on an up curve. (They try to be objective,, though).  
Just think ... If you voted Leave, and Brexit goes ahead, that blue passport will be like an albatross around your neck, reminding you every time you use it what a berk you were to believe Leave lies.#StopBrexit#XenophobeBlue 
The Great Irish Bank Bailout metaphor was an innocent, relatable man accidentally slipping on ice and banging his head.The Great Brexit Metaphor is a wanker trying to impress his mates getting his balls double-whalloped while dressed like a spoilt 9 year old.  
Russia worked hard to get Trump in the Whitehouse and Britain to Brexit, but did you fall for any of the 3000 Facebook ad campaigns or the 150k+ fake accounts? Russia TRICKED voters, and when facts change, minds can change. Take a look #RESIST #StopBrexit 
If you supported Remain you get a knighthood or CBE, if you supported Brexit you get a tax bill - typical establishment @Arron_banks @LordAshcroft @matthew_elliott @wdjstraw 
My top remainer annoyance is being told why I voted for Brexit and how that reason was wrong ....why don’t you ask my reason first....? 
3 simple points about the final Brexit deal:1. 》It will harm the UK.2. 》It will be exactly what the EU wants it to be.3. 》Neither the Tories nor Labour want you to be able to back out of it, no matter how bad it is.#StopBrexit 
Bear in mind that the original blue-black colour was imposed on us by the League of Nations in 1920 and all .@theresa_may's fine words are shown up as the hogwash they are. #Brexit is nostalgia for a mythic Britain that never existed. In reality, #BrexitBetraysBritain.WAKE UP! 
Britain after Brexit. 
Blue passports could have been re-introduced without Brexit, Government admits.Meanwhile, people are being stripped of their right to live and work across the EU. #StopBrexit. 
The blue passport nonsense really does sum up Brexit. 
It was your giving airtime to this monstrous idiot that caused the whole Brexit catastrophe. Stop it, he's a nobody.  
Deary me! Some rather intolerant and extreme comment on Brexit here. I should be delighted to come to @Uni_of_Essex to take part in a sensible discussion, if invited. I am often on campus.  
I'm having a Brexit Christmas dinner. No Turkey or Brussels. #Christmas #JustSaying #MerryChristmas 
Is Theresa May more than Madame Brexit? - I'm more than 'Madame Brexit' - Theresa May  #MateuszMorawiecki @theresa_may @ConservativesGE RETWEET & VOTE  #YourVoiceMatters 
So basically, all Remainers will find reasons to dumb down opportunities and will try to find negatives from all change resulting from Brexit. Passports are just the start..... 
The #bluepassport fiasco might rebound on T May by showing those Remain voters who’d apparently resigned themselves to #Brexit, & Leave voters beginning to wonder if it’s really up their street, just what a silly, totemic, ideological, empty farce #Brexit really is 
Putin wants to destabilize Western Democracy...he targeted UK/Europe/Brexit with Farage, Johnson, et al..while targeting our election Trump, Bannon...They tried for 3-peat with France but failed...we’re under attack and at cyber war with Russia... 
Toxic Tony to spend £10million on new campaign to block Brexit. Take note Labour voters he's keen for free movement to make sure we don't get a pay rise. 
*looks at brexit*  
Welcome to Tory Britain...before Brexit truly hits.  
New York could be the biggest beneficiary of Brexit, argues Lionel Barber  
Your tweeting drivel of this kind encapsulates the insanity of Brexit and the absence of any rational arguments in favour of it. No-one but a moron cares a flying f--k about the colour of their passport, and it's morons to whom you hope to appeal with this shallow tweet.  
Make Britain Crap again. Reinventing the wheel? The insanity of #Brexit and Blue Passports @chunkymark 
So instead of tackling real challenges - NHS underfunding, low wages,  lack of skills, shortage of affordable housing - or even fixing its Brexit ‘end goal’, this truly contemptible #ToryBrexitgovt chooses pathetic #bluepassport gesture politics that 80% don’t even want 
And when you have professional journalists writing lies such as ‘Euronotes Cause Impotence‘ or ‘EU Puts Speed Limits on Children’s Roundabouts‘ or 'Curved Bananas Banned by Brussels' - then the result is a breakdown of democracy.As happened with Brexit:  
Brexit won't bring back Woolworths. Or resurrect Morecambe and Wise. Or bring dolly birds back. There's not going to be a return of Seaside Special and Spangles are still gone. 
Tomorrow's front page: 49% YES ... poll delivers an early Christmas present as nearly half of Scots would vote for independence in Europe over Brexit Britain in an early 2019 indyref ... we say let's do it  
You are only as good as the company you keep and May is keeping company with someone that is trying to dismantle their countries independent legal system.  Says a lot about Brexit Britain. #StopBrexit 
Article: July 7 2017: Brexit vote sees highest spike in religious and racial hate crimes ever recorded #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
‘Government admits it could have brought back blue passports without Brexit’.... but it didn’t because... it really doesnt matter!  
hey with all this brexit stuff if we can decide what we're putting on passports can ireland just have the cd inlay booklet of Maniac 2000 as our passport book 
Our PM chimes in to parrot the tabloids & Brexit loonies... because #bluepassport wasn’t yet cringe enough. 
The Office for Budget Responsibility has regularly reported the Brexit black hole in our public finances. Here's the Financial Times explaining that Brexit is already costing us £350m per week!  
Theresa May defends the Polish government's assault on the Rule of Law. This is entirely in line with her authoritarian contempt for the ECHR, ECJ and legal checks on her government's power.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Brexit BOMBSHELL: UK small business predict economic BOOM during UK split with EU  
Is it any shock that the government is totally betraying us on Brexit when it's stuffed to the brim with Remain campaigners? We need real leadership in this country!  
The colour is not relevant because the contract was already up for renewal irrespective of Brexit. There is no increased cost to UK tax payers. The colour change adds no cost to the new contract.  Therefore the colour is irrelevant. 
2017- Trump sworn in as President- North Korea tests- UK triggers Brexit- Syria chemical attack and US military response- Terror attacks across world and Las Vegas massacre- Defeat of ISIS- Hurricanes and flooding- Catalonia crisis- Sexual harassment scandals 
Legal action over whether UK can stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
Theresa May and Boris Johnson's condemnation of Russia's cyber attacks is entirely specious so long as the Tories persist with a #Brexit which will represent a massive victory in Putin's war against the EU & western democracy.#BrexitBetraysBritain.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
People of one country living in other will not have to apply for residency rights post-Brexit  
In fairness, a passport can be a pretty powerful identity marker.That's why since Brexit I've been using my Irish one. 
If you watch the BBC’s election coverage of the 1975 EEC referendum on December 31st at 22:52:03 then Britain will have voted to stay in the EU right as the clock strikes midnight. Start your year off right. 
Exactly. Johnson's claim that Russia targeted the referendum, 'but not successfully', defies logic. They weren't supporting 'remain'. 
So my being black invalidates the points I make? I'd hope so, for your sake.Because if it doesn't, then you choosing to focus on my skin colour strongly suggests you can't find fault in my logic.In your position, as a Brexit supporter, I would be more worried by the latter.... 
British Government confirm Irish people will be free to live and work in UK ‘uninhibited’ post-Brexit  pic.twitter.com/PQUlsCEWzk 
Excellent video - Monbiot gets to the heart of the corrupt pretence of Tory ministers that their Brexit is in the interest of British workers  
Gina Miller started 2017 with a groundbreaking Brexit victory. She ended it getting her way again  
Whenever I read the latest Brexit nonsense...  
Jeremy Corbyn suffers major Brexit rebellion as 64 Labour MPs defy whip over customs union 
The cat explanation of Brexit is possibly the most accurate one ever, tbh. #BrexitGIFs 
Right to highlight that difference. Passport thing a joke. But please get more active in opposing Brexit full stop.   
So if you think having a blue passport is a brexit victory wait until you get the chance to protect your rights to wear a knotted hanky on your head and socks with sandals at the same time. Politics in action, sockin' it to em there Theresa... 
Brexit is destroying our NHS, our economy, jobs and quality of life... but we've got blue passports. Of course Croatia has blue passports and they're IN the EU... but sure, let's pretend we've 'won'.  
Poland - EU referendum poll, Millward Brown/TVNREMAIN 83%Leave 11% 
I with you on that. This whole #bluepassport thing has left me incandescent with rage. That people can seriously get excited over a passport cover sums up the total idiocy of the whole pointless stupid moment in this country's history which is now defined by Brexit. 
Lovely Twitterers - Feel free to send me a friend request on Facebook - solidarity against Trump & Brexit! 
In the UK, here's the Russian observer claiming that Scotland's independence referendum in 2014 didn't meet international standards:  
Gibraltar condemns EU negotiating guideline setting that a separate two-year Brexit transition phase for Gibraltar will need to be negotiated directly between London and Madrid 
Just popping in to say this:It’s now confirmed that Russia targeted Brexit.The only argument now is whether or not they succeeded.On one side there is extensive evidence saying they did.On the other side is Boris Johnson. 
Farmers are right to be pessimistic #Brexit voters want £350m/week on #NHS before a single penny goes on agricultural subsidies. No group stands to lose more proportionately 
Turns out any EU country can have any passport colour they like, so what are we waiting for @theresa_may, give us #bluepassports now and then we can forget about Brexit since that was the last argument Brexiteers were clinging to.  
How Brexit could go wrong over the next decade  
Wrong as usual. Wrong on everything.I went to France, Germany, Belgium, Italy and Switzerland in the years before we joined the EEC never mind the failing #EU and didn't need any documentation other than my splendid #bluepassport It's #Brexit time. 
Will take a miracle to repair the damage being caused by Brexit ambition:The people completely dividedParliament in disarrayUK reputation shotUK isolatedExcludedThe solution?A compromise formulated by an all party pro-EU alliance. pic.twitter.com/2ydERzTWOI 
So @Charlotte_Tyson has blocked me...My work today is done.Lose sleep tonight I will not. #Brexit   
Niche tweet for older tweeps. Maybe post-Brexit economy will be so crap we’ll get V forms in our passports again. Max spend abroad/year £50.  
Unrelated things?1. Brexit 2. EU starts its own army3. EU gets stroppy  with democratic Poland.4. UK signs defence pact with Poland 
Brexit; an analogy... 
Spanish police engaged in excessive force when confronting demonstrators in Catalonia during a disputed referendum on Catalonia’s independence in October - one of @hrw's most viewed videos in 2017  pic.twitter.com/ArJHlkardZ 
When you try explain to a Scottish Nationalist that the Brexit referendum was a UK wide vote...  
The Governments introduction of Blue passports isn't the will of the people. The majority of the country don't think it is even important what colour the British passport is, it is just the older Brexit extremists that live in the past that want blue passports. #StopBrexit 
What is triggering REMOANers about "blue passport" is that it's a visible sign that #BrExit is happening. Everything else is words so they can refuse to hear them and pretend it can all be undone. Sorry, but we had the debate and you lost it. Time to climb back on board.  
Contempt for one of their own MPs and even greater contempt for the ordinary working people that voted for Brexit.  
congrats on changing your formerly-redcoated passports to the color of the Continental Army, the French revolutionary National Guard, and Napoleon's Imperial Guard, Brexit cucks  
Six leading members of Theresa May’s cabinet are paid-up subscribers of the secretive European Research Group, the hard-line anti-EU caucus of Conservative MPs who have serially refused to publish their membership list.  #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Shameful and embarrassing, but not remotely surprising. Once again: Gov hasn't done assessments about Brexit's economic impact because it doesn't care how badly it batters the economy. Brexit is about ideology and fear, not real lives or jobs.My piece:  
Pep Guardiola being investigated by Spanish police over #Catalonia referendum support  
British passport contract up for renewal, will cost £500m over 11 years to keep it burgendy. Someone says "fuck it lets have blue again, cost is the same, Brexit init?" Twitter ablaze with claims colour change costs £500m. But ... But... russian bots. You're all fucking morons. 
I am quoted in this story on whether blue passports will simply symbolise travel hassles for UK citizens post Brexit -  
No Brexit sector research, Irish border chaos & no clarity on regulars but we have time & money for this? #passports 
Anyone who thinks having a #bluepassport is important is either a total idiot or a cynical lying political manipulator.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
“The threadbare state of government preparations for Brexit was exposed on Thursday as civil service reports once heralded for providing ‘excruciating detail’ on the impact of leaving the EU were criticised for containing little more than padding, repetition and plagiarism.”  
In a press conference today, Boris Johnson has told Russia that their interference in Western democracies has ‘not been successful’. Which is simply a bizarre thing to say, given the Russians have got Brexit to undermine the EU and Trump the man-child in the White House 
The Remoaner meltdown over #BluePassports is glorious and hilarious.Imagine their grief, tears & vitriol when we are finally & fully free from their grasping, money grubbing, anti-democratic, threatening, authoritarian and Marxist EU.#Brexit  
Dear @Channel4News if you're going to insist on calling the pro-indy Catalan parties separatists, then by that logic Brexit Britain is a separatist state now too. 
“The question is whether Theresa May will be prepared to put the country’s future ahead of her own pride." @jonlis1 on Brexit:  
How #Spain drove #Catalonia from wanting just a decent autonomy to seeing no other way out than independence. Still the Catalans only want to go there if democratically decided in a referendum. But a referendum in itself is already to much for Spain. 
Trouble is, he's SO anti Brexit, he can't be objective, and uses any and all situations to sway others to 'his' opinion. 
@A50Challenge I've always said brexit will fail on a technicality Here it is and the govt will fall on it's on sword  
Could you add reversal of Brexit? A fantasy to cling to over the festive season  
So you voted to gamble 100s of billions in wait and see but can't name a tangible benefit that u think Brexit will bring.Good one. Thanks a lot. 
The return of the blue British passport after Brexit won’t only be the return of a colour. It will symbolise the return of our GREAT country’s INDEPENDENCE, SELF-DETERMINATION & NATIONAL IDENTITY!  
Brexit: Has there ever been a time when the UK has spent so much time, energy and money contemplating its own navel?Politics is a messParliament appears confusedThe people dividedOfficial opposition supports Brexit agendaTrivia and nationalism in controlFuture, bleak.  
A new BREXMAS stamp celebrates the spirit of I'll will to all including the baby jesus #brexit  
It really is staggeringly pathetic how Brexit pom pom boys are so easily pleased about a #bluepassport. I’d bin mine in a flash to get my hands on this 26 country, elk  prancing beauty. 
May's next great step forward in the #Brexit disaster is a return to green paper driving licences that fall apart in your wallet. 
Happy holidays to everyone who didn’t vote for Trump or Brexit 
Dear God, the obtuse, juvenile "give me slogans because I can't cope with rational arguments" emptiness of it. Just wait and see what a Worthing Business Directory looks like if Hard #Brexit consigns the economy to the rubbish tip. #StopBrexit #FBPE. 
There is no turning back. You take the #bluepassport: the story ends, you wake up in your bed & believe whatever you want to believe. You take the burgundy passport: you stay in Wonderland & I show you how deep the rabbit hole goes. Remember: all I'm offering is the truth #brexit 
Legal action to see whether UK could unilaterally stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
#BorisJohnson proving he's a 'tough guy' in Russia but actually looking like a prize fool. Brexit happened not because of Russian involvement but because of bullshitters like Johnson telling the public they'd be better off and that more money would go to the #NHS. Fool. #bbcnews 
#Catalonia #independence vote progression:2006: 1,352,1112010: 1,422,0032012: 1,734,8522014: 1,897,274 non-binding non-official #referendum2015: 1,966,5082017: 2,044,038 #indyref2017: 2,062,378 #elections(99.7% votes counted) 
As we break for the festive period I wish you all, even the diminishing rump of Remoaners, aBrexitastic Brexmas!Viva Brexit! 
To be brought back after Brexit. Death penalty: 16% Remain, 53% Leave. Corporal punishment in schools: 14% Remain, 42% Leave. Nearly a culture war there.  
Ha! I told you I’d deliver a red, white and blue #Brexit:Red lines White supremacists Blue passports Back of the net. Boom!!  
The fanatical desire for Blue/Black passports as a symbol of xenophobic nationalist pride and a return to the past shows everything that is wrong with Brexit and the divide it has created in Britain. #StopBrexit 
Good choice of hero of the year. @faisalislam has put BBC’s Brexit coverage to shame. 
Brexit reminds me of QPR. Spending shit loads of money on stuff we don't need and ultimately being worse off than we were before. 
Back in the blue: Brexit supporters score victory on passports  
Brexiteers & Tories saying #bluepassport makes them proud to be British.Spending £50 billion on Brexit & turning our back on a progressive union while NHS & social care is on it's arse and homelessness and foodbank use is up is NOTHING to be proud of. 
But if you click through, they've updated the picture to have a new mock-up half-way to black. It's bizarre. It's ridiculous. It'd make Communist Russia blush. It's Brexit Britain. 
Momentous Panelbase poll suggests Brexit could lead to majority support for independence -  #ScotRef 
Mateusz Morawiecki, Poland's PM has expressed a desire for talks on a UK-EU trade deal including services to start "as soon as possible" #Brexit  
I suspect that the Russians were expecting thanks for helping to fix the referendum result for Boris.. #brexitshambles 
EU nations that have already overridden Barnier to call for a services-included trade deal with Britain: ItalyBelgiumPoland#Brexit  
My hunch is Boris Johnson has suddenly decided to acknowledge Russian interference in our politics as a prelude to disowning Brexit. 
Thatcher and subsequent administrations trashed manufacturing. We became a service economy. The 'Big Brexit Problem' is that you can't 'trade' services. We have nothing much to offer 'world markets'. WTO rules for bugger all and with the City's income descimated, we are stuffed 
I understand the outrage at the 10yr passport contract costing £490m (nothing to do with Brexit btw)For that sort of money we could get about 10 days of EU membership. #brexophobia 
The “return” of blue passports is the PERFECT symbol of Brexit, in that it’ll cost a fortune, it’ll achieve nothing but make some idiots fleetingly happy, it’s based on an entirely spurious idea of the past (they were BLACK, not blue)… and it hasn’t actually happened yet. 
We now go live to Brexit. #BluePassport 
The fact that govt feels it’s worth announcing that passports will change colour *if* we leave the EU tells just just how bankrupt their post-Brexit vision is 
For my next passport I guess I’ll just have to buy a burgundy covert printed with the EU logo, because *fuck* those little-englanders and the Brexit they rode in on. 
Many thanks @KateHoeyMP Much appreciated. And congratulations to you for your excellent work on pushing the case for #Brexit in the House of Commons & putting the country first.  
Annoyed with @uklabour & remain spreading #FakeNews this time on the #Bluepassport ? Then Retweet the life out of this please. The Passport contract is up for renewalWe’d be paying if we had never heard of #Brexit or if they were staying same colour 
Most people who voted for Brexit won't need a #bluepassport.Most are so old they'll be dead by the time their old ones run out.#ironic 
What a shambles @DavidDavisMP - Proof that part of Brexit impact assessment was actually copied and pasted from Wikipedia. - Via @PSbook #ToryWinterCrisis …  
The referendum was advisory, the margin between leave and remain was small, the vote was influenced by Russia, article 50 was not lawful, economy is flat lining and it would appear that the will of the people is changing now we are getting nearer to leaving 
I don't care about the colour but the #bluepassport is a perfect metaphor for BREXIT: Nostalgic, identity-driven, nationalistic and confers less advantage and freedom on the holder than the article it is supposed to replace. 
There is nothing wrong with a strong president, but in April we argued that Turkey’s referendum made President Erdogan a modern sultan  
Is it me, or is it that when it becomes painfully evident that Davis' department has cribbed the "sectoral analyses" from Wikipedia, we suddenly have twitter gushing over blue passports and Big Ben bongs.C'mon folks, stay focused #Brexit 
And if we end up having to reverse our national suicide bid and rejoin the EU without opt outs, and in the Euro, it will somehow be Remainers' fault for not getting behind Brexit.Bugger that. You wanted it. You were warned. This is not our disaster. 
#BLUEPASSPORTS - the FACTS• The Passport contract is up for renewal.• Renewal costs £500million• Neither the colour change nor #Brexit is part of that fee. • We’d be paying it anyway even if we chose the burgundy colour again & were remaining in the EU. #EndFakeNews 
“Blue passports could have been re-introduced without Brexit, Government admits”   
12000 retweets but still 100% wrong. The 2009 10yr passport supply contract was £400m and due for renewal even if Brexit hadn't happened. This is the next 10 yr contract to supply 6m passports a year at £490m to allow for inflation. A security redesign's normal every few yrs too  
Legal action over whether the UK can reverse Brexit gets go ahead  
In a stunning Brexit victory for the Sun, new UK passports will feature a picture of a topless woman on page 3.  
If this is the quality of thinking that has gone into the pluses and minuses of  #Brexit ( and it is) then no wonder so many of us dread what lies ahead with such people (ostensibly) in charge.  It would be risible if it wasn’t terrifying…  
it was not a referendum but elections and not specially held in normal circumstances. 
“Blub...whine...blub...boo boo...blue passport...Brexit...wah...it’s not fair...whine...racism...blub...bitch...cry...whine...Brexit...wah...blue passport...I’m an EU extremist...whine...blub...blub...blue passport....”I’m @DavidLammy & I whine about #Brexit pic.twitter.com/9ebx59xtnM 
Government facing High Court challenge to cancel Article 50 and halt Brexit negotiationsIf judicial review is successful, legal mechanism could be nullified and negotiations haltedWouldn't that be a wonderful late Xmas present  
Jesus Christ. If a Blue passport is the price we have to pay for a sensible Brexit, let's pay it. They're changing the bloody colour, not saying we have to display it on pain of death. Everyone's gone mad. Again. 
Here's another one for you @markpack. I resigned from the Brexit loving @UKLabour last year after the leadership contest. I thought I'd done with politics, but Jeremy's recent activities have convinced me to join the @LibDems and fight Brexit all the way. 
A very happy Xmas to all my London constituents, friends and family. Let's hope and it's my sincerest wish 2018 brings some positive resolution to the deeply divisive Brexit question & more harmony across the UK. 
Your terrifying statistic of the day - slightly more Leave voters are in favour of the death penalty than the reintroduction of #bluepassports #brexit  
As with all things Brexit, it will be poorer people who suffer most. The rich will buy their freedom to live wherever they choose, while those with less money have their dreams ripped away.The price of taking back control, is the loss of our control to define our own futures. 
Potentially significant successful campaign by @JolyonMaugham and others.If Parliament knows explicitly it has the power to order Remain, it will have real sovereignty in Brexit matters.Brings Remain into the Overton window. 
Am I wrong to think it is wiser to require a reasonable majority to validate the break up of Spain (Catalonia) the UK (Scotland) and the EU (#Brexit) not just a few percentage points? 
I've got it.Make passport colour a free individual choice between Brexit blue and EU burgundy. Make everyone apply for a fresh one.Give it 5 years and rejoin the EU or stay out, according to the majority colour in use.I am only half joking.#bluepassport 
One inspiration for Michel Barnier's Brexit steps chart may have been this more dramatic cliff edge version by @epc_eu @FabianZuleeg 
Enjoyed today; seeing why Remain lost the referendum in the first place. A reminder of the sheer contempt the metropolitan class have for the importance of having a 'British identity'. The passport issue isn't in itself important, but it is a symbol to many people. 
When it comes to Brexit negotiations- it’s an extension we want, not a transition.  
The Brexit impact papers read like an essay where a student has struggled to reach the word count.  
Instead of talking about the lack of proper preparation for the impact of Brexit on the economy and society, we are talking about an 'iconic' passport that no-one under the age of 45 (?) remembers.  
It could have returned without Brexit, dear @BBCNews, as there was no EU obligation to have a burgundy version (see Croatia). Please do your homework. 
Legal action to prove UK can stop Brexit gets go-ahead. A great Christmas present for the #StopBrexit movement. #FBPE.   
When Britain has left the EUOur passports will once more be blue;As blue as the holder,Abandoned to moulderFor hours in a non-EU queue.#bluepassport #Brexit 
Amazing artwork, and scintillating wit. How did Remain possibly fail to win the referendum with talent like this on their side?  
UK passports will change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  
Don't talk down our hand, Remainers. We can play a blinder over #Brexit. We have a huge trade deficit with the EU – totalling £82 billion in 2016. Our markets are vital for the countries that drive the EU27’s economy.  
Retweet if you remember when we had proper blue British passports for real British people, and they had a picture of a golliwog on them! #bluepassport #Brexit #TheyreComingBack 
Government facing High Court challenge to cancel Article 50 and halt Brexit negotiations  
Fair point. Passports, royal yacht etc are all distractions from the monumental balls-up the Govt are making of Brexit.  
An idiotic statement (we could have had them anyway) from an appalling human being who is by a mile the worst PM in our proud history. An utter disgrace to this country, that she is trying to destroy. We shall stop brexit in 2018.  
Join our pointless campaign to make the #NewBritishPassport a #RainbowPassport (Just to wind up the #Brexit Bunch)  
Our wonderful blue British passports are coming back after Brexit.  pleased? Or is  it daft PR. Join me on @LBC from 7 
Britain's economy faces twin pressures, both related to Brexit, in latest GDP figures  
People are dragging the blue UK passport that's coming out after Brexit 
Brexiteers: "I have a dream that my four little children will one day live in a nation where they will be judged by the colour of their passport, not by the content of their character." #brexit #bluepassport 
What a divisive waste of time that will just create more bad feeling.We weren't even forced to change the colour of our passports in 1988. It was never a EU directive or one of their regulations. That was just another Brexit lie. #StopBrexit 
After revisions announced today, average quarterly #GDP growth in the five quarters since the EU referendum is exactly the same (just over 0.4% q/q) as in the five quarters before, #despiteBrexit. We can argue about the counterfactual, but talk of a sharp slowdown is misleading. 
'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit....Just like American passports then.  
#WriteABrexitSectorReport#EU pet passport currently allows pets to travel across #EU borders without going through quarantine which causes unnecessary suffering and stress to animals.After #Brexit: FUCK KNOWS.But according to Owen Patterson they will "come to an arrangement." pic.twitter.com/eHsZwptQoe 
Gotta big up the Brits tho, any other country on earth having an ongoing identity crisis clusterfuck would have turned dull as fuck after a few weeks, but 18 months into this Brexit thing and it's STILL comedy gold. 
@CloughOlive this sums up the priorities of #Brexit nicely  
#WriteABrexitSectorReportThe #NHS needs nurses.Many nurses are #EU immigrants.Applications from #EU nurses are down 90%.The #NHS needs doctors.1/2 #EU doctors are thinking of leaving.1/5 #EU doctors already planning to do so.BUT LET'S #BREXIT ANYWAY BECOZ WILLOFTHEPEOPLE. 
I still fail to see how wanting Scotland to leave her most important political & economic union (the UK,  not the EU) gives the SNP such a grand soapbox to stand on top of when it comes to Brexit & the identity politics behind it.  
I personally couldn't care less what colour my passport is. And I suspect neither could most people, regardless of how they voted in the referendum. So watching the pro-EU fanatics getting so angry about the whole thing really is amusing. 
Like my Brexit driver, when told his plans to retire to Spain might not go smoothly, said that was a problem for people like me to sort out.  
#Brexit explained...  
#BluePassports A Passport, a little book that opens up the world, enables travel&discovery, enables 1 2 see different cultures, broadening horizons by exchanging values. How very appropriate that in this #Brexit shambles it’s it’s COLOUR not it’s FUNCTION that’s being discussed. 
Thanks to @UNPeacebuilding’s 2017 #GYPI, we will join forces w/ @UNFPA & @UNHumanRights to empower women and youth for a free, fair, transparent and violence-free Referendum in Papua New Guinea.  
The #Brexit fanatics are so busy rejoicing about #BluePassports that they haven't noticed that Davis's "reports" were written by a 6 year old with access to Wikipedia. Besides, the old passports were black. 
I’ve already got a blue passport. It’s from a country that’s only had independence since 1944, & has a smaller population than Bristol. It gives me the right to live & work in 27 other countries. Leavers voted to make this passport more powerful than the Brexit Blue.  
What utter nonsense - this belittles our country & your office. We've always been a great nation, proud to be British and of our standing in the world. We didn't need an EU referendum and we certainly don't need blue passports (my first one was black) to give expression to this!  
How we close a year that brought a tide of sexual harassment cases, proof the pay gap is entrenched in our biggest institutions, more evidence failed austerity hurts BAME women & single parents worst. While no women sit at the #Brexit negotiations table. Bravo, @theresa_may. 
."Court in Edinburgh has said a legal action can go ahead to establish whether UK can unilaterally stop the Brexit process if British voters decide the final deal is unacceptable.". 
We accept the result every bit as much as Leavers accepted the result of the 1975 referendum. #BrexitChristmasMovies 
After Brexit I want endless pics of Leavers brandishing their blue passports while standing in the Rest of The World queue on their holidays to Spain which will be costing them twice as much. 
Blue passports could have been re-introduced without Brexit, Government admits  
.Brexit will be the end of the Union . 
Latest poll shows 49 percent of Scots back an independent Scotland in the EU over post-Brexit UK  
The #BluePassport screams one message above all others. #Brexit is stupid, mind-bogglingly stupid!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Legal action to see whether UK could unilaterally stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
I swear...Ever since that referendum, it’s been like living inside a never-ending episode of Dad’s Army.  
A new poll shows support towards independence surging as Britain gets closer to #Brexit. 
After 18 fucking months of this fucking shitstorm I'm even more fucking angry now than I fucking was then. We're being led into the unknown by a bunch of elitist fucking cheats, liars & all round Twatknackers. Not getting behind fucking Brexit. No fucking way. No fucking chance. pic.twitter.com/HsgABD3qlm 
#bluepassport #BluePassportsQUOTE ''The Government could have changed the colour of British passports back to blue at any time REGARDLESS of Brexit...'  
The real facts about this silly #Brexit passport issue:1) The EU never required countries to have red passports, it is advisory. Croatia is in EU but has blue passports.2) The UK can't go back to the old leather covers. They are now against ICAO standards, not EU.h/t @jonworth 
UK passports will change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  
Blue passports could have been re-introduced without #Brexit, Government admits  
Burgundy is a shit colour and has always been regarded as camp. No surprise all the Remoaner nancyboys love their EU passports. Blue is the best colour, that's why Leicester play in blue. Up the Brexit and up the city! #bluepassport 
Die Hard Brexit#BrexitChristmasMovies 
Of course in return we lose our EU citizenship, legal and automatic right to live, work, visit and move across the EU and the protections of EU law. A very poor bargain for a bit of blue paper. Narrow nationalism of the narrowest kind. Brexit dying. 
Brexit: Un-cultural Learnings of Stupidity for Make Benefit Glorious Nation of Little England #BrexitChristmasMovies 
With respect if your passport colour means that much to you.... if you hate Brexit that much... if you love the dictatorship that is the EU.....you & people like you are living in the wrong country.It really is that simple. 
Time for Ministers to be honest about #Brexit options available - my amendment for the 2018 report stage of #EUWithdrawalBill with @ChukaUmunna would require Ministers to admit that UK CAN unilaterally extend or withdraw the Article 50 notice if needs be 
Currently our EU passports are made in the UK - post Brexit the "British blue" may be produced in Germany or FranceRejoice!  
Post-Brexit plan to spend £500m 'bringing back blue passports' is already under way whilst our country has 126,600 of our CHILDREN HOMLESS. #Shameonyou @theresa_may 
Pathetic Govt propaganda backfires; Government admits it could have brought back blue passports without Brexit  
We Need To Talk About Those Who Would Gain From A Hard Brexit  
Yes campaigners have every right to get snarky about the direction of Brexit Britain after being told repeatedly by pro-union voices in 2014 that they were isolationist, jingoistic and parochial, despite wanting Scotland to join the world as an equal nation. 
After David Davis was accused of misleading parliament, Tim Farron said that the #Brexit Secretary has to resign.“@DavidDavisMP needs to go. He has mislead parliament & under his leadership the Brexit department has turned incompetence into an art form” says @timfarron 
I am a human. I support Humanity so i support referendum in Kashmir. #KashmirCrisis 
The Brexit Express - a young boy discovers that Santa, being foreign, can no longer come to the UK. Christmas is cancelled  #BrexitChristmasMovies 
A country isn't made great or important by the colour of its passports but by its relationships with other countries. Britain's after #brexit #bluepassport doesn't return us to fictional great past but a diminished present reality. 
EU PANIC: Poland calls for ‘best possible’ Brexit trade deal ‘as soon as possible’  
The colour of the new UK passport is literally the ONLY concrete real Brexit outcome I’ve read about or heard. A colour.  Fucking hell we deserve everything that’s coming to us. Our children, however, do not.  
Legal action to decide if the UK can stop Brexit given the go ahead  
If we could apply for individual #EU Citizenship post-#Brexit, would you? 
Happy #Xmas to all fighters and opposers of #Brexit!  And no, we don't want useless #BluePassports for Xmas, or ever. #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #FBPE #BluePassport. 
This! Exactly this. Brexit doesn't care about party loyalties, it will hurt us all. So it is time to join a pro EU party. Let both main parties know that they proceed with brexit at their peril. #StopBrexit 
Managed to sneak 166g of pure French cheese past Border control by hiding it in pram. Needs must. Going to England to preach the word of Beaufort to the Cheddites. This is possibly the last chance we have to stop Brexit.  
Taken aback by the shockingly rude and offensive behaviour of these MPs. No MP should disrespect another in this way, and @KateHoeyMP was speaking out for #Brexit voters. The disdain @HelenGoodmanMP and her colleagues show was an affront to basic manners and Brexit.  
This week’s column is on Burnley, Britain and Brexit.   
The new series of Brexit Britain has jumped the shark. Nobody would believe this pointlessness in real life. If anybody genuinely cares about the colour of a passport, as opposed to the functions and benefits it bestows, they should be relieved of their duties.  
This is what we ought to be talking about. This is May’s Brexit Britain. Friend to all the wrong people. Let’s change it in 2018.  
Brexit's sole achievement so far: #bluepassports.  That's £721 per person per passport. Totally worth it. 
A reminder that the first working day after Brexit will be April fools day 2019. Good luck deciphering the joke stories from the real ones.  
The new leader of the French conservative party slams the EU and says it must give the UK a special Brexit deal  
UK to see return of dark blue passports after Brexit  
James, I admire your business skills but you are talking complete garbage on this. The passport contact was up for renewal Brexit or not. The colour change imposes no extra costs. 
I'm pleased to announced that we the DUP, have made significant progress on the Brexit negotiations. I made a trade deal with the North Pole today - Santa will be switching coal for NI wood pellets for all naughty children and Gerry Adams. 
Remain MPs now dress up their plots against Brexit in the name of parliamentary sovereignty. They conflate ‘democracy’ with their power rather than ours. This year showed that the question of 'who rules?' is still unfinished business, writes @Tom_Slater_  
6/ The TIMING of the UK redesign has NOTHING to do with Brexit. We redesign passports every 5 years - mostly for security reasons - via private tender. A 10yr contract was awarded to De La Rue (who make UK banknotes) in 2009. That contract is up for renewal in 2019 #DespiteBrexit 
Sadly Brexit is for life, not just for Christmas. Tanked economy, Agreement on the ropes & international isolation...could they not have bought Passport covers & saved all this hassle?  
And with that utter absolute bollocks this Scottish No voter 2014, who did so with conviction believing a socially just UK was possible, will vote Yes in the next Scottish referendum. Tories have killed the UK resorting to gimmicks.  
Shops are good. People buy stuff in shops when they can't wait long enough to use the internet. Shops sell things like patriotic cheese, different types of meat and bread, which many people eat. Shops will still exist after Brexit so yay for us. #WriteABrexitSectorReport 
How are these blue passports going to help lower food costs? Brexit devaluing the pound has meant higher prices for smaller portions.If I can't even afford to leave the country, how does vanity like this help those like me put a meal on table every night? 
The new passport is not even the right colour. The old one was much closer to black.As fake as the promises Brexit was built on. #FBPE 
Contrary to what Project Fear doom-mungers predicted last year, UK finances are improving. Nov deficit is lowest since 2007, tax receipts 5% higher than Nov ‘16, unemployment fallen to 42-year low of 4.3%. OBR underestimated tax receipts post Brexit vote.  
Its worse than that, it's also a badge of shame that symbolises the petty-minded, exceptionalist tub-thumping ignorance that allowed leave to prevail. #Brexit 
UK passports will change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  
And here is a great REMAIN Christmas present. This might bring the government down, and brexit along with it @Andrewrosindell do enjoy. X 
Those #brexit reports have been released. Davis was half right. They are excruciating. Just not detailed. 
Blue passports are the perfect parable of Brexit: regaining just enough enough sovereignty to change the colour of our passports to a colour that they never were before, but not quite enough sovereignty to change back to the size they used to be.  
We're going to court to clarify whether Article.50 can be withdrawn. #Brexit  
Seriously, if the colour of a passport - which you'll probably never use - was a deciding factor on your #Brexit Leave vote, you're a 100% certified idiot and shouldn't be allowed to use the remote control, much less vote on something important. 
What a scandalous waste of money. Little Britain indeed!Post-Brexit plan to spend £500m 'bringing back blue passports' is already under way  
lol.  Scotland is part of the UNITED KINGDOM.  Did you miss the 2014 independence referendum?  The result was, out of an electorate of 4.1m Only 1.65m backed independence.  Just under 38%. 
51.9% voting37% voters26.5% populationExpressing an opinion to leave in a non-binding vote is not the indisputable WillPS you can't win an opinion poll.....PPS Fascists have 1 vote & disallow any others.....BINDING #FinalSay in 2018 to Confirm #Brexit or #StopBrexit 
I was a NO in 2014 (I wanted a federal Scotland). But after Brexit it’s a choice of being in the UK or the EU. For the sake of my adopted country (spent first 40 years of my life in England), I would far prefer to be part of the EU than the UK. So I will be a YES in 2019. 
In case this was drowned out during blue passport hysteria by English Brexiteers one should read all about Brexit UK and shape of disaster ahead  
- Baldrick, these Brexit studies aren’t going to go down well.- I’ve been thinking about that Sir, and I have a cunning plan.- Does it involve passports?- Yes Sir, blue ones.  
‘Major blow to EU’: Senior Russian senator compares Catalonia election results to Brexit  
Thought 2017 was the rocky peak of Brexit torture? We ain't seen nothing yet.My latest on the unscalable mountains ahead  
"The Government is not telling you the truth about Brexit" - @GeorgeMonbiot 
Irish Govt not looking to ramp up anything. We want to work with all parties to protect NI + Ire through Brexit + to support incl. New Exec. 
We've traded a burgundy Rolls Royce for a blue Reliant Robin.#Brexit#StopBrexit NOW 
“Today it's clear what the big problem has always been: independence could win a referendum even in the worst circumstances”  
Honestly WHO CARES . (Except those Steve, 51, 4 kids, divorced, “not racist, just don’t like ‘em”  BREXIT!)  
#WriteABrexitSectorReport Glossary"Abroad" - A technical term we use in the DExEU for anywhere outside England.Abroad is run by foreigners, who own our car factories and make our electricity. We did not need them in the war, so Brexit will have no impact these sectors. 
The Government has revealed British passports will become dark blue after Brexit, in a move they could have made at any point since 1981 
Boris Johnson has clashed with his Russian counterpart over Moscow's alleged cyber attacks on the West. Sergey Lavrov said Mr Johnson confirmed Russia had not interfered in the UK's election and the Brexit referendum - to which the Foreign Secretary replied: "Not successfully."  
Of all the pointless, stupid things about Brexit, people getting excited about the colour of their passport is right up there. Barely anyone under 40 even remembers or could care less about blue passports.  
My UK passport was an expression of my freedom to easily live and work in Europe. Until the Tories threw it away by holding a needless referendum. This is truly pathetic.  
Study: Brexit Not Driven by Racism, Public Want Immigration Control and Criminal Checks   
To be fair, this is not an unreasonable assessment of progress, 18 months after the referendum.  
Is it any shock that the government is totally betraying us on Brexit when it's stuffed to the brim with Remain campaigners? We need real leadership in this country!  
Best #Brexit deal yet. Get a #bluepassport and start paying for your new privatised NHS. https://t.co/aZ9Flrmhm5?amp=1 
Brexit is turning us into a laughing stock. We’re swapping the right to live and work in 27 countries for new passports that will cost the taxpayer £500m. But don’t worry, when we’re all stood in the airport for 4 hours we can stand in the queue and look at just how blue they are  
The old British passports were black. But before 1989 there was another country that did use the same colour the British will get for their Brexit passports  
Go on tell me that’s a blue passport.We’re trashing our economy to return to an old person’s fantasy youth with ‘iconic blue passports’ that never existed. It’s all so Brexit.  
Breathing is done by all living things. It uses oxygen which is invisible but very important, like impact assessments. After Brexit we will breathe English oxygen. It will be coloured blue and not smell of garlic. #WriteABrexitSectorReport 
Huge if true: new analysis from David Davis' Brexit department has shown that electricity is important for heating and light  
Anna demanded that we have a transition period, which meant giving that £350m to the EU not the NHS.Don't blame LEAVE voters for that. Most of us would be very happy leaving in March 2019, but the cost of your "soft brexit" is paid by OUR NHS.  
Blue for Brexit: British passports to change color post-divorce.  
Nothing will make me feel less proud to be British than a blue fucking passport. It will symbolise everything small minded, selfish, fascist and racist that I am ashamed to be associated with. Fuck Brexit and Fuck Blue Fucking Passports. 
How to write a sectoral analysis...  Copy and  Paste Take our Brexit papers quiz - can you get 7/7? 
Brexit is making me realize that if they’d just called the Euro ‘the Guinea’ the UK would have joined in an instant 
.@KateHoeyMP talking sense on #Brexit & being heckled by her fellow @uklabour MP @HelenGoodmanMP who represents a seat that voted 57% to leave the EUHelen's majority was wiped out from 3.5k to 500 at GE17.  Clearly she's at odds with their wishes 
It's only "iconic" if you're over 60.'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit - BBC News  
Theresa May has managed to encapsulate in one tweet how absurd Brexit is  
Brexiteers before 23rd June 2016:'Brexit means £350 million a week for the NHS'Brexiteers in 2017:'£500m for #bluepassport and a £50 billion brexit divorce bill is a price worth paying for our sovereignty' 
We now go live to Brexit...  
Positive identification with your burgundy passport as a symbol of resistance to brexit jingoism is also just extremely bad politics. The absolute worst. 
YOU ARE TELLING US THAT CHANGING THE COLOUR OF OUR PASSPORT, WHICH WE CAN DO ALREADY AS EU MEMBERS, IS A FAIR SWAP FOR TRASHING THE ECONOMY AND LOSING THE RIGHT TO LIVE, WORK, LOVE & RETIRE IN 27 OTHER COUNTRIES?! Brexit for the super rich only.  
A little ditty on #choice4xmas...Twas the night before Christmas and all through the houseNot a creature was stirring not even a mouseTill you tapped on your glass with a final addendumAnd said “let’s discuss the repeal referendum” 
**newsflash** after Brexit fire engines to be changed to blue. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Britain is an independent, democratic  County before Brexit so please try to stop being silly. Happy Christmas  
MUST-READ: Great story from @openDemocracy about which Cabinet members are associated with the hard Brexit supporting ERG group.  
Imagine lugging these through airport security after brexit! Not sure @ukhomeoffice have thought this one through tbh 
When getting a sodding blue passport is viewed a some sort of major victory for Brexit, you know we're really, properly fucked 
The Brexit hit to the UK economy could be as much as £350 million a week. The figure is the exact mirror of the amount Vote Leave promised that Brexit would bring home from Brussels, to support the struggling NHS.  
If only it were a mere trading partnership, the Leave movement would have lost the referendum.Actually there wouldn't have been a referendum...Actually there wouldn't have been a Leave movement...  
Yep mine was black as well. My latest theory is somehow we have wondered into a different quantum universe where they were blue and Brexit makes sense to some people 
 UK passports to change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  #AFP #EU #Brexit #Britain 
Remainers don't hate blue passports but we wonder why you didn't change the colour years ago.  Burgundy passports are not compulsory in the EU, there are other colours.  Blue passports were just another Brexit lie weren't they Andrew? 
Brexiteers are hailing the return of #BluePassports, as freedom.. But such is their ignorance, they've only achieved the opposite! #Brexit  
What brexit promised: an Independant country that doesn’t depend on others for money, that can decide its own laws with a stronger NHS- What we got: a blue passport 
Brits will get their iconic dark blue passports back after Brexit, ministers announce today  
Blue Passports Jam Cheese Come on, economically inept Brexit twats, you're a third of the way to 'Getting your country back'. You petty fucking morons. 
I was worried about Brexit but this #bluepassport thing has completely changed my mind. Personally I’m going to enjoy proudly waving it at other EU nations as they walk past us queuing at immigration. 
Example of #fakenews disseminated by #theeconomist where @edwardlucas works. They talk about the next EU budget 2021-27 in which Poland will be graduating from subsidies, hence little impact. Also following #Brexit the next EU budget will be smaller by 10 bn € year (70 in total)  
Apparently Brexit is a papist conspiracy. Now I have read it all. 
Even a Brexit that works out economically is not going to endure if it appears to be the project of people who hate modern Britain and its values. 
The "first real, tangible victory" you say?You mean to tell me that it's been 18 months since the referendum and the only "victory" we've achieved is passports changing from red to blue?Brexit is pathetic. Fucking pathetic.  
Poll:Would you like a blue passport?OrFreedom to travel anywhere in the EU without paying for a visa?#FBPE #Brexit 
UK making pointless superficial change to meaningless non-EU mandated symbol and calling it a win is the most Brexit thing ever.   
I’d also like to point out that “Reintroduce navy blue passports” was number 2 in my 12 ways to #Brexit without leaving the EU post - that dates from August 2016! 
In a country of poverty & food banks Govt now spending £500m to reissue "iconic blue" passport to prove we're "proud" & not in EU anymore. When will this #brexit madness end  
'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit  
EU PANIC: Poland calls for ‘best possible’ Brexit trade deal ‘as soon as possible’  
Countdown:  Brexit: 462 days, 11 hours, 6 minutes, 36 seconds 
#WriteABrexitSectorReport We anticipate the United Kingdom making a swift transition from red to blue passports after #Brexit boosting profits and creating thousands of jobs in the blue ink sector.  A clear success despite initial adverse data provided by the Bank of England.  
Legal action over whether UK can stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
Brilliant... a blue passport and no NHS well done Brexit  
RENEW your passport today and never be forced to get a blue one since Brexit Britain won't last longer than a decade 
Our amendment to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill, to be considered at the Report stage in January, forcing the Government to come clean about the legal advice it has on the revocability of Art 50. The British people should know they have the legal right to keep an open mind on #Brexit  
While Brexit talks will absorb Theresa May's attention, she needs a strong deputy to look after the home front. It's time for Jeremy Hunt. My @telegraph column: 
Nigel Farage: Return of #bluepassport is "the first real, tangible victory" for people who voted for #Brexit  
#bluepassports are a distraction from brexshit. The Government is facing a High Court challenge over the legality of Article 50, in a case it is claimed could bring Brexit negotiations to a halt. @A50Challenge  #stopbrexit  
.@ChrisLeslieMP and I have tabled an amendment to the EU (Withdrawal) Bill requiring the Govt to publish the legal advice on the revocability of Art 50 - they are trying to hide it from the public who are legally entitled to keep an open mind on #Brexit  
16 Brexit Christmas cracker jokes that will make or break your Christmas lunch:  
Legal action over whether UK can stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
Here’s an idea, Brexiteers.I’ll happily let you have blue passports (and indeed the  doesn’t give a damn either as burgundy colour is advisory).But let the  stay in the  then?Deal?#Brexit 
Oh Dear in #EU Countries already had the power to choose which ever colour of passport they wantedAnother #Brexit Fail  
The Guardian: The Office for National Statistics has revised up its estimate for year-on-year growth in the last quarter, to 1.7% from 1.5%. That’s because the ONS now thinks the UK economy grew faster than previously thought in the six months after the Brexit vote. 
BBC News interviewing f*cking Farage again...we dont' CARE what he thinks or says, can you not get that @BBCNews ? #Brexit 
"I Couldn't Be Happier" – @Nigel_Farage Hails Symbolic Victory as Britain's Iconic 'Old Blue' Passport Set to Return After Brexit   
That old British passport is either black or very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very,  very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very, very dark blue. #brexit  
Passport cover colour and design.  What an embarrassingly low level the #Brexit so-called debate has now reached. 
What's next for #Brexit? CrowdJustice case on challenge to legality of Article 50 today in the @Independent 
My ever-so brilliant and openly heterosexual colleague Tom has made a rainbow passport and I demand a referendum to usher it in.  
Theresa May smiles as a Polish translator calls her 'Madam Brexit' by mistake  
Dear Kevin, don’t be silly. I grew up with all those things, & I worked for Brexit in order to live in an independent, democratic country. 
The breathtaking idiocy of #Brexit beautiful demonstrated by @davidschneider 
 I cancelled my @UKLabour membership and joined @LibDems over @jeremycorbyn ignoring the majority of labour members and voters who are actually pro-EU. He has been helping the Tories towards a hard ‘ideological’ Brexit. He must oppose this to gain support from own voters 
Ministers are slowly forging a Brexit consensus—around an outcome that is legally, politically and practically impossible  
Yes. The government have had the power to change passport colour at any stage since 1988. They have chosen to use that power now in order to make it seem like it’s because of Brexit. They could also tighten border controls in line with EU directives to create the same effect. 
The new UK #bluepassport is like all the other aspects of #Brexit. When you look beyond the superficial presentation, what it really means is a worse deal for British citizens.  
Study: Brexit Not Driven by Racism, Public Want Immigration Control and Criminal Checks  
excited to announce this morning that due to Brexit, after October 2019 the Metropolitan Line will be returned to its 'iconic' blue colour.  
Our last digital newspaper of the year is out with some of the latest #Tech & #Recruitment related news!Read more here: #News #IBMwatson #Brexit #IoTsecurity #Google #AI #NintendoSwitch 
Revealed: Six of Theresa May's cabinet ministers are paid-up members of the secretive hard-Brexit European Reseach Group:  #brexitdarkmoney 
"Paul" and "Joan" both won Smyths vouchers. "Amy" won a trip to Lapland.Are TheLiberal.ie planning to use these fake social media accounts during upcoming abortion referendum? #8Committee 
You can tell Brexit is an utter shambles when changing the colour of a wee book is something to be proud of.  Well done.    
I'd make fun of Brexit Brits for spending £500m to change their passports from burgundy to blue, but much of my country is currently celebrating a little girl thanking Trump for "making it okay to say 'Merry Christmas' again" while we strip healthcare from kids before Xmas, so... 
Government facing High Court challenge to cancel Article 50 and halt Brexit negotiations  
Ignore the naysayers and tune out the babble: a bright post-Brexit future for Britain is still on track  
Legal action from @andywightman & others on whether UK can stop Brexit gets go-ahead  
Quote of the day on #Brexit Britain from Sir Max Hastings:  We're not a power in the world anymore, our stature is diminished, our foreign sec behaves like a 19th century school prefect....#bluepassport 
Here we go. The shape of 2018: divided UK Govt won’t set out a coherent ask. EU will provide the answer.Wishing all a safe and brexit-free Christmas. Enjoy having your cake and eat it: there won’t be much of that next year!  
#brexit bus latest update - blue and iconic  
Economy = FUCKEDInternational relations = FUCKEDJob prospects = FUCKEDValue of the £ = FUCKEDTravel & Visa Opportunities = FUCKEDLaws to protect people = FUCKEDBUT NONE OF THAT MATTERS BECAUSE WE HAVE BLUE PASSPORTS AGAIN. BREXIT WAS A SUCCESS.Eurgh. #bluepassport 
Brexit, Trump and now this 
This is @HelenGoodmanMP laughing hysterically at @KateHoeyMP talking on #Brexit  Helen represents a seat that voted 57% to leave EUHelen had her majority almost wiped out from 3.5k to 500 at GE17Don’t be like Helen. Be more like Kate 
You don’t need my thoughts on blue passports, but today has really brought home to me how, in our obsession with our own sovereignty, we have ceded through Brexit so much power on a global scale. It is indeed a poignant symbol of that loss. 
Maybe the iconic #BluePassport tender spec should include:20 pages of iconic Suduku puzzles, and a iconic little blue pencil in the spine, to help while away all that extra time, post Brexit, in non-EU citizens queues? 
Many have died since the Brexit vote having left their home towns and their countries 80 years ago to liberate Europe.....Only to have some little shit stain like you insult their legacy on Twitter.Jog on.  
Anyway, good to see we've all learned that 'maybe we shouldn't just call everyone we disagree with stupid and try to understand their views' lesson from the referendum. 
The passport colour ishoo is a peculiarly stupid, trivial & pointless distraction - like the Sun and (except for the triviality bit) Brexit itself.  
Lavrov: Boris says he has no evidence that Russia interfered on BrexitJohnson: Not successfully!Lavrov: He’s afraid that if he doesn’t contradict me his reputation is going to be ruinedJohnson: It’s your reputation I worry about! 
It is job of Corbyn to hold govt to account It is also the job of MSM - in particularly the BBC. The failure of the media and BBC to do this since 2010 is a significant factor in the UK’s present woes including 1. Destructive austerity 2. Disastrous Brexit3. Ethical decline  
"The potential loss to UK services caused by #Brexit ..is about £350 million a week. "-@BloombergTVThat number sound familiar? #WriteABrexitSectorReport#bluepassport 
They are arguing in public now!Lavrov; "Even Boris has said we didn't interfere in the Brexit Referendum."Boris; "Not successfully."Lavrov; "You've just made all this up..."Russian Press Secretary intervenes. 
Thank you David in the studio, now back to Brexit Live  
Lavrov: Johnson said recently that he has no proof that Russia meddled in the referendum.Boris: Not successfully is what I said.Lavrov: He’s scared that if he doesn’t disagree with me, his reputation will be ruined at home.Boris: Sergei it’s your reputation I’m worried about. 
We have a massive homelessness crisis, but instead we are to spend £490m on a #Brexit #bluepassport. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The #bluepassport is akin to midlife crisis man frantically applying the Grecian 2000 and remortgaging the family home to buy a Porsche. The sad, hollow gestures of a declining state desperately trying to delude itself into a sense of relevancy and importance. #Brexit  
I've noticed a lot of business/politics people referring to "good or bad optics" and the need to be "laser focused" What's next?"Brexit is diffraction limited""Our will is super resolved""Take back control with LabVIEW" "Strong and stable, like an optical table" 
I Voted LEAVE, I am happy to admit it was a mistake the only time in my voting lifetime I have felt that way. The EU is not perfect but neither is the UK. I would vote REMAIN in any future referendum. 
UK passports will change from burgundy to blue after Brexit  
Brexit explained, eye-wateringly:  
#FBPE The blue passport nonsense has successfully diverted attention from the epic shambles of the Brexit department, its minister and the empty impact reports. 
Bananas are bendy. The EU doesn't like bendy bananas. After #Brexit our bananas will be the bendiest in the universe and everyone will be jealous of our bananas. #WriteABrexitSectorReport 
The whole concept of an outside body [EU] enforcing its will over the UK after #Brexit goes against everything Leave voted for. 
So how much money will the whole #passport thing cost? Where else could that money be used? Education would be fucking good start.Post Britain Brexit is going to be as blue, cold and depressing as these passports. 
"There's no good news. There's only bad news and irrelevant news." (That sums up Brexit.) 
Govt announces that after Brexit television pictures will revert to iconic black and white, as will minstrels. 
Brexit would mean cost of flights going up, holidays becoming more expensive and UK citizens losing the right to live and work freely in Europe. But at least we get a blue passport.. 
It’s just that Croatia is EU member and their passport is already blue, so, while there may be no conspiracy(doubtful) it’s not really a Brexit issue.  
The @BrexitCentral year ends on an optimistic note with our founder and Editor-at-Large @matthew_elliott reviewing the events of 2017 and reminding us that a bright post-Brexit future for Britain is on track  
Voting for Brexit to change the colour of your passport is like voting to cut off your feet to change the colour of your shoes 
Yes, getting a #bluepassport back after #Brexit is important to some people. But it's not as popular as the return of.... say.... the death penalty.  
Fair play to Theresa May. She said she wanted a red, white and blue Brexit.  
Brexit voters "we voted for £350M a week more to be spent on the NHS"Farage "Blue passports will make England great again"Brexit voters "my NHS operation has just been cancelled."Farage "look at the passport...it's blue....and shiny...." 
Worrying about the colour of the passport during Brexit is like complaining the Chassagne-Montrachet is being served too cold on the Titanic. 
“The Brexit 'impact assessments' do reveal one thing – that David Davis has done nothing to prepare for Brexit”  
Since we're discussing the trim post-Brexit order of things, isn't it time for the British army to revert to some decent clobber?  
Ahh Brexit. Spending £500 million to change the passport from Burgandy to Blue. Now that's a deal if I've ever seen one! 
Thanks to Brexit we'll have a new blue passport! That was worth it... The burgundy one was just a common EU agreement not a dictat - we could  have changed the colour at any point without the need for this divisive  & destructive process. #bluepassport #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Pep Guardiola being investigated by Spanish police over his support for the Catalonia referendum  
Our government, and indeed almost the whole political establishment seems to have collapsed into a kind of collective senile confusion. A once great nation fallen into stumbling dotage. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #bluepassport 
Happy for the passport to change colour. In fact blue is a fantastic idea. Now just add a circle of 28 yellow stars around the crest and we're sorted.Gets my vote.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Ironic that those who claim Brexit- voters are prejudiced neanderthals demonstrate the most bigotry.I lived in France for 5 years. Half my family is French. I voted Brexit and would do so again. Oh, and I didn't vote Leave because I wanted a #bluepassport ! 
Britain's economy faces twin pressures, both related to Brexit, in latest GDP figures  
Brexit is stupid. Breakfast is great. Have you ever tried putting curry on a crumpet? It's class  
Roses are red,Brexit passports are blue,Take your time to admire them,In a longer airport queue. 
This whole passport thing is so embarrassing. Brexit is beginning to feel like a huge effort to turn the clock back 100 years with some misguided imperial overtones. I much prefer my current passport with the free inbuilt bonus feature of visa-free travel to European countries.  
4 fantastic reasons by @heidi_mp why pro-Europeans should remain positive going into 2018: 1) our arguments are cutting through in the polls; 2) there is no parl majority for hard brexit 3) brexit IS reversible if people change their minds 4) parl will have meaningful vote  
#Brexit Britain has become a King Lear of nations, old & foolish, taking advice from charlatans and liars who flatter its conceit of greatness.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
This Christmas is costing households an average of 15% more than 2016.  Mainly food price inflation. Entirely because of Brexit. “ #FBPEand 
We've got our #Bluepassport back and are selling more kettle chips to the Russians. How Tory Brexit is diminishing our nation.  
The Brexit divorce bill will cost us €39bn. Brexit has already reduced our economic growth forecasts. Britain's output is now 0.9% lower due to Brexit - equating to £350m less a week. Now blue passports (made in Germany or France) will cost half a billion pounds we don’t have. 
Brexit’s smooth and orderly transition  
UK passports to be blue after Brexit. Well that'll make up for the plunging currency, rising inflation, stagnant wages & loss of jobs then 
The UK Government is facing a High Court challenge over the legality of Article 50 in a case campaigners say could bring #Brexit negotiations to a halt. My story for @Independent @A50Challenge 
not remotely interested in the colour of the passport , the total humiliating mess the Tories are making of Brexit comes higher up the list!  
Priti Patel finally comes clean on #BrexitAll those lies, lower wages, inflation, growth decline, laughing stock of the world wasn't about taking back control of a #BluePassport it was always about: Cutting taxes for the rich! 
‘Disorganised’ Brexit department has one in four posts unfilled  
The long-awaited Brexit reports published yesterday don't say very much at all. @FactCheck explains why...#WriteABrexitSectorReport 
Nigel Farage on the return of blue passports after Brexit: “What it says is normal has been resumed - we’re becoming a proper country again”  
It seems to have stimulated the “Brexit=The End of Days” people the most. 
#Bluepassport. Britain seems to have receded into a second childhood. Unable to cope with the EU and the modern world its addled mind has fixated on a simple infantile desire - "I want the blue one".#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
This obsession about returning the colour of the British passport to imperial blue undermines the arguments of those who claim that the Brexit vote wasn't driven by an urge to turn back the clock. 
Ireland: there is an island called Ireland. Ireland has two parts, a Northern part and the other bit. People & things move across the border, one way and the other. After Brexit, unicorns will patrol the border, keeping everyone happy.  #WriteABrexitSectorReport 
Sun readers stop obsessing about the colour of your passports. Quite apart from the fact that the U.K. could have had any colour it liked in the EU (and the old ones were indigo by the way), you’re not going to be able to travel after Brexit and, besides, you hate foreigners. 
I think a lot of Labour supporters have yet to grasp that #Brexit will harm the #NHS. By slowing economic growth it will cut the tax revenues needed to pay for the NHS. A trade deal with the US will mean the NHS being opened up to private business.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit is chasing EU nurses, doctors etc away when we already have a staffing crisis. (Like I said: brain drain). The idea that we can just replace with immigrants from other countries just underlines the futility and stupidity of this whole exercise.  
#VictoriaLIVE why are you peddling The S*n’s propaganda that blue passports are a #brexit victory? We could’ve had blue passports whenever we wanted in the EU! Please do some basic research before doing Mr Murdoch’s work at the licence fee payers expense.  
Blog: Normalish service - Officially I am on Christmas holiday from now until new year. I have an employer who has told me so, and pays me nonetheless. I thank all those who campaigned for paid holidays in times past and worry about the post-Brexit fu...  
The worst thing about Brexit's effluent is not its toxicity, or dishonesty, or even the post-colonial panic attack shuddering at its core. It's the sheer gut-wrenching, eye-gouging, squirming embarrassment  
The red, white and blue #Brexit turns out to be putting the economy in the red to get blue passports to please white people. 
Last time I had a blue passport there was no minimum wage, fewer rights at work , and I couldn’t afford to go anywhere -overjoyed ! BBC News - 'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit  
Cost of Burgandy passport: £72.50 Cost of Brexit blue passport: £72b in lost economic activity, crashing the pound & removing the right to live and work freely in Europe  
This Is Just To SayI have eatenthe continental cheeses that were inthe iceboxand whichyou were probablysavingfor after BrexitForgive methey were unpatriotic 
Do you think that if David Cameron had simply offered a referendum on the colour of our passports all of this mess could have been avoided? 
As is all of Brexit, really.  
I see that a wee bit of plagiarism has been found via Turnitin. Such a good example to our students. Imagine someone pleading, "But the government did it with their Brexit analyses. This is just a second year essay."  
Poland offers Theresa May backing over Brexit deal amid EU rift | Spain promises 'reasonable' outcome in Gibraltar | UK to get 'iconic' dark blue passports back after Brexit  
WATCH | "What it says is that normal service is being resumed. We're becoming a proper country again!"Brexit legend @Nigel_Farage is overjoyed by the return of real BRITISH passports. Huge victory for common sense. 
Strange world we live in where the colour of passports takes priority over the issue of whether you can travel to neighbouring European countries without paying for a visa or a visa waiver #Brexit 
The colour is not the only reason it's a blue passport #brexit #bluepassport 
Anna on the one hand you say you support the Referendum result.On the other hand you stereotype leave voters and their aspirations. Your narrative isn't exactly conciliatory, it's totally partisan. So you would forgive them for not trusting your intentions re amendments. 
So Brexit is going to "bring back" the #bluepassport ?We could have had a blue passport at any time. Here's all the EU passports...#skypapers 
14/ But for the rest of us this lack of planning is a disgrace. Imagine doing no planning before holding a referendum and then doing no planning before triggering a 2 year clock and then doing no planning for 9 months after that  
See Janet read the #Brexit impact reports.See John read them too.See Janet run.See John run.See them ask their grandparents why they've taken away their freedom of movement to live, love and work in 27 EU countries.#WriteABrexitSectorReport 
My solution to Brexit us bring back old passports, milk in pints and old lightbulbs but stay in the EU. 90% of Brexiteers would be happy 
We should be allowed both passport colours and the issuing of new ones could be treated as a massive rolling referendum on the issue, for ever. 
Apparently, leavers voted for #Brexit because we wanted a blue passport....Yep, it’s all about passports.  
Brexit Explained  
You just summed up Brexit!Less is now more.Poverty is freedom.Penury is happiness. 
Good grief, the blue passports thing. Brexit is a cargo cult. 
Government to reintroduce popular "iconic" ration books in major  Brexit victory  
So the UK economy is growing slower, the country losing about £350m a week & British influence waning worldwide thanks to #Brexit. In return, we are getting blue passports. It's not exactly deal of the century, is it? 
Your to-do list for 2018.~ Fight to secure a new independence referendum.~ Fight to win that referendum.~ Fight to ensure the outcome is respected.#Referendum2018 
Blue passports and the fraudulent Brexit impact reports capture the  infantile priorities and lack preparedness of the project. Public must be given a final say 
It's interesting all remainers bleating about an EU passport giving them visa free travel to 27 other countries. Again it's another bland utilitarian argument based on nothing but personal convenience. That, ultimately, is at the root of the generational divide. #Brexit 
'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit  
Brexit reaches new moronic depths #bluepassport  
8 funniest reactions to Home Office announcement that passports will be blue again after Brexit  #bluepassport #Brexit  
Oh whoops yesterday was a bit humiliating with those Brexit impact statements. Quick, do the blue passport story. Deflect. Make them argue over something else.  
May facing Cabinet Brexit headache after sacking Green leaves 'hole at the centre of Government' Simple promote Jacob Rees-Mogg! 
Imagine having believed voting for #brexit would mean our NHS was going to get an extra £350m per week, only to find out it actually meant you’d get a #BluePassport instead...almost like asking for a Porsche for xmas and ending up with a twig 
The words "European Union" appearing on passports was the most visible symbol of Britain having become a subordinate of a supreme government for Europe. That is why it was hated. The colour is neither here nor there. #Brexit 
My word the #Conservatives literally have zero clue about #Brexit do they.....the EU do not dictate passport colours!   
After Brexit UK will go back to Blue passports. Think we should have these personally.....   
Woodworking SectorScrews are used to join planks together.We have two short planks, and after Brexit we will be well screwed.#WriteABrexitSectorReport 
(1) It’s possible to have a blue passport *and* be a member of the EU. (2) So glad ministers are focused on the important stuff, like the NHS, the economy, and all the other negative Brexit impacts we can already see etc. … 
Only in Brexit Britain would you celebrate losing a passport that entitles you to travel & work in 27 other countries for a different coloured one with no rights whatsoever. Is this just one long episode of MTV Punk'd or Beadle's About?  
The "iconic" #bluepassport will return after #Brexit, the Home Office has said  
Hi @UKLabour 55% of your young supporters think - wrongly - your policy is Anti Brexit. Erm... Why isn't it Anti Brexit?Are you mad?How does Brexit help the young, poor or tenuously employed?How does it boost tax receipts and fund the NHS or education?How? 
Friends! Nuked!As @MckKirk so wisely implies, the lowest unemployment since 1975 is an utter disaster!In any case, Brexit *hasn't happened yet*, so it'll doubtless drop even more after Brexit!And yet Leavers claim that low unemployment is "good news"! Talk about ignorant!  
British passports will return to 'iconic' blue cover after Brexit, it is confirmed  
What they don’t tell you is that it will be made in Germany.... which is the real reflection of the Brexit fraud.  
Where are all those people now who kept lecturing me here on Twitter after the referendum on Oct1 that it's only a minority of Catalans who want independence? #CatalanElections 
Brits will get their iconic blue passports back after Brexit... but will YOU be eligible for one? More info:  #BluePassport 
He did a Brexit  
Immigration Minister @BrandonLewis announces return of blue British passport after #Brexit, in a move symbolising Britain's national identity.  
Just after headlines such as 'IMF releases grim report card on UK's economy, mainly thanks to Brexit', Tory minister Brandon Lewis tells us on @BBCr4today that 'our economy is in good shape'. But heh, we can look forward to blue passports, so it's all hunky-dory 
There is a solution: we call it referendum.  
Suspect the desperation to present the passport story as a “victory”, or meaningful benefit to British people, betrays the fact pro-Brexit MPs and media recognise other ‘positive’ outcomes of Brexit will be few and far between.  
Few under 40 remember blue passport. This move symbolises the nostalgia driven agenda of drivel from the #Brexit campaign  
Very unfair that colorblind people won't be able to reap the reward of brexit. 
Join our pointless campaign to make the #NewBritishPassport a #RainbowPassport (Just to wind up the #Brexit Bunch)  
1) it could have always been blue so pretending it’s an anti EU ‘result’ is misleading 2) redesign costs money we don’t have, because you’re spending on unnecessary Brexit that will distract govt from things that could have solved real UK issues, with for no proven benefit. 
Methinks the colour of passports is the most important issue for majority of Brexiters. What if we gave them that and dropped Brexit?#ExitFromBrexit #FBPE #bluepassport 
The blue passports issue is Exhibit A in the case for sectioning Brexit as insane. A quest to replace a burgundy passport with rights across 28 countries for a blue-black one that covers only one.Just... why? 
Jesus, could we have avoided this whole #Brexit drama if we'd just given some people a #bluepassport? 
#WriteABrexitSectorReport If we have extra money we put it in banks to keep it safe.  After Brexit, when everyone is poor, people will need their money back and the banks will run out. Then people will be sad and will go outside and see an angel and everything will be fine. 
British passports will be navy blue after Brexit, says Home Office   
I’m proud to be a citizen of the European Union, unfortunately because of what #Brexit has done to my country, to its values and reputation, I’m less proud of my UK citizenship. Plus I don’t give a monkey what colour my passport is! pic.twitter.com/nHI15XW5Av 
Theresa May referred to as 'Madam Brexit' by translator – video  
'Madam Brexit': Theresa May smiles as translator gets her name wrong  
At last re Brexit the Tories reveal plan....(re the colour of the passport)'. And you thought they didn't have a scooby. 
This morning we announced the return of the blue #British passport after #Brexit. Watch how our passport has changed over the last 600 years.  
Terrorism, shifts on the global stage, #migrationEU & #Brexit – these are some of the main issues the EU handled in 2017. Click  to find out how @EUCouncil helped Europe meet these challenges. 
If ALL MPs listened to the will of their constituents, as expressed in the referendum, Leave would have a 166 seat majority.#BrexitMeansBrexit #TeamTory 
Much better to have a blue one (for most people, for the first time) than a red one which lets you go anywhere in Europe visa free, no? #brexit  
The passport thing is the daftest of all the Brexit things. Denying yourself visa free travel across Europe. Basically handing a passport in. "Not for me, thanks." The opposite of liberty. Mental. Imagine explaining that decision to a North Korean. 
'Madame Brexit' pushes stronger ties with Poland  
When the best bit of #Brexit news 18 months in is that you will have a blue passport that will be made in France and could have been blue at literally any time the UK chose them to be, your Brexit isn't looking great! 
So there'll be blue passports? Well that's alright then, I won't miss my freedom of movement at all. Suddenly I see the point of all of this... #StopBrexit #FBPE #BrexitShambles #Brexit #bluepassport 
Remainers: We have a mountain to climb. The media, Labour & the Tories behave as if it is normal & democratic that we are leaving the EU because of *the will of the people*. It is neither normal nor true. It is how fascism starts. This is not paranoia. This is Brexit Britain. 
The blue passport will be a constant dismal reminder of backward-looking #Brexit, reaffirming the establishment, confirming the far right victory and refusing to allow the UK to modernise and live in the 21st century. #bluepassport 
One of these passports gives you visa-free access to travel, live and work in 27 other countries.The other one is blue.The #Brexit mentality in a nutshell.  
We could have had a blue passport as a member of the EU. A ridiculous, meaningless gesture to #Brexit fanatics.  
Britain to get navy blue passports back after Brexit to 'restore our national identity'  
Ok, let’s see....Unemployment rate at a 42 year low of 4.3% FTSE 100 at record high - over 7600 Manufacturing orders - highest in 30 years Forbes World Annual Rankings - UK no.1 for business Hmmmm....maybe this Brexit thing isn’t that bad after all!  
Listening to @BrandonLewis going on about #BluePassport What a bunch of sentimental claptrap. "People will remember their blue passport." The people who will really suffer from the #brexit disaster only ever had #EU burgundy ones. #bbcgms 
After Brexit, the cover on the UK's passports will go from burgundy to dark blue. 
Printing blue British Brexit passports in Germany would be so funny 
#r4today once again parroting the government’s line on blue passports / Brexit.  In reality the reintroduction of blue passports is just a symbol of how shallow and futile Brexit is. 
#r4today the government says the #bluepassport is a symbol of the UK 'regaining its sovereignty after #brexit'.  the blue passport is a symbol of national suicide and fuckwittery. 
Coming to a shop near you soon.... shit t-shirts for #Brexiteers....“I voted for #Brexit & all I got was this Crappy Blue passport & no human rights, crippling debt and centuries of Austerity”Has a ring to it don’t ya think?  
The passport is objectively less valuable if it doesn't let us live anywhere in Europe or get us protections by the embassies of EU countries across the world.But I suppose the only thing that matters is colour, not UK prosperity? That's the Brexit mantra, right? 
Miller established that the Referendum result wasn't the decision: it just advised what the decision could be. So where is the decision. /5 
Key post Brexit priorities, from left• Nothing to do with the EU• Nothing to do with the EU• Nothing to do with the EU• Nothing to do with the EU• Nothing to do with the EU• Nothing to do with the EU• Let's kill people  
Is this why Brexit reports are so poor? Dept for Exiting EU is short of 143 economists as staff leave and recruitment stutters (from The Times)  
Cut and paste Brexit reports are simply Googled and wouldn't get more than a C at GCSE, say MPs  
'Iconic' blue British passport to return after Brexit  
If anything sum up the relentless stupid pointlessness of #brexit this would be it.  UK has been free to make its passports whatever colour it likes ever since we've been in the EU.  
Siri, show me Brexit as a gif  
UK to get traditional navy blue passports back after Brexit in bid to 'restore our national identity'  
My taxi driver is a Brexit-voting Spurs fan who has just felt it necessary to point out Harry & Meghan's baby will be black. 
I'm gobsmacked that those brexit MPs are more concerned about the color of the passport than basic human rights and financial impact on our economy. If your identity is defined by the color of your passport, you have a serious problem. #BrexitShambles 
JOKE: Getting cucked by BrexitWOKE: Being European Matt Myers#MyersTwitter 
British passports will be navy blue after Brexit says Home Office  This is so petty. Who cares? 
I mean, let’s be honest here, people voted for brexit not to change the colour of their passports but that of their neighbours faces. 
It’s a nice idea, but robotics and artificial intelligence won’t come close to filling labor shortages in a post-Brexit Britain, when many immigrants, who provide much-needed labor, will be forced out of the country:  
British passports will go back to blue after Brexit, ditching EU burgundy  
UK to get its iconic dark blue passport back in stunning Brexit victory for The Sun EU emblems to be removed from vehicle registration plates ?  
Vote was all about pro indy v pro Madrid rule & coalitions make up numbers. 70 to 57 with 8 more wanting a referendum so 78 for that option. 
Rajoy surely in an impossible position now. The Independistas he hounded  for  “sedition”  have just won the Catalan election. There will have to be a referendum. Shame on the EU for tacitly supporting repression.  
'I wish Brexit would FAIL!' TRAITOR Heseltine says MPs will turn their back on Leave voters  
4/TM uses the rt wing press to rabble rouse calling elected MPs traitorsDoes she think she can ride the wild horse of populist nationalism & still control it?Is it already out of her hands & Daily Mail is running her?Is she such a short termist that she only sees the 
If you voted Brexit to get a blue passport you are the unholiest of unholy arseclowns. 
3/If they sense they’ve got that much control the ultra rt will rise anywayAt what point do we think we can put the genie back in the bottle?This is why it’s so concerning that the Tory leadership hasn’t tried to steer us back to centrist politics & tone down the rhetoric 
Brexit: criminal incompetence - what sort of government goes into bat in the most important negotiations of the century and doesn't carry out any impact assessments?  #Brexit .  
Because #Brexit is a #culturewar, the #UK's very own #MAGA#TrumpPeople don't care that he played them with the #GOPTaxScam ...and their cuts will actually sunset in 4 years.Just as long as he stops #immigration, they'll take the hit!list-@davidschneider 
Any law that stifles democracy is a law that needs to be broken just ask Mandela or the African American community in the US. Spain needs to stop hiding behind courts and judges and allow democracy to prevail by granting a consential referendum. 
Top secret Brexit studies reveal that David Davis is the most stupid cretin in the Government.As if we didn't know :-/ 
Blue passports and a solution to the Irish problem.  Yay Brexit.  
I make no comment whether passports should be blue, red or solid gold but the post-Brexit blue passports doing the rounds (left) as “the return of the iconic passport” are absolutely nothing like the old ones (right)... #GrumpyWithoutByElections  
A regular reminder that Brexit is all down to Tories NOT LAB.The referendum was to heal Tory party rifts & appease UKIP.The lies from the leave side were from Tories. LAB are simply accepting the will of the vote BUT want a soft NOT hard Brexit. 
This is a humiliation for Rajoy, who engineered this crisis in order to undermine the momentum towards independence. The pressure now for a binding, internationally adjudicated referendum, or at least some sort of decisive vote, will be huge.  
Can’t wait to get a blue #British #passport and then stand in the three hundred mile queue at every #European airport with all the other non EU citizens. What a treat! Who wants to whizz through when you can queue stand in line for two hours? #Brexit 
David Davis branded a 'charlatan' as critics blast 'copy-and-paste' Brexit impact reports | talkRADIO  #bbcqt 
With the #Brexit reports released today, two main reactions have come through: either the real ones are concealed, or this is all there is - a hurried, botched job.I don’t think they are mutually exclusive. Here’s a possibility:(Thread.)  
Have you ever stopped to think some might’ve voted Brexit because of people as arrogant as you?  
What is so revealing about the organs of Brexit, Daily Mail, Telegraph etc, and so many of their activists online is how intolerant they are of a different opinion. Well there is no way I’m giving up, bring it on! 
Half the pricks who voted for Brexit haven't even left their hometowns.  
Interesting image from UEA.If the #Brexit referendum was translated into Parliament seats, Leave would have a 166 seat majority.  
Economist is a Rothschild publication. Macron is an agent of the Rothschild. Rothschild are enablers of the Windsors. Is Macron being told to stay the course? At stake is European market post-Brexit.  
UK passports are changing colour after Brexit  
The brutally clear @sikorskiradek on Poland, Brexit and May  
A tremendous #Brexit achievement, throwing away the rights of UK citizens to protection by diplomatic or consular authorities of any other EU country. We get colouring in instead.  
Schools are places people send children to learn things. At school we spent a day writing Brexit Sector reports. And a man came and took them away and put them in binders. He said they were very special. I got a gold star which I showed my mum. 
Theresa May's claim that a second referendum "would be betraying the British people" has the character not of a political utterance but the ranting of a fanatical cult leader.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Thumping, misguided nostalgia forced upon generations who have no attachment to it but will still shoulder the consequences. Quite the metaphor for Brexit, really.  
The return of the Great British passport for Brexit Britain! Great news! Two words you won’t find on it? European Union!  
Farage explicitly campaigned for Brexit on the passport issue - suggesting that leaving the world's largest trade bloc in which we had the best terms of any nation on Earth was worth it to change the colour of our passport. Something we could do anyway. Imagine being such a punt  
Say goodbye to that stinky old EU passport: Britain's getting a proper blue one back after Brexit!  
Birmingham University Study shows why the EU holds all the best cards in #Brexit negotiations: 2.64% of EU GDP is at risk because of Brexit trade-related consequences while 12.2% of UK GDP is threatened, and Leave areas are most at risk: #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Pro-independence parties keep winning elections. Any referenda they hold votes yes for independence. The Spanish state won't allow a legal referendum.When will Europe just admit it doesn't give a flying toss about the right to self-determination? 
Wouldn’t it be funny if the EU also changed all their passports to blue on Brexit.  
Blue passports and the right to measure bananas in shillings. That’s all Brexit is going to get you.Happy now? 
Catalonia should probably have a referendum now eh? Without getting beat up. 
This sums up the unfortunate generational divide on Brexit. I’m not getting a blue passport “back”, I’ve never had one. I have though had a passport that allows me visa free travel across Europe all of my life.  
“It went on to reveal that there are two companies in the world that make large passenger aircraft. Now that the documents are public, these firms can be named as Boeing and Airbus.” @RobDotHutton 
Spain's @marianorajoy tried to stop the Catalan referendum with police brutality. He applied 155 to take control of Catalonia. His deputy said the indy process was "kaput". Rajoy called for these elections but his PP has gone from 11 to 4 seats in CAT. Rajoy must resign. Surely? 
I'm 38. I first got a passport in 1991. Until the referendum campaign I had no idea they had previously been a different colour. It hasn't once come up in any conversation I've ever been part of. How on earth does this matter?  
Post-Brexit passports will be blue. Don't give a shit, don't know 'bout you. I plan to move to Timbuktu. Ooh I get the shivers. 
So, Catalonia's new parliament meets, and calls an independence referendum. What then? 
If the Brexit nightmare comes true which of my passports do you think I might use more often. My devalued, but nostalgicl blue  one, or the one with 100's of millions of citizens behind it and international credibility - my   one? Not a difficult choice sadly. 
This our future under a Tory Brexit:Workers rights - gone. NHS - gone.Environmental protections - gone.Falling wages,Rising prices,Rising poverty,Rising homelessness,Rick bottom tax rates for business and rich paid for by more cuts.Don't say you weren't warned.  
Brexit: David Davis running an ‘utterly disorganised’ department, with one in four posts unfilled - The Independent  
Pleased to be able to confirm our plans for the new British passport post Brexit.  
I don’t really care what colour my passport is but I love odd trivia and had *genuinely no idea* blue passports had even been a thing until Brexit. (And over a third of the current U.K. population was born after they were phased out, under the tyranny of burgundy passports.) 
But I wanted the black one with the hard cardboard cover. We need another referendum!  
UK to get its iconic dark blue passport back in stunning Brexit victory for The Sun  
£2.79 on Amazon. Dark Blue Leather United Kingdom Passport Cover. Didn't need Brexit for that... 
Thoughts on #catalonia1. Rajoy is fucked. He's done. His "strategy" was catastrophic for unionism.2. There should be no impediment to another referendum, given a decent period of time.3. Scotland is next. 
Chris you are certainly not alone in changing your mind. I too voted leave and now accept it was a serious error. Telling our MPs are so much more effective because we are demonstrating the shift in views since the  referendum. #remainernow 
Brexit Explained  
Excl: Brits will get their iconic blue passports back after Brexit, ministers announce today; 
Attemps to explain Brexit away as an ‘English phenomenon’ infuriate me to my unionist core, writes @WelshConserv leader @AndrewRTDavies 
Brexit recap  
Chucka Umunna has said that the people of Catalonia 'didn't know what they were voting for,' in their independence referendum. Citizens didn't know leaving Spain meant leaving Spain. Separatist  parties never made clear  they intended to be separate. And the Russians hacked it. 
"WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT..."  
The Brexit papers are the biggest case of 'the dog ate my homework' the world has ever seen.Take our quiz to discover how well David Davis is preparing the country for Brexit... 
It looks like the pro-independence majority has been confirmed. Calling an official election after a referendum where they tried to question the process has turned out to be a rather foolish endeavour that has only strengthened the case for independence. #CatalanElections #21D 
Good. Prisoners chose to cause harm to our communities, as such they lose any right to have a say during their incarceration. Voting is a privilege and a responsibility. Thank you @Nus_Ghani and @attorneygeneral for confirming this will be the case post #Brexit  
From what I see, after 71% of votes counted, the pro-independence parties are going to maintain a majority with 70 seats. After trying to prevent the 1-O referendum, after 155, after locking up politicians, the “issue” is still there. So what next for Rajoy? Should he resign? 
The Brexit negotiations are between an adult EU and a spoilt brat who wants instant gratification and everything their way. Brats always lose. 
The company you keep and all that.... Poland offers Theresa May backing over Brexit deal amid rift with EU  
JUNCKER'S NIGHTMARE - Democracy!French opposition leader calls for REFERENDUM on future shape of EU...Truly a nightmare scenario for Brussels - Asking consent from the people!So glad we're Leaving #EU#Brexit 
And creepy  cover No 1: The Dalek Invasion Of Earth! #Brexit Britain has been foretold...  
But but - muh Brexit apocalypse....  
Just Wait - #EU will come RUNNING to Britain for trade dealA free-trade deal MUST include goods AND services because you “can’t have one without the other”“Why would we let them sell tons & tons of goods to us & not let us export our services?”#Brexit 
Spot on from @thomasbrake “We’ve been given old information, extracts from Wikipedia, & a few choice quotes, & nothing how Brexit will hit each sector. Govt’s woeful failure to prepare for #Brexit laid bare in front of the whole country.”#ExitFromBrexit 
Were the secret Brexit reports compiled by Pippa Middleton  
Promising comments from Michael Gove!  As Brexit negotiations continue, it’s vital that any new trade agreements insist on imports meeting UK animal welfare standards.  
Thersea May misleading the country on Brexit and Labour bottling it when it refuses to let you vote on the Brexit deal  
Brexit Minister David Davis saying he does his job "on the basis of facts, and data, and research, and analysis and operational planning"Well we've read your impact assessments @DavidDavisMP and you seem to be doing your job on the basis of Wikipedia. 
Plagiarism. In the Brexit Studies. You get send down from University for that.  This continues to be very much not OK as an example of how to govern. 
Secret Brexit reports are criticised for padding and plagiarism.Davis promised analysis in “excruciating detail”. Instead, we learnt that:- Britain is an island- Farming produces food- Banks are located where people live.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
House of Commons vote could reveal secret legal advice believed to say Brexit can be stopped  
What have we learnt about David Davis:1. He isn't clever2. He tells porkie pies 3. He isn't a hard worker4. He doesn't know how the EU works5. He doesn't know what impact Brexit will have on Britain.Please add to the list in the comment section and let's #StopBrexit 
O. M. G. The Brexit "impact assessments" aka "sectoral analyses" are SPECTACULARLY BAD. I mean, worse than you could ever imagine. And then think of something worse than that. And double it. Twice.  They're embarrassing. The EU must be pissing themselves.   
The Brexit impact assessments have just revealed that David Davis did nothing to prepare for Brexit 
Turn on Eastenders by accident. Haven't seen it for years. They seem very angry. Probably Brexit-related. 
Take a closer look and Brexit is foreign billionaires plus, of course, Putin dipping their fingers and money deep into British politics. #Brexit is not patriotic. Brexit is betrayal.#BrexitBetraysBritain.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
“Brexit Secretary now says his department hasn’t conducted any research into what effect different Brexit outcomes will have on different parts of the UK economy. If that is the case, that is nothing short of a dereliction of duty.”  
Pep Guardiola is under investigation by the Spanish police for "rebellion" during the Catalan referendum. [El Nacional]  
'JUNCKER'S NIGHTMARE: French opposition leader calls for REFERENDUM on future shape of EU' 
The question one has to ask themselves is why are the EU so desperate to retain the UK in their Union? Why did the #EU pay €160 Million to Pro-Remain Groups?#Brexit  
I see the quality press understand the Brexit impact studies very well.  
Just as unstoppable as the Titanic was unsinkable. If you really believed it you wouldn't need to say it.You're losing your beloved brexit, and it serves you right. 
Every real Conservative should see this. We One Nation Tories have to recognise it's happening here. It's how unthinkable illiberal attitudes are made acceptable by the extremists. Brexit has been made acceptable as long as its soft! Actually it's a denial of all we've stood for.  
Absolutely right, the brave Poles fought alongside our armies and our pilots during two World Wars. They are also hard workers for the British economy and we should honour their friendship after Brexit and who knows they may follow us - along with others.  
To put some numbers on it - here's the change in Real GDP since the referendum.#StopBrexitThursday#StopBrexit#Brexit#FBPE#WeAreEurope#FinalSay 
Poland offers Theresa May backing over Brexit deal amid rift with EU. They are proving to be true friends to the UK.  
Online plagiarism checker is unimpressed with these newly-released Brexit reports.  
U.K.'s Secret Brexit Studies Reveal That Airbus Makes Planes...Secret economic analyses published online by Parliament. “Most of this could be found on Wikipedia,” says MP.No real preparation. No plan. Just lies. #StopBrexit. #FBPE.  
The far right, with striking support from Putin, has brought us:- Brexit- Division of Europe- Trump- Attacks on the UN- Division between US and Europe and so onThis is groundwork for grave trouble ahead. Anyone voting for decay of our peaceful world order: you did this. 
Fascist Poland Politician offers Theresa May backing over #Brexit deal amid rift with #EUEnemies of my enemies blah blah blah... 
#Brexit supporter Lord Ashcroft. 1. Sold Belizean passports for £33,000 each.2. Sheltered a vast fortune in a secret Bermuda based trust. 3. Donated several million pounds to the Tories and was Tory party vice chairman. Utterly corrupt, totally legal.#StopBrexit #FBPE  /1 
He stepped aside to allow the Tories to literally vote against democracy.  Some of us are trying to avoid the dire outcome you mentioned by reversing Brexit. 
Have the Lords spotted exactly why  the Govt still wants parts of these documents kept secret? Cos they confirm industry wants a 'soft Brexit'? 
I'm sure it's great fun mocking the Brexit sectoral reports, but it feels a little unfair on the people who wrote them: good civil servants having to pull together something coherent from nothing in no time to cover for their boss. 
I only found out about this 20 minutes ago, and I have already skimmed three of them. They are not in what I would call - cough - ‘excruciating detail’. Simply lamentable. Totally useless in assessing what Brexit might mean to sectors.  
Sorry @johnmcdonnellMP, you're wearing your Brexit blinkers here. The IMF also said Brexit had led to the fall in the pound, the rise in inflation, the squeeze in wages, lower growth and less investment - all in all bad for the economy and bad for the lives of ordinary people.  
If any of my followers have access to academic plagiarism software to compare the Government’s Brexit impact studies to Wikipedia please do email me.. 
French opposition leader calls for REFERENDUM on future shape of EU  
May’s Polish overtures strike a dissonant chord - @FinancialTimes View warns Brexit Britain not to become Perfidious Albion  
Good spot from the night before Wikipedia copy and paste brexit impact studies  
Our fight for an Exit from Brexit won’t stop here. You deserve the final say on any Brexit deal, with a chance to reject it and stay in the EU if you don’t like it.There is only one UK party that is 100% pro-European – the Liberal Democrats.2018 looks set to be the crunch year! 
Poland offers Theresa May backing over Brexit deal amid rift with EU. Polish PM Mateusz Morawiecki warns against ‘dangerous’ Brussels protectionism as the British PM brings top team to Warsaw, reports The Guardian. 
I feel like we should seriously reconsider any free-trade deals with Britain after their vote against us today. Let them Brexit themselves. 
NC44 my #EUwithdrawalbill amendment seeking an independent evaluation of #brexit impact on health & social care on behalf of @CamphillScot & 56 other sectoral orgs was defeated, 318 votes to 294. If the 13 @ScotTories MPs had supported it, it wd be law now. 
Other key quotes from those Brexit studies:‘fishing industry is concentrated in coastal towns.’‘electricity is a fundamental part of modern society.’ ‘the food chain includes agriculture.’And ‘we’re completely taking the piss.’ 
ACRE- Association of Conservatives for the Reform of `Europe. A group of Fascists with links in every country . Including this bloke in Poland and the one in Hungary.This is the other arm of Brexit to break EU. Dan Hannan’s mates #StopBrexit  
I’m sick of this EU fascist superstate bringing in better working conditions for British workers. If we want to treat our workers like shite, we bloody well will. Brexit now!  
'The Brexit impact assessments have just revealed that David Davis did nothing to prepare for Brexit'  
The UK is being stolen: 4 reasons we are still angry about Brexit | The New European  
It was no answer at all. Brexit strategy: bold statement (there will be no hard border), scrutiny on bold statement (how?), slogan escape route (will of people/no running commentary)Repeat forever.  
Brexit, Bitcoin and Veganism: The second album by Sundara Karma 
."We have to stay angry with Labour’s leaders too, for their FAILURE to fight in the referendum campaign,their FAILURE to stand up properly against May’s governing only for the 52%,their REFUSAL to call out Brexit for what it is, a national calamity". 
Three new additions to never be talked about at the dinner table: Brexit, Bitcoin and Veganism 
Why does #BBCNews call Catalans 'separatists' for wanting independence, but doesn't call the swivel eyed Brexiteers separatists for wanting Brexit? 
Here is the 8-page sectoral ‘analysis’ for medical services and social care.  Our one-man Brexit specialist @markgdayan has produced more and better analysis in his lunch hour  
House of Commons vote could reveal secret legal advice believed to say Brexit can be stopped  
This has to get through to people outside the Remain camp who don’t hear about it because they read the Mail or Express and live behind a wall of disinformation about the wrecking-ball effects of Brexit.  
It's time to support #2ndReferemdumI support democracy. I value democracy. So let's have more of it, now the facts are in.Brexit is bad for economy. Bad for jobs. Bad for rights. Bad for Britain. And a clear majority now want to #Remain.It's time.@UKLabour 
Oh. The, er, Brexit sectoral analyses that don't discuss Brexit have been published. As you were.  
A v quick thread on the #Brexit sectoral analyses published by Select Committee today. They are easily mocked, because they are gutted. So FWIW here is an informed view from Whitehall. 1/Thread 
Fishing is *currently* limited to coastal regions. Brexit will allow us to make creative decisions and expand our industries. 
"Am I still on this fecking island? "#StopBrexit#FBPE#a50challenge 
A Leave voter writes to his MP seeking a second referendum.He has changed his mind.I suspect other Leave voters will feel the same.It's an excellent letter, lets hope it encourages others to do the same.#ExitFromBrexit  
Britain's "Madame Brexit" tells Poland: Your constitution is your own matter  
If the Brexit Secretary really hasn't bothered to produce any assessments of the impact of different Brexit outcomes, "that is nothing short of a dereliction of duty." @SeemaMalhotra1 
‘UK's Secret Brexit Studies Reveal That Airbus Makes Planes’EU:  
How the Telegraph - home to Boris Johnson, Daniel Hannan etc - was the incubator for Brexit  
Cracking blog by @SeemaMalhotra1 on the release of the Brexit non-impact 'impact assessments' today. They are a proper Wikipedia job.  
We can’t allow such *sensitive* information from the Brexit Impact Studies to LEAK like this! It will undermine the UK’s negotiating position!!  
U.K.'s secret Brexit studies reveal that Airbus makes planes  
Poland offers Theresa May backing over Brexit deal amid rift with EU  
The petition to leave the EU immediately is currently at 127,862. Please show your support for leave by voting and retweeting. At the very least, this shows the Govt that we still want our Brexit. 
Civil service reports on Brexit are criticised for padding and plagiarism  
Excruciating detail, @DavidDavisMP said - UK govt's 39 sectoral reports have zero analysis of brexit impact, says @JohnSpringford 
Theresa May wants a stronger relationship with Poland after #Brexit  
"Electricity is good" says Janet"Yes it is" says John"Brexit is a mess though""Yes. Yes it is" says John 
How to avoid a family row when #Brexit crops up over Christmas... (and you know it will) 
Treasonmeeting 1 was a mere bagatelle, a statement of intent. The mechanics of the deal were finalized in Scotland the day after #Brexit; this is why traitor and money launderer @stevenmnuchin1 isn't in line for POTUS. He's going down 
The most embarrassingly simple bits from Davis Davis' 'excruciatingly detailed' Brexit analyses  
Personally I like to see the return to #brexit Britain of abstract nouns as common first names—with a postmodern English Puritan twist. Not just Constance & Felicity, but Evasion, Complicity, Waste. ‘Deception Johnson’ has an almost picaresque nimbus around it 
Brexit sector reports are the gift that keeps on giving. Superb analysis. "Electricity is a fundamental part of modern society. Residential and industrial users rely on its use to ensure basic and vital needs such as lighting, heating or refrigeration are met on a daily basis" 
It’s a nice idea, but robotics and artificial intelligence won’t come close to filling labor shortages in a post-Brexit Britain, when many immigrants, who provide much-needed labor, will be forced out of the country.  
'Bout bloody time these Labour MPs started showing a bit of mettle. Time is running out to save this country from Brexit. Once we are out we will never get in again. Stuck on our own with Trump. @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer @jeremycorbyn 
Leave campaigners claimed #Brexit wouldn't damage economy. @thetimes reports 28% car crash. When will they acknowledge the damage to UK? 
What I'll be watching in 2018 #EU1 Italy election2 German gvt outcome3 EU-Visegrad refugee stand off4 Brexit phase 25 Bavaria 6 Identity issues among voters7 Final Juncker reforms8 Labour vote in non-Lab councils9 Sweden election 
I’ve just read the Life Sciences Sector Report. It described the sector. Lots of numbers but the report itself states the quality is not great. It is ‘industry yearbook’ type stuff.It told me zero about the impact of Brexit on my company 
Gloomy #Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
DICTATORSHIP: The Netherlands to end referendum opportunity. The only country in Europe...1)  2) 3)  
Thank you PM @theresa_may for the 2nd G2G consultations in Warsaw today. We agree that the UK-Polish relationship is at its strongest in living memory. Together we’re paving the way for both great economic relations and close security cooperation in a post-Brexit world. 
More state secrets revealed to the pesky EU by those Brexit reports...  
Editor-at-large @campbellclaret on how William Shakespeare, the King of Word-Invention, provides us with the language to describe Brexit  
#Brexit (in any form) means unavoidable austerity for a very long time no matter who is in power . (Historically this then increases likelihood of a series of ineffectual governments and increasing extremism )  
WATCH | "When they saw behind the facade, when they penetrated to the realities, they stood up to fight for the continued existence of their nation - and that is what will happen"Enoch Powell predicted Brexit 42 years ago. Incredible! #TBT #ThrowbackThursday 
Amazing graphic. Since Brexit vote, the UK has shot straight from being at the top of the range of G7 economies for growth... to being at the bottom - and missed out on the surge others are enjoying.Brexit’s just so... Brexit.  
Congratulations to the work experience students who wrote tge Brexit impact assessments in your post GCSE week. Good luck with your A levels. 
Britain and US hold crucial SECRET trade meetings on post-Brexit ‘special relationship'  
The EU says it is united, against populism and Brexit. But this is a convenient fiction. There are two Europes - the continent is divided between its political elites and the people they claim to represent, writes @Tom_Slater_  
Brexit campaigners furious as blue passports could be made in GERMANY after we leave EU  @theresa_may 
You know when people say Remainers lost #brexit referendum & should just not fight it? Below is what we are fighting - you want to give up? Really? "Giving up" cannot be an option - its too important to "just let it go".  
Have to say we are rather enjoying the triggering being created nationwide by our @EFDgroup flyers on the betrayal of Brexit. They must be working 
Poland’s PM seems to give Theresa May all she wants in a Brexit deal - “freedom of providing services” and accepting “different rules and regulations”. Dismay in Paris/Berlin? 
I’ve lost count of the ‘damning’ reports on this Tory government. On austerity, housing, prisons, Brexit, the NHS, transport, schools, universal credit, wages, inflation, social mobility, poverty, tax avoidance, not to mention 3 Cabinet ministers gone in the last 2 months. 
"We can, and we must, #StopBrexit. A second referendum on the issue is one of the few democratically acceptable ways of achieving this." says @MollyMEP  
Fishing is "concentrated" in "coastal towns"...These Brexit reports are just trolling us  
So @theresa_may just said 1 million Polish citizens can stay in the UK.Fine, but what is the point of Brexit and is the “will” of the 17 million Leave voters being observed when the number of Polish immigrants in the UK was one of their main complaints?What is the point?! 
What’s @theresa_may doing in Poland?Isn’t she pushing a Brexit that was driven by “all these immigrants”? The number of Polish immigrants being a common complaint among Leavers.Are we going to leave EU but keep EU workers? Because if so what exactly is the point of Brexit? 
"This confounds the naysayers at the IMF, Bank of England and Treasury and shows the future is bright for Brexit Britain," says @JLongworthLML 
Can we all now please refer to the Prime Minister as Madame Brexit  
Coincidence or not, the first school census post #Brexit included to register kids nationality. It was then forwarded to the Home Office for immigration checks purpose.Lovely little Britain isn't it.And @AmberRuddHR wishing us a Merry Christmas "You'll be fine"  
At Theresa May's news conference in Warsaw, a Polish translator has just referred to her as "Madame Brexit" 
Polish translator just called Theresa May “Madame Brexit” 
4,800+ schoolchildren have endured a year of uncertainty over whether they can stay in this area as they are classed as EU nationals.The figures – which schools have been obliged to collect for the 1st time – reveal the human face of the #Brexit negotia'.  
Here's something you may or may not like to sign, about something we may or may not want to do.  Petition: Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to remain in the EU.  
The NHS was central in the referendum campaign but is virtually entirely absent from these reports. I've now read through half of them - they could have been written by someone with virtually no knowledge of the EU 
Have read IT sector report. To describe it as Janet and John, would be an insult to the Janet & John books #Brexit 
Brexit is, in my naive view, all about intellectual deficiency. It is its defining feature. It's to be expected in the population at large, but not in British political leaders. Yet there it is, large as life and in your face, in May, Davis, Hunt and Corbyn et al. 
The referendum Broke some people's hearts And the very next day Their minds flew away. This year Their tweeting through tears Made everyone else feel special. 
Hoey - "There are seventeen and a half million people who don't think I'm talking nonsense" Possibly Kate, but equally possible is the fact that twenty-eight million think you are, so what's your actual point again? 
There is literally nothing on the impact of leaving the EU on higher education in this impact assessment  #Brexit 
Events of 2017 in the "Doctor Who" universe:1. Hollyood's fourth reboot of "The Karkus".2. Harry Sullivan's column in the Daily Mail questioning whether "the old girl can see us through Brexit".3. US President resentful of charismatic Mexican.  
Nigel is lying again. Forbes doesn't say business will be great. It says it IS great, but there will be a downturn after Brexit.  
When I read an ex mandarin saying such half baked things about Brexit, it makes me doubt their judgement on so much else ....  
There’s more to governing than Brexit, but this govt doesn’t have time/talent to deal with it. UC is causing widespread misery, legal aid slashed and crime rising. Brexit not just a disaster, also a distraction from other problems. 
The Scottish Parliament supported a motion that Scotland is entitled to consider a new Independence Referendum as a consequence of the UK leaving the European Union.  When should Scotland have a referendum? 
#Brexit is already badly damaging the UK's economy  
The experts were right, Brexit is already badly damaging UK's economy, IMF tells Brexiteers  
And Davis lied about the existence of the Brexit impact reports. Why has he not been sacked yet?  
I don’t understand why @UKLabour and particularly my pro EU #Canterbury MP don’t support giving the British people the final say on a Tory #Brexit? With a few honourable exceptions most sat on their hands last night. It baffles me. @LabourWhit 
Thank you, Brexit... teeing our NHS up for privatisation. 
.@ThomasBrake: Publication of #sectoralanalysis reports lays bare the Government's failure to prepare for Brexit  
Theresa May desperate for Brexit support flies to Poland to meet new prime minister a day after the EU took unprecedented action to stop the country’s slide into authoritarianism. Dreadful diplomacy.  
A flood of meaningless non-stories is provided by British mainstream media to cover up May's treachery over #Brexit , the scandalous introduction of sex education for minors and the real reasons why Damian Green had to step down. That is how #censorship works in Britain. 
Beyond that... what is the likelihood that gov can secure the best deal for the country *without* understanding the projected impact (quantitative or otherwise..) of different forms of Brexit on the 58 sectors (previously defined as key by gov themselves)? 
"I genuinely don't think it is going to happen" @zoesqwilliams "Shall we have a bet?" @MrHarryCole £100 is now at stake over Brexit #bbcdp 
The extensive #Brexit sectoral analysis for fisheries has revealed that fisheries activities are concentrated near the sea. #mindblown 
My highlight from the Government Sectorial Analysis of #Brexit and Fisheries.@DavidDavisMP has worked out it happens at the coast a lot 
I spent time I'll never get back going through them yesterday. They were all written that way - the Ladybird binders of Brexit. 
Brexit Sectoral Reports published. NOTHING in them you couldn't google. Why did they want to hide them?  I'm convinced forecasted analysis has been done, just not in the form we can easily ask for 
Suddenly they oppose austerity now they think they can use it as leverage to stop Brexit. Despite austerity happening for seven years while we’re in the EU 
The only reason these Brexit sectoral analyses were not published was to avoid ministerial embarassment at the shoddiness, after all the bluster and bigging-up.The restricted access Commons room was mere theatre. 
Brexit may help with slow realisation that Britain is a relatively normal European country, one that quite likes long holidays, socialised medicine and football. 
Yesterday I made a speech arguing that the people should have the final say over Brexit. Full speech here:  
Indeed - the higher education report is a useful collection of stats on EU27 students and staff plus research £ - but there is zero attempt at assessing Brexit impact  
I see ministers have published their Brexit impact assessments. Looks to me like they've just printed off Wikipedia pages on bits of the economy. I know it's the end of term, but we can do better than this. 
"It is strange you appointed a Brexiteer as Brexit spokesman," @NicolaSturgeon says to @LabourRichard. She's speaking about @NeilFindlay_MSP who, erm, voted remain. #fmqs 
Lib Dems call for second EU referendum in December 2018  
On October 1 the Spanish police injured 1,000 Catalan referendum voters. Today we will beat them, but with votes, not with truncheons.#VotaRepública 
FT Exclusive: EU officials are preparing a skeleton, Canada-style trade deal in case the UK is unable to clarify its demands and remains in 'Brexit La-La land'  
List of the 9 antidemocratic @LibDems MPs who voted for a Second EU Referendum in an attempt to undo the 2016 result- Tom Brake- Sir Vince Cable- Sir Edward Davey- Tim Farron- Wera Hobhouse- Christine Jardine- Layla Moran- Jamie Stone- Jo Swinson 
Some of these no-shit-sherlock Brexit reports sail so close to parody you begin to suspect some comedic genius lurking beneath (almost): "Most firms have headquarters based in London, but banks and banking services are found all over the UK, largely in proportion to population." 
How much more shame will Brexit bring on us?Today May crawls to Polish Law +Justice party begging for support,despite EU sharp censure of them anti-forcing judiciary under far-right political thumb.No more boasts of UK as cradle of democracy/mother of parliaments etc 
Chemicals one also totally descriptive, no description of what impact Brexit would have on e.g. access to EU regulatory system  
The just-published Brexit impact report on health and social care says nothing about the impact of Brexit on health and social care. Plus all views from the sector, which must have included councils’ views, are redacted. A pointless document.  
The man who promoted this #21D #Catalan election by calling the illegal Oct 1st referendum isn’t in Barcelona. Carles Puigdemont @KRLS is in exile in Brussels. @SkyNews spoke to him, exclusively, last month 
I've just had a look at the health & social care one. It's just a statement on the current situation. These certainly are not impact reports on the effects of Brexit #pointless 
“It should be clear to the government that removing or weakening working time regulations would put patients at serious risk.” @janetRCN joins 12 royal colleges and trade unions to say weakening working time regulations after Brexit could be dangerous:  
Only 23 MPs backed a second referendum on Brexit but that hasn't stopped EU fanatics like Lord Heseltine banging on about a 2nd vote 
DExEU are doing their damnedest to finish the remaining 19 before the new year. As for the published stuff, random sampling shows that it is a collection of info downloaded from open sources in an erratic manner. No real analysis in the Brexit context, no impact assessment. 
The Brexit Sectoral (not Impact) Assessments have now been released to the public. Click, read, and wonder what the hell they've actually been doing @DExEUgov (aside from paying their female staff less...) #BrexitReports  
39 sectoral reports on Brexit published.  Have flipped through the aerospace one. It's entirely descriptive. Zero analysis of Brexit impact. 
Brexit Committee has published the definitely not impact assessments 39 Sectoral studies - in each case redacting every sectors “view” of where Brexit should land at request of Government  
The only reason Liam Fox wants secrecy on #Brexit talks with the US is so he can keep the British people in the dark while he sells our country and its sovereignty to the USA.#BrexitBetraysBritain #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Theresa May off to Poland today presumably to take a further lesson, after her visits to Erdogan and Trump, into how a government should go about subverting democracy. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Friends! Summary!1. Brexit! BORING!2. And really awful!3. It's so *complicated*, isn't it?4. All this "democracy" business is a real yawn, too!5. Why don't we let Our EU decide everything instead?6. After all, that's how Britain got where it is today. 7. That's all, folks!  
Disappointing that EU-funded CBI are calling for UK to be a EU rule taker. This betray key promise of referendum - to take back control of our laws. 
#LordsQs Tony Greaves warns that exodus of European Union construction workers following Brexit risks provision of affordable housing  
Brexit sectoral reports (the artist previously known as impact assessments) have just been published  
The Final Say on the Final Day (last speech on EU Withdrawal) on why UK voters deserve the #FinalSay  on the EU #Brexit Deal  
Also this morning, Brexit Committee will publish those impact studies, (at last) but they still won't be complete - for a refresher (if you still have the will to live)  
Leaving the EU will not look anything like what people were promised. And if the final deal doesn't contain all those Brexit promises, then MPs should reject it. And YOU should tell them to. Watch this:  
 Secret Brexit Impact Assessments "a costly vanity exercise" @joswinson 
This *must* be a red line issue for Brexit deal. Disentangling from ALL EU Defence Union initiatives signed since November 2016  
"On the first day of Brexit my true love sent to me chlorine washed poultry."This is how Brexit could unfold in a new take on a famous Christmas carol.  
It’s a nice idea, but robotics and artificial intelligence won’t come close to filling labor shortages in a post-Brexit Britain, when many immigrants, who provide much-needed labor, will be forced out of the country.  
The 2-party state is bankrupt, it fails to represent the people. The earlier the two "main" parties split up, the better it is for representative democracy in UK. Brexit is the living proof that the current system is defunct.  
All of these brexi folk trying to get remain voters on side. Forget it. Government split the country with lies to save a political party. They then picked a side. I am a proud citizen of nowhere, a non-citizen, anti brexit, traitor if you must. I can never get behind brexit. 
Good luck to the independence parties of Catalonia and her people from us in Wales.  Spain has shown its ugly side since the referendum, now it's time for Catalonia to be a free, progressive and democratic country we can all look up to. #catalonia #catalynia #21D 
Sorry @UKLabour but I've had enough of your supporting the Tories' abysmal Brexit psychodrama. #StopBrexitI just joined the Liberal Democrats - join me here:  via @LibDems 
You *will* be paying for Brexit for generations to come, so why pay its cheerleaders too?  Cancel further payments and cut the card. 
Last night our effort to enshrine in law a vote on the final Brexit deal was defeated by the Conservatives after Labour failed to show up.Find out more here:  
Where we’re at:EU: starts proceedings against Poland for undermining democracy, human rights and the rule of law.Theresa May: heads to Poland with Hammond and Johnson to woo them over Brexit.#SoProud 
Within a year after the referendum, the EU had duped Westminster into new commitments in defence finance and policy that Brussels will govern.They will have a harmful effect on UK defence autonomy up to 2021 and STILL appear in civil servants’ proposals for an ‘exit treaty’. 
Keep your voice down, they haven't worked it out yet... @SKZCartoons on Brexit and Ireland.  
We’re having a Brexit themed Christmas dinner this year. No Brussels  
After all the project Fear doom & gloom, it is clear to me that post-Brexit optimism is now gathering momentum.  
The Royal College of Anaesthetists & other Medical Royal Colleges have called on the Government to ensure working time regulations are safeguarded after #Brexit  
A notice to @UKLabourI do not & never have supported #BrexitThe majority of #Labour supporters & members all voted #RemainIf you do not change your policy then I & so many others will advocate for #StopBrexit & back the @LibDems at the next General Election. #FBPE #FinalSay 
Was ‘Brexit’ was propelled by anti-immigrant prejudice? Read the results of a study testing this claim - freely available until 9th January:  @BPSOfficial 
Kate Hoey MP - "I don’t really trust the EU. They want to punish us for that brave decision to actually leave something that, when we look at what we are discussing here, we are simply asking to leave." #Brexit  
EU Committee urges @DavidDavisMP to publish #Brexit sectoral analyses in full, saying that they “pose no risk to the UK’s negotiating position” and would “promote an informed public debate”:  
Some people aren't worried about #Brexit damaging our country. These 'BREXIACS'  (Brexit At Any Cost) are not owning up to what it has already cost us - before we've even left and try to pretend the economic evidence either doesn't exist or is irrelevant 
A stunning fall in domestic demand causes UK car production to head for the first annual fall since the financial crisis #Brexit uncertainty is one of the factors hitting demand.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
So worrying to see people pretending #Brexit isn't a problem for the economy. Latest figures show #Brexit has COST the UK around £350m a week - that's money we CAN'T invest in NHS or other priorities! 
The @rcgp are pleased to be supporting @TheBMA with this letter to the Prime Ministers urging the Working Time Regulations to be retained post #Brexit #TeamGP 
Bring power back to the people they said.... #brexit  
Young people voting against #Brexit were voting for more expensive housing, increased strain on #NHS & fewer & more distant school places with larger classes!I would suggest the effects of 1million extra people every 3-4years is pretty obvious! #FBPE  
Wasn't the #EU #Referendum non-binding as well? So isn't that the end of #Brexit ? 
I'm really not that fussed about Damian Green. But a Minister claiming to have studied Brexit impacts in excruciating detail when he'd done no such thing, now there's a sackable offence. 
Corbyn's strategy seems to be to sit back and let the Tory #Brexit fanatics ruin our country in the hope that an angry electorate will then kick them out so that he can preside over the ruins. There may be a slight flaw in this approach. 
Dec 19: Brexit will cause loss of influence on scale of 1970s, says ex-MI6 chief#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
"UK demands secrecy in Brexit trade talks with US" Hard Brexit, Soft Brexit...Secret Brexit? This doesn't bode well for food safety standards and animal welfare. READ >>>  
City bankers are warming to Jeremy Corbyn. The reality is that Labour has a manifestly more City and Business friendly Brexit position than the Tory party. And business means jobs..  #EU 
Consumer confidence in Britain falls to a 4-year low  
Only 463 sleeps left until Brexit!  
I wish that the BBC had allowed Paul Lewis to say whether he thought Brexit was a good idea during the EU Referendum  
Yes, It is a gamble. Ld Ashcroft on GE. Over two thirds (68%) of those who voted Conservative said they had voted Leave in the referendum. Just under two thirds (64%) of those who voted Labour said they had voted to remain in the EU, as did nearly eight in ten Liberal Democrats.  
well said by @DMiliband "All of our options narrow post-brexit" which is why everybody has the right to reconsider  
They say #Brexit is patriotic. Even if we put aside their possible Russian links, Arron Banks, Farage and Andy Wigmore of Leave.EU have been colluding with Trump, Bannon and Mercer to subvert British politics. (diagram by @carolecadwalla) #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Labour could and could have stopped this.People need to remember that when Labour MP's follow hard right Tories into the voting lobby - AGAINST TO REQUEST OF THE TUC#Labour#TUC#Brexit  
Theresa May is not a great leader. She fully understood that Green was a problemShe knows Brexit is bad She allows extremists in her own party to boss the agendaShe clings to power putting party before country.This is a rotten government.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
They say #Brexit is patriotic. That is nonsense. Rich & powerful foreigners, like Trump & Putin, Murdoch, Australian billionaire Michael Hintze, New Zealand Dubai based billionaire Christopher Chandler & many others have interfered to foist Brexit on Britain#StopBrexit #FBPE 
.@CNagpaul and twelve other medical bodies have written to @theresa_may urging her not to make changes to the working time regulations as a result of #Brexit  
In November, Liam Fox made a public pledge for transparency during Brexit trade talks. Two days later, his department signed a deal with the US to keep them secret  
Corbyn ain’t so nice: misleads electorate about Labour Brexit policy; abstentions on key policies; duplicitous liar like rest of Labour  
In Today's news...- Withdrawal Bill clears Committee Stage- EU says Brexit transition to end by December 2020- Barnier backtracks on tough talk...and much more inside! 
Why - despite pre-referendum claims from the #Leave camp - small fishing communities stand to lose out due to #Brexit. Just like everyone else. #StopBrexit 
Large lines to vote in Catalan regional elections this AM. Outside Barcelona school where police clashed with protesters during banned referendum on Oct 1 one voter said: "I've got butterflies in my stomach being here again."  
If you voted Labour under the impression you would get a final say on the Brexit deal, more fool you. Corbyn position the same as May: “will of the people” forever frozen in 2016. Madness.  
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 21: as new facts emerge, people should be able to keep an open mind on Brexit. Please RT:  
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon demands Holyrood votes on Brexit, and announces that the result will be 'definitely against', thereby eliminating need for actual vote.  
It'd be great if BBC GMS's Spanish Criminal Law correspondent could come on to explain on what grounds they've now taken to confidently, and without the slightest qualification, describing October's referendum as "illegal". 
There was a time when the lies and sleaze clearly visible in the current govt, would bring it down. Brexit Britain is a different place and it's ugly. To quote the Brexiters, I want my country back.#StopBrexit 
You almost just wish that Labour would settle on one position on Brexit so the British public could know where they stand. Labour making the chaotic Tories look decisive.  
.Real Labour is beginning to awaken to the dangers of Brexit & Real Labour is beginning to take a stand against Corbyn's Brexit plan . 
Just 9 Labour MPs felt you should have a say on the final Brexit deal: Ben Bradshaw, Roger Godsiff, Helen Hayes, David Lammy, Catherine West, Daniel Zeichner, Ann Clwyd, Geraint Davies, Paul Flynn. The rest followed Corbyn’s orders to deny it. Greens think you should have a say. 
Completely agree. Horrible & unacceptable. As Chris Wilkins says in @thetimes this morning - Brexit is driving us mad  
Friends!Nutters!Don't buy into the "inevitability" line peddled by a tiny handful of 17,410,742 hardline Brexiters who want us to leave Our EU!The truth is that we - Remainers - are in charge. We have the right to demand that Leavers change their minds in a second Referendum. pic.twitter.com/nbzRqhznWu 
Exclusive: UK demands secrecy in #Brexit trade talks with USThis is what they meant by Take Back Control 
NEW Jeremy Corbyn suffers major Brexit rebellion as 64 Labour MPs defy whip over customs union  
Brexit-voting caller on James O’Brien’s show, who works as a taxi driver, is so happy with the ECJ ruling that he’s reconsidering Brexit. He’s beginning to realise the Tories are planning to slash all of our rights. If you think he’s the only one you haven’t seen the polling. 
A tale of viewing the Brexit 'sectoral analyses' by @joswinson. 
Lack of investment decisions after Brexit vote has left Britain's economy facing a "very, very challenging" year, David Miliband says  
Second time this week #r4today include a Legatum speaker on a piece about #Brexit WITHOUT mentioning how this toxic “think tank” is or that it is under investigation...#BBCBias 
Ideally, MPs should vote to withdraw Article 50 & kill off the omnishambles that is Brexit. But they won't. The second option is a vote by the people on the deal or Remain in the EU. That Amendment was rejected. So we the people must hold our own referendum on the deal or Remain 
I’m actually amazed David Davis ISN’T taking this opportunity to resign, using it as an excuse, before his incompetence over Brexit negotiations gets exposed even further.  
‘Brexit WILL NOT weaken us’ May flies to Poland for close cooperation ahead of EU split  
A victory for #WorkersRights. But  #Brexit would undermine it.  
Corbyn’s Labour backs #Brexit. If you support #Labour but oppose #Brexit, will you vote for an alternative pro-Remain party at the next election?Please RT and let the Labour leadership know it’s on the wrong track! #DemocraticRenewal 
“Let’s mobilise the youth vote, let’s get them engaged with politics but, whatever you do, don’t tell them the truth about Jezza & Brexit”  
May in Poland to Seek #Brexit Ally after Firing her DeputyPolish government undermining rule of law and independence of judiciary. Tories sit with members of this same party in EuroparlWe must not allow UK’s Brexit weakness to undermine democracy here 
Public engagement, Brexit, nationalist archaeological narratives & Ancient DNA - new short paper by @Boothicus & I  out today 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May will allow #Brexit delay in exceptional circumstances  
The new Highland Clearances: will #Brexit usher in a new era of depopulation for northern Scotland, a model of EU economic success?  
Brexit latest: when conducting crucial negotiations, it’s important to display a complete absence of integrity & trustworthiness.  
This could be the first quantitative evidence that uncertainty over Brexit has hit UK universities’ participation in EU projects 
Phew! So many Remoaners on Twitter are crying at the moment because they cannot now use a second referendum to thwart the will of the people.  
Great to see @theresa_may strengthening further our relationship with long-time friend & ally Poland “I am determined that #Brexit will not weaken our relationship with Poland. Rather, it will serve as a catalyst to strengthen it” 
This thread shows how our democracy is hollowed out by the Tory Brexit process. TTIP level secrecy & obfuscation  
#DamianGreen #damiengreen @DavidDavisMP file that with brexit impact studies !  
Real wages were rising in the UK before #Brexit vote. Now they're falling, unlike in the eurozone HT @TheEconomist 
Theresa May accused of planning to thwart 'meaningful vote' on Brexit deal (euphemism for veto) by Remoaner MPs. The PM is right to stop the rebels keeping us in the single market & customs union by the back door.  
IMF issues yet more dire Brexit warnings. The same IMF that receives funding from the EU, which has got previous post-EU referendum predictions wrong & whose chief (Lagarde) has a criminal conviction.  
#labour latest betrayal of remainers Voted against Customs Union and Second Referendum.Usual refrain "just waiting to change their minds"Yes, after April 2019 when too late.#libdems at the front of opposition. 
I apologise in advance for the temerity of suggesting just a smidgen of perspective: the government has - in a matter of weeks - passed a strong budget, moved onto Brexit trade talks, and passed the EU Withdrawal Bill through the Commons (winning 42 votes, just 1 lost). 
OMG Lib Dems undersold Royal Mail by £1bn on bad advice. Unforgivable.Instead let's have Labour make UK poorer by say £36bn+ per year. Let's deprive Brits of rights & opportunities as EU citizens & diminish us & EU at Putin's pleasure. Much betterNot May Not Corbyn Not Brexit  
2. Here are the results:Abstained: 308MPs who think the British public should have the final say on Brexit: 23 Total: 331MPs who don’t: 319Shame on @UKlabour & @jeremycorbyn for defying the will of the vast majority of Labour voters & the country#Amendment120#r4today 
Oh how the people were duped. In the last election on the doorsteps Labour remainers turned away from @LibDems. Corbyn will fight #Brexit they told me. I told them he wouldnt. Finally last night the evidence was there. Being right doesn't make me happy though. 
It’s a nice idea, but robotics and artificial intelligence won’t come close to filling labor shortages in a post-Brexit Britain, when many immigrants, who provide much-needed labor, will be forced out of the country.  
"Yeah, that's my resignation letter there Dave, put yours alongside it, that'll show her" "Errr, Damian, errr, let me be clear......." 
Steve Bell’s If ... On the 12th Day of Brexit ...  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  127,643 Signatures for the #Brexit we voted for. RETWEET NOW ! 
Chaos the new normal in May’s Government. Another day, another crisis. Just as well there are no big public issues to sort, such as Brexit 
Labour have a choice of Brexit *or* their social policies, and have chosen to completely abandon the social policies outlined in their manifesto.They don't listen to their members, and they don't want the public to have a say either.  
May accused of planning to thwart 'meaningful vote' on Brexit deal won by MPsPretty obvious she can't be trusted one jot..she's no intent to let Parl have a real say...FGS sack her & save the UK! #StopBrexit & #Remain 
Green resigns. May can now demonstrate her full commitment to Brexit by replacing him with Rees Mogg. 
*Sighs*. Theresa May, September 2016: There'll be "no running commentary" on Brexit negotiations.  
Two hurdles loom in next Brexit phase   
Proven conflict of interest by a PM should trigger an immediate vote of non-confidence... if not a flat out recall referendum... the people need recourse...  
Brexit is really s bad idea.Brexit gave us the sterling crashWhich caused inflationWhich makes us all poorer Remind me why some folk voted to leave?Ah yes! The bus message! 
That's me done with abstaining @UKLabour - am resigning and have just joined @LibDems Only Lab MPs who voted for a #referendum on the #BrexitDeal were @BenPBradshaw @AnnClwyd @GeraintDaviesMP @PaulFlynnMP @RogerGodsiff @helenhayes_ @DavidLammy @CatherineWest1 @DanielZeichner :( 
Tonight's @HouseofCommons vote to deny the British Public a further say on Brexit (including #Remain as now in #EU) is nothing short of a 'National Disgrace & Scandal', given that SO much has 'emerged' over the past 18 months! Beware ALL who neglected their duty! #ExitFromBrexit 
Theresa May heads to Poland to seek a Brexit ally after firing her deputy  
How on Earth can you whip a party to ABSTAIN on such a crucial issue? I would have more respect for him if he honestly said “I’m a Brexiteer”!I hate what the Labour Party has become under this man. I joined in 85 and resigned when he whipped for Art 50. Brexit is a Tory project. 
Is your MP on the list? The 23 who voted for a second EU referendum  
Don't bother coming here we're having a nightmare with this Brexit thing leaving the European Union. Whole of UK divided on being in or out. Racism and anti-Semitism everywhere and poor treated like shit. You'd feel at home! 
An amendment by @LibDems to secure a new referendum on the final #Brexit deal was defeated in the Commons last night after @UKLabour failed to turn up for the vote. Read and share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
#DavidDavis just bluffing when he said he would resign if #DamienGreen was made 2resign. Mr Davis also 'bluffed' about Impact Assessments. He is a Chief Negotiator 4 #Brexit . How can EU take him seriously, he shows a lack of integrity/sincerity. Broken promises & empty threats.  
The things Brexit voters care about will be worse after Brexit. Money, status, influence, security. Going against your own interests is practically the definition of stupidity. 
Davis: I know what I said, but imagine the panic if I stepped down from negotiating Brexit just when my country needs me.Country: <blinks silently> 
Depressing how ridiculous & damaging #Brexit will be yet both Govt & Opposition continue to force it through in the most autocratic way, denying us the People a further #FinalSay in 2018 because they know we'd vote #Remain now...Democracy is dying in the UK... 
While the far right populist architects of #brexit hide behind feeble & inept politictians in UK, in Poland & Hungary they're openly running the Governments. Sadly Orban's Hungary will veto any serious moves by EU against Poland. Only Germany can put the pressure on Orban.  
Here’s the list of MPs who voted in favour of a referendum on the terms of Brexit. They deserve our appreciation and applause. 
CityBankers warm To  Jeremy Corbyn & John  McDonall As Labours Manifesto Is More City friendly Than Tori’s & Also Labours Brexit Plan Closer To maintaining ties with Single market  
I am astonished: 18 months after Corbyn made it clear that he was pro-Leave by calling for the Gov't to trigger A50 straight away, by congratulating excellent Brexit speech 3 months earlier, by consistently voting anti-EU for 40+ years, ppl are just finding outJC is a Brexiteer 
Thank you, Tom.Unfortunately we seem to be surrounded by cowards and crooks when it comes to Brexit.  #amendment120 
Labour continue with their cynical, follow the public, triangulation exercise on #Brexit. And people blamed Blair for being over-attentive to focus groups. Sad to see that on the greatest issue of our times Labour are entirely without principles.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
》So Corbyn whipped his MPs to ABSTAIN on one of the most important issues of our time.》He refused to support a referendum on the final Brexit deal.》"The will of the people can't be changed by the will of the people."》Labour has lost the right to call itself an opposition. 
Woo hoo!123,456 followers.  Of which at least 123,000 are bemused Russian pornbots. No idea (genuinely) why any of you follow my drivel about Brexit and other law and policy issues, but I am grateful that you do. Thank you. 
Retweet if you agree Alabama should have its voice heard on the #GOPTaxScam The election last week was in large part a referendum on the tax bill. 
A beautiful chocolate teapot. After tonight's vote on #Amendment120 to the #EUWithdrawalBill -  which could have passed had #JeremyCorbyn not whipped his MPs to withhold their support - I feel this accurately depicts the efficacy of the #Opposition #Labour is offering on #Brexit.  
"We're about to publish most of what you've given us & the public will be able to see there is no assessment of the impact of #Brexit...".@hilarybennmp to .@theresa_may in the HoC Liaison CommitteeMinute: 15:24:35  #brexitshambles #StopBrexit #FinalSay 
Who was the most “interesting” guest at your holiday party? Send us your photos! #Brexit ringleader @Nigel_Farage held court at the @qorvis bash Tues night @HayAdamsHotel 
We are very disappointed with the outcome of the vote on Amendment 120.Labour whipping MPs to abstain, effectively letting the Tories block the public from having a voice over Brexit, shows a lack of courage.But the fight is far from over. We can and will stop Brexit! #FBPE 
Once again @UKLabour showing contempt #forthemany - #amendment120 was the people's chance to have some control over #Brexit. @jeremycorbyn, abstaining has brought you one step close to leading the Labourvative Party. 
Now repeat this up and down the country, in every major bank, pharmaceutical company, in aviation, car manufacturering, nuclear.... Brexit is a waste of time and talent. Imagine what we could have done instead.  
#Labour will pay a heavy price for this betrayal...thank you for all you do in the face of autocracy & the denial of the democratic right to rethink #Brexit...this must not be the last attempt to get a #FinalSay in 2018...we must #StopBrexit there's not one reason it can work. 
Theresa May’s Brexit policy is a fantasy that will collide with reality in 2018.If we leave the single market, UK companies could relocate to the EU. And it will mean that there will be a hard border in Ireland. Not may be. Will be.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Europe must not 'punish Britain' over Brexit, warns new French conservative leader who calls for 'tailor-made' deal - The Telegraph  
Only nine Labour MPs joined the Liberal Democrats & Caroline Lucas in voting to give public final say on referendum. The rest sided with the Tories. Another day. Another Labour letdown.  
I will always keep on saying this. #Brexit is the symbol of the failure of our education system. This helps the Tories. A politically illiterate electorate enures Tories the opportunity to govern. #StopBrexit 
.@JonathanPlaid responds to yet another Commons vote where Labour abstain rather than vote to protect Wales's national interests. #Brexit  
So Jose who's to blame for Man Utd losing against Bristol City?Mourinho : Wenger, ISIS, climate change, Donald Trump, Weather, Brexit. 
Just voted to give you a Vote on the Deal and an Exit from #Brexit . Joined by Plaid, a handful of Labour MPs and Caroline Lucas.  No Tories or SNP.  Shame on them and the Labour front bench. 
Parliament's vote on the Brexit deal must include an option to Remain in the EU.Ministers’ responses to this petition are offensive to 49m people who didn’t vote Leave. So let’s get a debate in Parliament.RT, sign & share to help #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Bombardier are still being targeted by Trump’s protectionist ‘America First’ policy - the rest of the UK should take note. This is what awaits us post-Brexit. Labour will continue to stand up for #Bombardier jobs. 
MPs who think that the British public should have the final say on Brexit: 23 MPs who don’t: 319MPs who bottled it and abstained: 308#Amendment120 
Who’s your favourite to be next to leave The Big Brexit Household 
Amendment 120 moved by @tombrakemp calling for a second referendum DEFEATED by 319-23. Government majority of 296. Committee Stage of the EU Withdrawal Bill concluded. 
Suppose it won't matter in Westminstershire' but Green was lead minister in Brexit talks with ScotGov - which for the moment leaves us with Fluff 
Dems have momentum for 2018. Focus it on fixing structural issues that suppress votes and voter power at the state level:1. Pass anti-gerrymandering bills & initiatives2. Pass National Popular Vote interstate compact by referendum.3. Go to mail-in ballots by default, like WA. 
Proud to have just voted on a Liberal Democrat amendment for the British people to have a vote on the eventual Brexit deal - shame no Tories, (brave) handful of Labour, not a single SNP #ExitFromBrexit @LibDems 
Big talking point on i front page... Implications for parliamentary scrutiny, food standards, NHS, animal welfare, among much else #tomorrowspaperstoday #skypapers #BRCvMUN #Brexit #damiangreen @michaelgove @LiamFox Full story here:  
#skypapers Bloody Yasmin Alibhai - Brown on horrendus journalist. Get ready shouting & screaming non stop. l hate Brexit & Donald Trump. Same bollocks every time she’s on TV or radio. Change the record FFS.   
My life has become so dull since the referendum. I’m sat here - with London on my doorstep - watching votes on amendments to #EUWithdrawalBill on TV.How the bloody hell has it come to this? I hate Brexit.  
Brexit latest resignation scores:EU 0Brexiteers 4A wanker, groper, liar and a schemer. Given that's a Brexiteers typical profile how do any of them have a job? #newsnight 
I am so fed up with negative Brexit stories on the BBC. If you push the negative enough it becomes a self-reinforcing policy.   The BBC's biased Brexit reporting has and is damaging the British economy... #BiasedBBC #CulturalMarxism 
Well, in his last act as Deputy PM, at least he pushed the IMF’s  Brexit-influenced downgrading of UK growth off top spot on the News. Good boy. #DamianGreenResigns 
."It seems doubtful that many who voted for Brexit voted to remove legal rights to paid holidays, rest breaks, and maximum hours". 
So important to fight against Brexit hard border and damage to UK trade & economy. Thank you to my 64 @UKLabour colleagues for voting to keep the option of staying in the #CustomsUnion 
All of our MPs voted tonight to keep Customs Union membership on the table after #Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn and his colleagues abstained.  
2017 has been insane for Theresa May: Lancaster House, Article 50, calls snap election, GE2017 result, DUP deal, Florence, Tory conference disaster, coup attempt, Fallon quits, Patel quits, DUP veto Brexit deal, Tory rebels defeat, EU agrees to talk trade, Green resigns 
Brexit Secretary David Davis said he’d quit if Damian Green was forced to resign. Second Cabinet Minister duty bound to hand in his goodbye letter?  
Well, that’s another promise our Brexit minister won’t be honouring then...#damiangreen #brexit  
Breaking news: Tory Green has finally been sacked. I look forward to Mr Brexit, David Davis, now keeping his promise and resigning too.Theresa May's effective deputy Damian Green quits over pornography cover-up  via @telegraphnews 
Damian Green has resigned from the cabinet I mean he’s been sacked for lying about knowing there was porn on his computer What? How is he still an MP? He lied about porn on his computer and he is still allowed to hold public office? Seriously? Oh and the Brexit Minister?! pic.twitter.com/Lrcb8zajxa 
Labour and Tory MPs are lining up to vote through the #EUWithdrawalBill right now. A bill that will see a Tory Power Grab on the Scottish Parliament - just let that sink it. #Brexit  
Naughty Mr Green has been caught out telling porkies and he has had to resign. Shame we can't get the Brexiteers in the cabinet to resign for doing the same thing during the referendum campaign. Sack the fib tellers and #StopBrexit 
Lib Dems call for second EU referendum in December 2018  
Dear @vincecable and @thomasbrake This really is an excellent point that @theresa_may needs to be challenged with. #Brexit #ExitFromBrexit #ExitBrexit #StopBrexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Police leaking info about his porn, a journalist revealing he 'fleetingly' touched her knee, Remoaners hoping his exit will weaken May's Brexit efforts - the #DamianGreen sacking shows how prudish and rotten public life has become. 
Yet another awkward climb down from a previous negotiating position from the Brexit secretary. At least he is used to it. 
This #FBPE thing is driving me mad - I could just spend all day following more people... I'm almost nostalgic for the good old days when I had to search around for Remainers... Well not really, #FBPE is succeeding brilliantly!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
May has lost three cabinet ministers - Green, Fallon, Patel - in seven weeks. Just few weeks back, consensus was she’d be loathed to let Green go, but #Brexit breakthrough has made her stronger than she’s been since election 
The Deputy Prime Minister has resigned.David Davis, Brexit Secretary, has also said in the past that he would also resign if Damian Green, now the former Deputy Prime Minister, left the cabinet.This is huge. 
Labour front bench abstaining on another amendment that would keep open the option of staying within the Customs Union. Jeremy Corbyn the little helper of the Tories for a hard Brexit 
The Deputy Prime Minister has resigned, Brexit "negotiations" still at square one, Boris using slurs about dead bodies in Libya, Gove thinking cheese is more important than the blue belt, Gauke's universal credit leaving children homeless at Christmas. May must go. #GE2018 
Hey @DavidDavisMP don't forget your promise. Have you send your letter of resignation to @theresa_may? Or was just another bluff like the #Brexit Impact reports?  
#DamianGreen resigns from cabinet3 down..I'll not gloat nor rake over the reasons...but we've reached a point where a Govt that prevents giving the Ppl a #FinalSay in 2018 & forces through a #Brexit backed by only 37% of voters does not deserve to govern. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis said he'd resign if May sacked Damian Green  She has. So will she lose a fourth Cabinet Minister? 
Tory 2017 Manifesto:“We are leaving EU.In leaving EU we have chosen a truly global role for Britain.No deal is better than a bad deal.We will no longer be members of single market or customs union.The days of Britain making vast annual contributions to #EU will end”#Brexit 
If Brexit is reversed Jacob Rees-Mogg says he'll flee the country -   - more reasons to #StopBrexit! 
FFS - even though Facebook said the Russians spent a massive 73pence and Twitter said they found nothing you are still convinced Russia interfered with Brexit and election? Dear God desperate stuff @Arron_banks 
Brexit should be cancelled immediately. Majority is against it. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Michael Gove says he still believes in scientific advice.I suspect however that we'd struggle to find a scientist who believes in Gove's views on #BrexitTime to #ExitFromBrexit 
The #FBPE hashtag doesn't seem to be doing much to fight Brexit (it's a hashtag—what did they expect?) but, like a wasp's coloured stripes, it does provide a handy warning to other Twitter fauna, viz. 'DON'T ENGAGE WITH ME, I PROBABLY WON'T BE REASONABLE' 
The IMF forecast that a #Brexit vote would "most likely entail a depreciation of sterling, higher inflation leading to a squeeze on disposable income and a reduction in investment,” It's being proven right #StopBrexit #FBPE 
A very merry Christmas from Berlin to all my #FBPE friends!  I am going to take a few days off from fighting Brexit. Big  to you comrades, enjoy your holidays! X  
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF.Sterling down, higher inflation, squeeze on disposable income, reduction in investment...“This is not the experts speaking, it’s what the economy is demonstrating” - @lagarde#StopBrexit #FBPE  
Labour's @KateHoeyMP says she's "delighted" that she's lived long enough to see Brexit actually happening as @ianpaisleymp praises her consistency in opposing the EU encroaching on British laws  
Bottom line: even from my hour perusing the government's collation of Brexit views across 24 sectors, it was blindingly obvious what a far-reaching, ridiculous folly this whole Brexit debacle is. (11/ENDS) #ExitFromBrexit 
The experts were right, Brexit is already badly damaging UK's economy, IMF tells Brexiteers  
25,000 jobs in Swansea are directly reliant on or current membership of the EU // @GeraintDaviesMP#Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
I am grateful for MPs like Anna Soubry @Anna_Soubry, Chuka Umunna @ChukaUmunna and Ken Clarke @KenClarkeMP for standing up against the madness that is #Brexit at all cost - Thank You.Please remain vocal - there are 16m people behind you. 
The biggest threat to the UK economy isn’t Brexit, it’s the prospect of a hard-left Labour government, @Nigel_Farage says 
This is how the contents are described. For example, the Agriculture one had 35 pages of background facts, and 5 pages of sector views. Most worryingly:  no analysis at all of what the impact of Brexit could be. (6)  
Except last week was nothing to do with overturning Brexit, it was a vote to ensure that MPs would have the chance to approve the final deal. To ensure that the very parliamentary sovereignty that the Leave campaign argued for was upheld. 
Ken Clarke - This is one of the biggest shambles I've seen in my life on one of the most important subjects that we have to resolve for the benefit of future generations.#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #EUwithdrawalbill 
Just spoken in favour of Lib Dem amendment 120, which would give everyone a Vote on the Deal the UK government secure with the EU and, if it is the will of the people, an Exit from #Brexit . How many MPs  will back the amendment? 
There is no plan for Brexit, and everyone now knows this, even if the government and a dwindling percentage of the electorate are still furiously pretending otherwise.   
This shows exactly why the EU issue should never have been decided by a referendum: people change their minds. It’s why we have elections every 5 years, giving people the opportunity to vote a different way. Referendums offer no such safety mechanism. 
Please support @LibDems - they have consistently been the party arguing for a Deal Referendum. If you are a Remainer, the integrity of their stance should matter to you.  
Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW: Let there be no mistake - we are steadfast in our support for Gibraltar, its people and its economy 
Theresa May has to be admired for her dead-eyed ruthlessness. Off to Poland on security pretext but real reason is to exploit situation to get Poland to support UK in upcoming Brexit votes in EU Parliament. In return for what, we may wonder .. ?  
Rotterdam Port recruiting 100 extra customs officers for Brexit, with UK responsible for 8.5% of trafficExtra inspection pointsVeterinary inspection pointsNew infrastructureIT systems...ie not frictionless  
IDS: “I’m all for consulting and consulting the British public. The truth is, you can consult them as much as you like and you’ll get different opinions all the time.”If that’s the case, why are you insisting that a single referendum result is the eternal ‘will of the people’?!  
Of these 24 sectors, the papers show that in 21 of them, industry has concerns about skills gaps, attracting talent and labour mobility post-Brexit. (2) 
Today I viewed the 'sectoral analysis' in the @DExEUgov Brexit reading room. I was handed two hefty lever arch files. During my slot I managed to look at 24 of the 39 separate papers. (1) 
So much for frictionless trade - Rotterdam is recruiting 100 new customers officers for impact of #Brexit  ......Brexit & Port of Rotterdam | Port of Rotterdam  
Today's Bleeding Obvious News:Uber is a Taxi firm.The ECJ does work.PM, we can't Leave EU without a treaty.People sleeping on the streets are homeless.If you hide evidence innocents go to jail. Brexit is very silly.#C4News #BFPE 
Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW tells Ken Clarke his argument is based on a contradiction and his amendments cannot be accepted as they could trigger "legal chaos" 
Black cab driver on #C4News applauds regulation of Uber by EU but won't change mind on #brexit because  EU "has too many rules" Go figure?! 
Without the #Brexit madness, the UK economy would be booming in line with the humming eurozone and global economy. Investors would be queuing up to locate here. Consumers would be purring. Smart move, indeed. We are now a gateway to nowhere.  
The restoration of hanging, corporal punishment & blue passports – the key post-Brexit priorities for Leave voters  
To rework your phrases @theresa_may :There must be no attempts to deny our sovereign Parliament a meaningful vote, no attempts to block it through the back door, and no dictatorship on BrexitWe will not tolerate it 
The jokes just write themselves #brexit  
Brexit provides the UK with so many opportunities we just have to take them & stop the government from backtracking on what the British people democratically voted for. We need a complete break from the EU not a bad deal politicians want that to keep us half in for years.  
Buy British for Brexit. Over the last 12 years I bought 4 German cars and 3 German motorcycles.  No more EU purchases. I bought a Great British car and I am going to buy a British bike in spring 2018.  Hit the twisted EU were it hurts, in their pockets. 
Brexit BOOST: 'Leaving EU is REAL GAIN for UK businesses' says trade expert  
Nice toilet paper they have in ASDA these days. Granite Brexit loo roll  
When a politician like T May talks of the country 'uniting' behind a policy, then she is denying a fundamental feature of a democracy, namely that it is based on the principle of uniting around the right to disagree about policies. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Never before in the history of the UK have so many voted for something. And in the case of Brexit at the EU Referendum, it was something that they felt passionately about. I'm proud to have been just one of the 17,410,742 people in our country who did. Brexit: 29 March 2019 
So @IMFNews say Brexit will harm UK growth, @Forbes says business will be great. But who is right? #FarageOnLBC 
Am not allowed to say what IS in the #Brexit sectoral analyses but I have said quite a bit about what is NOT. And they are sub-C grade GCSE essay cribbed off Wikipedia.   
Later this evening I'll be voting for @LibDems amendment to EU Withdrawal Bill to give people a say on the final Brexit deal. We need a first referendum on the facts.  
In a democracy there are government & opposition and majority & minority, all part of the healthily bickering democratic community. But once you talk of the "Will of the People", then there are the people and their enemies. And democracy is under threat.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The IMF says Brexit will harm UK growth, Forbes says business will be great. Who’s right? @Nigel_Farage is live 
Ken Clarke is making a wonderful speech in the House of Commons. Tears apart every #Brexit argument. 
Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW explains the Government's 'exit day' amendment and why the Government will also be supporting Sir Oliver Letwin's new amendment to go with it 
If you're a Tory voter who backs Brexit, then please wonder why Jeremy Corbyn also wants Brexit... and if you're a Labour voter who wants Brexit, take a good look at the Tory Brexiteers.Anything your worst enemy wants as badly as you do, is too dangerous for anyone to have. 
OMG!! Theresa May, Brexit and Santa    
Disappointed by patronising reaction by @KateHoeyMP to @AnnaMcMorrin in #Brexit debate - who dared to question her. Kate Hoey claims she’s “not a rebel” - the fact is that she’s rebelled 26 times this year - mostly to vote with hard Brexit Tories.  
My amendment in support of @CamphillScot and other disability & children's charities should called at around 8pm. @UKLabour will support will @ScotTories? #EUWithdrawal #Brexit  
This totally discredits any remaining myth that the EU is just a benign collection of cooperating neighbours. It is the Brussels Empire. And any non-compliant vassal state will be punished by the unaccountable EmperorsViva Brexit! 
How many voted for what?17.4m Brexit (EU Referendum, 2016)14.1m Conservative GE199213.7m Conservative GE197913.7m Conservative GE201713.5m Labour GE199712.9m Labour GE201711.3m Conservative GE201510.7m Conservative GE2010  9.3m Labour GE2015  8.6m Labour GE2010 
We go now live to Brexit.  
“Why I’m moving to Ireland” by a prominent UK academic @telescoper. Food for thought for @JoJohnsonUK and #brexit 
Dear @UKLabour , is this acceptable for one of your MPs to say?If yes, do you want to lose all the people who hoped you would soften or cancel Brexit?If not, why does Ms Hoey still have the Labour whip?  
As concerns grow in Commons about threats by Government to undermine the historic vote on #Brexit last week - Dominic Grieve warns Minister that they should avoid “kicking a hornets nest...” @Open_Britain 
Britain’s elections watchdog has imposed big fines on the EU referendum’s official Remain campaign and on the Liberal Democrats, for filing inaccurate and incomplete spending returns.  
Theresa May's premiership will be judged by her ability to deliver Brexit. However, the Tories' legacy will be judged by a consistent policy of digging us deeper into the EU (formerly EEC). The Tories just like Labour will be punished at forthcoming general elections due to that. 
Nigel Farage - "What the #Brexit voters wanted was control over the numbers of people that were coming into our country. This Government doesn’t appear to even want to pay lip service to it."  
Corbyn's achievements this year:-Lost the General Election-Undermined the Brexit process-Gained some followers on TwitterMay's achievements this year:-Successfully negotiating Brexit-Lowest unemployment in 40 years-Standing up for Britain on the world stage 
Failing to agree data-sharing rules after Brexit may be threaten security, intelligence chiefs warn  
Theresa May's letter to Santa sets out the details of our Brexit position more clearly than any other document to date.  
In case you missed my Guardian articles this year on #Brexit and the Tories attempts to rebrand themselves as animal loving greenies, they are listed here (for holiday reading!):  
It is down to the grassroots movement to swing opinion on Brexit - and then the politicians will follow.  
Tomorrow the people of Catalonia will vote in their regional election, called in the aftermath of their disputed independence referendum.Earlier this year we spent time with Ricard, who believes Catalan independence is just a matter of time. pic.twitter.com/dSmtaM3wUr 
Brexit: Be more patriotic about cheese, says Michael Gove  
Re Brexit costing money. Given that the economic consensus was so wrong in their assessment of how the economy would perform after a vote to leave it would be strange to attach to much belief to an argument about the counter-factual and how the economy might otherwise have done! 
Right, I am writing something along the lines of "ten [x]s which are shaping Brexit".Don't like "factors".  Don't think I can get away with "things".Any suggestions? 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "The European Union produces its laws in a form of gobbledygook. They write stentorian, sesquipedalian sentences nobody can ever understand." #Brexit  
Theresa May accused of planning to thwart 'meaningful vote' on Brexit deal won by MPs  
How’s Brexit going? Oh. 
The UK has never needed Europe & we have always stood distinct from the rest of Europe as a nation free & in charge of our own country & democracy. Brexit is our chance to reform our country & rebuild it from the damage the EU inflicted on us  
EU - I voted LEAVEI Support Brexit  
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
We must stop Brexit now, put an end to this madness that has poisoned UK.MPs get a grip. Look at what you are doing/allowing to be done. There was greatness about Britain, still alive in Hawking, Attenborough, McEwan but nothing great or democratic about Brexit. THIS is Brexit.  
Caller’s burning question to @IainDale: “If Brexit had gone the other way, would MPs be arguing over a soft Remain or a hard Remain?"  
Thought we’d have seen sense long ago.Every day we push on with Brexit costs us now in terms of jobs,NHS &reputation  
I’m asking the UK Gov why the Welsh Government hasn’t seen the #Brexit impact assessments for the #Welsh economy? Do they even exist? Because we have a right to know. 
Another step on the road to #Brexit - #EU wants end to transition by 31 December 2020. Brexit deniers note - #Brexit is happening.   
Lib Dems call for EU deal referendum in December 2018.“Brexit is not a done deal,” says @vincecable. “It can be stopped.”50% of public and growing support a vote on the final deal. It must have an option to Remain.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
Here are stats on religious belief. 53% of people in UK have no religion  If that was a referendum, Govt would be implementing the overwhelming democratic will of the British people and getting on with banning it by March 2019 (transition to end of 2020)! 
Brexit perspectives:Real patriots = British people living abroad to avoid tax.The enemy = EU nationals living here and paying taxes. 
Anyone else get the feeling the Remain movement is growing & growing? It's 18 months since the referendum result, but rather than lie down & accept the lies force-fed by the Leave campaign, more and more people are standing up against them. 2018 will be the pivotal year #FBPE 
.@jonlis1: 'The events of the past fortnight have emphasised that Brexit is not a policy. It is a Tory fantasy and national nightmare.'  
Here it comes Brexiters, you & I are going to have to cough up more & more to pay for Brexit AND the Police AND NHS AND social care AND education & all the other stuff you were blaming the EU for.Good job guys! Top! I didn't vote for this, but you did, right?  
Red Kipper @KateHoeyMP should learn that the duty of an MP is toward the nation, not to obey voters. She should also note that only in dictatorships do referendums end contestation on an issue.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Excellent explainer from @jonlis1 on the delusional and/or dishonest rhetoric that has us all hamstrung.Brexit is ‘a Tory fantasy and a national nightmare.’  
It has damaged England globally, not just in Scotland. Thing is it is set also to damage Scotland greatly &that's another reason we need indy asap. Brexit unleashed an English nationalism that has damaged the union with Scotland for good  
Will a free trade agreement with the EU be in place by March 2019? @hilarybennmp questions the Prime Minister @theresa_may #Brexit  
It's the #EUWithdrawalBill's final day in Committee. Here are the briefings we've published to inform MPs during the debates. You too can access our impartial #Brexit research by visiting  
2016 Brexiters: "After Brexit we will be more prosperous"2017 Brexiters: "Eat more Wensleydale or we're fucked"  
This point is worth stressing: many people in Brussels also see Poland, Hungary and democratic standards as a deeper problem for the EU than Brexit, which is now seen as British issue that can be managed.  
#BlueandWhiteChristmasDayDon't be blue this #Christmas... Just add some gold stars and we will #StopBrexit!Just download the song & tell that #Brexit Grinch to go away...#StopBrexit #FBPE 
'It's GOBBLEDYGOOK!' @Jacob_Rees_Mogg HAILS Brexit as chance to pass 'plain-English' laws  
The case for a post-Brexit transition period has yet to be made  
The experts were right, Brexit is already badly damaging UK's economy, IMF tells Brexiteers  
“We now know that Mr Tony Blair and his former Cabinet Minister Mark Malloch-Brown, who was made a peer and a Cabinet Minister on the same day by Tony Blair, they’ve been running this show it seems to me” #Brexit #live on @talkRADIO Listen online:  
Today at #liason committee, one of my Qus showed the Prime Minister was unaware of, or unwilling to face up to,  the fact that UK could have higher trade barriers with up to 94 countries as a result of Brexit. 
The Brexit effect: Polish nationals in the UK face mounting xenophobiaReport by @France24_en via @FRANCE24 
Because of Brexit poor Kevin will now only earn €225,000 a week. Spare a thought for Kevin this Brexmas.  
The more I think about it the more I suspect this to be the greatest vulnerability in the whole Brexit project because it can't be handled by transition. Only option I could see is extending A50 period as transition.  
As Brexit fails, we enter the inevitable period of political manoeuvring to win the right to pin the blame for it on someone else.#StopBrexit#FBPE 
IMF tells Brexiteers: The experts were right, Brexit is already badly damaging the UK's economy  
MUST-READ: Kevin De Bruyne's new Manchester City deal will pay him in €'s because of Brexit, in a trend becoming common due to the fall in the value of the £. Pls RT:  
Nicky Morgan unimpressed with fellow liaison committee member Bill Cash claim on referendum vote now...  
Why don’t grants allow African, Asian, Middle East journalists to spend a week or 2 in Britain & write the opus on Brexit? Would love to see publications run that take as much as someone from the West who spends 2 weeks in another country & writes about their issues. 
Friends! Lovely!And as one message shrewdly points out:"More than 45 people in Richmond Park are unhappy about Brexit"!Which is even more than the number of people who joined my recent Mass March Against Brexit!And yet Leavers STILL claim that "most people accept Brexit"!  
Sign of the time: European Council on Foreign Relations moves its headquarters from London to Berlin. With #Brexit, the UK has abdicated also its intellectual leadership to Germany. 
The Tories want to use #Brexit to take hard-won #WorkersRights away from British workers. 
That sound you hear is May tripping over the Irish border can she’s barely even kicked out from her under her feet, never mind down road #brexit  
Mrs May says Govn will support Am to delay Brexit in ‘exceptional circumstances’. She intends to delay & impede so Ref can be overturned. 
"Brexit is not a policy. It is a Tory fantasy and national nightmare"  
Having listened to the back and forth between @YvetteCooperMP and @theresa_may abut what kind of vote parliament will have on final Brexit deal, I now know considerably less than I thought I did. 
So those MPs who thought they'd won a guarantee of a "meaningful vote" ahead of any Brexit deal...er...well seems not. 
May complains about her own MPs talking of ‘a worst case scenario’ Brexit. She must surely see now there is no ‘great case scenario’ Brexit. 
Lib Dems have call for Britons to be given the chance to vote on Brexit again in 12 months time  
MISTRUST: 59% of UK nationals don't trust the EU - that's up 8% in just 6 months! The way EU big wigs have handled Brexit probably hasn't helped their cause! 
First real moment of tension at Liaison Committee - Cooper pushing May on the kind of vote MP s will get on the final brexit deal 
'They can't STOP us!' Economist DASHES EU plans to thwart UK's post-Brexit trade strategy  
The Brexit effect: UK health service faces 'Brexodus'Already stretched #NHS struggling to retain and recruit nurses from the EU via @FRANCE24 
Once we have left the EU, should we have referendum on whether to rejoin? Yes: 52%No: 48%Via Survation  (20/12) 
Theresa May says the EU Commission's decision to end the Brexit transition by December 31, 2020, is enough time for the UK  
Theresa May admits no impact assessments were carried out. Hilary Benn says we're about to publish what the government gave us and the public will soon realise there was no assessment of the impact of #brexit. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The European Parliament’s chosen #Brexit negotiator is demanding the #UK Prime Minister condemn Warsaw to prove Britain’s loyalty to “EU values”.What EU values? #Poland stand your ground against #EU #NWO dictators. 
The IMF pulls no punches in its latest report on the UK economy and defends the gloomy outlook it made ahead of the 2016 Brexit vote  
The same is true for the UK (& most wealthy western countries). This is well known, which makes the anti-immigrant flavour of Brexit and May's government (dating from her period as Home Sec) all the more problematic. It delivers a demographic timebomb to our kids.  
Benn tells PM: “We are about to publish most of what you have given to us and the public will see that there is no assessment of the impact of Brexit on different sectors” 
PM up in front of the Commons SuperCommittee the Liaison Committee - impressive bunch: chaired by Wollaston, ... Benn up first on Brexit “full alignment”  
One week before EU referendum. Christine Lagarde the UK would fall into recession in 2017, “The implication would be negative growth in 2017,” What happened!No recession, and The UK economy advanced 0.4% on quarter in the three months to September of 2017 
Theresa May faces questioning on Brexit negotiations by the Liaison Committee  
Hey, that's Robin Gething. Yeah, he blamed Brexit for his breakup. 
I’m in the building for my EXTRA EXTRA shows today and Thursday 4-7pm @talkRADIO #UFO #Brexit #terrorism 
Too late, Theresa: Brexit offer to EU citizens leaves many cold  
On BBC Politics Scotland @AlisonJohnstone says on Brexit, the UK Gov is "uniquely incompetent". pic.twitter.com/HbpbNJoWSO 
Honest poll, since the EU referendum have you actively boycotted U.K. business who were pro leave I.e Wetherspoon; Dyson; Next etc 
"Brexit" is a SCAM. There can be no other explanation. The Tories and the GOP are joined at the hip. And then there's Putin... #StopBrexit 
The Tory Brexit deception, maintained by ever increasing duplicity & hypocrisy. Yesterday they aided their enablers, the DUP, to avoid exposure in a massive EU referendum fraud - ask yourself what possible reason did the DUP pay £235k for something that didn't even appear in NI?  
The Daily Mail says healthcare in Germany and France is much better, funny how they manage that, aren't they supposed to be part of that terrible failing EU economy (which now since the Brexit vote outgrows Britain's, but never mind).  
"My passion against Brexit stems from a love of Britain, and a desire to stop the country opting for its own decline and irrelevance"Read more:  
Don’t risk #Brexit full top...  
》Amendment 120 would guarantee the UK a ref on the final deal.》If Jeremy Corbyn supports it, there are enough Tory rebels to ensure the amendment is passed.》This is probably the last chance we'll have to put a ref in place before Brexit.》Do the right thing Labour, and lead  
Kevin De Bruyne's new contract will be paid in euros, due to the impact of Brexit on pound sterling. Not only is he the best player in the league, sounds like he has the best agent.  
NO SURRENDER ! 365 Videos of the Repression lived in Catalonia by the Spanish Police in the Referendum of October 1, 2017   #FreeCatalanPoliticalPrisoners #FreedomForCatalonia We will never forget ! 
Today’s @EveningStandard has IMF downgrading UK growth, as it warns of consequences of hard Brexit and rubbishes £350m claim  
So Gove is being realistic about a trade deal with the USA.The whole replace-EU-trade-with trade-with-rest-of-world case is based on unrealistic expectations for trade deals (in speed, depth).So where does this leave the whole Vote Leave argument?#Brexit  
Since Republicans in California won’t have a candidate for Senate or governor, they’re trying to induce their voters to come to the polls with...a gas tax referendum.Yeah, good luck with that one. 
Paid. In. Euros.The world's best footballers hedging against Brexit in their new contracts.  
.@GerardBattenMEP Brexit is now going in the direction I predicted three years ago. It can be delayed up to the next general election and then overturned. Our Quisling political class are working to betray us in front of our very eyes. Only a revival of UKIP can prevent this. 
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
Totalitarian EU triggers sanctions on Poland for protecting its borders and culture. #Brexit and #Polexit now! 
Have to ask this but what the hell is going on with @UKLabour? What’s the plan? What’s the reaction? Because this news means austerity cannot be reversed for at least another decade. Brexit is NOT your project! Why shackle yourself to a sinking ship??  
Days after the “Putin stole Brexit” conspiracy was blown to bits by news Russian “trolls” spent less than $1 on the EU referendum, the Remain campaign and Lib Dems are fined thousands of pounds for filing dodgy spending returns. That wasn't in the script!  
Brits worried about price of foreign cheddar rising after Brexit should be more patriotic in their cheese buying habits, Gove suggests  
The most disturbing thing to me about Brexit is that many Britons seemed to regard it as an opinion poll and were shocked to learn their votes counted. 
I have a hunch that most of the most excitable Brexiters on here didn’t give two hoots about the EU prior to the referendum. The lies and deceit just fit nicely with their otherwise toxic agenda.#StopBrexit 
"Somebody needs to be told that they are going to be very disappointed with this agreement" Prof Michael Dougan gave evidence on the first phase deal to the Gov's #Brexit Select Committee this morning. Watch here >  @livuni_EULaw 
So now these Brexit fools are pushing the "they need us more than we need them" scenario with services. Have they learned nothing in the last 18 months?  
Brexit: All that's left for May to get through is the unyielding wall of reality  
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  Of course they are: right now it could be nothing else 
Ta-da! The full terms of Kevin De Bruyne’s new contract. - Paid in euros due to Brexit- €10m signing-on fee - €230k per week basic- €300k per week after extras- plus other bonuses (win CL/PL/Balon d’Or)- will be finalised early January  
Interesting article, the DUP Brexit ‘Dark Money’ episode will continue to run and run until the answers appear.  
Guess what, Kate Hoey? YOU piss people off. You were elected MP for Vauxhall because you carried the Labour banner & the good people of Vauxhall who voted to Remain did not understand that Labour is now a Brexit party, which you always were. 
Full Brexit in Jan. 2021 as EU sets transition deadline  
Another legal claim against Brexit. If the law wishes to avoid being an “enemy of the people” it should decline to hear this meddlesome claim; the UK government considers we’re *politically* bound to leave (& hence legal position is irrelevant)  
There was a young man at the gym this morning wearing (among other things) a Brexit T-shirt and a knee brace. So I tripped him. 
BREXIT: Theresa May confirms she would delay exiting the European Union in ‘exceptional circumstances’ such as ‘it being a destructive clusterfuck with no benefits that systematically worsens the lives of every inhabitant of the country.’ 
We need to know who funded DUP Brexit campaign.  Why are govt. blocking this? This should be challenged. @BBCNews @ITVnews @c4news @uklabour @libdems 
Lamentable response from Theresa May on child homelessness. Tone deaf as she is on everything from Trump to Grenfell to Brexit. 
I don't have to wait until the outcome of Brexit. I know that the Westminster agenda, as always, is to strangle Scotland. A chokehold that we must resist. Now is the time. 
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
8th amendment committee report launched today, proud to have been part of it on behalf of @labour , now over to Government to set date for referendum  
The Liaison Committee is questioning Prime Minister @theresa_may later today. @sarahwollaston and other Select Committee chairs will ask about Brexit and her domestic agenda.Tune in from 3.15pm at:  
MAY: Government could delay Brexit date “in exceptional circumstances”.  
'Brexit and Northern Ireland: A Reading List' has been updated to reflect the  latest developments.  Latest version available at  
Not best day for @theresa_may – IMF downgrades UK growth forecast and EU Commission lays down conditions for shorter-than-expected transition during which UK will have less sovereignty than it has inside EU – backing down on fixing Brexit day in law is sensible though 
I sympathise - in my experience most British civil servants are highly competent. Not sure the sheer manpower required to make Brexit work has quite sunk in at all levels yet. 
My ignorance of the EU prior to the referendum is a source of serious shame. Here they are doing precisely what Churchill envisaged and providing a unified bulwark against fascistic stirrings in Europe.  
Right out of Toxic Tony's manual of how to spin a fuck up.May 2016: IMF says - Brexit would prompt stock market & house price crashJune 2016: IMF says - Brexit would trigger UK recessionDecember 2017: IMF says - We were right about Brexit damage pic.twitter.com/4VVDdVYxuZ 
No more talk of ‘bargaining chips’? The EU Committee has written to the Immigration Minister @BrandonLewis to confirm details of the Government’s offer on #Brexit #citizensrights:  
This is a great endorsement of post-Brexit Britain!  
We are less than 2 years into what is likely to be a decade long #Brexit transition mess, let alone the decades afterwards when we will carry on paying the price. The sooner we ditch this self-destructive lunacy the better. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
EU’s message to #Britain : you’re welcome to stay in #singlemarket & #CustomsUnion during  a #brexit transitional period, PROVIDED you play by the same rules as all of us...#BrexitReality 
FORBES: UK NUMBER ONE BEST COUNTRY IN WORLD FOR BUSINESSTop the list for the first time ever.          DESPITE  BREXIT!     #fo2eu 
When you can see the terrorism in Germany Italy France Greece UK, Poland has every right and a duty to keep its citizens safe if that means refusing migrants so be it! The EU is hell bent on ruining Europe #Polexit #Brexit 
Around 2 years after joining the EEC we had a referendum to ask people whether they agreed with the decision & whether we should continue. So why not a similar referendum now regarding #Brexit!What are Leavers frightened of!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
'If you walk away they’ll come to us!' James Dyson's brilliant argument FOR no deal Brexit  
Maurice Glasman interviewed about Brexit, Corbyn, and how working class culture + interests remain peripheral to the agenda of @UKLabour 
.@senatornoone logic that anyone not able to vote in 1983 deserves to have their say on Eighth Amendment means we should periodically re-run every referendum #8Committee 
“If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy”. So said... David Davis! This country CAN change its mind over Brexit. Why? How? What happens next? This short video will explain..  
Brexit could be delayed in 'exceptional circumstances', Theresa May admits  
Then you don't understand the magnitude of Cobyn's betrayal. Biggest Tory enabler is Corbyn.  He cannot afford his ambitious manifesto & Brexit. UK already has massive debts. No Corporations to tax post brexit - so huge tax increases for us. He has no intention of being elected  
Gloomy #Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
Poll: would you vote for @UKLabour and @jeremycorbyn if they promised a referendum on the outcome of the #Brexit negotiations which included an option to stay in the EU?Pls RT for larger sample 
As a Civil Servant - definitely doesn’t help that we’ve spent the last 7 years being demonised and demoralised - with staff and budget cuts to boot. Brexit will tie us up for years 
If a Brexit referendum was called next year would you vote. 
This paper is one of the few good things to emerge from the wreckage of the referendum, and will play a role in taking back control of a better future for Britain #BrexitBatshit  
EU Brexit co-ordinator @GuyVerhofstadt demands Theresa May attack patriotic Poland to prove Britain's loyalty to “European liberal democratic values”. What would you tell him? 
We’ve long since reached “exceptional circumstances” ... not for delaying Brexit, but for abandoning it altogether given the lies it’s built on, the hate it has stirred, and the negative consequences it has already had for the economy and society.  
Today, the experts fought back. My short take on Christine @Lagarde and the @IMFNews report on the UK Economy  #Brexit 
Corbyn looks jaded and running out of steam. Can't think on his feet and becomes raucous when frustrated. Devoting all six questions to NHS his default position. Worthy but no new revelations to hurt May. His weakness on Brexit serious handicap. Needs to sharpen up in 2018 #PMQs 
This week @jeremycorbyn @ChukaUmunna @angelasmithmp @wesstreeting asked again and again if our working conditions are safe with @theresa_may post #BREXIT. @JackDromeyMP sums it up - you can't trust the Tories with our rights at work >>>  #PMQs 
Christmas Brexit banter. #pmqs 
》We currently possess at least 750 global trade deals and treaties  through the EU.》It's impossible just to "copy and paste" them after Brexit, because the UK alone doesn't offer the same amount of products and consumers as the combined EU.#StopBrexit 
The American President has been a supporter of both Brexit and of this Polish government.  He withdrew from TPP and the Paris accords.  He may end NAFTA.  He’s joined Putin’s growing insurgency vs global order.  
Gloomy Brexit forecasts for UK are coming true, says IMF  
"The idea that somehow the British people were misinformed about Brexit is absolute nonsense" ~ IDS  
I want 2018 to be the year we break the back of this thing and start to see real recognition of and investment in #librarians and #infopros as central to the UK's future. Vital to keep up the pressure on domestic policy & Local Govt finance with Govt & media in the face of brexit 
Britain ranked 1st for 1st time in Forbes list of best country to do business. Forbes says of Brexit: 'economy has held up relatively well. Britain’s business climate remains attractive.  UK ranks first in Forbes’ 
Gibraltar will not be excluded from arrangements for the #Brexit transition period or withdrawal agreement, @theresa_may tells @J_Donaldson_MP #PMQs 
Good #Brexit news just keeps on coming! UK is now the best place in the world to do business.  
Chris Leslie not happy that Labour MPs will be ordered to abstain on his Customs Union amendment: “This isn’t a time to hide behind technicalities - it’s a time to stand up and be counted against the prospect of Brexit austerity if MPs don’t act now.” 
DUP raising Gibraltar in #pmqs - could be one of the big problems of next year in Brexit negs 
And here’s the Financial Times piece on the real cost of Brexit: 
That was a shocking, cruel, clueless and deluded performance by Theresa May.Utterly out of touch on the NHS, poverty and Brexit and completely in denial about the mess and misery she has helped create.A fitting end to a pathetic and incompetent year Government. #PMQs 
Michel Gove at EFRA select Ctte this morning confirmed we become  a Coastal State and take back control of UK waters on Brexit day, 9 month bridge for 2019 not two year transition is way to go, no link of trade for access to our waters. Growing consensus #seaofopportinity. 
1939: Tyrannical regime attacks Poland, after period of appeasement by Britain.2017: Tyrannical regime attacks Poland, after period of appeasement by Britain.Don't miss tomorrow's #Brexit news at  
.@SenLynnRuane says if the referendum is passed, some women will still travel who fall beyond 12 weeks @rtenews #8committee 
Govt response to petition for Brexit vote to include option to remain: “You lost, we’re leaving, get over it.” The truth is, there never was a mandate. Gov't is holding on to a lucky coup because if they let go, they not only lose power but their criminality might be outed. 
》We currently possess at least 750 treaties and trade deals with the rest of the world through the EU.》Even if we replace them at the impossible rate of one a week after Brexit, it will still take us more than 14 years to get back to where we are now  
In any business plan, to project future earnings without projecting future costs would be laughable. But that’s what Vote Leave did... projecting £350m/week would go into the bank with not a penny of cost. £0. Not even for the extra civil service needed to do Brexit. 
My cartoon Wednesday @TheTimes. Torys R Us (batteries not included; reduced to clear) #Tories #Brexit etc etc  
Christine Lagarde defends the IMF's gloomy predictions about the impact of Brexit  
Referendum here we come #repealthe8th is in our sights. Very sorry to be missing launch of excellent #8Committee report. Well done to all involved. Lets change history for women in 2018. 
Michel Barnier is 'Scrooge' to rule out bespoke Brexit deal, City bosses say  
If this is the kind of toxic masculinity and misogyny coming from Sean O'Rourke, and RTE, the start of 2018 in the run-up to the #repealthe8th referendum is going to be long and depressing. #TodaySOR 
Key point here is note the Roger Bootle quote. Amongst Eurosceptic economists, it was known that the net contribution was trivial relative to broader economic effects of Brexit... but Vote Leave went and presented it as a windfall awaiting. Knowingly misleading. 
Too late, Theresa - Brexit offer to EU citizens leaves many cold  
'Sleepwalking into a Food Crisis'; that sums up Brexit pretty well (in my & a few other people's opinion)  
Bring power back to Manchester, not Whitehall, says Greater Manchester Mayor Andy Burnham, who is demanding that powers returned to the UK after Brexit should be handed to the regions, because, he says, Westminster has failed the north of England.  
It's not the Brexit talks that have caused more #homelessnessinengland ; it's  all the fault of Tory ideology 
THREAD. As the @FT reports that Brexit is already costing us more than we could possibly recover in net contributions to the EU... can we remind you that we made exactly that prediction in Nov 2015 in our submission to the House of Lords:  
puffed up bureaucrat Michel Barnier slapped down by EU leaders for ruling out bespoke Brexit deal for Britain. He speaks for the Commission, which he wants to lead, not the 27 
A 300-year-old argument between Britain and Spain threatens to derail Theresa May's Brexit plans  pic.twitter.com/vepPc0Ezaz 
Ignore the doomsayers. There are plenty of opportunities for post-Brexit Britain, says Ross Clark:  
Tories and DUP accused of conspiring to hide mystery Brexit donor via @irish_news 
Something I've noticed - you say *anything* about Brexit (no matter how trivial) to an ardent Remainer they start barking ridiculous hypothetical questions at you and DEMANDING answers.Bossy little f*ckers aren't they? 
Brexit fan Andrew Neil feigning concern about the poor getting poorer but did not make any link to Brexit in his questioning. #BBCDP 
Yet we send 14billion foreign aidWhy not help/look after our own citizens #Brexit  
Just in case you've missed it, Barnier has called the Brexiteers bluff. The UK can't be ready for any type of Brexit by January 1st 2021. NI borderTariffsSystemsWTOImmigration controlAviation etc#stopbrexit 
#Africa #America #Biafra BIAFRAN REFERENDUM IS NOT A CALL FOR WAR AND CAN NEVER BE ALTERNATED WITH RESTRUCTURING  
#Biafra BIAFRAN REFERENDUM IS NOT A CALL FOR WAR AND CAN NEVER BE ALTERNATED WITH RESTRUCTURING: BIAFRAN REFERENDUM IS NOT A CALL FOR WAR AND CAN NEVER BE ALTERNATED WITH RESTRUCTURING By Kingsley John Chibuzor For Family Writers Press Dec, 2017 Igbo…  
If Brexit isn’t stopped, you won’t, because UK economy will shrink by 4-5%, requiring massive cuts across the board.  
A vote in Parliament today could give the public the final say on #Brexit, but only if @labour & @jeremycorbyn back it. RT if you agree. 
I think it was @Trevornoah who said that before Trump, nobody cared about the ins and outs of government administration. Now we've all had to wake up and become experts overnight, like when you find out your pilot is drunk.Same goes for Brexit. 
Heartbreaking stories of EU nationals who have been uprooted from their home, the United Kingdom, after decades here due to the uncertainty and hostility post #Brexit  
LOL I run my own business, I trade internationally, I employ people, I pay a hell of a lot of tax and I dare say I am much better equipped to comment on Brexit than you #Brexidiot 
Migration from the EU fell to 9,000 in last quarter, the lowest ever figure. Brexit is working 
Day 9 of the 12 #LifeStories of #Christmas@MattBirdSpeaker tells us for #PMQs his agents of #Transformation with his #ThoughtForTheDay on #homelessness #foodbanksTo gain #WednesdayWisdom On the 20th invest not in #Brexit but in this #book as a #gift 
.@vincecable has set out a timetable for a referendum on the deal that would allow people to choose whether to accept the deal or stay in the EU. Find out more:  #ExitFromBrexit 
Anneliese Midgley, political director Unite union says@ 'Labour must support membership of single market & customs union.' Labour's secret agenda: overturn Brexit 
Trident is not a necessity. Most countries do not have nuclear missiles and submarines. Food and shelter are necessities.Brexit is a terrible and extremely expensive error which will make most people poorer. 
UK to "respect all the rules of the custom union and the single market during transition period" - Michel Barnier, EU chief #Brexit negotiator  
So food prices are going up, living standards are going down, council tax is going up but essential council sevices are being cut & the NHS in the worse crisis in its history... Basically the Brexidiots have thrown themselves & us under the Brexit bus. 
Commission proposals for a negotiation mandate in the next phase of Brexit talks now online.  (The details are in the annex). Some thoughts 1/ 
Too late, Theresa: #Brexit offer to EU citizens leaves many cold.  
A "gambit" is "an act or remark that is calculated to gain an advantage, especially at the outset of a situation" - EU have so carried through everything they have said on Brexit.The "gambits" on Brexit so far are all on UK side, and most have failed. 
Remember Brexit is for life, not just for Christmas.. 
Since you're desperately trying to draw an equivalence here I'm presuming you have evidence of Soubry et al attempting to shut down Brexit by issuing death threats to pro Leave MPs?I'll wait.  
A C Grayling is absolutely right, we are being undemocratically steamrollered into a Brexit future, a future that was never determined reasonably, nor have there been rigorous analyses of the impact in at least 58 aspects. It appears to be verging on negligent one could suggest.  
WHEN IS BREXIT NOT BREXIT?      > When we agree to anything less than 100% control of immigration> When we agree to play by the EU rule book forever and a day> When a poor EU trade deal prevents us from maximizing trade opportunities outside the EU 12% 
#BREAKING EU says Brexit transition should end December 31, 2020 
We have sent a Recommendation to the Council (#Article50) to begin discussions on the next phase of the orderly withdrawal of the United Kingdom from the European Union:  #Brexit  
The Social Democrats call on the government to commit to the publication early next year of a referendum bill to give effect to the recommendations of the #8Committee  
EU sets end of UK Brexit transition period as no later than 31 December 2020  
Least surprising news of the week, govt minister adds his name to amendment that avoids defeat over date in Brexit bill  
Defra hasn’t finished its own assessment of effect on food prices under ‘no deal’ Brexit….but accepts Resolution Foundation forecast of 4.3% hike 
The European Union's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says the UK will retain the benefits and obligations of being in the EU during the transition period 
Yesterday the Government voted to restrict transparency and exclude from publication the DUP donation from the EU referendum - the largest donation in the history of Northern Ireland politics 
To make Brexit a success, we must break free from the over-taxed, over-regulated European model, writes @OwenPaterson 
It was a great night @EssexCanning et al.  A gathering of real #YoungTories to drive #ToryRenewal.  Clear to me that the sprit of the NewGeneration is key to making Brexit a moment of inspiring & unifying Renewal .  
The European Union says Brexit transition should end no later than 31 December 2020 
UK sees Brexit as simple and as an exercise in spin.EU27 sees Brexit as complex and as an exercise in process.Almost every problem comes down to this contradiction.EU27 keeps prevailing because their position is correct.And UK is left to spin each setback as a victory. 
.@MichelBarnier on our recommendation to begin discussions on the next phase of #Brexit negotiations with the United Kingdom 
The amount of people who voted Brexit phoning in to @mrjamesob on @LBC today using terms like, "I voted with my heart not my head" and "We we're promised".A referendum on the final deal is making more and more sense each day 
A really key point. The Lancaster House red lines largely defined the post-Brexit relationship yet apparently they were not formally discussed by cabinet and no detailed assessment was made of their impact. So who decided these red lines, when, and how?  
I mean, cheer up, Aberdeen folk - you might be breaking your legs on the pavements but at least your council opposes a second referendum. 
brexit will derail itself. It's an unworkable, unrealistic nonsense. We need to continue to speak out to dispel the myth brexit is the "will of the people", welcome those who regret voting brexit and be ready to pick up the mess when it does all fall flat. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Official immigration statistics show Brexit causing HUGE EU migrants fall  
Thanks to @tracey_crouch for convening colleagues from across the charity sector this morning to discuss post-budget and Brexit opportunities for civil society.  
Labour MPs who use Parliamentary tactics to delay or derail Brexit are opposing the decision of UK voters in the referendum & the terms of their own Manifesto in 2017. To defy 1 expression of the public will is foolish. To defy 2 may prove v damaging to them in a future election. 
#Brexit is also a clash of political cultures of Brussels and WestminsterThe EU is good at processes, and has the UK neatly trapped in A50, with London conceding most of the points in Phase IThe UK is good at pol spin, and will at the end claim victory for having left the EU  
She & her #Brexit cabal will use Smoke & Mirrors & every dirty procedural trick, reliant on ideologues & party hacks in both parties to get past 29/03/19. This #EUWithdrawalBill will be used to shut out Parl & any option for the Ppl to be allowed to change our minds = AUTOCRACY 
Last night, I was on @Channel4News to talk about British food & farming post-Brexit. We must have a plan that's good, not only for the environment, but for food and farming as well.  
Brexit-backing Sun and Mail seen as having the most negative impact on society  via @LondonEconomic 
Theresa May's government is going to capitulate to every EU27 demand and then claim each as victories for keeping Brexit on track. 
An annual ranking has declared the UK to be the best country for business next year, despite uncertainty over Brexit  
Cuts growth forecast. Blames Brexit  
EU may refuse to back Britain over the Falklands after Brexit, former UN ambassador warns. MPs warned Leave vote regarded as a shark woukd regard blood in the water 
That's "Scottish" Labour to the hiltChoosing the most Farage like Pro Brexit member to be their Brexit ministerRepresenting the will of Scotland? Don't be daft 
Facebook cracks down on ...Brexit!  
"Slowly but surely the threads are emerging. Russia not only interfered directly in the election of Donald Trump. But also in our referendum."  
Austria launches new migrant policy: Benefits cut, phones seized +money taken#MAGA #Brexit  
Brexit never was a done deal. Sloppy legislation for an advisory referendum which assumed only Remain could win, a campaign w lies on an industrial scale & a divided nation are not a mandate for Brexit. It was Gov't then MPs duty to act in UK's interest. DO YOUR JOB #StopBrexit 
Who was Walter Bagehot? And what would he say about the mess that we're in? My programme is now available on iPlayer, with plenty of Brexit, Trump and financial crisis,  
If all those who changed their minds, dropped their MP a letter or e-mail explaining that they no longer want Brexit, their voices would be on the record. We need a ground swell of brexit voters to speak up about their change of heart.Their voices are vital. 
In #Broxburn this morning visiting Stoddart’s beef processing plant, meeting EU nationals who work there and discussing food & drink exporting , which rely heavily on Single Market & Customs Union arrangements - crazy to put them at risk.  #Brexit 
And I thought Iain Duncan Smith's time was completely taken up telling businesses how they'll 'have to cope' with BrexitHow fortunate we must be in the UK, to have such a person as IDS as our expert on all things #Brexit I'm sure you're all re-assured  by this?#ExitFromBrexit 
Today my amendment to #EUWithdrawalBill to help protect Health and Social Care Services will be debated. Pleased to have support of 57 Health and Disability orgs and wide cross party support #Brexit  
America first....but only THE RICH!Great inspiration for Brexiteers striving to create a tax heaven which will make the rich even richer!#FBPE #Brexit #stopbrexit #Trump 
Britain should have a referendum on Brexit deal in December 2018. This would give people the choice to accept the deal or #ExitFromBrexit and stay in EU 
Brexit is not a done deal. It can be stopped, but only with the approval of the British public 
'Scrooge' Michel Barnier under fire from all sides after claiming to rule out 'bespoke' Brexit deal | Victory for Gove as EU prepares to back down on fishing quotas during transition | UK tops Forbes' Best Country for Business 2018 rankings  
Watch @CommonsEUexit take evidence on the agreement on phase 1 of #Brexit negotiations from @anandMenon1, Prof Michael Dougan & @OpenEurope's Stephen Booth from 9.15 here  
2017 began with May and Trump holding hands at the White House, and some 6,200 kilometres away, a nervous EU. The year ends with the UK boxed into a Brexit process over which it now has little control  - a roundup of a year in Brexit fun and drama 
Fortunately, after Brexit, liberated from the heavy hand of Brussels regulation, we will be free to call Uber a florist’s.   
Much respect to Chris for admitting his mistake - many believed Vote Leave & it takes courage to admit you've changed your mind on #Brexit  
If a thriving City matters to the UK (and not everyone thinks it does) it makes perfect sense for Bank of England and Treasury NOT to increase post-Brexit costs for EU banks based here - which is what they’ll announce later today. 
Dear @jeremycorbyn, Brexit is a decision that will affect us all. I believe the public deserve the final say on the deal. Please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill to give the public the final say. 
Hilarious I'm a remainer taxi driver (we do exist) and have been winding up Brexit taxi drivers about  the pending irony  of this judgement there response is a shuffling uneasy "yeah well" thanks for your support James 
Captain of the Titanic: “The ship is fine but inaccurate claims that the ship is sinking because it hit an iceberg is causing it to sink.”(See also: Brexit) 
If #Brexit is such a good thing then why is that we are trying very hard to replicate exactly what we already have with the EU?#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Can't understand this Tory line about Brexit being the choice of the people. When did Tories ever give a damn about what "the people" wanted? #Brexit is about appeasing the wealthy and the media moguls, and saving the Tory Party from internal destruction. 
Frozen out: Brexit set to lay waste to Edinburgh's financial services industry  #ScotRef #Referendum2018 
In Britain, also, populist parties have no seats in parliament and a negligible vote share. Brexit killed off populism, by responding to legitimate public concerns. Messy, yes. Unedifying for many MPs and parties. But still quite a feat.  
Great news, with an amusing side order of Brexit-supporting cabbies not knowing which way up they are this morning.  
I think there’s a lot in this analysis. But the danger lies in misdiagnosing Brexit as drawbridge-raising - it was a vote to lift our sights to more distant horizons, strengthen ties with further-away allies, to better manage globalisation. A point that HMG should make more often  
‘Dear Santa... I already have everything I could possibly wish for this year. But, if you could see your way to impeaching #Trump and maybe reversing #Brexit ...? Thank you xxx’ Quite. I’m with Peanuts.  
Up early for radio I/view about DUP #brexit dark money. Presenter had to abandon i/view when my line dropped 3 times. Have 4G in rural Ireland but not in Glasgow 
While the world is busy shopping Christmas gifts... #Kashmir is grieving again. It's beyond time to lift Kashmir issue to the surface, hold India accountable & demand a #Referendum!  
Lib Dems call for second EU referendum in December 2018  
It is most important that people grasp that Brexit is not the final destination, but only the first step in a far right wrecking plan. This week's attacks on the Working Time Directive point the way to a bonfire of regulation that will harm all but the richest. #FBPE 
."The UK regions that voted to leave the EU are more economically exposed to the effects of Brexit than anywhere else in Europe". 
Our article in the @guardian today. Homeless EU migrants have already borne the brunt of Brexit Britain  
EU27’s “.. confusion (over #Brexit) is akin to that of passengers wondering what to do about a disruptive drunk on a bus. They are unsure whether to laugh nervously at our antics, try to reason with and help us in some way or just give us a wide berth to ensure their own safety.”  
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 20: Brexit is already deterring foreign students from studying at our world class universities.  
Those students who gave Labour that major boost in the election? They wrongly believed Jeremy Corbyn was leading an anti-Brexit movement  #brexit 
.@SusannaReid100 right on #GMB that those who voted for Brexit expecting to gain the £6bn we give the EU won't be happy with the £70bn a year we lose in diminished tax revenues bc of the tanking economy which is directly due to brexit. 
EAST MIDLANDS: The president of East Midlands Chamber, which represents thousands of  businesses across Nottinghamshire, Derbyshire and Leicestershire, has said the region is well-placed to flourish post-Brexit.   
Fantastic from Plaid. Labour’s chaotic and contradictory approach to Brexit laid out. Thank god in Scotland they’ve at least got Neil Findlay on the case....  
This Gov. is more like a dictatorship regarding more than Brexit. They run roughshod over the people, lying or using statistics which are entirely confabulated to answer questions. Worst thing is, it seems we can do nothing about it until a General Election & It is maddening! 
This metaphor for Brexit I find a little too on the nose  
The DUP will not have to name the source of a £425,000 donation it spent campaigning for Brexit  
#English nationalism was a key driver of #Brexit but this nationalism was for long layered with other political identities -Britishness & empire. The first has been diluted & the second no longer available  
2018 will see pay, productivity and migration top the agenda as the UK looks ahead to #Brexit, finds our latest Labour Market predictions  
Why we need to set out an inspiring vision for how we will make Brexit a moment of modernising Renewal (cultural, economic and political) - NOT the final victory of a UKIP isolationism.  #ToryRenewal 
"Will #Brexit drive the French to drink?" UK consumers drink 44% of French champagne sales outside EU27. No trade deal = big problems for French. Full story:  
BUBBLY BREXIT! (But maybe not for French champagne producers)Full story:  @DExEUgov @LeaveMnsLeave @LeaveEUOfficial 
The UK's Brexit options are limited  
Tory MPs have blocked a move which would have revealed the source of £435 000 spent by the DUP to campaign for Brexit before the referendum. The decision was taken by a Tory dominated Commons committee via statutory instrument, which does not have to be debated in Parliament. 
Slow burn of UK post-Imperial decline v sharp shock of Russia's post-Soviet downgrade. Column on status anxiety, nationalism, Putin, Brexit.  
As recruitment fell further in 1917, Prime Minister William “Billy” Hughes called for a second conscription referendum to be held #onthisday in 1917. This campaign was as heated as the first. Take a look at some of propaganda from this time in history  
MSM stance seems to be that #Brexit can't be stopped unless there is a significant shift in public opinion. Yet polls now showing 55-45 in favour of #Remain. That's a 10 point lead, when will our politicians stop ignoring the facts? #StopBrexit #FBPE 
I wasn't expecting to read this: 'The reality is that Labour has a manifestly more City-friendly Brexit position than the Tory party'!  
A second EU referendum should be held for Christmas 2018, say Lib Dems  
“Gibraltar becomes latest sticking point in Brexit talks”. Err no, Remainers have always known it’s a massive sticking point. It’s one of the many reasons we voted to Remain. @MollyMEP 
Theresa May is rounding off 2017 at Westminster with a potentially gruelling interrogation on Brexit by some of the most senior and powerful MPs in the Commons  
In the squally rivers of 'The Tory dark money' scandal, It seems now to have went full circle back to Northern Ireland. The DUP will not have to name the source of a £425,000 donation it spent campaigning for Brexit  
In which MP @NadineDorries tells the world it's OK to threaten @Anna_Soubry with death because she "heckles" (that's literally her job in parliament). No prizes for guessing what Nadine wld have been doing in the 1930s. #Brexit normalization of fascist tendencies accelerating.  
Bank of England to allow EU banks to continue to operate in UK without setting up subsidiary: regulators fear loss of EU banking activity and threat to The City in a clear sign of our weakness in Brexit negotiations 
It’s happened. Walked into a coffee shop and ordered a ‘small Brexit to stay’. Time for a holiday.... 
I am puzzled why the British Govt is deaf to this. Brexit is ruinous. #stopbrexit 
By threatening to "take names" of countries opposing the US recognition of Jerusalem the General Assembly, @nikkihaley has declared Thursday's vote a referendum on the administration's global credibility. Good luck with that.My guess: 171 in favor, 7 against, 9 abstentions. 
A coup. By our government. Against its people. They don’t deserve to be in office. #Brexit #FBPE 
Lib Dems call for second EU referendum in December 2018  
The idea that Brexit is patriotic by splitting UK away from EU & weakening UK’s standing in the world is bizarre but it’s weirdly what Leavers want and Russia & all our other world rivals would absolutely love!  A weaker UK.  Yay, go, Team Brexit!  
The DUP campaigned FOR Brexit with the help of a large dodgy donation - the source of which they have been given permission to keep secret. Something smells bad - very bad! #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Well done Japan  simple solution to the 'refugee crisis'!#svpol #migpol #eupol #brexit  
Bit by bit all of us will come to realise that Brexit will be an unmitigated economic disaster for Scotland  
#Brexit could lead to big economic losses for the UK if it leaves the EU without a trade deal. New report:  via @RANDEurope 
Whose American dream was the #GOPTaxScam a referendum on @JohnCornyn? Feels like a nightmare for the 13 million who lose health insurance. 
Parts of UK that voted Brexit are most exposed to its effects, report says  
Before we voted on #Brexit we were clearly told "they need us more than we need them"But they don't, this study proves itSo of course a few can say "let's leave anyway" but this isn't what 52% voted for, and no amount of blustering can change that 
Lib Dems call for second EU referendum in December 2018  
"Criterion and on"THOSE #BREXIT CABINET MEETING MINUTESIf you like my comics, please support me by buying the book!  
British businesses stand to lose a huge deal from a hard Brexit.  
More despite Brexit news  
May can berate Putin. But #Brexit is his dream policy  
Only if you get sensible about Brexit, Jeremy, and vow to stop it.  
With empowerment of the UK's (or rather "little Englander") #brexit fansWe are now back to the days of"No Irish or blacks"It only targets different minorities . 
BoE to allow EU banks to operate in UK as normal post-Brexit: BBC  
A Series of Miscalculations: The Kurdish Referendum and its Fallout @ipinstGO 
The "will of the people" becomes as meaningless as "strong and stable" or "brexit means brexit" when the disastrous consequences of #brexit become increasingly apparent and polls repeatedly indicate a shift in opinion.There's only one rational conclusion - #StopBrexit 
Well said! You captured in a nutshell the hurt and rejection #Brexit has already caused to our friends and neighbours. Despite all the bullying there's no reason why this madness is inevitable and the #ExitFromBrexit voice must remain strong to stop it. #StopBrexit 
Still incredible that the EU & US allowed Russia to invade a European state, one that was making credible strides towards EU candidacy, and have looked the other way for three years as Moscow has continued a war of aggression. Loss of Western credibility predates Brexit & Trump. 
No, you're not an expert on Brexit.#Brexit  
None of us opposing Brexit are these things for standing up for what we believe in. But know this,  the man who came up with 'enemies of the people', now works for the government.#StopBrexit 
Encouraging. Labour’s policies would be deliverable with no #Brexit or softest of Brexits. Not with hard #Brexit or no deal, says Shadow Chancellor.  
The Perfect job for the #EnglishCricket Team! - #Ashes#Crexit #Brexit@theheraldsun@ECB_cricket #ashes17 @CricketAus 
All I want for Christmas is No Brexit & a Government of National Unity, to set about fixing this mess and repairing our relationship w EU.Not May, Not Corbyn, Not any of the 50 shades of Brexit, & neither austerity nor anti-austerity. Just common-sense responsible government. 
The UK is being stolen: 4 reasons we are still angry about Brexit  
During phase 1 of Brexit talks the EU focused on Northern Ireland. During phase 2 they will focus on Gibraltar. EU playing a very dangerous game. Patience running thin in the UK. Eventually enough will be enough. No deal is better than a bad deal.  
Parts of UK that voted Brexit are most exposed to its effects, report says  
We agree, why don’t you oppose #Brexit full stop  
For the past 42 years this country has been run solely for those who ticked the Yes box to “Do you think the UK should stay in the European Community (Common Market)?” in the 1975 referendum.  
Black boy boy was banned from Xmas school play due to his 'extreme' haircut' Any semblance of natural black hair has become 'politicised' in Brexit Britain. Black school aged children are in the front line.  
We start January 2, and we have 11 months to get 20 people. It is a referendum on getting rid of these horrible Republicans who tried to take down our country. With the House and Senate, trump is done. 
BREXIT Here is Edward Bear, coming downstairs..bump, bump, bump, on the back of his head, behind Christopher Robin. It is as far as he knows the only way of coming downstairs, but sometimes he feels... there is another way, if only he could stop bumping for a moment & think of it  
People I thought were good MPs are acting in a way I never thought I'd see. Ken Clarke is one of the few MPs who's stuck by his principles. If we cant get our representatives to stand and say Brexit is bad for the county then it's a lost cause 
There's an argument that #Brexit must be pushed through to avoid a loss of faith in democracy and civil disorder. The question we face is how to combat that argument. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Twitter is full of comments about appalling govt., Brexit disaster etc. So now we need to do something serious - unite the many Remain groups, get the unions on board to save jobs, get a parliamentary group, all under 1 umbrella.We need leadership and we need it now! #remain 
Bullshit alert: Chris Grayling MP tells @maitlis on #Newsnight that sterling (gbp) against the dollar (usd) is at the same level as at the time of referendum. June 22 2016: 1 gbp = 1.47 usd, presently 1 to 1.33. So no, Chris, not the same. pic.twitter.com/mMVq9k9sbR 
1. Always the 'Best Possible Deal' never a 'BETTER DEAL' as U can't promise that can U? All UK citizens will be worse off & lose rights if #Brexit goes ahead. We lose FOM & the right to take the Govt to the ECJ when rights are infringed. British rights only as safe as 1 Parlmnt  
Brexit: UK plans to soften impact on European banks  
Dear @jeremycorbynBrexit is a decision that will catastrophically affect us allThe public deserve the final say on the deal. Please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill to give the public the final say. This is crucial, please do the right thing #FBPE 
Government deliberately hiding £435k Brexit donation from public.Secret Brexit donation - to the DUP to keep it hidden but spent in the rest of the UK - “stinks”, says Owen Jones.Stop the secret influence. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Blaming @PeoplesMomentum for death threats on Tory Brexit rebels! He must have got that line from @theresa_may, which she brought back from Paul Dacre's 25th anniversary party. All the Tories in the pocket of the Daily Mail. 
EU publishes 'killer graphic' that claims Theresa May is leading the UK towards a 'hard Brexit'  
A paradox of #Brexit is that in its right-wing ultra-free market form it will pass power from the state to multinationals and the global super-rich and so will weaken and take control away from the nation-state that Brexiters claim to care so much about. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
#newsnight Chris Grayling defending the daily mail and express by blaming labour.Absolutely disgraceful.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Will Brexit ''make or break Conservatism''? @Freeman_George says this could be a ''catastrophic moment'' #newsnight 
So tomorrow the govt will press its gimmick Brexit 'exit day' amendment. And then support an amendment to amend its (then ten minutes old) amendment. And that's sound government? 
It's the least worst Brexit, that's the best that can be said of it. But for a country of 66m to be a ruletaker with no vote on those rules which we now influence very considerably is a curious 'improvement'. #ExitFromBrexit in order to #Remain is immeasurably superior 
Where is the useless voice of #Corbyn on #Brexit? All that rubbish that #Momentum came out with after the election. No voice, no teeth no opposition. Same old hard left all full of piss and wind. Get Corbyn out and get an electable @UKLabour. We must defeat Brexit. 
Liberals in Ireland are above the law. RTE/Pat Kenny rig the Presidential election. Frances Fitzgerald broke the law during the Children's referendum. Colm O'Gorman breaks the law regarding Soros money. A clear pattern emerging. 
So did Jess Phillips vote with the Tories today to help Theresa May cover up #DarkMoney donations to the DUP for the EU Referendum?Zat rite? 
Those 11 MPs who voted to stop the government from circumventing parliament on Brexit are amongst the most talented in the government, 3 Barristers - Anna is one, One solicitor and Doctor - Nadine Dories is one of the less intellectual members of the government, bit of an airhead 
Gibraltar becomes latest sticking point in Brexit talks  
People say I’m not being clear about Brexit, so let me say this: I am completely committed to Brexit. Utterly opposed to Brexit. (Delete as applicable) 
Andrew Marr, David Dimbleby, Andrew Neil, John Humphrys, Nick Robinson, Laura Kuenssberg - Tory sympathisers. First 4 are fronting BBC flagship news & current affairs & quite scandalously & openly pro-Brexit. Another agenda item for Brexit public inquiry, which *must* happen  
Now Willy Peeple has changed his mind about Brexit we've just got to get rid of the Brexit Taliban. We can stop this.  
There's a rumor going around Facebook that someone paid Boris Johnson a visit and left a Bollocks to brexit sticker in his lavatory. Stickers available from  btw in case the person responsible needs any more  
GSK, one of the few companies to publicly stick some numbers on their #Brexit costs, already spending nearly a tenth of its 2016 net income on EU exit planning  
Goodnight allRemember it’s panto time so watch the Tory brexit story It’s a laugh a minute  
.Whispers here, whispers there - but meaningless unless Labour opposes Brexit.  
MPs have shown that for the most part they are more concerned with their careers than the welfare of the nation. Electoral geography gives Leavers a disproportionate influence over MPs. That is why MPs cannot be trusted with the final decision on #Brexit.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
If Corbyn colludes in foisting #Brexit on the British people without a #FinalSay referendum he and the Labour party will be condemned for betraying those Labour is committed to protect. Labour will be ruined for a generation or more.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
If #Brexit is forced through without a #FinalSay referendum millions of people will regard it quite simply as a kind of coup. It will never be accepted and the politicians who orchestrated it will be regarded as criminals to be prosecuted and punished.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
If #amendment120 is not passed and #Brexit is forced through against the will of the majority then I forecast that within 10 years many MPs who helped pushed it through will find themselves behind prison bars. There will be no forgiveness and no forgetting. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Thank you @EFDgroup @UKIP & @Nigel_Farage for the lovely leaflet I received today. Over the moon to hear your news that Brexit is under threat. Merry Christmas  Hold a #2ndReferendum #StopBrexit 
No. The world is inter and intra-connected. To leave a major trading bloc , relatively speaking, a few  miles away...and the country doing this- is an island-is nuts, frankly,For whatever reason.#Brexit  
Excl: Michel Barnier angers EU leaders and Juncker for going beyond his brief to attack Theresa May’s Brexit hopes; 
‘It's the GREAT Brexit BETRAYAL!' BBC audience member blasts idea of HALF Brexit  
If Anna Soubry et al want to complain about being intimidated, they really should look in the mirror every time they heckle, intimidate and abuse in order to try and shut down #Brexit supporting MPs in Parliament. #Double standards 
Robert Peston: Labour prepared to back 2nd EU Referendum, but only if there is enough public demand for it.#exitfrombrexit 
UK more likely to suffer economic disaster than EU countries after Brexit  via @MetroUK 
Brexit raises many of the same issues for #Gibraltar as for Northern Ireland but complicated by its status as overseas territory. Another community neglected by irresponsible Brextremists 
3 Prime Ministers who will forever be remembered for one thing:Eden = SuezBlair = IraqCameron = Brexit 
Gibraltar becomes latest sticking point in Brexit talks  
Then stop Brexit and protect them.  
Try stopping Brexit, mate. That'd be a good first step.  
Owen Paterson: To make Brexit a success, we must break free from the over-taxed, over-regulated EU model   
Dear @UKLabour MPsAs the facts emerge, as living standards fall, as growth plummets and inflation spikes, people change their minds on Brexit.Give people a chance to vote on the facts of the Brexit deal, please back Amendment 120.  
Meanwhile in the universe where Miliband won, without Brexit, the biggest news story this week is that Ed used emojis in his official Christmas cards and people are outraged. 
Millions of workers could face even longer working weeks. No-one voted for Brexit to hand power over to bad bosses.  
Brexit will cause loss of influence on scale of 1970s, says ex-MI6 chief.Brexit is putting our security, economy and prosperity at risk, according to Sir John Sawers. It’s more important than ever to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
EU publishes 'killer graphic' that claims Theresa May is leading the UK towards a 'hard Brexit'  @BrexitBin @nawtydad @VladimirFarage @smburningham1 @dontbrexitfixit @dorsetnative @chrisfburgess @carolJhedges @DavidoOrr @theskibeagle @lbjfanbigups @GDE60 
So, council tax payers must fork out more because @theresa_may can't afford money for the police or social care, but can afford to squander billions on Brexit & Trident!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg on a transition deal.#MoggMentum#Brexit  
Poll: the worst comes to the worst, and the UK crashes out of the EU in a Hard Brexit. A new political party is formed from the rubble, a polar opposite to UKIP - a Rejoin the EU party. Would you join? #FBPE. Please RT for larger sample. 
We were sold the idea that Brexit was going to be easy. That it wouldn’t cost a penny. That the EU needed us more than we needed them.It was all a pack of lies. We need to pause Brexit, reconsider our options and have a informed public debate with facts not rhetoric.#Brexit  
I’d just like to say again in case I can make it any clearer: Brexit is not a policy. It is a Tory fantasy and a national nightmare. 
“No Significant Russian Activity” During Referendum  
Tomorrow's front page ...Frozen out: Brexit could lay waste to Edinburgh’s financial services industry after Barnier rules out free trade agreement  
My MP @robertabwMP hasn’t yet replied to my tweet, below, so I’ve just emailed her. Roberta, thanks for all the leaflets you push through my letterbox, a response to my request would be much appreciated, too. The more I learn, the more I worry about Brexit  
If #Brexit is your biggest worry today your a fucking twat. Homelessness, poverty is happening right now because of successive government policy over 30 years. pic.twitter.com/smKtKQl2o8 
Hard to overstate how embarrassing this is. EU means what it says. UK's so far caved on everything.Again: no bespoke trade deal = no bespoke trade deal. Full regulatory alignment = full regulatory alignment.Brexit is not a policy. It is a Tory fantasy and national nightmare.  
LibDems and Open Britain Fined For Referendum Spending Breaches  
Steve Bell on the PM’s new Brexit clothes. #Strong&Stable 
Had two breaks from the holiday so far, one for the Brexit deal and another for Star Wars. Star Wars was substantially more worthwhile. 
Something very ‘Alastair Campbell’ about the fact that the Lib Dems, BBC, Blair and the New European have ALL revisited their ‘2nd referendum’ talk at the SAME time for absolutely NO newsworthy reason.It didn’t work in Feb.  
*Brexit Explained*  
For those who don't use Facebook. RT: Robert @Peston"@johnmcdonnellMP has reviewed Labour’s manifesto to determine whether important policies would be made impossible by softest of Brexits or staying in EU. They wouldn’t."#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll  
Saw Andrew Pierce on Sky News this evening justifying the language of the Daily Mail about Anna Soubry et al and failing to distance its role in online violent threats. Brexit is corroding legitimate debate in a democracy with him as a cheer leader...Shocking. 
Steve Bell on Theresa May's Brexit cabinet meeting – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Use #FBPE to find and follow other pro-EU accounts. Togeather we can #stopbrexit  #brexit #Remain #Unitedkingdom #England #Scotland #Wales #Nothernireland #London please RT 
Govt wins vote to keep mystery donor of DUP Brexit cash secret. Why would they do that? Could this Govt be any more corrupt? 
Listening to Today in Parliament from Monday, depressing to hear May reiterate “the Brexit the country voted for.”No one knew what they were voting for and the referendum was utterly flawed. 
As the BBC would say in spite of Brexit...  
Is Trump cooling on giving May a US-UK trade deal? No10's readout: "They agreed on the importance of a swift post-Brexit bilateral trade deal".But the White House didn't mention it;  
A second referendum is a must, consistently polls show majority want to remain, if we leave on the 29th March 2019 they cannot be sure they have executed the will of the people, only that 37% of the electorate, 26% of the population, decided that on that day they wanted to leave  
Bercow lives on Mars, saying MPs are not traitors, mutineers, malcontents or enemies of the people. Brexit rebels are all of the above.  
Blindingly obvious. And right. < Brexit will cause loss of influence on scale of 1970s, says ex-MI6 chief  
Trump speaks to UK's Theresa May about Jerusalem decision, Brexit  
People are applying for EU passports because of Brexit.  
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
Met Mike Russell tonight - he welcomed me to my new role and we agreed to speak regularly about getting the best deal can for Scotland in relation to Brexit 
“Theresa May No Friends” #StopBrexit! #FBPE #Brexit: EU will refuse to back UK over Falkland Islands in future UN votes , suggests former ambassador  
Same old codswallop “people did not know what they were voting for in Referendum”. They voted to leave EU. 
We must live in parallel worlds. In the chamber I observe it's the Brexit supporting MPs who are by far the most vocal and abusive  
So 25 Ministers speak at the "full Cabinet discussion" on Brexit & the PM waffles something about going for a really ambitious trade deal. The Govt should just try slides like this, that just sort of tell the truth.  
  fans should also NEVER forget that the way they came back to LI proper was thanks to NY State and NOT local Republicans (Lighthouse Project) or Democrats (referendum) who left them high and dry. Don't ever forget their infighting, fat cattery, and tone-deafness. 
I voted Brexit. Got a B.Sc in psychology and pursuing a Ph.D in neuroscience. And using education as battering ram is downright arrogance at its worst. This, peeps, is why Brexit won. End of it.  
So that vote to conceal the DUP Brexit funding source makes this the most corrupt House of Commons of my lifetime. @JolyonMaugham @Petergeogehan what is your view? 
Ideas that are decades out of date, no plan for Brexit, racism, sexism, tax dodging which cheats the public of funds, a major Labour run council with the bailiffs at its door and I could easily go on. Yes Mr Corbyn it is only fit for the bin. Prime Minster, only in your dreams!  
Brexit will cause loss of influence on scale of 1970s, says ex-MI6 chief  
This really is the age of magical thinking. “I believe man made climate change doesn’t exist, so it doesn’t”, “I don’t like losing an election, so I haven’t”,  “I supported Brexit which will make the U.K. poor and isolated, so it won’t”. 
another good day of bollocksing Brexit...lots handed out in shops and stuck on bins etc in Exeter....#StopBrexit @EUflagmafia 
Hi! Cancer researcher here. Yes, "we're not doing research with you cos you're not in Europe" started pretty much straight after the referendum. UK scientists were excluded from big international projects seeking any EU funding. 
Pop goes another baseless narrative - 'muh Russian bots hacked Brexit.'  
Why do you think the Cabinet did not discuss immigration at today’s Brexit meeting? #FarageOnLBC 
My favorite #Brexit cartoon.  
Could it be because we voted Brexit on a false immigration premise created by you. Or because there's no way to close the borders without screwing up  the Good Friday Agreement? 
"Let us, as Remainers, remain angry... This is a just anger, and it will sustain us to victory over Brexit, whether in the short term or the long term."  
It seems @Arron_banks is worried about traitors supporting foreign powers Oh, look here's Arron, Andy and Nigel and chums with that orange faced guy in front of a gold lift. Amazing who you meet when you're waiting for a lift.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE /1 
Norway scenario is economically the least disruptive, preferred for business, but exposes the Brexit promises of “taking back control” as outright liesCanada scenario would at least give UK the illusion of sovereignty, but substantial economic cost 
Meet the official opposition#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit  
Excuse me, could you please explain Labour’s position on Brexit?  
An unusual and not insignificant decision: A key figure involved in the RHI scheme as it ran out of control in 2015 is being moved to head up the Northern Ireland Civil Service's Brexit planning.  
The UK is top of Forbes' Best Countries for Business survey for the first time... despite Brexit  
The post-Brexit problem for Brexiters is...  
This is the reality of Brexit. Why must we keep hammering this long nail into our collective forehead?   
Well done @BBCLondonNews covering the very real Brexit threat to financial services. Incredible that main national news ignored 
Another @BBCNews blackout on all the things going wrong re Brexit. 
After the Stanley Cups championships, tomorrow might be the most monumental day in franchise history. Think of the road to get here, the many failed attempts at finding their own home. The lighthouse, the referendum, Barclays even. 
This is corruption. At the heart of politics. It helped cripple the UK with Brexit. The Tories are destroying Britain quicker than the SNP.  
As @irony_meter just pointed out, the glory of this tweet is that it is basically Russia's first official admission that they tried to intervene, however marginally, in the referendum.  
Our exclusive research on the economic costs of Brexit to date - £350m per week in lost output - is on course to be the most read story of the year.....Thank you @ChrisGiles_ 
Love the hypocrisy of Brexiters saying leave voters knew exactly what they were voting for yet can't agree between themselves what Brexit actually means in practical terms.  
T May had the cheek to claim yesterday that her progress after 18 mths was good for Leave voters (really? - economy down, inflation & food prices up) &  indeed also for Remainers: we're supposed to be grateful that risk of a chaotic, cliff-edge Brexit is slightly lower. I'm not. 
May can berate Putin. But Brexit is his dream policy | Rafael Behr  
The Descending Staircase of British Decline: the graphic that Michel Barnier used recently to show how the Tories' red lines on Brexit lead inexorably to isolation from our European markets.  
#Labour will oppose #Tory #Brexit plans:  
Appeaser Theresa’s Cabinet Discusses Brexit for Almost Two Hours – Doesn’t Mention Immigration Once  
Brexit BOOST: 'Leaving EU is REAL GAIN for UK businesses' says trade expert  
#TheresaMay if you still expect a "Deep and special relationship" with #Europe after #Brexit,YOU ARE DELUDED.#Europeans feel REJECTED. If you want to maintain the good relationship we had with #Europe then you need to end this fantasy shitshow and #StopBrexit #FBPE pic.twitter.com/8CKeVIORgk 
Hello folks. I'm one of those people who only seldom venture beyond Twitter to campaign. I, and I'm sure others like me, would be very interested to hear of how campaigning is going on beyond tweet land. So news of the wider world is welcome.Please RT.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Britain from 2009-2017:The government takes taxpayers money away from public services pay back a debt to banks who have already been bailed out with taxpayers money. And to pay for Brexit, even more taxpayers money will be taken away from public services. 
This is the pollster’s biggest margin in favour of remaining since the June 2016 referendum backed Brexit.  
"If 16-year-olds could have voted in that referendum it may have been different... Do young people get a voice in this country? No. They are falling through the cracks in society."  
I am far too familiar with Brexit hate and abuse than I would like. But this tweet from an Associate Editor of @spectator publicly calling me "fanatical Remoaning academic" while saying he loves what Brexiters are doing to me on the back of screen-grabbed tweet is something else.  
Three days ago a FT subscriber loudly said they were cancelling their subscription in protest at my Brexit commentary. (Seriously.)But today they are still leaving critical comments on my posts.A practical example of having a cake and eating it. 
Not just Labour's opponents who find Richard Leonard's choice of Brexit Spokesman baffling, their former leader is scunnered too  
"If Labour is to return to power, it must capture another 64 seats in parliament. Preaching to middle-class liberals will not be enough, since almost all those 64 most winnable constituencies contain a high concentration of Brexit-supporting voters.'  
Support for EU 65% in Scotland. Scottish Labour appoint Brexiteer as Brexit spokesperson. The ability to shoot themselves repeatedly in the foot is quite something.  
More Brexit good news! British manufacturing at a 30 year high. The freedom and prosperity a full Brexit will bring cannot come too soon.  
Tomorrow is a big day in Parliament for the #EUWithdrawalBill. Please ask your MP to vote for #Amendment120 (The People to vote on the final deal), and to vote against putting the #Brexit leave date into law.Please RT#FBPE#StopBrexit 
Despite @naomi_long changing law to allow publication of political donations from Jan 14, Tories and DUP block openness until July 17. Misses EU referendum and RHI spike. #dirtydeal What have they got to hide? 
(Smell the stench ... if there was nothing rotten to hide then this was the opportunity to clear the air ...) The DUP will not have to name the source of a £425,000 donation it spent campaigning for Brexit - The Independent  
Only by diverging from EU rules and regulations from March 30th 2019 can the UK fully enjoy the economic benefits of Brexit, says @LeaveMnsLeave 
Kate Hoey is one of a very small number of principled Labour MPs who I respect. I'm proud to have shared a platform with her during the EU referendum campaign. Abusive tweets/emails/comments from Remainers are a daily reality; saddening that their vile behaviour gets a free pass.  
“Accused by the Conservative MP Nusrat Ghani of providing only ‘gloom and doom’ about Brexit, Sawers hit back, saying: ‘We have to acknowledge that Brexit is damaging our economy’”  
The need for unions fell away to some extent with the protections given to workers by the EU. As the brexit project is an attack on workers' rights, the need for unions reasserts itself. Join a union without delay. 
People need to wake up to the fact that it’s the Brexit hardliners red lines that are hamstringing Britain’s future, not the EU  
We have reached an important step on the road to delivering the smooth and orderly Brexit that people voted for in June last year.  
BREXIT GLOOM: Government's secret Brexit studies are like C-grade GCSE coursework says MP / #Brexit #StopBrexit 
[UNPAYWALLED] Theresa May can accept either a soft Brexit that will split the Conservative Party or a hard Brexit that could break up the United Kingdom.  
In what may be one of the greatest political ironies of the 21st century, new analysis claims that Brexit is costing the economy £350 million a week.  
Reading Arendt’s ‘The Origins of Totalitarianism’. The section on ‘The Temporary Alliance Between the Mob and the Elite’ has so many echoes in Brexit it’s uncanny. 
The word 'brexit' is going to enter the vocabulary as a new word for  total failure. In 100 years time people will say "You've made a right brexit  of that", whereas now we would say "a right balls-up of that". 
Immigration was one of the main reasons people voted Brexit. The fact Theresa May's cabinet 'didn't talk about it' in today's meeting shows they don't care about the people. May and her Remoaner chums can't be trusted with Britain's future. 
Owen Paterson: "Cardiff University economists predict that Brexit will lower consumer prices by around eight per cent — benefitting the poorest households most of all — and see an overall gain to GDP of seven per cent, or £135 billion each year."  
Very encouraging polling from @LeftFootFwd. Government must guarantee in clear and specific terms that it will guarantee all European Working Time regulations after Brexit.  
Brexit Boom: British Manufacturing at 30-Year High While German Business Confidence Falls  
Sadly, but sadly rather predictably, Labour are abandoning the majority of Scots who rejected #brexit and voted to remain with these appointments. #voteSNP 
‘You must be delighted, @Theresa_May,’ writes @Jon_Danzig in his open letter to the PM. ‘#Brexit is the wrong decision for Britain. You said so last year, and now the country is agreeing with you at last.’ Please share Jon’s blog widely. Link:  
Mrs May says she will not be derailed from delivering Brexit by Remainers. What is she going to do? Lock us up or turn the Army on us.#FBPE 
Britain's two biggest newspapers are also the ones considered to have the most negative influence on society  #Brexit #TheSun #DailyMail 
Open letter from Leave Means Leave to the Cabinet: Break with EU red tape to secure Brexit bonus  via @BrexitCentral @LeaveMnsLeave @JLongworthLML @TiceRichard 
Today, the government has tried to cover up for the DUP. But it won't stop me & @PeterKGeoghegan following their dark-money Brexit donations to find out where it really came from. But we'll need your help: chip in here#brexitdarkmoney 
“I want an exit from Brexit”Lib Dem petition to get support for Amendment 120 - to make sure there’s a vote on whether to #StopBrexit:   
*Staggering* cost of Brexit. GSK told @CommonsHealth they have spent £70 million on #Brexit that they could have invested in cancer research. 
Brexit dark money cover-up. Utterly disgraceful that our democracy can be so easily subverted, and that subversion is then rubber-stamped by the Government. Just confirms Tories are in thrall to the DUP.  
“No one voted to lose their holidays or lunch break. Theresa May promised to defend + extend workers’ rights after #Brexit. She must not cave in to plotting Tory Ministers" says GMB's @Tim_Roache as poll shows 74% want EU workers' rights enshrined in UK 
When she makes you want to behead the one you left your first wife, did a Brexit, and started a new religion for, that's how you know she's the one. #TudorLoveTip 
.@JasonFarrellSky confronts online trolls who sent abusive emails to Tory MP Anna Soubry and her fellow Brexit rebels  
 Liberal Democrats 'broke EU referendum finance rules'  
Around 3,000 companies have moved their headquarters out of Catalonia since October's unauthorized referendum on secession from Spain  
UK warns Brussels it can't ‘cherry pick’ in Brexit deal via @MailOnline 
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit.  #ExitFromBrexit 
62% of Conservative voters believe existing EU protections on workers’ rights - including the Working Time Directive - should be enshrined and protected in UK law after Brexit.  
It's a shame so many MPs choose to use their time trying to stop Brexit at all costs, instead of ensuring Britain benefits from the immense opportunities after March '19, particularly on trade 
Goodbye family time,hello 12 or 14 hour shifts 6 days a week,no holiday pay and no employee protections...just like the good old USA,that what tories want Britain to be,,by the time people realise what brexit is,tories will have made it too late to stop! 
Food policy experts have warned against a post-Brexit deal with the US which could see 'dirty' poultry, fish, vegetables and fruit imported to the UK. 
Moyes has always been one of the best managers around, a tough no nonsense Hard Brexit manager. Sadly he won't get a go at one of the "big clubs" because he's not a latte sipping Frenchman. The game's not what it used to be in my day!  
Elections watchdog fines the Remain campaign and the Liberal Democrats for failing to fully register spending on the EU referendum  via @MailOnline 
The argument that Government can always spend more by using QE and debt is interesting but the plain truth is, you can borrow or print all you like but if a Remain UK generates £50bn more than a Brexit UK you've got £50bn more to allocate as you see fit. 
.@theresa_may .@jeremycorbyn When will you take your Ostrich heads out of the Brexit sand?You are ruining The Country.  
Orwellian Speech by Tory Minister Chloe Smith defending Government’s decision to keep political donations in Northern Ireland between 2014 & 17 secret, hiding source of £435,000 Brexit DUP donation. 
BloggedThe Day the Unicorns CriedMy detailed analysis of the phase 1 Brexit deal -  
Brexit will cause loss of influence on scale of 1970s, says ex-MI6 chief  
The Liberal Democrats and an anti-Brexit group have both been fined for breaching campaign rules during the EU referendum  
BREAKING: Voters won’t tolerate workers’ rights being watered down after Brexit, shows poll  
AND WHAT ABOUT UK-EU NATIONALS LIVING HERE IN THE UK?THE EU ACTS AS A SAFETY NET AGAINST THE THREAT OF ADVERSE GOVERNMENTS HERE IN THE UK. WHY ARE YOU REMOVING OUR RIGHTS TO LIVE, WORK, RETIRE, LOVE IN 28 COUNTRIES ON A PAPER THIN ADVISORY REFERENDUM?! WE DON’T TRUST YOU.  
Remember this? 1 of the 3 Labour rebels who voted *FOR* triggering article 50 is now Shadow Secretary for Brexit. Another is now Scottish Labour leader...  
Russian tweets on Brexit were minimal, study shows. More than 100 Russia-linked Twitter accounts published posts about Brexit in the run-up to the UK referendum, according to research from @polbots and @oiioxford 
So when you are served “Nothingburger with Chips” on Russian “bots for #Brexit”, just check out @BrexitBetrayal and his equally Russian follower @Ukpatriotgain. Anybody in Britain can replicate what I just showed you. Try it for yourselves :) End thread. 
as I reported when I broke “bots for Brexit” in October 2016, fake patriots and Russian Brexit supporters can be spotted by their alien-to-UK messaging unity. “He” supports Trump, attacks Hillary using a) a fake news site, newswars dot com and b) Bannon Americanism “deep state”  
Thread for “academic studies” and @CommonsHomeAffs on “Russian Bots for #Brexit” and those misleading “academic studies” using a currently live example MPs and UK media may check themselves.  
Why have Scottish Labour appointed a Brexiteer as their Brexit spokesperson? Scotland voted to remain, and Tory plans to drag us out of the single market and customs union will destroy hundreds of thousands of jobs  
Peers 'to get extra £1m in expenses' as they fight Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Six Billion pounds seems like a reasonable amount to spend on a boat with a hole in it, says Government in charge of negotiating Brexit 
OUR Ordinary UK Peoples Money, Making the Rich, Richer. Time for Brexit. Lord & Lady Kinnock's £10m Euro gravy train  
So Scottish Labour have eventually settled on a position on Brexit, they are for it, for the chaos, for the environmental damage, for the ripping up of workers rights, for the ripping up of equality rights, for the ripping up of human rights. For the few not the many now we know. 
How many of the British MPs, I wonder, have received money, freebies, hospitality or offers of jobs in the future from the EU? Because the way so many of them undermine #Brexit can't be explained by anything else than corruption. 
.@ThomasBrake responds to today's Cabinet agreement on a "bespoke" Brexit deal  
So @JeremyCorbyn went to Russia as Putin’s stooge on the same trip that Mike Flynn and Jill Stein were on. UK tweeps, has this rather salient fact been covered in the UK press? #Brexit 
In their bubble, they think people have forgotten about migration. They are so, so wrong. They simply do not care about the number one issue for which people voted Brexit. When did you last hear anyone from the political class mention it?  
British politics :An incompetent Tory government unable to put the national interest before their internal politics.An uninterested Labour opposition banking on Brexit being an economic disaster so they can be swept to power. 
Not sure this far-right extremist is getting the #Brexit poll result he wanted. Very different from Autumn last year when the Leavers were winning most polls. We've come a long way on Twitter. It would be interesting to know how we're progressing elsewhere.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
My dad's gone to the local 'spoons to cover it in Bollocks to Brexit stickers. You can make time for these things when you're retired. 
.@ChukaUmunna – Government can’t deliver on ‘exact same benefits’ Brexit promise  
Theresa May rebukes EU's Barnier over 'bespoke' Brexit trade deal. UK tail trying to wag the EU dog again. May appears to still believe the UK is the empire of old and the EU will fold on its red lines. Wrong! 
Predictions for 2018: Brexit will mean an exponential increase in them twee fuckeurs who talk about drinking a cup of tea as though it constitutes a personality trait. 
Guess what: when you attack democracy, you piss people off.Some home truths to the eternally whining "Anti-Brexit Elitists" from the brilliant Brendan O'Neill  
Attempts to block Brexit are being bankrolled by City PR firms, lobbyists & inv bankers.Now Best for Britain is being led by a multi-millionaire former lobbyist, Economist journalist & friend of Bono who currently has 12 jobs.Remoaners just don’t get it. 
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit #ExitfromBrexit 
BETRAYAL: 25 Ministers spoke for almost 2 hours at today’s Cabinet Brexit meeting. No one mentioned immigration.  
This slide, used by #MichelBarnier in a presentation to #EU leaders, shows why a Canada style deal is the only option for #Brexit.No deal for services - 80% of the British economy!When will our government wake up to reality?  
Looks like Scottish Labour will now be a party of Brexit. Scotland voted 62% to remain and this Tory Brexit presents a clear threat to our living standards and devolution settlement.  
Asked whether Brexit would improve or worsen their prospects for career progression and pay increases, only 24 per cent felt there would be a negative effect   
》A few days ago the ECB warned UK banks relocating to the EU that their move must be real, and not just show.》Today Barnier warned the UK that its financial services sector won't be able to operate in the EU after Brexit.》Anyone who says this isn't a big deal in a fool. 
This “study” appears only to have examined the percentage of tweets to and from Sputnik or RT using hashtag #Brexit (!)It literally says “fake news was a bigger problem” as though Russian accounts did not spread that. @GCHQ; with respect, get a grip. 
Interesting fact.8 out of the 14 Labour Shadow Cabinet campaigned alongside Tory party members in the independence referendum. 
So now Brexit bullies are hounding the journalist @carolecadwalla . Bullies and bastards on the rampage. Defend this brave journalist- she is getting to them. 
People who close their eyes on the terrible damage the membership of the EU inflicted on Britain are either fools or traitors who are prepared to see their own country destroyed for the sake of militant liberal agendas imposed on it. The worst traitors are in parliament. #Brexit 
EU Commissioner: Mass Migration is the New Norm, We Will Never Stop ItBrexit looks better by the day. 
BREXIT:Liberal Democrats have been fined £18,000 for breaching campaign rules in the EU referendum last year. The party failed to provide invoices & receipts for payments worth more than £80,000.  
Brexiters explicitly linking agriculture to financial services deal. UK farmers to be thrown under the Brexit bus?  
Who exactly agreed to @theresa_may ‘s red lines. They weren’t on the referendum ballot paper - or even the manifesto of the election she didn’t win. #Democracy #wtf 
The UK's English Question is being made plain and pressing by Brexit  
There was "no significant Russian activity" ahead of Britain's 2016 vote for Brexit, concludes yet another academic study  
Richard Leonard appoints Neil Findlay as Labour Brexit spokesman. Both men broke the Labour whip and voted with the Tories to trigger Article 50.  
We are officially “Yorkshire’s #Brexit Resistance” according to this article in the Yorkshire Post! Join #Leeds for Europe & be a part of our dynamic & growing movement.  
Yes, we are leaving, but any decision made by democracy can also be undone by democracy. We say Brexit can ONLY be stopped if that's what Britain wants. You cannot be more democratic than that. Or are you saying you won't allow Britain to change its mind? 
How nice that the Cabinet are finally discussing Brexit. 
Well.Well.Blimey bazooks.Oh dear.Well.Er....Oh.Gosh.No idea, you?Gosh.Well.Well.Yes.Means Brexit.Oh.Bold ambitious, and bold.Well.Oh.Something will turn up.Help.Perhaps...?No idea, sorry.Well.Hmmmm.Not the foggiest.And loop.  
That's the dividend of stopping Brexit. It is also the human cost of not preventing it. Reference point here . Obv did this quickly. The deaths are probably a bit higher as we have an increasingly ageing population. #FBPE #NHS #Remain 
Brexit will cost us £50bn every year of lost tax so if a future Lab gov spent all that tax on improving the NHS it'd save 31,505 lives per year. Over a 30 year term - Back of fag packet Brexit costs nearly 1 million Britons their lives. #FBPE #NHS #Remain 
"Kurdistan is going to be better after the referendum"  
Theresa May demands 'creative' Brexit trade deal after 'unified' Cabinet meeting  
"The EU referendum of 2016 was not prompted by any downturn in relations between the UK and the EU or any threat posed by Europe to our prosperity, security or well-being."  
Osborne’s gruesome forecasts for the economy post Brexit-vote have not only failed to materialise – the vote seems to have achieved what he failed to do: it really is rebalancing the economy  
Wow, 25 ministers spoke at Cabinet about govt Brexit plan, discussion lasted an hour and forty five mins 
First full Cabinet discussion on how the Government sees Brexit turning out lasted an hour and 45 minutes and immigration wasn’t mentioned once, the Prime Minister’s spokesman says. 
BREAKING: Nigel Farage stretchered away after seeing the latest poll backing Remain #Brexit  
British factories report biggest boom in 30 years thanks to Brexit; not despite it (finds CBI & Times)  
The Tories are still trying to cover up past donations to the DUP over Brexit. Wonder why?(The donations were uncovered by @opendemocracy) > 
Yesterday Theresa had her first meeting to discuss what the cabinet wanted from Brexit. It lasted an hour. Now she's off finding out what the post office do like she's in a Greg fucking Wallace documentary.  
Northern England and Midlands most at danger of Brexit. Self-harming to have voted for it - Birmingham University study  
Clear words from the EU.》There is no place for UK financial services in the EU after Brexit.》No UK/EU trade deal will include financial services.》In leaving the single market, UK will lose its financial services passports.  
After a year and a half of desperately trying to undermine our huge referendum victory, it's actually @Open_Britain and the @LibDems who are getting fined for breaking finance rules. How embarrassing!  
Yesterday @jeremycorbyn @ChukaUmunna @angelasmithmp @wesstreeting asked again and again if our working conditions are safe with @theresa_may post #BREXIT. @JackDromeyMP sums it up - you can't trust the Tories with our rights at work >>>  
"It is still about left and right, but the crucial thing is in the wake of the election in June, it is no longer JUST about left and right" explains psephologist Prof John Curtice because "Brexit still mattered" #bbcdp 
Theresa May is today uniting her Cabinet around a cherry-picking model of #Brexit. Here is why that is a dangerous delusion, with zero prospects of success, that totally misunderstands how the EU works.  
I'm totally clueless about Brexit, I don't have a plan, I don't know what I want, I don't understand democracy and I've achieved nothing to date. Why can't I be the Prime Minister as I've all the necessary skills?#stopbrexit 
EU REFERENDUM ELECTORAL FRAUD(oh wait it's on the remain side so it won't trend on here) 
Latest Brexit timeline from Goldman  
Makes rather a nonsense of the Remainer argument that students’ votes in the EU referendum should count for more because they’re so intelligent and well-informed.  
'The Brexit hamster wheel of delusion' is the best description of 2017 I've read 
Tomorrow, Parliament vote on Amendment 120, which calls for the people to be given their say on the final Brexit deal.It will pass if @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn, plus the expected Tory rebels, vote for it.Contact your MP *TODAY* and ask them to vote for Amendment 120. #FBPE 
A second referendum on Britain’s membership of the European Union would be a “betrayal”, Theresa May warned MPs today  
Report Finds "No Significant Russian Activity" During Referendum:  
Independence is the only means of escape for Scotland.The Disastrous Brexit Plan You Knew Nothing About   
After Twitter publishes data showing the Russian online influence on Brexit was minimal and campaigners complain, independent researchers release a report... also showing that it was minimal   
To make Brexit a success, Britain must break free from the over-taxed, over-regulated European model  
Periodic reminder:Brexit Referendum called for us to leave.The “red lines” were not voted on.They are harmful.They reflect of fear-afflicted misreading of the electorate. 
It is basically an invitation by the Commission for the UK Government to have a think about just how crimson are its red lines, their implications, and the mandate for them from the referendum and the election 
Brexit: EU will refuse to back UK over Falkland Islands in future UN votes , suggests former ambassador“UK's loss of influence since the Leave vote viewed 'as a shark would regard blood in the water', MPs are told”  
The Brexit referendum has definitely passed its sell-by date. Insofar as its result ever was the "will" of the people, now it most decidedly is *not*. 
#Brexit nonsense: @JWexlerBM, esteemed colleague, #European prehistory expert, #UK-resident for over 10 yrs, married to British husband, emplyoed at British Museum, contributing to international research - asked to leave UK.Petition to #KeepJenniferinUK: 
Michel Barnier rules out a special deal for Britain's financial services sector after Brexit  
RTE finally admits to perverting the 2011 Presidential Election. Any bets that it won't do likewise to the 2018 Abortion Referendum? 
EU may refuse to back Britain over the Falklands after Brexit, former UN ambassador warns  
"Losing it over Brexit", a new report from @GreenJeanMEP, is out today! It finds that communities and projects in #London are set to lose more than £500m in EU funding *every year* #brexitshambles 
So, in effect, IDS is admitting that all those promises of great global trading opportunities were just more #LeaveLies. Why should we respect a result built on such dishonesty!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Consequences of #Brexit already being felt in Scotland yet we didn’t vote for it (& still wouldn’t according to latest polls).   
I don't recall the public getting a final say on the post-indyref devolution "deal". Other than when they elected a government that stood on a platform of a second referendum in the event of Brexit, of course. 
Theresa May refused EIGHT times yesterday to rule out axing vital workers rights after Brexit. The 48 hour week & paid holidays are under threat in a plot by Brexiteer Tories to scrap the EU’s Working Time Directive. Great to see we are 'taking back control'. 
[Office conversation]-My uncle's only making 72 pigs-in-blankets this year, instead of 90, like normal.-Why?-Well, it's the Brexit, isn't it. 
Report cited by @Peston says 12% of UK GDP at risk from Brexit. Economic benefits of EU were never explained in Britain; we were fed straight banana stories.  
Tomorrow there will be a very important vote on amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill. If it goes through, the public will have a vote on the final deal. This is not a reversal of #Brexit but recognition that public opinion has changed. 
Why the UK has the weakest hand in the Brexit negotiations -  brutal new study by the University of Birmingham.  
Interesting @ShippersUnbound on @BBCr4today alleges in yesterday's Brexit committee only Hammond & Rudd argued for regulatory convergence 
The truth is that #TheresaMay has been quietly satisfied with the vilification of anti-Brexit supporters and the #DailyMail doing her dirty work for her. I've said it many times before, she's NOT FIT TO BE PM and should be SACKED by her party! #MayOut 
Brexit is an overtly racist phenomenon, there’s no escaping that reality. Supporting, appeasing or ignoring Brexit translates into enabling this evil.  
Tomorrow, the UK government will try to sneak through a law which will bury the DUP's huge Brexit donation in another layer of secrecy.  
BREXIT: There is a level of delusion among Brexit voting Mail readers about Britain’s negotiating strength that is genuinely breathtaking.  
Liberal Democrats fined £18,000 for breaching campaign finance rules relating to EU referendum  
Rolls-Royce worries border checks after Britain leaves the European Union will disrupt its global supply chain and is looking at alternatives.RR Brexit contingency plans include moving out of the country to Germany where it has production facilities.  
Northern Ireland needs equal marriage and abortion rights – but no referendum | Richard Angell  
The fruits of another dodgy deal between the Government and the DUP this afternoon when Tories block transparency rules that would reveal the source of the ‘dark money’ behind Brexit.  
Sadly, while first additional arrow points to a hard border(realism), the second requires the govt to ‘reconsider’(wild optimism). And so we stay stuck in the Brexit hamster-wheel of delusion. 
British manufacturing at a 30 year high. Watch the BBC and Financial Times, in the unlikely event they report it, say: 'Despite Brexit.' 
MUST-WATCH: As the cabinet discuss today what they want the Brexit end deal to look like, don't let them forget the bar they set themselves - delivering the 'exact same benefits' as we enjoy now. Please RT so everybody knows:  
Brexit will be, in effect, an English Declaration of Independence from the UK. Are Jacob-Rees Mogg and his fellow Brexiteers really ready for that, wonders @peterarnottglas? 
Peers could rake in an extra £1million in tax-free expenses from sitting more days as they fight to water down Brexit  
Liberal Democrats fined £18,000 over EU referendum campaign breaches  
.                            People of Sotland You are  about to be dragged into a black hole created by Englands vote for the  #BritNat Tory #Brexit#Indyre2 and decide where you want to go! 
Watch any #Brexit debate that has taken place in Parliament -you can hear the same few rebels heckling and abusing away, non stop. So much so, Deputy Speaker Hoyle lost his temper in a way I have never before seen him pushed, with one. Their strategy has been heckle to intimidate 
The BBC is in a sorry state. We must hope that it begins to pay attention to very good arguments against Brexit next year.  
I'm sick of being told to respect the result of the 2014 referendum by people who pay no heed to the promises and commitments that they made to the people of Scotland to get a No vote, says @weegingerdug.via @ScotNational 
A little amendment to @MichelBarnier’s excellent diagram. To make it, well, more realistic!#Brexit (Thanks @JenniferMerode for the original tweet, and @KnoxTony for the idea!)  
Amazing, the same people who heckle, boo, abuse and intimidate #Brexit supporting MPs in the chamber, then rise another day to complain to the Speaker that people are trying to shut them down and suppress the debate. #couldn’tmakeitup 
Dominic Grieve’s intelligence, principle and understanding of Brexit should put him in the Cabinet. But those qualities also bar him from this Government. 
Liberal Democrats 'broke EU referendum finance rules'  
It's time to trade with the rest of the world #GlobalBritain #Brexit  
On what should be Labour's priority:Stopping Brexit: 17%Winning general election: 31%Winning general election and then putting war criminals on trial: 52%Via YouGov (19/12)  
The fantasy of a second referendum threatens our freedom to say 'no'.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg on Boris Johnson: "He has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need".   Who needs reality, when fake utopia is so much better? 
UK needs QUICK CLEAN BREAK from BrusselsOver 50 Tory MPs & MEPs attack EU plan for extra 2 year Transition to STOP Britain making its own laws & forces unlimited immigrationVoters expressed anger at May’s £39 Billion EU gift + extra 2yrs in #EU#Brexit 
Our @JasonFarrellSky rings up some of the people who publicly called for Brexit rebel Anna Soubry to be hanged... “I don't care what you think, I want them gone...” says one from Kent  
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back #Amendment120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit. #FinalSayForAll 
.@jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @Labour4EU @UKLabour @LauraSmithMP Pls do the right thing tomorrow & support Amendment 120 & give people a vote on Brexit reality, a vote on the final deal with option to Remain. The referendum was ADVISORY but Tories are abusing it as a power grab RT 
It's definitely a threat and now his email address is out there! #brexit has emboldened these paranoid cowards; astonishing that these views are still held. Keep up the good work @DavidLammy 
New post: The political consequences of Brexit Transition   
Recent comments made by Michel Barnier suggest “There won’t be any cherry picking” and that the UK may be limited to existing models.Which would you like to see the UK pursue?Please RT for a larger sample size.#Brexit 
These comments by @MichelBarnier echo what he said at @CER_EU conference in Brussels on Nov 20 - "Brexit means Brexit, everywhere...The legal consequence of Brexit is that UK financial service providers lose their EU passport." Read/Watch here:  
@acgrayling @BrexitBin @mikegalsworthy I just emailed my MP and thanked him for his support over the years but informed him, that at the next election, I will be voting for any candidate or party campaigning to reverse Brexit. “We can get it if we really want it”. 
What possible reason could anyone have NOW for supporting Brexit?I don't mean why they voted Leave. I mean, why keep supporting it NOW?Four possibilities:1. Sheer stubbornness2. Ignorance3. Tax evasion4. RacismAnd that really is all. 
The UK membership of this EU is built on 45 years of lies and deceit. We were lied to on the 1st referendum ‘Just a common market - no political integration’, we were denied referenda at Maastricht & Lisbon (cause we’d have overwhelmingly rejected it)#Brexit  
This.If you support #Brexit, you're supporting the agenda of a hostile foreign power who worked under cover to promote LeaveI don't think it was done for the benefit of the UK  
And just so we are clear, I think Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn is complicit in this travesty. He is the one standing on the sidline while the government trashes the country. The aftermath of Brexit will be too toxic to handle. He will not be up to the job.  
Before pundits from every side take advantage of the demonstrations in the KRG, I thought I would make one thing clear: This is not a result of short-term issues like the Referendum fiasco, this is part of a long-running political crisis in the region. 
This is a brilliant illustration of how screwed the British are in the #Brexit negotiations.Neatly highlights why UK red lines lead to a Canada style deal.  
#Brexit Let’s have a Brexit free day bored out my head with it every bloody day. Get out do your Xmas  shopping. Go down the pub. Or put gold on radio  brilliant music all day long.   
LibDems and Open Britain Fined For Referendum Spending Breaches:  
Oi Codswallop , Lib Dems fined for referendum cock ups. They should have independently audited the campaign like us ! @andywigmore 
This is what you’ve “achieved”:#Brexit chaos#Inequality rising#NHS being destroyed#Homelessness doubled#ClimateChange ignored#PublicServices decimated#Britain more divided than ever#UniversalCredit & #PIPs ruining lives#Dacre & #Murdoch dictating Govt policyWell done. 
They were laid to rest in the referendum but they’ve risen from the dead.  Now they are walking around threatening us all.  
Libdems and Open Britain fined this morning for bad accounting and filing in relation to the EU referendum. 
UK in 'weak' bargaining position because economic impact of Brexit on EU limited, say academics -  
As we warned from the start ... the Tories see Brexit as a golden opportunity to scrap our rights at work  
We have a powerful rightwing #kamikaze press and a cowed BBC.@Daily_Express ; @DailyMailUK , and @TheSun. The @Telegraph -once a great paper open to all views ( and now called "The Tragedy of Fleet Street") are the real #EnemiesOfThePeople.#Brexit  
latest from @oiioxford @polbots group:  “Russian Involvement and Junk News during #Brexit"@vidyaNarayana12 @bencekollanyi @monaelswah @pnhowardPunchline = not much RU content.  (Most of the junk news was homegrown.) 
EU Committee is concerned by lack of clarity about Government’s plans to maintain mechanisms for consumer protection post-#Brexit. Read the new report here:  
Russia-linked Twitter accounts 'tried to divide UK' after terrorist attacks And of course they were pushing the same message as the Daily Mail and Farage and friends. But no collusion, no shared interests or aims! No! No! No!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Britain's businesses are increasingly pessimistic about the country's outlook  
Ask yourself: Have you learned any new information since the referendum?If you have different information now, isn't it our patriotic duty to re-assess our position?#Amendment120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill 
If you're against Amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill then clearly you think a referendum on the final deal might stop Brexit.In that case, YOU are against the Will of the People. 
Excellent discussion @McrJMCE  last night, organised by @The3Million and INCA about citizens’ rights, EU/UK negotiations, Settled Status, #brexit. Nobody should be complacent, including us Brits! These are our right too that are being eroded! Should not be a race to the bottom!  
She also needs to stop accusing those MPs who don’t agree with her hardline #Brexit plans of ‘betraying’ voters  
They should but won't since requires decision on #Brexit. God forbid that #LabourParty leadership should commit on biggest issue of time. 
J-Corbz in Grazia on #Brexit referendum: 'largest participation of people in an electoral process ever in Britain'. Turnout was 72.2%. Turnout was above that in all 1945-1992 GEs bar 1970. But hey. 
NEWS! Cabinet civil war over whose Brexit plan will be laughed at by Brussels  
8/ Remarkably some Brexiters feel that stopping Brexit would betray the trust of the public even though those same Brexiters lied to the public in the first place @SuellaFernandes  
This is the email that will make the Lords battle a Hard Brexit.  
And I quote @BBCr4today, "The Cabinet sit down today to discuss for the first time what they want from #Brexit." 
The #Brexit referendum was advisory. Here's Europe Minister David Lidington emphasizing the advisory status of the referendum to fend off an SNP amendment to the referendum bill (paragraph 3 in the graphic)#StopBrexit #FBPE #LeaveLies 
Brexit must refresh parts of the UK like Stoke which the EU has failed to reach, writes Tory MP Jack Brereton for @BrexitCentral 
The tweets from @StefaanDeRynck, advisor to @MichelBarnier, are essential reading for understanding the EU27 position on Brexit.  
Soubry is a Brexit traitor & mutineer, despite her protestations. No national paper has called for her to be harmed or threatened, though many of us wish she would switch her brain into gear before opening her mouth  
HMS Brexit  
In today’s Brexit Metaphor: something that costs billions of pounds proves not to be seaworthy.  
Glad to see that our research on regional brexit exposure is being disseminated #Brexit @CityREDI #regions #europe 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 19: as new facts come to light, people should be able to keep an open mind on Brexit.  
“What I don’t accept is that they are entitled to break the law…”Antoinette @Sandbach MP spoke to us after it emerged she and other MPs received dozens of abusive messages after a recent Brexit vote in parliament.  
Very good Brexit so far summary. Also very depressing. Merry Christmas!  
Yesterday, led by @jeremycorbyn #Labour asked again and again if your working conditions are safe with @theresa_may post #BREXIT I think @JackDromeyMP sums up the frustration at the lack of an answer from the Prime Minister. @ChukaUmunna @angelasmithmp @wesstreeting 
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit. I was one of many who voted for you in GE17 in the hope that you would attempt to stop the destruction which #Brexit 
When some bitter Remainer die-hard starts bangin' on about having a second referendum. pic.twitter.com/X1q8IZyMyH 
Theresa May says a 2nd referendum would be a "betrayal". There have been death threats to MPs, & now May uses this highly emotive language about a suggested democratic vote.She is whipping up the climate of violence! @Anna_Soubry @NickyMorgan01 @ChukaUmunna#StopBrexit #Brexit 
A new study finds little evidence of Russian interference in the Brexit referendum  
Meeting Chatham House and Facebook today to help establish the extent of Russian interference in UK politics and the EU referendum for the Parliamentary debate I have secured  on Thursday. 
Support for Brexit is falling away. Is Theresa May pushing ahead with Brexit bc the UK still wants Brexit or bc the Brextremists in her party want it & that's how she can stay in No 10. 
Those parts of the UK that voted most strongly for Leave would be hurt disproportionately more by a hard Brexit with no trade deal, says University of Birmingham, City-Redi research institute  
The climate of violence is coming from Theresa May downwards. If you repeatedly yell "Will of the People" you inevitably demonise opponents as treacherous anti-democratic enemies of the people.@Anna_Soubry @NickyMorgan01 @ChukaUmunna#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
May triggered A50 before having a plan and only met Cabinet yesterday to formulate one.They might agree what Brexit means next year.They can’t/won’t reveal the possible impacts of Brexit.She bribed the DUP to support her.And a 2nd Ref would be a betrayal would it?? 
In the debtors court: my column today on why the miserable train of sad bankrupts is everyone's problem, as unsecured debt rises due to government austerity and Brexit screwing down the economy.  
Alternatively correct title: Barnier draws logical conclusion from #EUCO April guidelines & UK positions on #Brexit  
I still find it extraordinary and a disgrace that only this week - 18 months after the EU referendum! - that the Cabinet had its first full formal discussion on our future relationship with the EU. 
Oxford researchers compile analysis that Twitter refused to provide. Study shows: Russian tweets on Brexit were minimal.  via @FT 
On a daily basis the BBC tries to talk down the impact of Brexit and deny the possibility of a second referendum. You can’t and a second referendum will occur if Brexit does not kill itself first.#FBPE 
Following #Brexit, it will be essential for the government to make good a significant loss in EU funding for research and development, and that the UK continues to benefit from the collaboration of researchers and scientists across the EU. Our analysis:  
Why, as a labour supporter & member, do I have such a problem with Corbyn? Brexit is a shit show, we’re only neck & neck in the polls &. There are great people like @DavidLammy ready to lead the party. 
.A warning for Unionism from a Unionist....."We can only hope Brexit implodes under the weight of its own contradictions. Otherwise, it might lead to Irish unity." 
Dear @jeremycorbyn Brexit is a decision that will affect us all. I believe the public deserve the final say on the deal. Please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill to give the public the final say 
."If Mrs. May and her blustering crew represent the best of British diplomacy, then post-Brexit Britain will be a sorry state." 
Open letter from Leave Means Leave to the Cabinet: Break with EU red tape to secure Brexit bonus  
It was always what #Brexit was about - why the billionaire tax avoiders were so keen on it  
Humphries asks “will Ireland come to the aid of its old friend Britain”.  No.  But Dublin just might come to the aid of those financial services firms that need a new home post Brexit.  #r4today #exitbrexit 
Corbyn has no chance unless he clarifies Lab's Brexit position. He wants Brexit and Lab happy just to oppose everything the Govt says or does.  That's opposing not being an Opposition.   Peak Corbyn was June 2017. 
Fox: “businesspeople are lazy”IDS: “businesses will have to learn to get by after Brexit” Combined business experience: zero. (Unless you count knowing Adam Werritty) 
FT research shows that the weekly hit to the British economy from Brexit could be the same £350m that Leave campaigners promised to claw back  
Home Secretary @AmberRuddHR writes to EU citizens in the UK about the agreement reached with the EU on their rights:  #Brexit #citizensrights 
Goldman Sachs boss speaks out on Brexit after poll showing majority of Britons now back Remain  
“first phase of the Brexit negotiations saw Britain slowly and painfully coming to understand that the EU was serious... The second phase of talks look set to involve a similar awakening to the grim reality of negotiating with the EU – and of Brexit” 
While multinational #Corporations play off one country against another in their search for sweetheart deals, the EU stands up against them. No wonder the neo-liberal right want #Brexit ! 
Must read @RSylvesterTimes on Govt Brexit approach: As one senior Tory says: “It’s like setting off on a ship without knowing where you’re going. Only now we’re out at sea and in full sail has the captain taken out the charts to determine the course”  
Hey, Corbyn, it turns out that the Brexit you have voted for with the Tories will wreck workers rights. But at least you're respecting the will of the people.  
A 'Brexit War Cabinet'? Who came up with that? We're not fighting bloody WW2. When will May stop this pathetic hardline posturing?  
UK: #Brexit I would disagree. The worst hit regions in EU have 20% unemployment TODAY. The worst hit region in the UK is the North East and unemployment is at 6%  
This is important battle now: to ensure post Brexit Britain is truly free of the overregulated overtaxed EU model:  
I simply don’t believe the “Our Brexit is better than your Brexit” claim. Britain can only have a relationship with EU (e.g. Norway model) if we fully accept “Freedon of Movement”. Otherwise all Brexits are the same and it’s disingenuous to claim otherwise.  
Seems the Referendum ballot was very specific about #BrexitDeal terms. (May have been written in invisible ink.)Tory #Brexit trolls emerging from under their dank, dark bridges   
David Davis to warn EU it cannot cherrypick in Brexit trade deal talksHmm, not sure DD knows how this works  
Hard hitting interview of Catalan Health Minister @toni_comin Remember: ”In the Catalan parliament, there has been a majority of seats and votes in favour of the referendum since 2012.”  
Tory MP Anna Soubry Accuses Daily Mail And Daily Telegraph Of 'Inciting' Violent Threats Against Brexit RebelsGood that some Tories are noticing but a shame it’s taken threats hatred toward themselves for them to start paying attention  
2nd Referendum.  
From @OwenPaterson: To make Brexit a success, we must break free from the over-taxed, over-regulated European model  
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit.  #ExitFromBrexit 
_Impact of Brexit on UK and European regions: new evidence from supply chain links @voxeu • 
Dear Jeremy Corbyn, Brexit is a decision that will affect us all. I believe the public deserve the final say on the deal. Please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill to give the public the final say @jeremycorbyn 
Dear @JeremyCorbyn, please ask your MPs to back amendment 120 to the EU Withdrawal Bill tomorrow and give the British people the final say on Brexit. I voted for you with this expectation 
Regulatory alignment is completely incompatible with Brexit says @LeaveMnsLeave in an open letter to cabinet 
Nothing more reassuring than waking up to find a letter from @AmberRuddHR on your inbox stating that my #citizenrights would remain BROADLY the same after #Brexit!   
HMS Brexit?  
This does seem to be an absurd symbol of faulty national aspiration-HMS Brexit. #FBPE  HMS Queen Elizabeth: Leak found on new aircraft carrier 
What’s infuriating is UK Parliament did not require that EU be consulted on available deals (for city, auto industry etc) BEFORE voting, in 2015, to hold an In/Out referendum. Such a lack of due diligence was a dereliction of duty of monumental proportions  
#Brexit fans either don't care about The City of London or arrogantly just think that we'll get a deal for the financial services sector. Why would that happen? Paris, Frankfurt etc. would jump at the chance of those jobs coming to them. They won't relocate to Barnsley. 
Excited to hear that our Brexit research has been featured on ITV Central News this morning   
Brexit is Britain being remoulded in the image of Farage, Duncan Smith & other extreme right wingers. Is that what the majority want? 
B O O M!@MichelBarnier: As a result of choice the UK govt has made for the UK,  "there is not a single agreement that is open to financial services. It doesn't exist"Well done Brexit loonies.#StopBrexit#r4today @LBC @skynews 
Yes I reckon he's worse than Trump.  He not only owns Fox he ensured Brexit went through in UK. So many apologies for him. Hopefully he'll die soon but his mother lived to over 100!! 
The Brexit has caused a downward economic impact of £350m per week in the British economic output - already now.Sad, but oh, the irony.  
Partially Inspired by Anthem Protests, Proposed Tennessee Law Would Require Referendum Before Using Tax Dollars for Sports Stadiums  
Astonishing achievement that he managed to say all that with a straight face. They have form of course, it's in their dna.... 
Lords EU Justice cttee: Consumers protected across the EU by 90 European Directives ensuring high standards and compensation. How will UK and EU work together to protect them after Brexit? Report here later  
More facile posing  @Keir_Starmer. Maybe you could show what @uklabour "true colours" are when it comes to #Brexit. You are as chameleon-like as the Tories: no idea of the impact, no clear direction, just playing it for party gain while UK falls apart. No principle  
If any of you have seen Brexit regret tweets, please tag me in them. I am documenting the changing of the tide. See my pinned tweet.#brexitregret#FBPE 
#Brexit will boost trade ties with India says #UK official; @CimGOI @sureshpprabhu will be in London for bilateral talks with @UKTradeMinister, in Jan 2018  @vinitgoenka #IT4Commerce 
.@CarolineLucas @UKLabour @LibDems @theSNP @Plaid_Cymru Please act to ensure that donations made in NI between Jan 14 and July 17, including #Brexit #DarkMoney donated to the DUP and spent in GB, is exposed to public scrutiny. @allianceparty 
Brexit is not in all our genes. Cooperation is the norm - it's what separates us from the apes. Selfishness is the mutation. 
#TheSun spinning that British government scrapping our worker's rights after Brexit will mean more money in your pocket when actually it means mandatory overtime, less holiday and less time with your family.This is the true aim of Brexit- make Britain a low wage sweatshop.  
Dear Emily, It's the billionaires and powerful politicians that are backing Brexit. They are doing so in order to avoid the new EU tax laws which come in Jan 2019. Why else are tax dodgers like Farage, Banks, Rothermere backing Brexit ? 
Brexit is about the rich Rees-Moggs of Britain, not anyone else | The New European…  
As @KeiserReport told you *before* the referendum, before  censors.    
“newspapers...entirely disinhibited in the inaccuracies they peddle& the vitriolic abuse they are prepared to heap on those who do anything they consider to be at variance with their version of what Brexit should be”-Dominic Grieve#StopFundingHate 
True story: Walker's prop tax gimmick took $36 off my tax bill!But I now pay $60/yr in "wheel taxes" my county imposed after state cut local funding. I pay $500/yr for the referendum our underfunded school needed. And I had to buy new tires after 30k miles bc WI roads are shit. 
I voted Brexit and I've got a Business Degree, my niece voted Brexit and she's got a Criminology Degree.  PS we are also both from "up North where they think we are all thick"  
Dear millenials, the lady is talking nonsense. Do some research and you will find Brexit was bankrolled by billionaires and millionaires, some of whom you can find listed in the Panama & Paradise Papers.Dig further and you will find many of those 'powerful politicians' too. 
Brexit means working longer for less pay with fewer rights. They call it taking back control.  
If fighting brexit were anti democracy the police would lock Remainers up. But In a democracy, we can fight brexit, protected by British law 
Yes they're in those incredibly detailed 58 Brexit reports that filled 2 lever arch files & MPs could only see if they went in blindfold after being strip searched & having their mobiles taken off them. #FBPE 
After mugging the world for centuries,  finally got around to mugging itself. #Brexit  
Here’s the Daily Mail’s @toryboypierce, dismissing suggestions that the Mail is in any way responsible for the hatred that’s been whipped up since the Brexit vote. No, honestly, he’s not joking.  
Anybody know how to set up one of these petitions? Let's get 100k to have him as new Brexit secretary ! Better still PM  
This is actually worse than Brexit. Though goes some way to explaining it.  
Doesn't matter why they didn't vote, because referendum is now past its sell-by date. Events have overtaken it and what matters is that now there's no longer even the weakest of excuses for pretending it's the will of the people. So, as of now, just whose "will" is Brexit?  
Taking into account UK government's Brexit red lines, what is the best model of UK future trade relations with the EU compared to other third countries? Here is a handy graph that the EU27 received during Friday's EUCO (via @TomaszBielecki). 
Brexit could cost Germany BILLIONS as budget chiefs scramble to fill financial black hole  
The great majority of non-voters in 2016 now oppose #Brexit. Some will say we should ignore them because they didn't vote. But what is wrong, for example, with not voting because you are not sure which is the best option, or you feel insufficiently informed?#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Hollow nonsense from DUP against @simoncoveney. Recall DUP indignant at @EndaKennyTD reasoned observations on referendum, denounced #allislandcivicdialogue & raged against him ensuring 'unity by consent via GFA = EU rejoin'' ringfenced into EU27 stance on future UK relations. 
Listening to @BBC #Brexit programme  Laura Kuensberg thinks ARticle50 is legally binding. That's not true! We've just lodged our Notice of Intention to Leave but can withdraw that notification any time before Mr 2019 and retain same rights as now, no Euro, keep the rebate 
UK cannot have a special deal for the City, says EU Brexit negotiator.So much for having our cake and eating it. Financial services are 10% of our economy. Brexit is putting jobs and public services at risk.#StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
breaking news! millions below poverty line in UK, major costs cut for help for the disabled, BrExIT... hundreds of 1000’s homeless, we bomb innocent people in countries uncountable, Tresemmé doesn’t know what day it is... BUT NO OUR CHAR is going to Willcocks Nursery in the LDN x  
EU states told to increase contributions to cover £10.5 billion Brexit black hole  
.@thomasbrake: "This shows that a Brexit Deal is going to be far, far harder than the Conservatives think. Membership of the single market and customs union are vital to our economy and we are now starting to see the real potential costs to ripping up our trade deal with Europe."  
You can bet that the Senate Intelligence committee and/or Mueller will ask questions about the "Nationbuilder" software that was used by Jill Stein, Trump, and the Brexit campaign...  
Can we borrow Ambassador Haley for our Brexit negotiations? Seems @theresa_may  will allow any  EU country to tell us where we can put ours... 
Brexit was supposed to save us £350m a week. Instead, it is already costing us £340m a week. Let’s #StopBrexit and fund our NHS instead. #FBPE. 
Makes no sense to me. Brexit was driven *by* the elite – it’s not any kind of revolt against them. And the young will be hardest hit as opportunities generations before them had disappear. 
The Guardian front page, Tuesday 19.12.17 | Barnier tells May: you won’t get a special Brexit deal for the City  
Second Brexit vote would be a betrayal, says May 
As a Scottish and British voter I'm clear. I would like the Scottish Government to get on with improving Scotland's public services and infrastructure, while the UK government deals with issues like Brexit. 
Started reading Tony Connelly’s book “Brexit and Ireland”. Absolutely fascinating ‘behind the scenes’ insight. Irish Gov started prep for a brexit scenario as far back as 2013. To put into perspective, UK gov only started post-brexit trade discussion *today*.  
What have we learnt in 2017? During Britain's time of need, reactionary left will side with EU to spite 'evil Tories'. Bad economic news= brilliant!EU says something= gospel! May says 100bn too much= pay! May agrees 35bn= Brexit disaster!EU demand= great!UK demand= naive! 
QUESTION:Are you actively choosing to boycott EU produce since the #Brexit campaign began?#BoycottEU#Brexit Plz RT & comment with examples 
Barnier: no special deal for financial services, no trade deals til after transition, no unilateral halt to brexit 
Point three widely predicted and predictable. Brexit causes NHS personnel crisis. This one will get worse.  
The EU are NOT our friends, as much as May tries to make out they are. Walk away!Theresa May faces Cabinet row over Brexit as EU warns there is 'no way' UK can have a bespoke trade deal  via @telegraphnews 
Is anybody out there actually reading the growing pile of research on why people voted for Brexit - seriously? Because for the past 18 months almost everyone seems to think it was about economic self-interest. 
Britons turn against Brexit as UK now BACKS Remain over Leave by 10 points in SHOCK poll.Now even the Express can see that people want to Remain in the EU and #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
RT OH LOOK what is brushed aside by #Skypapers #Newsnight @lbc #Bbcdp @Bbc5live #r4today @Skynews @Bbcnews #Bbcpapers More than half of Britons now want to stay in EU, poll finds, in biggest gap since referendum' | via @telegraph 
#FBPE Thinking about opposition to the rats nest that is Brexit, we have all the arguments, increasingly good numbers and insuperable logic. What we don't have is leadership. 
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: Barnier tells May: you won't get a special Brexit deal for the City #skypapers 
Taking a stand for that community, not against it, is the revolt of our time. It’s a revolt not to undermine a referendum (won only with hate and lies), but for the very fabric of this country. 20/20 
So, in the end, I say to you all: Brexit isn’t exciting. It isn’t imaginative and it certainly isn’t full of possibilities. 17/  
There is nothing democratic about Brexit whatsoever. It’s built on the foundations of lies and hate, and has unleashed horrific forces, see for instance 15/  
IF this is even vaguely true it makes it even more important that we deliver a Brexit that works for people who wouldn’t vote for it a second time.    
Great stuff from Mr Speaker. But I wish he were right that MPs invariably act in the interests of the country. Brexit is the opposite of that: and only now, after 18 months of damage, are MPs beginning to do their duty.  
"The UK cannot have a special deal for the City" My colleague @jennifermerode has had an interview with Michel Barnier. This is what he says #brexit 
.@Anna_Soubry + other Tory MPs attack Daily Mail and Telegraph for 'inciting' violent threats against them over Brexit.  
'Ave it Barnier.David Davis to warn EU it cannot cherrypick in Brexit trade deal talks 
I wonder if Brexit really began with #LeagueofGentlemen (or as it was originally called #LegatumofGentlemen) 
I voted SNP as we already have the mandate for Indy ref. If we don't use this before Brexit, then I give up. We'll never have better conditions than then. 
OPINION: The Brexit Mess Proves Its Supporters Correct  
Btw, 2018  will be a bigger year than the last two - for Europe and the rise of the right, for the US and midterms and for the UK and Brexit. It is when decency and reason either pick themselves up and fight, or skulk in the corner. 
‘I have received death threats, and I blame the vitriol of the pro-Brexit press’.Terrible this is happening. MPs need to be able to vote with their conscience on Brexit. #StopBrexit. #FBPE.   
Must Watch: Britain must Leave the EU to restore Democracy."Leaving EU is a democratic & not a nationalist argument"Tony Benn, Labour MP, argued passionately for UK's withdrawal from the #EU all through his political career.Truly Excellent...#Brexit 
“Vote as you see fit” - Commons Speaker Bercow’s message to MPs amid unprecedented pressure from the Brexit press. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Important new paper by John Curtice (@whatukthinks <- do follow)-Value divide now central to British politics-Little evidence Corbyn's left-wing outlook played decisive role-Tory donors & (new) Tory voters think v differently about Brexit 
Ah, ever so nice to see Arch-Brexit-Wanker @DanielJHannan exposed for the lying sphincter he is. 
Between 55-58% of students hadn’t realised Corbyn was every bit as ignorant about the hugely damaging impact of Brexit as Davis, Fox, Johnson & Gove.   
Theresa May: “can we have a bespoke Brexit trade deal”EU: “no”Theresa May: “Yay I saved the country we can have a bespoke trade deal”EU: “no means no, you idiot sandwich, are you stupid ? Why are you lying to your country?”  
Brexit-backing Sun & Mail seen as having the most negative impact on society, remain supporting Times & Guardian the most positive  
The Brexit “decision would have consequences – human, social, economic, fiscal, financial, technical, judicial. I have always recommended that no one should underestimate them.” @MichelBarnier  
Commons Speaker John Bercow defends MPs’ right to vote “as they see fit”, despite pressure from the Brexit press. Most MPs support Remain - they should vote with their conscience and #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
David Davis to warn European commission it cannot cherrypick Brexit trade deal sectors  
#Brexit will benefit a few billionaire tax avoiders. Rest of us will be worse off in every conceivable way. Can't put it plainer than that 
You’d think by now the Brexit Minister would have mastered his brief, and understood how the eu does trade deals with 3rd parties. But then again, clearly not  
"After attempting to masquerade as the president of a respected policy institute, @DanielJHannan has fallen flat on his face," says @BenPBradshaw "He is the new clown of Brexit”  
#UKIP are rattled...."Brexit Under Threat"Well done #FBPE guys... You are doing your job well!#StopBrexit 
Good insight by John Curtice. After Brexit, it's no longer about "left" and "right"—it's now social liberals vs social conservatives  via @prospect_uk 
Petition to Leave #EU immediately soared over 122,000 after Theresa May agreed to pay £39 Billion to leave EU.Parliament will have to debate ditching Art50 & leaving on our terms, not EUs.This is what should have happened week after Referendum.#Brexit 
YOU, yes you, CAN stop Brexit. If you want to stop Brexit, tell your MP. If you voted leave and have changed your mind, tell your MP. Talk to your friends, tell them Brexit is not inevitable and for them to tell their MP if they want to stop Brexit.  
UK cannot have a special deal for the City, says EU's Brexit negotiator  
UK can’t have special deal for City of London - EU's #Brexit negotiator-Shocking blow to May  
."British politics is crying out for truth not fantasy on Brexit. But Mrs May will not & cannot provide it.". 
Brexiters now have 3 options:1. Spend the next 20 yrs insisting that brexit would have been great if it were done properly.2. Pretend they were remainers all along.3. Admit their mistake and try to help fix it.I hope we all give the last type a warm welcome.#StopBrexit 
If you believe parliament is sovereign in making our laws - not only after general elections and manifesto promises, but also after a referendum - support the #A50challenge 
David Davis to warn European commission it cannot cherrypick Brexit trade deal sectors  
"This vote must not over-ride the subsequent convincing evidence that Brexit would be a disaster for the UK economy, for jobs, for health services, for food production and for working and human rights in the UK"Nearly 10k signatures, please sign & RT  
Brexit is falling apart as public opinion turns against it. It is no wonder that the May is trying to get a rapid transition deal. #StopBrexit 
Why should we accept a Brexit that holds our heads underwater? We were promised no downside by @DavidDavisMP #FBPE #FinalSay 
If you want to know what happens after BREXIT - look to the US. Look at the climate change denial. Look at US health. Look at US minimum wages. Look at US working hours. Tories have already said they will "relieve" the UK of the maximum number of working hours allowed. 
Another leave lie. All these figures from the EU are MINIMUM rights. Member states are encouraged to provide more. And the point is, all these right are written into EU law. If you think they'll all survive after Brexit, you're naive.  
Labour voter all my life. Labour member since 1997 to present. Becoming more sceptical about Labour’s desire to soften if not stop Brexit. Am considering joining Lib Dem’s. - have no intention of supporting any organisation that panders to the wishes of racists. 
I asked the PM today, now that polls show UK public are shifting away from Brexit, if she will start leading the country or will she continue to be led by he hard Brexiteers in the Tory Party  
This superb thread explains why Brexit is the very definition of irony. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "I want Theresa May show real metal and steel in rejecting these rather hostile negotiating terms from the European Union." #Brexit  
I think this campaign idea is worth repeating: Every day Remainers should try to post at least one comment and give likes to several pro-EU tweets in MSM comments pages. If lots of us do this it will have an impact, so please RT.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
#Brexit is the tale of how a cynical segment of the super-rich and their political lackeys have sought to use control of much of the mass media to dupe millions into helping them get a #BrexitTaxHaven. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Man behind Vote Leave accuses 'zombie' Remainers of trying 2 overturn #BrexitSo allowing the Ppl a #FinalSay in 2018 when the divorce deal gets put to the EU, a chance to either Confirm or #StopBrexit is a 'Shoddy plot'? Funny I thought it was DEMOCRACY 
Bumper EU Referendum poll, how would you vote today, please share widely#Brexit 
Have to laugh at the accounts where their bios say "I voted Remain but I cherish democracy and want to see Brexit work"... They RT all the Brextremists. 
Millions of workers could face even longer working weeks. No-one voted for Brexit to hand power over to bad bosses.  
Love this Ken Clarke response on #c4news last week to being called a traitor by the pro-#Brexit press ... "I owe my constituents my best judgment, I don’t take orders from the Daily Mail, Telegraph or Daily Express" 
Fuming Labour supporter tells @Nigel_Farage he will “burn” his membership card over the party’s mixed stance on Brexit #FarageOnLBC 
I think the good chaps of the Black Country are starting to get... well... pissed off I think is the phrase!I couldn’t have put it better myself @JunckerEU#Brexit #15Months2Go 
Since Ed mentioned it on the show, I can now officially announce that I will be on the Christmas special of @CheerfulPodcast !! I got to meet Ed, play Class Struggle, and talk about Brexit. I can legitimately say... THIS WOULDN'T HAVE HAPPENED IF ED MILIBAND WERE PRIME MINISTER 
The Brexit “war cabinet” concluded today after 90 minutes without senior ministers agreeing a position on what Britain's trade relationship should look like.  
“It’s hard not to stress how important today’s Brexit War Cabinet meeting was… I think the path we go down should be one where we adopt an independent trade policy,” says @BrexitCentral's @darrengrimes_ on @bbc5live's #Brexitcast 
As always had a lot of fun taking part in #Brexitcast: Spoke about how important today’s Brexit War Cabinet meeting was and how I hope the Cabinet decides post-Brexit Britain must exploit the very many opportunties of adopting an independent trade policy and regulatory autonomy.  
No way in the world UK is going to manage that, even were it legally possible (it almost certainly won’t be).This isn’t “collision course with Brussels” but Brussels going “how is she STILL being so stupid?”#brexit  
#Brexit and the case for a second #EU referendum - guest article by #GinaMiller. Please re-Tweet. Link to article:  
Very well said. The voice of prominent Brexiteers is starting to be heard now that we are moving to phase 2 Brexit & May has allowed the Cabinet to discuss Brexit outcomes. Please keep it going.  
I must say again: terrible as this is - and don't get me wrong: it is horrifying - what is new about this? Brexit has been unleashing this towards MPs, and others engaged in taking a stand against Brexit, for quite some time now. And it began during EUref.  
You sound like a person who hasn't read one of my goddamn books or essays and thinks that being a remainer should come with no criticism of the EU.   #brexit  
You accurately describe #ToryBrexit as a race to the bottom favouring only the 1%, but any #Brexit harms UK. If you really want to protect rights, jobs & economic prosperity, there's only 1 alternative: #StopBrexitLegitimise it with #FinalSayEnd #BrexitShambles#ExitFromBrexit 
Brexit thinktank removes 'institute' from its name  
The Guardian view on Theresa May and Brexit: time to get off her fantasy island | Editorial  
Why didn't Catalonia negotiate a referendum with Spain? What happened on October 1st?  
I don't support #brexit but I also don't support the EU destroying Greece impoverishing its southern nations,  turning the refugee crisis into a tragedy not seen since the dying days of the second world war-Social contract of the EU ended when they elected neo liberal govts.  
."I could have sworn Brexit politicians said it would save us £350 million a week not cost us £350 million a week.”. 
New car registrations November 2016/ November 2017Spain +12.4%France +10.3%Germany +9.4%Italy +6.8%UK -11.2%Brexit going spiffingly well isn't it? 
Dave Brown on Theresa May and what Brexit will look like panto style - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit thinktank removes 'institute' from its name  This story reveals a lot about how UK's shady think tank world works 
As the Royal Free doctor Charles House said ‘have Brexit or the NHS. you can’t have both’. Becoming ever clearer he was right.  
The majority of Labour MPs represent Leave voting constituencies. The majority of Conservative Constituency Chairmen support Brexit. The majority of Tory voters voted Leave. Yet we are stuck with an unrepresentative House of Commons stuffed full of Remain supporting MPs. 
The Brexit crisis is not the only emergency facing the UK and leaving the EU could spell the end for another union.  
Exactly this (while RT'ing @IanDunt, @davidallengreen, @StevePeers, @EmporersNewC, @faisalislam, @KirstyS_Hughes, @jonworth @WomaninHavana @ottocrat or any of the other amazing observers of Brexit) 19/ 
Why we can think again about Brexit, why we should think again about Brexit, and how YOU can stop Brexit. Watch here:  via @YouTube 
That £350m a week figure for the NHS. It's how much the FT have calculated the UK is losing per week as a result of #Brexit vote. That's before we have even left the EU. #BrexitReality 
We need Labour’s big beasts to reverse Brexit – but not Tony Blair | Letters  
No one voted for Brexit to lose their rights at work. But cabinet ministers are handing control to bad bosses.  
Brexit can and must be stopped 18/ 
Theresa May refuses to guarantee EU rules to limit the working week to 48 hours will survive Brexit  Wasn't the plan to convert EU law to UK law & maintain standards? Sorry, get mixed up between what May says & the truth. 
Young people – you can't call yourself 'radical' if you don't support Brexit  
#Brexit rebels, ordinary people with the courage to say no we will not let this happen here #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Real price of Brexit happens to be £350m a week... so far. Ironic number. This is also before considering the massive opportunity cost (to national policy development) of the all-consuming money-wasting project.  
Public repeatedly told during referendum no threat to workers' rights from Brexit. PM refuses to deny plans to so do. Duplicity of Brexiters jaw dropping. Mrs May has sold her soul to the Devil.  
We now go live to the Brexit negotiations: 
Another hard #Brexit “think tank” in a spot of bother #brexitshambles  
My answer is the one I just gave: everyone respects an election result. But the losers then spend every moment trying to overturn it at the next election. Why is a referendum any different? If people think it was an error isn't it perfectly reasonable to try to ameliorate it?  
.@theresa_may refuses to rule out a longer working week and shorter holidays for workers in post-Brexit Britain. Does this not demonstrate that you can never trust the Tories with workers' rights?  
I am not sure why a referendum is different from an election. The moment a party loses an election it begins work to overturn the result at the next election. They respect the result but want to change it in future. I never comment on referendums or elections.  
No-one voted for Brexit to lose out on holidays, don't let #Brexit water down our rights at work.  
The @Conservatives​ want to use Brexit to rip up rights at work and make Britain a tax haven for the super-rich.  
People see Brexit now for what it is.If were a people’s movement,it wouldn’t be necessary to force it through with bullying & intimidation. 
.@AmberRuddHR won't take up @YvetteCooperMP invitation to criticise Daily Mail for taunting the 11 Tory Brexit rebels 
We have reached an important step on the road to delivering the smooth and orderly Brexit that people voted for in June last year.  
"Businesses will just have to get by after Brexit."But I'll be fine, cos I married a multimillionaire aristocrat and lived rent free on her father's land. "What, you didn't do that? More fool you."  
Spain: Police Used Excessive Force in CataloniaHold Independent Investigation into Violence During Referendum @MarcaEspanaEN Second most read story of the Human Rights Watch website in 2017  
'If Wales doesn’t stand up to be counted, the rest of the world will forget it ever existed. Brexit Britain already has.' | @padrigmcg 
Stay angry, fight Brexit! Beat the price rise by subscribing to The New European this Christmas -  
We’ve agreed protection for the rights of #EU citizens and their families living in the UK:  #citizensrights #Brexit  
This is Y Brexit is so dangerous. Anti-EU forces cont to sow division & promote xenophobia. Now they’re in government in Austria. All those backing Brexit need to remember who wants it most - Le Pen, Trump, Farage, Putin, Wilders, German AFD, Golden Dawn, DUP  
Wow something I agree with @vincecable on  - Corbyn “is a supporter of Brexit but he has persuaded large numbers of people that he is opposing it.They’ve kept juggling the balls quite cleverly but at some point, they’re going to be flushed out.”   
Scottish Government involvement? Is Blackford having a laugh?That idiot SNP MP Stephen Gethins got a look at the 'secret' Brexit impact papers and went blabbing to the Sunday Herald about them.The SNP cannot be trusted with ANYTHING.  
The vote at the UNSC today is about much more than Jerusalem it is an international referendum on the US's role as "mediator" and the verdict is clear, unified opposition. 
The 43 Non-EU countries wanting free trade agreements with the UK post-Brexit have a combined GDP of $53.2trn (USA's GDP alone is $18.6trn, incidentally). The combined GDP of the EU27 is $13.8trn and there are 26 official & working languages and 10 currencies in use in the EU27. 
I hope @LauraPidcockMP, @MikeAmesbury and, yes, the people on my own side of the Brexit debate who spit poison at @Anna_Soubry and Dominic Grieve, read this and perhaps reconsider a little bit.  
Also, you CANNOT stop Brexit under a Tory government. Ever. The Tories are literally the party that brought you Brexit. No ifs, no buts. Before you sort out BrexitYou. Have. To. Deal. With. The. Tories.Attacking Labour is NOT dealing with the Tories  
This looks like a shabby deal - govt complicit in covering up source of DUP's huge Brexit donation, against transparency laws required for political funding in rest of UK.  
No one sees simplicity, fairness, growth, jobs or fiscal discipline in the tax bill.Tax “reform” ended up as a referendum on the wealthy, lobbyists, and corporations vs. the middle class and working poor.2018 will be shaped by those themes because they are unavoidable. 
Car crash Brexit has shoved UK to the bottom of the growth table. #FBPE #MondayMotivaton #StopBrexit #Final 
May in STITCHES as Corbyn claims PM is DETERMINED to follow Labour's Brexit strategy.Not only does Corbyn think he won the election he now thinks he's running the country. 
Never in my wildest dreams did I ever think I would follow or RT so many @UKLabour supporters, or that I would join @LibDems. But that was before 24 June 2016. I no longer kowtow to Tory tribal loyalties, I follow anyone who wants to fight Brexit and #StopBrexit 
.@theresa_may said workers' rights would be "fully protected and maintained" after #Brexit at Lancaster House back in Jan. Now reports suggest ministers are plotting to scrap the working time directive. That would be a disaster - spot on @FrancesOGrady >>  
The cabinet are meeting for the first time today to discuss what type of brexit it they want. 18 months after the vote.Without impact assessments.If this doesn't tell you they don't have the best interests of the nation at heart, I don't know what will.#FBPE #StopBrexit 
Dear fellow millennials: if you'd rather side with the powerful politicians, banks and billionaires than back Brexit, then I’m afraid you don’t know the first thing about being radical.  
These are the Christmases of long ago that have returned to torment those made vulnerable by austerity.   #brexit 
Before the referendum May told us that remaining in the EU made us more secure, more prosperous and more influential.So why is she now determined to make us less secure, less prosperous and less influential?Go figure. #StopBrexit 
Theresa May accused of refusing to explicitly rule out scrapping paid holidays right after Brexit  
Nigel Evans gets slapped down by Mr Speaker..... the policy of the opposition is not a matter for the government of the day..... No.... No...No.... hopeless. Then fireworks ... don't you shake your head at me Mr Evans.  #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Serious questions now being asked in the House of Commons about the will of the people having CHANGED since the EU referendum. @RuthCadbury #Brexit #BrexitShambles  
8/ This overlooked several things, not least that the EU doesn’t want an indefinite Brexit negotiation any more than we do. Remainers are not really seen as some great white hope over here like they think they are. The EU has moved on - it’s got other stuff to get on with. 
Jeremy Corbyn: The choice is very clear:- A Tory Govt that will use Brexit to protect the very richest, slash corporation tax, and working regulations. - Or a Labour's vision that would protect Jobs, the economy, by building a relationship our closest trade partners.  
"EU citizens do feel reassured as a result of the #Brexit Phase 1, it was clear #citizensrights was an early issue to address, we've done just that and we give people reassurance for the future" PMDear Theresa May, this statement is far from being true. 
#StopBrexit for #ChristmasLet's put #NigelFarage where he belongs... in the Toilet!Download the #Brexit Grinch Song until midnight Thursday 21st and it will count to #Xmas charts! Available on itunes Amazon and Google play! 
No we are sick of con-men who told us Brexit would be a land of milk and honey now saying ‘it will cause poverty and hardship, but it’s worth the cost’. That proposition was never put to the British people, I can’t imagine why not  
From #Brexit to , 2017 was a big year for headlines that proved that anyone's voice can have an impact:  #LinkedInTopVoices 
Wetherspoons boss Tim Martin tells @IainDale a Brexit no deal would be “good” for Britain and could even lead to a fall in food prices  
Jeremy Corbyn: "The agreement reached on phase 1 was clearly cobbled together on the 11th hour, after the DUP vetoed the first attempt.""Truth is, its division and in-fighting in her own cabinet, and they're reliance on the DUP that makes them weak."#Brexit  
No “buffet style transition” - says BArnier official. Buffet Brexit is a new one  
Fake News: ‘Shock’ Poll Alleges Brexit ‘Remainers’ Now Have 11-Point Lead over Leave… They Don’t   
Nigel Farage is ready to return to front-line politics and fight for Brexit, his former colleague @davidcoburnukip has hinted in an interview with @georgegalloway Listen:  
Dominic Grieve’s amendment prevented the government forcing MPs to vote for an empty box, reserving the right to fill it with any old Brexit deal later. Quite right! Shocking his reward was death threats 
The PM has just confirmed that our Ministers are discussing our future trading relationship with the EU without any impact analysis of the different options. This is staggering stupidity and ignorance. #Brexit #FBPE 
No talks till March 2018, no deal before March 2019,  no trade deal as good as now. #Brexit  
Fake News: ‘Shock’ Poll Alleges Brexit ‘Remainers’ Now Have 11-Point Lead over Leave… They DON’T!             #fo2eu 
MPs voted to have an advisory referendum. How did it morph into a binding commitment without a vote by MPs? Who side-stepped UK democracy? 
The PM has failed twice to guarantee that worker’s rights set out in the European Working Time regulations such as the 48 hour working week would not be scrapped after Brexit. Not good enough.  
No love I voted leave and I now want a second referendum. I’ve been fooled, lied to and deceived and I want the chance to vote remain 
The Prime Minister has repeatedly been offered the opportunity today to guarantee that she will not allow European standards of workers' rights like the Working Time Directive to be diluted through Brexit, and repeatedly she has failed to do so. This is extremely worrying. 
No possible deal can be as good as the deal that Britain has now in the EU - @MaryCreaghMP demolishes the case for Brexit 
My New Year's resolution is to blast an air horn in the face of anyone who says the word "Brexit" in my presence. 
From FT article on how Brexit is already making a loss...  
PM totally rattled by question from @angelasmithmp on whether Working Time Directive will be retained after #Brexit - she refuses to confirm... very worrying. @The_TUC 
Now @angelasmithmp gives prime minster direct chance to confirm working time directive itself will be written into uk law under her plans for brexit. Again May refuses to do so and dodges the question. Tells you everything about her commitment to protecting basic rights at work. 
MADNESS: Barnier adviser Stefaan De Rynck demands UK accepts EU rules/laws until 2021. That simply isn't Brexit at all! 
Just asked PM if she can explain to the public the billions now being wasted on #Brexit + the fact that according to the @FT today it will COST us £350million per week - instead of the £350million per week we were promised for the NHS...  
It isn’t acceptable that we could get to ‘exit day’ and only have a sketchy framework outline of our future relationship with the EU. Public & businesses need FULL details of the proposed future trade deal, otherwise uncertainty will linger for years and years. #Brexit 
PM: I think [a second referendum] would be betraying the British people, Parliament gave them the vote, up to us to deliver” 
If Blair Could Reverse Brexit, Would His Reward Would Be "Presidency Of The U.S.E."? Now who wants that? 
In which I reveal how Unite will soon lobby Jeremy Corbyn to commit to Labour backing full membership of the single market and the customs union after Brexit. 
The British people deserve real Brexit. Not a Tory remainer Brexit.#ForTheNation 
This is the best justification for Brexit that I've seen so far. Ironically.  
Brexit is about the Rees-Moggs and Farages of Britain, not anyone else.  
UKGov can't be arsed to have a policy on negotiations with EU27.But Brexit means Brexit. And we'll get everything we want (whatever they are)Even the mutually exclusive things.It'll be deep and special.And it'll be great (whatever 'it' is)And delays are the EU's fault  
How much more of this nonsense do we have to put up with? Whether you are pro or anti Brexit it is just insulting to everyone to state as the UK's central policy ambition something which is by definition impossible.  
Life of Brexit"Suppose you agree that UK can't actually have regulatory divergence, which is nobody's fault, but that UK can have the *right* to have regulatory divergence.""It would be symbolic of UK struggle against oppression.""Symbolic of UK's struggle against reality." 
Call out. Do you know scientists who have recently moved / are moving to France over Brexit? And would be willing to chat to journalist? If so, please drop a DM or tweet @ us. Thanks! (and share!)  
Jeremy Corbyn demands Theresa May eradicates the "contradictions" in her government' Brexit policy. And keeps a straight face as he says it. 
"We are well on our way to delivering smooth and orderly #Brexit" - @theresa_may 
Theresa May says we will not be in the Single Market and Customs Union during the "implementation" period, but the status quo will remain. This means we will CONTINUE to accept EU laws, freedom of movement, and will not be able to sign free trade deals. This will DELAY Brexit! 
May says UK will not be in single market or customs union but ambition is “access would continue as now”  #Brexit 
[Conservative HQ]Press officer: Better future? Won't young people remember we scrapped EMA, increased tuition fees, made houses unaffordable, screwed their future with Brexit, excluded them from the minimum wage etc?Press officer 2: Nah. Just tweet it. 
May says it out loud - the Brexit bill is expected to be in the region of 35 - 39 billion pounds 
In-depth study by the Financial Times concludes that Brexit will be a net cost to the economy of £350m - after we stop paying EU. So no cash for the NHS. If you voted Leave, don't be embarrassed - be angry! At Boris Johnson, Farage, Gove, et al for lying to you... #StopBrexit 
Wow @LouiseMensch now wants UK police officers set upon if they identify as pro Brexit. How far can this nasty person go!!  
Interesting really - what would the offence be of colluding with Russia with both money and social media to throw a British referendum on #Brexit? Good news for @Nigel_Farage is he gets to serve his UK sentence before his extradition for spying 
Turns out Brexit has already cost UK economy £350m /week before we leave.  
#Brexit is destroying the UK economy and it hasn't even started yet. The UK has fallen right to the bottom (sharing last place with Italy) of all EU countries in terms of GDP per capita growth.  
The Delegated Legislation Committee meets tomorrow re ending NI Donor Secrecy from July 2017, not Jan 2014, which my change to law allowed. There's been  1 Council, 2 Assembly & 2 General Elections plus Brexit in the secrecy gap. Please sign and share. 
Tomorrow, the UK government will try to sneak through a law which will  bury the DUP's huge Brexit donation in another layer of secrecy 
Matthew Elliott said people calling for a second referendum were part of a “shoddy plot” to reverse Brexit  
If you voted Brexit and your fellow travellers are the BNP, Britain First, Trump, Putin, Le Pen, Nigel Farage and European fascist parties...do you ever question if you are on the right side of history?..because I bloody would.#StopBrexit #TalentlessTories #FBPE #BrexitShambles 
Whilst Labour has been too busy fighting amongst themselves, the @LibDems have been very clear on this all along: It should be the British people who have the final say on the Brexit deal.  
Brexit supporters once again showing their true — ahem — colors  
This will be mainly people buying tinned food and candles in preparation for Brexit. 
Mastercard say festive spending up 3.1 per cent, despite Brexit. 
Tony Blair has nothing to add to the Brexit debate. The Joke of British politics!  
.@mrjamesob said it was "an absolute travesty" Cabinet had taken 18 months to have their first meeting to discuss the Brexit trade deal  
Iain Duncan Smith said businesses will have to “learn to get by” after trade becomes more difficult with the EU after Brexit. Conveniently didn’t say that during the referendum campaign though….  
why is brexit trending has it all been sorted out now did we get the NHS money and that 
Brexit war cabinet on future relationship ended without agreement, I understand. Brexiteers Johnson, Fox, Gove plus Williamson vocal on the need for divergence from EU rules. Hammond and Rudd said to favour closer alignment. Meeting lasted just over 90 mins, more planned in 2018. 
The EU's vile handling of Brexit negotiations with us has convinced me 100% that we were right to vote to leave this bunch of corrupt, evil, thieving scoundrels. 
The greatest myth propagated by the Corbyn ‘left’ is that’s it not Corbyn’s job to oppose the Tories over Brexit. By definition, it’s the job of the Leader of the Opposition to oppose bad government policies & hold them to account. Corbyn’s failed on this. 
Wow. Remember Tories used to say they were the party of choice for business? They offered the referendum, now this?  Iain Duncan Smith says UK business will have to 'get by' with harder EU trade post-Brexit & accepts new barriers to trade will emerge.  
Better a Zombie than a Nazi☟Vote Leave leader Matthew Elliott accuses 'zombie' remainers of bid to overturn Brexit  
Why wasn't this written on the side of the #Brexit bus?   
This is how the Oxford dictionary should define Brexit in 2018...  
Even before we've left the EU, Brexit has already cost twice as much per week as our weekly contribution to the EU. 
I am not plotting to "overturn" Brexit. I am very openly doing all I can to stop it happening.  
1800 Ireland dragged into UK with no mandate from Irish nation?1918 Ireland's exit UK vote ignored?1919 UK sign Versailles Treaty: respect territorial integrity of small nations?1921 UK partition Ireland at gunpoint?1998 NI agree unique GFA peace deal?2016 NI reject #Brexit?  
What’s the point of a Brexit when nothing changes?Today by me, at @FT 
Michael Gove is aiming to pull the UK from the EU Working Time Directive. This protects from unscrupulous bosses and lays out essential rights for all workers. Post-Brexit Britain could be a journey back to Victorian working conditions... #NastyParty 
"Young people – you can't call yourself 'radical' if you don't support Brexit": read spiked's @EmilyRDinsmore's piece on @IndyVoices 
Exactly.  If we held a referendum to ask the electorate whether the Earth was flat & 52% said it was, it wouldn’t be ‘project sphere’ to say it wasn’t, it would be the truth, Brexit is no different, all evidence suggests it’s a bad idea, because it is, referendum is irrelevant. 
Irish passport applications from UK almost double after Brexit referendum, 162,251 were made to date this year 
.@mrjamesob: Why has it taken Cabinet 18 months to have their first Brexit trade meeting?  
The question of whether the UK can negotiate and conclude trade deals during Brexit transition is a bit of a red herring. The bigger question is whether anyone will want to conclude a comprehensive deal with the UK before knowing final status of UK-EU relationship 
Italy's eurosceptics threaten referendum on euro membership as they storm into poll lead  
Have you considered the possibility of a Hokey Cokey Brexit where different parts of the UK are in and others are out?  
Tony Blair has nothing to add to the Brexit debate  via @CityAM 
The real price of Brexit begins to emerge – @FT research shows that the weekly hit to the British economy could be the same £350m that Leave campaigners promised to claw back 
Farage staffer in Brussels, who made frequent trips to Russian embassy in Belgium, is accused of orchestrating smear campaign against Kremlin critic. Farage scoffs at the notion of Russian meddling in Brexit, denies taking money from Kremlin. Lol#Maddow  
No-one voted for Brexit to lose out on holidays, don't let #Brexit water down our rights at work.  
Wait!! I thought #Brexit decision would DESTROY mfging hopes?!  
Working time directive protects 1000s of workers from excessive hrs & protects holidays. @michaelgove & co want to scrap it. @UKLabour will fight the race-to-the-bottom Brexit that many Tories favour & fight for better or same protections when we exit EU:  
Presumably when, or if, the Cabinet decides what it wants from Brexit, this will be taken to be what Brexit has always meant, and what those who voted Leave have always wanted — such that thwarting the Government's Brexit vision will be to frustrate 'the will of the people'.  
All this talk of post-Brexit 'new trade agreements' has never (realistically) been about the UK making MORE money, it's about hammering down UK workers rights to the lowest global denominator so that the rich can better hoard their share.   
Gina Miller: I'm more than happy to put my trust in the public to reconsider Brexit Yep, the public were trusted with the decision and the Government's job is to carry it out, just like it said it would. 
Yet another example of how the Tories are keeping their Brexit decisions in the shadows. The Brexit Dept has failed to respond to 6 in 10 Freedom of Info requests. What have they got to hide?  
The town of my birth Barnsley isn't listening because Britain's 1% hasn't listened to its real pain of poverty. They have been made feral by neo liberalism-Their solution to it #brexit is wrong but their anguish is real.  
What’s the point of a Brexit when nothing changes?  
FIVE STAR REFERENDUM- Top Party could call for vote on €- Anti-Euro groups polling strongly - ITALIA!   
No amount of reality will get hardcore Brexiters to admit Brexit’s a terrible idea. It’s - *types very carefully* - an absolute cult.  
Any Brexit deal must guarantee our right to paid holiday leave.  
As it was with Brexit - 52% of Brits are wrong and have bad opinions.  
Well let’s look at the evidence. Labour is infested with racists misogynists homophobes & xenophobesIt’s lost the GE to the most incompetent Tory leader for over a generationIt’s playing both sides over Brexit whilst sitting back & hoping the Tories will crash the economy  
Boxing Day To Be Renamed St. Stephen's Day Under Brexit Rule  
Because #Leave is not about #economics. It would be dead in the water if it were.Makes no economic sense. Leave is UK's very own  rightwing #populism -like Trump; #Afd; #FrontNational.The eternal Tory #proxywar re: Europe has had many manifestations.This one is called: #Brexit  
This right wing Brexit cretin is now playing the "International Jewish Conspiracy" card. How low will these Leavers go?  
time for a weekly press conference to debunk all the media spin and promote work done at Holyrood. (I'm picturing the West Wing!) The misrepresentations are increasing in intensity.  hmm how odd? #scotref #indyref2 #brexit 
I think this is what Brexit was truly about. The removal of many key protections of workers/human and environmental rights. Race to the bottom has begun. 
June 23 2016 is history. Now the cold winds of #Brexit reality are beginning to seep through the growing cracks in the lies and the fantasies of Leave propaganda.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
For us I don't think we will ever be able to label Brexit a success, it's a mutual weakening - economically it's a lose-lose situation, says @StefaanDeRynck#CHevents 
Once again @Keir_Starmer, supporting #Brexit puts all these worker rights & standards back on the table.The UK can't hope for eternal Labour governments who are too pure to whittle away at regs & employment rights.As long as Labour supports #Brexit it's putting this at risk  
Theresa May still relentlessly pursuing a Brexit deal the EU insists is not on offer is going to end in tears 
Deborah Levy on Ziggy Stardust by David Bowie: “Britain needs this so much more than Brexit”  
If the UK is serious about getting the best deal that it can then it needs to start listening to the EU, and stop thinking that it has a special status. Brexit relegated it to a third country, which means it needs to start thinking like that 11/n 
I never thought of myself as a migrant - until the referendum I was simply a European living in Europe. After 29 yrs the UK doesn't feel like home anymore; France isn't home anymore as I have been in England for all my adult life. #InternationalMigrantsDay 
After all the Brexit fuss ...seems that the UK is not even in Top10 for places to migrate to :))  
A post-Brexit trade deal with the US could lead to 'dirty' poultry, fish, fruit and vegetables, food policy experts have warned.   
The Government spent more than £9m of our money on leaflets and websites telling us why we should vote Remain. Amongst that propaganda was an important line: “This is your decision. The Government will implement what you decide.” @matthew_elliott’s case against another referendum  
'#Brexit Secretary, @DavidDavisMP, has shown no improvement in a year,' writes @Jon_Danzig on his blog. 'And so today, I award Mr Davis 5 stars out of 5 for gross incompetence and contempt.’ Blog link:  
English #Brexit nationalists want to have & eat their cake. They want a proper English nation, not just a part of Britain or Europe, but at the same time they want the exceptional status that came with Britain being an imperial power and which is now lost.#StopBrexit #FBPE /1 
A Second Referendum is nothing more than a shoddy plot  to reverse Brexit says @matthew_elliott 
1/ Brexit briefing by top Barnier adviser @StefaanDeRynck about to start at Chatham House. His comments on trade options will be particularly keenly awaited... 
The real price of #Brexit begins to emerge. They ditched promise of £350m per week for NHS almost immediately!  
New Post: The latest @WalesGovernance update on #Brexit and Wales, featuring talks from @EdGarethPoole @johunt @roger_scully & @RA_Minto - 
Via Guardian: "PM's spokesman would not discuss whether the government saw keeping the  working time directive as essential for maintaining workers’ rights." Be afraid. Be very afraid. #Brexit #bbcdp 
How Brexit has made it far harder for the Tories to denounce Jeremy Corbyn as "anti-business".  
'New research has revealed Brexit could end up costing the UK economy £350m a week - the same amount Leave campaigners promised the country would get back after exiting the EU.'  
I genuinely want to see a brexit which works for everyone but some people are still tribal & classifying themselves as part of the 48% or 52%, I wouldn't be surprised if some of them asked to get in engraved on their tombstones.e.g.John Proud Husband & Father48%Stop Brexit 
#Brexit the same patriots who say British colonialism was v good for natives moan that GB cannot become an 'EU vassal' or colony. To laugh bitterly or cry with rage? 
**BREAKING** Forget all about war, famine, poverty, food banks, homelessness, Brexit woes because @BBCBreaking have decided that the top news on 18/12/17 is that a toddler will start nursery in January. #FFS 
#5things-Tax bill-Wall Street bonus cut-(another) Big Brexit week-Market rally-EM political boost 
#StopBrexitWe've gone from the top to the bottom of the G7 since the Brexit referendum. But Leavers still call it "Project Fear".  
Don't have Brussels sprouts or turkey for your Christmas dinner. Brussels have screwed us over with Brexit and Turkey is housing loads of ISIS Jihadists. 
But wasn't Brexit supposed to make it EASIER for businesses to trade? 
EU referendum result in Scotland "pretty much a tie", says @heraldscotland: 
Introducing the #Leeds branch of @ForBritainParty, a new, honest, brave alternative to the old parties who have betrayed us on #Brexit and so much more 
Gove and Johnson among Brexit ministers urging Theresa May to scrap directive that protects worker's rights  #EU #Brexit #WorkingTimeDirective 
The fundamental problem with the whole Brexit thing is that from day one it’s been presented as an IDEOLOGICAL question rather than anything to do with cost/benefit analysis. That’s the perfect recipe for social turmoil WHATEVER the result had been. 
If you are going to call your website @InFactsOrg and boast about how you are a “journalistic enterprise making the fact-based case against Brexit”, you should probably make sure you get your basic facts right.  
Chance of ‘Hard Brexit’ Grows As EU Head Negotiator Rules Out Tailored Deal: ‘UK Must Face the Consequences’  
Dominic Grieve Soubry Morgan and Clarke all say Parliament should have a say in matters that affect British people but they ignore fact that people had their say and said Brexit  
Err ... The EU represents the interests of 500 million EU citizens. This Brexit government represents the interests of 17 million Leavers. Leavers want to weaken the structures of the EU in order to have their way. The EU, quite rightly, says no.  
Total disarray at the heart of UKGOV. Some Tories want Theresa May to stay, some don't. Some want a deal with Labour, some don't. And still disagreement over what Brexit Means Brexit means.  
IDS: The public are sick of Parliament needlessly complicating Brexit and we need to ‘end the delays’  
And Putin is backing these far-right parties. #Brexit serves the enemies of democracy. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
This is true. And the same basis on which every pre and post Referendum study was calculated, including the HMT £4,200. As I am sure you know  
542 days since the Brexit Referendum.264 days since Article 50 was triggered.And only now is there finally a Cabinet discussion about what kind of trade deal the Government wants?The EU-27 must be laughing all the way to the negotiating table.  
To those who say Brexit won't affect your ability to live, work and retire in the EU, and that all you'll need is a bit of paperwork  
Reality bites, again! The EU's chief negotiator @MichelBarnier said there is "no way" the UK will be able to select just the good bits of all the possible #Brexit arrangements. "They have to face the consequences of their own decision” 
Literally no idea how a party can campaign for Brexit for 20+ years and wait until after the event to decide what that means.  
Boris is right to say that the UK must have the power to diverge from EU regulations. Britain should not become a ‘vassal state’ after Brexit.  
'The Brexit we're headed for isn't the one we were offered - so we need a second referendum or a general election' | Peter Mandelson  
I tell you what, after buying Salah from Roma for £35M Michael Edwards should be handling the Brexit negotiations.  
Wrong and misleading headline. It's not the Brexit deal that gives the Irish more rights. It is Brexit that takes away rights from Northern Irish #Anglocentrism 
Is @JBrokenshire helping to hide the #DUP dark money? More shadiness and bad faith from the Tories #Brexit  
Cost of Brexit - the story so far. Good round-up by @ChrisGiles_  here    &includes this nice graphic 
Cabinet subcommittee meeting this morning to work out what Brexit means...from UK Gov side...PM says she wants freedom to negotiate and “where possible” sign new trade deals, for implementation in 2021 
Yesterday, Labour’s top team once again proved that their approach to Brexit is a shambles. They won’t rule out a second referendum and have no plan to deliver control over our borders, laws and money.  
With both major parties pushing for a soft Brexit and thus abandoning their commitment to ending open door mass migration, the influx we've seen thus far is just the tip of the iceberg.At least five more years of record migration before we potentially leave the European Union!  
Already, the cost of #Brexit comes to more than the “savings” we were promised. Far from helping the NHS, it’s cutting the tax revenue that pays for the NHS and other public services  
Concern about Brexit’s impact on the NHS and social care has a greater potential to change minds even than the economy, writes @BenPBradshaw  
We agreed to the sequencing of issues at the convenience of EU27 ("orderly Brexit")/2 
Brexit, a threadWe sent the Article 50 notification at the convenience of EU27 ("no negotiation without notification")./1 
Even Baldrick understands that Scotland has the right to hold a referendum on Independence.  
All part of the Remain game. Postpone indefinitely, create legalistic process, try to bring about a second referendum, escalate Project Fear II. 
I usually find this deranged fool laughable, but sometimes he reveals himself to be such a piece of shit that I can’t. Here he is sneeringly saying gay people lied about the hurt they have suffered in order to win the referendum, while his audience sniggers  
See Corbyn for what he is - you are not staying in the EU, you never were - he's a Brexiteer. Labour's Brexit position is purposefully vague to appease you and cover the reality.#TheCorbynCon#ImwithMay#TeamTory 
Friends!Summary:1. I'm happy to trust the public to reconsider Brexit.2. God knows why. The racist bigots voted the wrong way last time.3. But if a second Referendum fails, we can always try to overturn it.4. Just like we did with the first one, in fact.5. That's all, folks!  
British economy is losing, not gaining, £350m a week from Brexit and inflation is 1.7% higher by (to 2.7%) losing the average worker a week’s wages. It’s time for the #FinalSay #NotWhatWeVotedFor  
"Andrew.... RT..... Davies..... Leader of the Welsh Conservatives...?..... Brexit means Breakfast? Yes that's the one. Can you put me through to Theresa May please?"  
"Brexit and the economy: the decline has begun. The British don't realise it yet. But that will soon change." From Germany's @SPIEGELONLINE. 
Breathtakingly sneaky move from @JBrokenshire & UK govt to cover up the DUP's dodgy #Brexit spending spree. Tomorrow 15 MPs will meet to 'scrutinise' the new law. They are all named here. Tell them what you think.  
The #BBC whines constantly that the #DUP are disproportionately influential due to their alliance with the Tories.  Of course this is because the DUP in the main supports #Brexit.  The BBC shows no such distaste for a small group of Tory rebels who betray their country and party 
There are only 2 options: Hard Brexit (ie Brexit) and Soft Brexit (ie Remain).  
Definition of #BREXIT:  A bunch of right wing nutters mis-sold an Advisory Referendum to the people. ** RESIST THE STUPID **#fbpe #Remainers pic.twitter.com/wx6XvBMibL 
You never miss the water until the well runs dry? Post-Brexit armada to prevent EU boats fishing illegally in UK waters  
Also, doing your own twitter poll on Brexit for self-selecting responders is one of the most pointless exercises known to human kind. 
The BMG Research poll found 51% favoured staying in the EU while just 41% backed Brexit.  
Five years ago, no one was for or against the EU anywhere near as passionately as they are now either for or against Brexit. Tories and UKIP took something that people were not that bothered about, and wrecked our society over it.  
Welcome of Austria's far-right shows  "pro-EU" now means quite specific things in Brussels: don't have a referendum on membership, don't advocate euro exit, and talk tough on   defence. The rest is up to you - today's @ftbrussels briefing   
The first person I heard using the F word about Brexit was .@Emma_Forage . While we haven’t yet reached a point where we need to fight from Maquis country it’s time to say Vive La #Bresistance .@spaceangel1964 @RemainerCreates @LoubinWally @StopBrexitMarch @AndyHol28495223 
The rest of the EU is BOOMING and here in dear old Brexit Britain we're reducing our growth forecasts daily - and everybody is £600 worse off than 12 months ago! FFS! What does it take for Brexiteers to wake up and for our politicians to stop being delusional incompetents?  
Dominic Grieve: 'Some newspapers seem disinhibited in the inaccuracies they peddle & the vitriol they heap on those at variance with their version of Brexit. This encourages an atmosphere of crisis & confrontation that leads directly to the death threats.'  
This will surely be the first time that a nation has sought to negotiate a worse trade deal than the one that currently exists. Can someone explain to me why #Brexit is a good idea? Looks like a disaster on stilts.  
Can’t help but feel that it would have been a good idea to schedule this meeting earlier, say 2016... #Brexit  
In the New Year, the Govt will set out its plans for our post #Brexit immigration system. This could be our chance to end indefinite immigration detention for good. Add your name to send a message to @theresa_may:  #Time4aTimeLimit #InternationalMigrantsDay 
18 months after the referendum. Negligence doesn’t even begin to describe it.   
Countries that hold regular referendums because of their constitution, like Ireland and Switzerland put several safeguards in incl 1. It requires a super-majority. 2 Make sure the public properly informed of consequences. 3. No issue cannot be overturned by another referendum. 
Striking how many leading Brexit campaigners have now become essentially anti-business.  
‘@georgegalloway: Blairite aggro undermining Corbyn now is to capitulate over Brexit. No-one should bet on them failing.  
Love how "everything will be glorious in Brexit Britain!" has become "we'll probably survive!" has become "you might not survive, but bloody well suck it up buttercup"  
Please folks giving me grief for RTing @PeteNorth303 - I disagree massively with what he says, BUT he is about the only Brexiteer willing to tell a painful, unvarnished truth about what is behind Brexit.Rather honest nastiness than dishonest crap we get from most Brexiteers! 
Ever since the #Brexit referendum in June 2016, EU citizens in the UK have felt increasingly unwelcome. Harrassment is on the rise and the government itself has fed the hate.  
Theresa May due to meet her "Brexit cabinet" to discuss for first time what UK's  future relationship with EU should be... THE FIRST TIME!!! What kind of shambles is she running? This is the first meeting to discuss an end goal?! A little over a year to go... #BrexitShambles 
The same for the people in Ebbw Vale and the South Wales Valleys - angry at the political system.But sold a lie that Brexit would make their lives better, rather than what will happen - that they’ll be ignored more than ever.15/15 
It has been a busy — and interesting —year for those of us working in UK public law. All of my 2017 posts on Public Law for Everyone can be found at: And all Brexit-related posts (of which there are a fair few!) are here:  
Inequality, air pollution, tax dodging, poverty: we can't afford the cost of putting these things right.But Brexit? Damn the cost consequences.  
Brexit campaigners promised the EU would be 'desperate' to maintain free trade with the UK. Now they say British business will just have to "get by" with new barriers. 
Iain Duncan Smith says UK business will have to 'get by' with harder trade after Brexit  
The alt-right coup that is #Brexit has been driven by the divisive rhetoric of the Daily Mail @MailOnline and now Mail staff are becoming the mouth piece for the government.  Is Brexit a power grab by that man of the people Viscount Rothermere?  
The real price of Brexit begins to emerge - UK is likely to be producing £18bn less a year than would have been reasonable to expect and this is directly attributable to Britain’s decision to leave the EU. That is just short of £350m a week. #StopBrexit  
Why should they. Because a bunch of right wing nutters mid-sold an Advisory Referendum to the people? The different world could just be a different country. Ireland looking very attractive right now. Vive la #Bresistance 
Book of the year as chosen by our politicians. 'How to stop brexit' wins the top prize. Great Xmas present  
Students: 87% voted to REMAIN. Labour voters: 72%.  Corbyn's support for Brexit will keep the Tories in power. As the Brexit shambles unfolds the official opposition @UKLabour does nothing to save us from this disaster. @ChukaUmunna @Keir_Starmer #stopbrexitnow @owensmith_MP 
The BBC's story on Brexit negotiations was next to an article with the heading ‘man cements head in microwave’. As one reader points out, it's the perfect metaphor for Brexit.  
Why bother giving Abbott the airtime. She hasn't changed her anti-white, anti-Brexit tune, ever. She's thick, has nothing of value to say (just pre-rehearsed answers) and BORING.  
Can we have another Referendum please?  
The working name for this chart with @ChrisGiles_ was the "Brexit wiggle"  
The EU is moving to stop wholesale tax avoidance by companies using Jersey and other UK Crown Dependencies & Overseas Territories, writes @RichardJMurphy.No wonder so many leading Brexiters & their billionaire backers are pushing for a hard #Brexit.  
Do you (like me) want to stop Brexit? Only a second referendum can do thatThat will only happen if public opinion demands itSo, if you want to stop Brexit, work on persuading people morning, noon and night     (The politicians will follow public opinion here, not lead it IMO) 
We were all expecting a downturn even before the Brexit vote happened. The centrist liberal media are trying to spin the effects of austerity to frame them as a consequence of #Brexit. No. This is entirely the result of Tory economic choices. 
Dunno why everyone's stressing about us gettin' a post-Brexit trade deal with your Germans.Just send Del Trotter over to Dusselldorf.The lad with have one banged out in 5 minutes flat.#PukkaDiplomacy 
Labour confirms Brexit strategy as ‘pandering to shouty Northern bastards’  pic.twitter.com/05y7iIkAzB 
Those Brexit and Ireland issues? They haven't gone away, you know. The contradictions are in the heart of the British constitution, and the clues are in the No 10 basement. Something I wrote for @IrishTimes 
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 18: as new facts come to light, people should be able to keep an open mind on Brexit.  
#NewBrexitFacts: @FT research shows that the cost of Brexit could be the same £350m per week that Leave campaigners promised for the NHS. Extraordinary  
BARNIER: UK must “face consequences” of Brexit. Is this the EU or the mafia?  
Exclusive FT research: the real price of Brexit begins to emerge  
After 10 years of declining incomes, benefit cuts, £1.5 trillion debt, billions hidden offshore, pound down and Brexit losses, the delusional Right inhabit a parallel world.  
Why didn’t parliament find out about this BEFORE voting to hold an In/Out referendum?! Entire basis of Leave’s Brexit campaign has now been thoroughly undermined. People voted on utterly false pretences  
BreakingNews...Theresa May’s Tory UK Cabinet are to meet today for the first time to discuss Brexit trade deal.. with Fukushima peach juice and tray of Chlorinated Coronation Chicken sandwiches  
The real price of #Brexit begins to emerge and, ironically, it is about £350m a week 
."Sturgeon needs to hold 2nd referendum by early 2019 if an independent Scotland wants to move smoothy to EU membership". 
So, 18 months after the referendum UK Cabinet to discuss today for first time what kind of #Brexit outcome is being sought. No comment necessary. 
Today is the first day that the UK government will try to decide its position on post-Brexit relations.You know. Doing that thing that should have been done before the referendum...or at the very latest before triggering Article 50. 
Put on radio and once again it is BBC Radio Brexit with IDS - now a world trade expert saying "business will have to learn" how to live without our biggest market. That's alright then 
Iain Duncan Smith tells Brexit-sceptic UK companies to suck it up: “British businesses will have to learn to get by in a different world.” #r4today 
."Irish Govt has made clear that it will use the Brexit process as an enforcement mechanism for the terms of the 1998 [Good Friday] agreement". 
For nearly 8 years, Austerity measures by Tories, have attacked the Working Man, depleted the #NHS etc#Brexit under Tories will be a disaster, True.But Austerity will continue with or without #BrexitTory Austerity has ruined Britain, not #Brexit  
18 months after a Leave vote, today the Cabinet will discuss what the Govt wants from Brexit *for the first time*.Just astonishing. 
Theresa May is looking to cut the EU Working Time Directive as soon as Brexit kicks in - a policy that protects workers. She claims this will free workers to earn more overtime. They already can go over the max time - this is a Tory scam! #ToryShambles #r4today 
On what she wants as a post #brexit relationship with EU, #TheresaMay’s plan has up to now been "keep it vague" as anything precise will split her cabinet.  Can she keep that going past today’s (first ever!!) cabinet discussion on it? @InFactsOrg 
LABOUR:Diane Abbott pledges that Labour will make it EASIER for immigrants to come to Britain after Brexit. The Shadow Home Secretary VOWS to slash red tape that can make it hard for new arrivals to get into the country.  
Apparently, Parliament's "meaningful" vote on the Brexit deal will be "the moment to stop the trainwreck.” This perfectly encapsulates the anti-democratic madness we have come to expect from the elites.  
In the run up to the referendum I heard a Tory say the best thing about coming out of the #EU is getting rid of all of this unnecessary health & safety regulation & now they're coming after the Working Time Directive! Workers rights enshrined in EU law have to be protected! 
#Brexit: ‘Even before the UK has left the EU, the referendum result is costing the UK government more than can possibly be recovered by ending net contributions to Brussels’ @FT 
Brexit PropagandaEvery day we have to endure government & establishment figures, the EU, the "Gina Millers" & much of the MSM briefing hard against Brexit. Where are the pro Brexit voices? Have they ALL been GAGGED except for Farage? Feels like 1000 to 1.  
Protesters chant “jash jash Barzani, biruxe Talabani” “traitor traitor Barzani, down with Talabani.” People have had enough of corruption & worshipping of families/individuals. They were ignored before the referendum, the elite are out of touch w/reality as is the diaspora. #KRG 
From top of the G7 to bottom in 15 months. The Brexit effect  
PM outlines wish to sign trade deals during Brexit transition She thinks that the UK can cherry pick and break the rules. This will not end well. 
Abuse, egg attacks, and a vandalised car — Nigel Farage says his life is 'miserable' after Brexit  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  117,119 Signatures on this Monday morning. They are for #Brexit. RETWEET NOW! 
Theresa May seems to think that she is being perceived as doing a good job. Absolutely delusional. She can't even keep her party together - nevermind run the country AND negotiate Brexit #ToryShambles #r4today 
Astonishing that this supposedly intelligent man doesn’t understand the rise of far Right on mainland Europe is largely because of the EU. Don’t be surprised if a similar thing happens here if the elites succeed in overturning Brexit. It’s a dangerous game.  
All I want for Christmas is my country back and the #BREXIT 17.4 million people voted for!  
Busted Flush..Front Page of the Times “Tories urge Theresa May to stay until 2021” hahahahaha!!! the Basket case Brexit Fukushima peach swillers won’t survive the 2018 General Election  
Opposition to a second referendum is proof that the first was crooked. If the first result really was “The People Speaking” then another go should produce the same result. What are the leavers afraid of? 
It has been clear throughout that Johnson’s idea of having our cake and eating it was nothing more than bluff. Barnier confirmed this last night with clear statement we face binary choice between single market or vanilla trade deal #Brexit 
The traders hub Surat has given 100% results to BJP, If this is not referendum on GST, what actually is? 
Uttar Pradesh was referendum on Demonetization, Gujarat is referendum on GST, These are the people who are not on Social media but smart enough to realize that we are in the right direction. 
Brexit will usher in a dark chapter for new British authors, warns publisher  
Intellectual debate will soar in a mo on @GMB. Joining @piersmorgan & @susannareid100 solo. @toryboypierce stuck in his care home. Might be Brexit staff shortages 
The 350 million per week Brexit was going to save the UK? That's almost exactly the amount per week Brexit has cost the UK so far:  
“Corbyn is being strategic about Brexit”, really?76% of 18-24 yr olds want to remain. 72% of Labour voters overall. Remain has 10% lead in polls, yet Labour only level with Tories. Is this a strategy or are LP front bench hindered because they’re led by Bennite anti EU faction. 
#GoodNews for students as we commit to remaining in #Erasmus - #Brexit does not mean we stop being European, but we are leaving the institution of the EU  
Britain’s economic output 0.9% or about £350m a week lower since the Brexit vote - @FT. Oh the irony 
I am arguing in my FT column that the eurozone, not Brexit, remains the biggest threat to the cohesion of the EU.  
'The real price of #Brexit begins to emerge' -- @FT research shows that the weekly hit to the British economy could be the same £350m that Brexiters promised to claw back http://o  /via @ChrisGiles_  
Analysis: The real price of Brexit begins to emerge  
Lost of shit ppl panicked over like it was the end of society:#Kony2012#Ebola#Gluten#Brexit#Trump2017#NetNeutralty What's it going to be next month? 
#Brexit: Theresa May to discuss end deal with ministers for the first time! 18 months since the referendum! This level of incompetence should not be tolerated.  
"Followed by Marr commenting that Brexit will go ahead anyway." The hell it will!  
From December last year:Tory MPs suggest firms draw up list for bonfire of EU laws after Brexit  
A splendid patriotic evening with The Rt. Hon. Esther McVey M.P. (Deputy Chief Whip, Tatton) and The Hon. Ian Paisley M.P. (North Antrim), who visited today for a great a celebration to mark our 28th Annual Romford Christmas Dinner! #Brexit #KeepBritainBlue  
Most likely to be a Remoaner? Antidemocratic, violence encouraging, New European writers who's paper is only fit to put under a litter tray.Most likely to be a Leave voter?Someone who respects democracy. #Brexit is the combined knowledge of people who know better!#Fact 
Only a BC Liberal would argue that #bcpoli democracy is undermined by holding a referendum.  Duh!  
Reminder: This year the Maine GOP repealed a voter referendum and lowered tipped workers' minimum wage  #FightFor15 
Brexit: Theresa May to discuss end deal with ministers  
Interesting.Labour's support among the young is quite dependent on them thinking Labour is anti-Brexit.Eventually flip-flop Labour will have to pick a side in the Brexit convo.  
A legal marijuana referendum will be on the Cook County ballot in March 
One does realise that 2 years of absorbing EU legislation without a say during "transition" gives the #EU lots of opportunities to force the #UK to accept all sorts of tax-evasion laws, completely thwarting the monstrously wealthy loons who backed #Brexit? 
The stakes are high because almost all experts predict that Britain’s departure, known as Brexit, will hurt the British economy more than staying would.  
“At a time when the peculiarly British view of Ireland has again been magnified by the Brexit negotiations, there are many echoes of Britain’s perpetual misunderstanding of the Irish condition.”  
Labour's quandary on #Brexit is due to it cynically appealing to both Leavers & Remainers by being ambiguous, so it cannot now lead with a positionWhilst this is understandable it's *not* honourable, honest, straightforward politicsIt's that simple 
Theresa May to defy Brussels and insist UK will start striking new trade deals after Brexit. We hope! So it’s ‘hard Brexit’ after all the charade?  
Brexit is the opposite of ‘taking back control’.The case for leaving the EU was sold on a lie. Those of us who oppose Brexit need to hammer this home relentlessly, says Lord Mandelson.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
He may as well just say: 'working class opinion doesn't count'. #ForTheMany "Tony Blair says stopping Brexit more important than Labour winning next election".  
May to pitch status quo Brexit transition to parliament  
Vassal states, traitors and enemies of the people: the political lexicon of Brexit is a reminder of the dangers of populism.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
.@JamesCleverly says he disagrees with Nadine Dorries on need for deselection, and that Labour "can't face both ways forever" on Brexit:  
So we have slipped into 2nd last out of 28. Thank you Brexit. Leavers have stuffed this country in every way. #ExitFromBrexit 
Gina Miller favours a second referendum, and points out that the European Union Act 2011 may well legally require this.  
This is why I cannot understand why  any Labour supporters can bear to back #Brexit. Look at the company they're keeping#StopBrexit 
Corbyn: Brexit is part of a right-wing anti-EU endeavour: see @AP today. Why are you supporting Fascists? Where is the internationalism of the Left? You are an obstacle: change or go. 
Food experts warn chlorinated turkey could be on the menu post-Brexit.  
Leaving twitter till after xmas. Brexit will still be brexit and vulnerable people will still be being murdered by this Govt. I hope the new year brings some major changes. Merry Christmas everyone xx 
See @AP today 18/12/17: far-Right political parties met this past weekend in Prague to coordinate opposition to the EU. Brexiters were there. We must fight this. First stop is stopping Brexit. This is serious: RT widely. 
ICYMI - Michael Heseltine says hard #Brexit Tories have 'betrayed' the achievements of Conservative governments /  
@AP Monday 18 December 2017: NB this: the anti-EU endeavour (include Brexit) is a concerted effort of the far-Right across Europe. We must fight it. First stop is stopping Brexit. RT widely: this is serious.  
Brexit: Barnier says 'no way' to a bespoke trade deal for UK. Well, that's clear and the UK will save £40 billion! 
Hi Roberta, I was a leave voter but I’ve come to realise I was led to believe in things that could never be delivered. Please on my behalf do what you can to ensure we hold a referendum on the terms of Brexit. Too many jobs are at stake in the North East @robertabwMP 
Stopping Brexit more important than Labour winning next election, says Tony Blair  
The Irish had the temerity to vote against #LisbonTreaty - so the people were forced to vote again so EU got right result.Same enemies of Democracy are at work over #Brexit#bbcqt #skynews #EUWithdrawalBill #Amendment7#LBCLIVE #Skypapers 
Commentators and politicians are complaining that, thanks to Brexit, politics is getting 'angrier and angrier'. Well, surprise surprise - when the establishment closes ranks to try to weaken or overthrow the largest democratic vote in British history, it pisses people off! 
When the Irish dared vote AGAINST the Lisbon Treaty the EU made them vote again until the right outcome was produced. The same forces are now agitating against the U.K. because we dared vote for Brexit 
Part of the reason for our defeat in the referendum was that we'd spent decades picking holes in the EU in the way one tends to do with a good thing one takes too much for granted. We had forgotten enthusiasm about the EU. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
English nationalism was buried under Britain & empire. The loss of empire & Celtic rejection of British identity has forced it to resurface, pale and bitter, lacking 300 years of history, identifying itself largely through rejection of what is not.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Bob Geldof's Brexit U-turn: 'Hypocritical' leftie admits European Union does NOT work  
The Guardian front page, Monday 18.12.17: Labour the key to soft Brexit, rebels tell May  
Internal TORY politics is now becoming a crueller & harsher GAME.Reflected in their social policies.Which are swept UNDER the radar by the MSM obsession with #Brexit 
Philip Hammond 'labels Michael Gove a liar' during furious row over Brexit NHS promise 
So many great tweets by pro-EU folk on Twitter. I could spend all day retweeting... We are building a really brilliant grassroots movement here!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Tories scared of Brexit, sacred of Corbyn, scared of Boris, scared of the Tory papers are paralysed by fear.So, nothing changes, nothing changes...#ToryBrexitChaos 
Incredibly, or maybe not, 18 months since the Brexit referendum, Cabinet ministers will meet on Monday for their first formal discussions on Britain’s future trade relationship with the EU, with divisions expected over what type of market access they want. 
Let me get this straight. A sane man is radicalised online & commits a barbaric act of Islamist terror shouting "Allahu Akbar", but it has nothing at  all to do with Islam. A mentally ill man horrifically murders an MP shouting "Britain first" and it is obviously due to Brexit? 
.@VinceCable points to poll evidence showing growing majority back a public vote on final Brexit deal @BBCWestminHour 
There’s is only one way to deal with small-minded truculence. #Brexit without further waste of time and energy.   
.@emilythornberry gets her first laugh of the night on @BBCWestminHour with claim that Labour leadership has been “consistent” on its Brexit position 
We should challenge the government to adopt the EU anti tax evasion and money laundering measures regardless of whether we leave or not. See them squirm. Expose what Brexit is really all about. Labour is in a great position to ram this home but... silence. 
Sounds almost as if the head of Goldman Sachs is tonight demanding we vote again in another referendum to overturn the last one? Alongside Blair, Clegg, Mandelson etc. Have bankers no self awareness?  
Isn't it time you stopped the "let's all piss on remainers" stuff? It's childish. For goodness sake grow up. We remainers know there is no going back. Even if Brexit was stopped tomorrow, Britain will never be the same.  
#FBPE #StopBrexit #Brexit The time has come. Gloves off, Brexit now needs to be stopped by a second referendum before we are damned by the stupid and self-interested. Persuade everyone you know to build a head of steam that the UK’s weak politicians will be unable to ignore 
Top Politics Tip: When a government says 'We're not telling you our plan, we're keeping it a secret', it's because…IT HAS NO PLAN#Brexit 
My father is 68. This is happening to us. My late grandfather came over during the Second World War to service the railways as an engineer. Dominica was British until 1978!This is post #Brexit Britain people. 
UK banks tell May: a Canada-style Brexit deal is not good enough  
UK banks getting nervous as penny drops UK heading for a Canada-style brexit deal, 
#Brexit is bad in many ways but the way in which it promotes this kind of vitriolic hatred, as Dominic describes it, will debase the British body politic long after Brexit has been consigned to the dustbin of history. But that is the first step.  
Hands off our holidays! Don’t let Boris and Gove scrap our working time rights after Brexit  
Ministers want to use Brexit to rip up workers’ rights guaranteed by the EU.“Millions could lose their paid holidays and be forced to work ridiculously long hours” - @FrancesOGrady, @The_TUC.The true Brexit agenda is being revealed. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
After all, everyone had a very clear view of what was involved at the time of the referendum. It was so well explained.  
Mrs May on Twitter today: ‘We are getting on with the job of Brexit - and we will not be derailed.’The reality:  
Crocodile tears from Labour.  Leaving the EU puts all these rights on the table.  Staying in protects them.  It's really that simple.If you support "the workers" then educating about & opposing #Brexit is a no brainer.  Anything else is hypocrisy.  
My mother voted #leave because she trusted the commitment to £350m for the NHS. She is angry that promise will not happen. She’s not online, so persuaded by press & bus. Mum wants another referendum. She feels she’s been lied to. #Brexit 
Michael Gove's latest Brexit plot is a straight up attack on workers' rights to paid holidays and breaks  
That’s right. Given that the entire basis of the agreement between Scotland and Westminster will be undermined by Brexit, I believe the Scots have every right to a second referendum when the deal’s done if the political will is there  
#Brexit decision belongs to UK citizens, and I'm not one. But GS built its Euro biz in the UK on certain assumptions, pays taxes and employs thousands of UK citizens concerned about the economy and their futures. On their behalf, at least, I have to be interested in the outcome.  
The important detail here (which further complicates Brexit) is that under the terms of the 1998 peace agreement everyone born in Northern Ireland is eligible for both British and Irish citizenship  
Remember that May NEVER had a mandate for Brexit before the last election and certainly didn't have one after it. Effectively (and she damn well knows it) may is acting AGAINST the national interest. It is a coup, pure and simple and ALL MPs are complicit. 
Anthony Joshua can be forgiven for thinking that's the worst public vote since Brexit. #SPOTY 
The Catalan election campaign is basically like Brexit but with nicer weather.  
Michael Heseltine says hard Brexit Tories have 'betrayed' the achievements of Conservative governments  
Italy 5-star party keeps option on euro referendum open  
The “will of the people” argument wasn’t strong enough to call a ship, Boaty McBoatface; but somehow it’s enough to allow the disaster of Brexit. Democracy - you fickle mistress you! 
Is it possible that Brexit will eventually become so disastrous that almost no one remembers supporting it? Like the Iraq war.  
Michael Gove let the cat out of the bag when he revealed what Tory Brexiteers really want- to scrap the Working Time Directive. First of many  workers rights to go. Working class people didn’t Vote #Brexit for a bonfire of their rights at work. 
"'The British people have spoken.' No they haven’t!" - @RichardDawkins’s take on Brexit this March was our most watched #Viewsnight of 2017 #NewsnightAdventCalendar 
I'm no expert, but this sounds to me like the suicide of Theresa May as leader of Britain. And the death of the Brexit deal ? Bri  
Children and teenagers under 18 in the UK can't vote. No MP represents them in parliament. But that doesn't mean long term decisions should be made without considering how they'll be affected.Brexit provides ABSOLUTELY NO BENEFITS AT ALL for our future generations.#StopBrexit 
Stopping Brexit more important than Labour winning next election, says Tony Blair  
There's concern in Amsterdam about a lack of homes for Brexit refugees  
Tory rebels urge Theresa May to form cross-party alliance for soft Brexit  
91% of MPs voted for the EU referendum to take place. 78% voted to trigger Article 50. And only 6 months ago 90% were elected on platforms committed to Brexit. Wonder what the average voter thinks when they come on Twitter & see MPs cheering a pro-Remain bounce among non-voters 
Great to see that Yorkshire & The Humber is now 57%/43% in favour of #Remain on this new poll. You can no longer fairly describe the North as pro-#Brexit.  
BFE: "Brexit MUST be STOPPED!" #8: Families Ripped Apart! RT #StopBrexit 
No way, Mrs May: There’s no having our cake and eating it.Brexiters “have to realise there won’t be any cherry picking,” says EU negotiator @MichelBarnier.Brexit was mis-sold to a minority of the electorate using lies. It’s time to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
There are only two ways out of the Catalan quagmire: an agreed independence referendum or wider reforms  
I'm sick of charlatans like yourself trying to over simplify Brexit.The "complications" you mention are the same obstacles previously dismissed as "project fear".Stop bitching just because reality didn't yield to your ludicrous fantasy. 
Are you listening @jeremycorbyn?The people want to RemainLabour voters want to RemainYoung people who put their trust in you, with futures at stake, want to RemainPoverty,homelessness,the NHS crisis all made worse by BrexitIs it about the people?Or is it about you?  
If you’re serious about Remaining, this week’s @RemainiacsCast is an essential listen. @nick_clegg with some important tactical input - it has to be Parliament to apply the brakes, soon; only then is there a chance of a #FinalSay referendum and a way out.  
'I've seen secret Brexit impact papers' says SNP MP FORGET 'Impact assessment papers'......BREXIT IS AN EMBARRASSMENT TO THE UK!!!! 
How many times do I need to repeat this, Barnier? 43 countries with a combined GDP of almost FOUR TIMES that of the EU27's want post-Brexit free trade deals with the UK.  
This is so outrageously obvious to those who didn’t vote for Brexit that it’s almost surreal to have to point it out. But blind faith isn’t called blind faith for nothing  
The public are sick of Parliament needlessly complicating Brexit and we need to 'end the delays' @BrexitCentral  
Environment Secretary Michael Gove and others will begin a push tomorrow for the UK to abandon the EU working time directive - which protects employees from working more than 48 hours in a week.So THAT'S what Brexit is really about. 
Really ?  As the trial pointed out.  Jo Cox was a campaigner for Remain and was assassinated a week before the referendum. The murderer shouted “Britain First”.  
Before the referendum you argued correctly that 'only a madman would leave the Single Market' @OwenPatersonIt is bizarre you now don your rose coloured Brexit Specs and call for needless economic damage. #StopBrexit 
We are deciding a constitutional issue - not a TV poll. In most countries any change would require a 2/3 majority and a simple majority in each of the constituent parts. So confirmatory referendum is surely not too much to ask. 
“Reversing Brexit now would be divisive and undemocratic.”Allow me to correct you, @SuellaFernandes: “Continuing Brexit now would be divisive and utterly idiotic.”You’re welcome.   
Netherlands: Nexit party FvD (ties to EFDD and UKIP) now third largest party in the country, hitting new record high of 10% (peil.nl poll). #Nexit #Brexit #FvD 
The Working Time Regulations are the incorporation of the *EU* Working Time Directive into GB law, and yet Labour will *still* not stand up and unequivocally oppose #Brexit. You're failing working folk. 
David Davis has lied to public and parliament over sharing #brexit assessments or incompetence.Now betting on a result he has an impact on would get you suspended for a long time in most sports.@JolyonMaugham how can he get away legally with this?? 
16 Brexit Christmas cracker jokes which will make or break your Christmas party -  
Why are the majority (supposedly) of the constituents in Brighton Pavilion so keen for Britain have a second referendum on the EU?  We've had one. Every one of those Brightonians had an opportunity to vote in a national referendum in 2016, and the UK voted to Leave. 
Reversing Brexit now would be divisive and undemocratic: it would destroy the trust of the British people, warns @SuellaFernandes  
The British public has swung behind staying in the EU by its largest margin since the referendum, with those backing Remain outstripping Leavers by ten points.  
You @theresa_may have no right to speak on this. Your rhetoric of "subverting democracy" and the "will of the people" has demonised opponents of #Brexit as enemies of the people. It is the language of tyranny, and an incitement to hatred & violence. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Former diplomat to lead Remainers' campaigns to shift public opinion on Brexit.“There has never been a more gross example of mis-selling than the Leave campaign” - @BestForBritain chair Lord @Malloch_Brown. Time to “stop the trainwreck” & #StopBrexit. 
HEATH (Accession 1972) NO REFERENDUMTHATCHER (Single Market 1986) NO REFERENDUMMAJOR (Maastricht 1992) NO REFERENDUMBLAIR (Amsterdam 1997, Nice 2001) NO REFERENDABROWN (Lisbon 2007)  NO REFERENDUMEU REFERENDUM held 23 June 2016. The UK voted by 1,269,501 votes to Leave. 
Boom! This is why you get those 'just leave now' cries of desperation. They are TERRIFIED of a 3-pronged problem; dying Brexit voters, better information for those fooled by the bus and young people refusing to be shafted next time.  
Petition: Tell the PM to face down Boris & Gove's Brexit plan to scrap our holiday rights  #stopbrexit #exitfrombrexit #bremain 
Abuse, egg attacks, and a vandalised car — Nigel Farage says his life is 'miserable' after Brexit  
Time for Brexiteers to get on with what's necessary for the constitutional integrity, freedom & sovereignty of our nation @OwenPaterson @michaelgove SW1 bubble dismissing Brexit fails to realise it's first punch on establishments face. A transition  sell out will cause hell  
Chile’s presidential vote Sunday is seen as a referendum on its moderate establishment  
Not content with stirring lunatic anti-govt conspiracy over the Grenfell death toll, it would appear David now wants to lie over workers rights post-Brexit.Someone, somewhere, voted for this clown.  
BMG Research: "Our polling suggests that about a year ago, those who did not vote in the referendum were broadly split, but today's poll shows that they are now overwhelmingly in favour of remaining in the EU, by a margin of more than four to one." Tide turning! #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Brexit isn't the "will of the people". It was the preference of just over 1/3rd of those eligible to vote in a 1-day opinion poll. The division thus created will take years to heal & will be even harder in an impoverished, isolated country. #StopBrexitHour 
Lab are taking the p*ss out of everyone on Brexit, especially all those voters who think it is really important and merits clarity.  
Read below on how @BestforBritain Board Chair is helping to gather together the movement to stay in the EU.Former diplomat to lead remainers' bid to shift public opinion on Brexit  
Given the state of things as they are now: Should the UK continue with #Brexit? #RecycleElectrons #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Diane Abbott: “We’ve never supported a second referendum.” “Well, you did Diane…” 
Robert Shrimsley: The art of (Brexit) negotiation — 'Nothing is agreed till everything is agreed'  
Brexit is putting me off this whole ‘will of the people’ idea | Matthew d’Ancona  
“The British public are too stupid to be involved in governing themselves” - Edward Heath, when asked why he lied to Parliament and the British people to get Britain into the EU.#Brexit  
NoThis is WRONG “..NHS is also a casualty of #Brexit..”Very very wrongOur #NHS is a casualty of 7+ yrs of Tory underfundingOur #NHS is a casualty of 7+ yrs of Tory GovtOur #NHS is a casualty of 7+ yrs of Tory understaffingOur #NHS is a casualty of 7+ yrs of Tories 
BREXIT GLOOM: UK banks tell May: a Canada-style Brexit deal is not good enough / #Brexit #StopBrexit #Finance 
The BBC states that family reunification rights in the latest #Brexit deal extend to future spouses/partners. This is not correct. They only extend to spouses/partners at the time of withdrawal (future ones still up for discussion btwn EU/UK) 1/2  
Seem to have upset a few Tories by stating I have no desire to be friends with them on @JPonpolitics show today.I do of course work pragmatically with MP's from all parties on my Select Committee, the Brexit shambles etc- just won't be drinking buddies. A non story really. 
Theresa May says she'll not be derailed on #Brexit. Remember when she swore blind that there'd be no snap election? Yup. Time to #StopBrexit. We're winning, so keep the pressure on, #Remainers! 
Boris & Gove's plan to scrap our holiday rights shows Brexit is not the destination for the Brexit fanatics, but merely a doorway to sweatshop Britain.To keep our rights in perpetuity, we believe we need Remain in the European Union.#StopBrexit 
Petition: Tell the PM to face down Boris & Gove's Brexit plan to scrap our holiday rights  
“The working time directive gave nearly five million women paid holidays for the first time. No-one voted for #Brexit to lose out on holidays, or to hand power over to bad bosses” - @FrancesOGrady#EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitDeal #FBPE 
This is what Brexit is really about, with the leave campaign funded by millionaires and billionaires so they don't have to pay tax  
Theresa May still living in a fantasy world, David Davis with his “Canada plus plus plus”  isn’t going to happen, Theresa hasn’t sewn up anything, she’s trying to give the impression alls well with Brexit and it just isn’t the case, she’s the puppet   
All the constitutional, borders and Brexit problems plaguing the British Isles might readily be solved by English independence ... Well, I've long thought that the UK is most likely to be broken up by English (not Scottish, Irish or Welsh) nationalism  
Brexit was inevitable from the day we decided to not join the Euro. 
The stupidity.and arrogance of Leavers like @CallMeRonnie69 is the reason why Brexit will never work.  
Barnier’s interview with Prospect explodes the Cabinet myth that we can have our Brexit cake and eat it: Norway style free trade with Canada freedom on rules isn’t an option. It’s one or other. Or as this cabinet hits bottom, neither.  
“May still thinks she can get a deal that preserves UK trade with Europe but allows us to diverge from EU rules when we wish. She is dancing on the head of a pin that doesn’t exist.”#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #StopBrexitHour 
The UK vote on Brexit:28% Couldn't Vote25% Voted Remain20% Didn't VoteOnly 27% Voted Leave.Scotland conned into refusing self-governance by a small margin on guarantee it meant staying in the EU.  Gibraltar voted almost 98% Remain.The will of the people, my *"!!. 
Labour is now a Remain Party.Corbyn played a game at the election - he appealed to Leave voters in Midlands & up North saying 'Trust Labour - he went down South & said 'Nudge, nudge, wink, wink, I want to protect the single market & champion #EU'#Brexit 
Murdoch's papers coverage of bosses ability to force us to work more post #brexit was illustrated with "slave shackles" being broken. Think about that for a moment. The removal of workers' rights sold as workers' freedom. Think long & hard about that & then think about it again.  
I don’t see why Scotland should support a second EU referendum. We voted correctly the first time. 
Labour confusion over second EU referendum as Remain support grows . A second referendum must be called, it’s an imperative now.#FBPE 
If I were #British I'd buy lots of guns and ammo, otherwise you guys are gonna be sorry.#Brexit #MAGA #DC #London 
The Labour position on Brexit is not a confused shambles, it is a deliberate cynical piece of positioning and party management. Cake having and eating as political messaging. 
This was always what #Brexit was about: removing all our rights, food and environmental standards, so no barriers to profit for the few.  
The EU made it clear before the referendum, there is no 'special arrangement' post Brexit. The Brexiteers lied, all that is left is a hard WTO Brexit and even that doesn't exist. So BREXIT doesn't exist. Suck that up! 
.@vincecable: It will be a long process to get to the point when the Government concedes a referendum must happen. Eventually, though, a poll to get them out of a mess of their creation – an Exit from Botched Brexit – could prove too tempting to ignore.  
After #Brexit workers' rights, of any sort, will be at constant danger of being undermined by UK govts. That's why workers' rights are best defended by remaining in the EU. With the changing public in opinion polls, it is time for Labour to recognise that @Manuel_TSSA @Labour4EU 
I asked a couple of newfound post-ref. trade enthusiasts who were on a bent about #Brexit + Global Britain this week what they thought of WTO appellate body dramatics + #MC11 developments. Just to make conversation, not to make a point. They had no idea what I was talking about 
The public are sick of Parliament needlessly complicating Brexit and we need to ‘end the delays’By Iain Duncan Smith via @TheSun  
“Has #Ireland just saved the UK from the madness of a hard #Brexit ? And if it’s a soft Brexit, why bother?” asks Fintan O’Toole (@fotoole ) in @IrishTimes 
Brexit deal gives more rights to Irish passport holders, experts say  
2/2 @Number10gov will be abandoning British workers if PM fails to publicly reject the watering down of #workersrights after #Brexit 
To be fair to Diane Abbott, why should she know Labour's Brexit policy? nobody else does 
1/2 British workers should not have to pay the price for weak leadership by @Number10gov Today's reports are yet more evidence that senior tories want to use #Brexit to rip up #workersrights 
I will always be pro-EU & for #StopBrexit. Soft Brexit is next to impossible & pointless. However I'm curious as to what Remainers think is the best approach for changing public opinion. What language is best when conversing with leavers? Please vote & retweet for larger sample. 
I've been working out how much money my family's lost by not sending our kids up the chimneys. Shocking. Bring on Brexit!  
It would help if the #BBC didn't restrict its vox pop interviews on #Brexit to old codgers out shopping. Youngsters, too, next time, please! It's their future at stake. 
I'm sure you know about this already, but just in case @mrjamesob @acgrayling @ThatTimWalker @RCorbettMEP @thatginamiller @nickreeves9876 @grahambsi @Andrew_Adonis @BenPBradshaw @CarolineLucas @vincecable #StopBrexit #StopBrexit2018  
Lack of eurozone reform outranks Brexit as the EU’s biggest threat  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May 'will not be derailed' on Brexit  
We voted, you appear to have misunderstood the result. To clarify for you the 'will of the people' was to LEAVE #Brexit  
Daily Mail desperately raking over Meghan Markle’s past try to find dirt. All they’ve managed  is that she once emptied bins at an ice cream parlour and went on anti-Brexit march. Of course both of these only make us love her more. 
On the advice of the BAI we’re pulling all hosts, guest, actors, and crew who are either pro or anti-choice from all Irish programming until after the referendum. 
ISIS would win very easily, IRA a bunch of nancyboys. ISIS would laugh at phoning in a bomb threat, Soft Brexit terrorism  
Brilliant news for trade after Brexit. More trade with China is a huge opportunity for the UK. Well done @David_Cameron. 
While Farage states he is a victim of abuse, it's also worth remembering the Brexit vote led to the highest ever surge in racial and religious hate crimes - a 23% increase. 
Farage moans he's skint despite living in a £4 million house, an £90,000 salary & sitting on a £73,000 a year MEP pension.Suck it up Nigel, thanks to Brexit, on average, households are losing £600 a year   
Brexit transition deal will 'replicate the status quo', Hammond says.Brexit achieves nothing except destruction and distraction. And a transition deal strips us of our voting rights.Better to Remain in the EU. #ExtendArticle50. #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Barnier: Britain must 'face the consequences' of Brexit So should EU Car manufactures,  wine, cheese exporters of £70bn Trade Deficit. YOU need UK more than we need you!  
Thought you might appreciate a packaging update to show how supportive of Brexit Tate & Lyle are, both publicly and in shadowy deals behind closed doors.  
NEWS! Diane Abbott refuses to back second referendum because she can’t count that far  
The public are sick of Parliament needlessly complicating Brexit - we need to end the delays, says Iain Duncan Smith  
An update from me on #Brexit; the latest in my series of #DespiteBrexit good news economic stories from across the UK  
Call off Brexit bullies or face defeat, Conservative peers tell May  
He did campaign for Brexit. So that’s one. 
Farage reveals REAL REASON behind Brexit shock  
Is this woman the biggest hypocrite in Britain?Decries the “bullying” of ministers before calling DUP MPs “extremists”.Claimed she doesn’t agree with referenda, now wants a second #Brexit referendum.She is EVERYTHING that is wrong with UK politics..  
The most significant intervention of the Brexit debate so far: Barnier tells @prospect_uk there’s ‘no way’ May can cherry pick between Canada and Norway models. As UK magical thinking is exposed, more important than ever to keep No Brexit as an option.  
It seems @JonathanPieNews might have overdone it on the eggnog. He's annoyingly happy & even #Brexit wont bring the mood down. Watch Jonathan's festive message:  Merry Christmas 
The man behind Vote Leave accuses 'zombie' Remainers of trying to overturn Brexit I don't know what concept of democracy Matthew Elliott supports, but the one I support allows people to peacefully campaign for things that are important to them?! 
Brexiteers requesting a new stamp to commemorate Brexit, here it is:  
Compiling a top ten favourite @UKLabour positions on a second referendum is proving trickier than expected. 
Today is an important step on the road to delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit and forging our deep and special future partnership.  
More evidence that @UKLabour are not respecting the decision of #Brexit by the public. One of the major reasons people backed Brexit was to stop the ECJ's authority over UK law. Labour want to REMAIN in the #EU and will NOT deliver Brexit.  
Labour confusion over second EU referendum as Remain support grows  
In contrast to struggling Brexit Britain, the Irish economy surges to double-digit growth....  
I was born in the rough and ready year of 1923 in Barnsley to a family that had been miners for as long as there had been pits in Yorkshire. So, I've known the heartache of poverty but I can tell you #Brexit won't deliver anything for the working class but more penury.  
Movement against Brexit gains momentum in UK #StopBrexit #FBPE #FollowBackProEU #FinalSayForAll UK in EU is best for both. @mikegalsworthy @nickynoo007 @AlexTaylorNews @Scientists4EU @PulseofEurope @JoeWatts_ @Independent 
.@SarahLudford - "There must be an #ExitFromBrexit opportunity, where people can say whether the Conservatives Brexit Deal really cuts the mustard" 
Excellent blog by @StevePeers on the Working Time Directive and what abolishing it post-Brexit woull *really* mean.   I'd just add that Sun claim that Directive "costs average family £1,200" is simply invented. 
May delusional as public support for Brexit collapses. She thinks Brexit will be her 'El Alamein'. It will be her 'Dien Bien Phu'.  
It's his ego for posterity, not the prosperity, safety and sovereignty of the people he once led: Tony Blair confirms he is working to reverse Brexit 
On today’s #SalmondOnSunday, live @LBC now:- Brexit: The PM will “not be derailed”- Scottish Budget- Bishop’s call for crackdown on internet Christmas Day shoppingHave your say... 0345 60 60 973 84850 @LBC 
My take on why #Brexit not only adversely impacts on unis but also on fight against sexual violence & online abuse  
How much of a risk, post-Brexit, does the EU27 want to place on its massive and mounting trade surplus with the UK?£71,800,000,000 in 2016£67,800,000,000 in 2015£58,800,000,000 in 2014£55,500,000,000 in 2013£41,200,000,000 in 2012£22,400,000,000 in 2011 
Increasingly convinced it’s not the EU referendum that has toxified politics in this country, it’s the entryist hijacking of the Labour Party.  
Change is in the air: “ Senior ex-diplomat to advise pro-EU campaigns before Brexit deal vote “ 
'They want to delay it as LONG as possible' Bone launches attack on anti-Brexit peers  
Brexit: deliberately throwing away the peace and prosperity we’ve carefully built and returning to spending millions fighting our neighbours  
Important statement - all to play for in the Labour party. By next summer, no way will Jeremy be supporting a ‘Tory Brexit’!  
Elliot is wrong. We, or at least I, are not hiding a plot to overturn Brexit. We're actively and openly trying to overturn Brexit.  
@faisalislam just published this exclusive interview in which Barnier says "no way" to a bespoke Brexit - it's Canada or Norway  
BREXIT: #Article50 is clear. Any country invoking the article leaves after 2 years. There is no article covering divorce payments or additional ties to SM CU or defence (covered by NATO) > hard soft phase 1 phase 2 = EU are making the rules up as they go along trying to halt exit 
When nationalism rears its head in an established nation it almost always represents a power-grab by a group that is at best careless of democracy, and almost always results in damage being inflicted on the society.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Most read this week - a real and shocking conspiracy of Brexit interests sitting in plain sight - Tate and Lyle, Belize and Big Sugar.  
This is the thing I can't understand. The majority of over 60's voted for #Brexit. They enjoyed 40 years of freedoms (many having settled in the EU), only to deny them to their own grandchildren. So totally selfish. I'd like to hear one defend that decision. 
.@MichelBarnier bursts the Brexiter's imaginary bubble! "There is “no way” that Britain will EVER achieve the sort of uniquely advantageous, bespoke Brexit deal that May has continually implied should be possible.". 
"They have to face the consequences of their own decision": Michel Barnier speaks exclusively on the UK's Brexit position  via @prospect_uk 
Back off our waters EU! Gove to get his own NAVY to patrol UK seas after Brexit  
Irish passport holders in Northern Ireland set to have more rights post Brexit than British passports holders in N Ireland.  
It's bizarre that anyone can think leaving the EU and going into a world of ruthless capitalist competition, and tax-dodging multinationals & billionaires is going to deliver some kind of British socialism. #Corbyn #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Breaks mean breaks! Stop Boris & Gove's  plan to cut back our working time rights after Brexit  
The year is 2050, Britain left the EU a few decades ago & Corbyn has decided to call a press conference to finally reveal what Labour's position on Brexit was after all this time.  
Sorry, Matthew, it isn't us "Zombie" Remainers who are preventing Brexit from working. It's the inherent impossibility of Brexit itself.  
Senior ex-diplomat to advise pro-EU campaigns before Brexit deal vote  
We cannot be an EU colony for 2 years to 2021, accepting new laws made without any say so of British people or Parliament or Govt.That is not leaving EU, that is being a vassal state of #EU & I would be very surprised if that is Government policy.#Brexit 
.@vincecable was on @JPonpolitics this morning talking about why the public need to have the final say on the Brexit deal, and how the @LibDems are fighting to put this into law this week. 
Good to see @davidcameron_n using his contacts to benefit economy with £750m UK-China fund. Very helpful after Brexit 
This is really not about allowing people to control their overtime. This is about enabling an attack on statutory holidays and holiday pay. This is what the Brexit establishment wants.#StopBrexit#referendum2018#FBPE 
Facebook and Twitter say There was practically zero Russian influence on Brexit. They're being told to look again.  
Brexit to be funded by the exploitation of UK workers  via @richardjmurphy 
Senior ex-diplomat to advise pro-EU campaigns before Brexit deal vote  
Brexit deal gives more rights to Irish passport holders, experts say  
If nothing else, Brexit has opened the eyes of ordinary British people to the extreme extent than we are being hoodwinked on a grand scale by the "system" which has been forced to break cover:> Our Westminster government> The EU > The sinister Globalisers like Blair and Soros 
I dont know but @UKLabour should have debated #Brexit at conference rather than try & hide the squabbling, because we all see it now!Diane Abbot last week - 2nd referendumToday -  No referendumTom Watson today - referendum possible.I am confused.  
The sneering attitude of liberal elite towards those who voted Brexit slammed by Dame Louise Casey (ex senior adviser to four PMs over two decades) said patronising snobs brand people uneducated yet they have no valid reason for remaining, who are the fools I ask. 
Interesting that the Working Time Regs are identified as the first possible post-Brexit workers’ rights casualty /1 
So remain is now 10 points ahead of leave. Brexit is NOT the will of the people @theresa_may 
51% of Britons now want to stay in the EU - the largest Remain lead since Referendum  
"Those who are now pushing for a harder Brexit were on the margins of our  party. They were always there, but they are the ones who have betrayed the achievements of Conservative governments from the 1950s onwards."               
True. I’m retired and I voted to remain but the truth is that many old people who voted Leave won’t be around to witness the damage inflicted by Brexit on young people. 
My guess is, they know the UK can have the Consevative Party, or Brexit, but it can't have both. Being flexible, dynamic, and pragmatic is their way of making sure they don't suffer the same fate.  
New for 2018Tron Brexit.  
Brexit voters were ‘mainly driven by taking back control of law-making powers from EU’ - not racism, a major new study has found  
BloggedWorkers' rights: the Brexit bonfire begins?Government plans to scrap the working time Directive - and porkies in the S*n 
Reversing Brexit now would be divisive and undemocratic: it would destroy the trust of the British people:  
Diane Abbott: Listen to CBI and NHS' on Brexit migration  
.“Nearly 90% of business owners in Scotland do not trust the UK government to secure the best Brexit deal.". 
RT - Tory ministers already looking to scrap workers rights at their cabinet meeting tomorrow.Scrapping holiday pay Safe working hours The right to breaks Tory hardliners will use #Brexit as an excuse to hammer workers into the ground. 
Brexit leads to higher wages for working class & wage competition among businesses. All going according to plan! 1/2  
I hear a lot of Tory EU rebels - eg Nicky Morgan - pulled out of broadcast stuff today, late on Friday. A good sign a deal is done over Brexit date rebellion. 
Let’s not let Brexit divide remainers by sneering at one generation or another. Those progressive baby boomers stand united with our younger generation who oppose Brexit. It’s frustrating to be lumped together with reactionary people with whom I share no common cause. 
'Brexit is the opposite of ‘taking back control’ – we must think again'  
British workers set for post-Brexit overtime boom as ministers plot to scrap EU limits  
Top 5 seats for petition calling to Leave EU now:Bexhill & BattleFolkstone & HytheLouth & HorncastleBoston & SkegnessClactonTop 5 seats for petition calling for referendum on final Brexit deal:CambridgeBristol East Hornsey Wood GreenBrighton PavilionOxford West 
Daily Mail & Express know this well, but as they become increasingly desperate to shore up collapsing support for Brexit they will continue to put lives at risk & use their most powerful weapon: inciting rage. They’re in a war & they’re using weapons of war. We must stop them  
I hate Brexit a little bit more every day 
Even the Mail is reporting this poll... Even Mail readers will know that #Brexit is no longer the "will of the people".#StopBrexit #FBPE 
We are getting on with the job of Brexit - and we will not be derailed:  
EU Workers' Rights are protecting workers & helping to increase productivity all over the EU. The Brexit Press are aiming at this when the UK has the lowest wage growth & one of the most insecure employment profiles in the EU. Contributing to in-work poverty & low productivity.  
Help us tell the PM she needs to face down Boris & Gove's plan to scrap our holiday rights after Brexit. Sign the petition:  
As an unapologetic #Remainer this is my manifesto - I will: not "get behind" or "get over" #Brexit work hard to stop it fight lies with truth hold Gov't accountable counter emotion with evidence act with humility, honesty & integrity#StopBrexit 
Petition:Leave EU immediately: Why wait another 18 months?Well done everyone, a fantastic response...114,268 signatures & counting...Looking forward to the Parliamentary debate.If you want to sign, please do - every little helps...#Brexit #EU 
Andrew Marr searches in vain for answers from Diane Abbott on Labour’s Brexit policy and gets empty, rehearsed blather and evasiveness in return.  
Abuse, egg attacks, and a vandalised car — Nigel Farage says his life is 'miserable' after Brexit  
Help me understand what Labour’s position is. So far I’ve heard Corbyn say they won’t rule out second referendum. Diane Abbott last month backed second referendum but today rules out second referendum. Tom Watson today doesn't rule out second referendum. 
This is the opposite of what scrapping workers rights means. As we always feared Brexit is becoming an excuse to scrap laws protecting workers and their hard-won rights - the Working Time Directive stops workers being forced to do overtime and lets them choose to do so  
Let"s be crystal clear, #Brexit will be used to deregulate and attack workers rights - thinking otherwise is delusional nonsense!  
Remember the passage of the Coughlan judgment when the High Court said "referendum campaigners may not appear on cookery shows"? Me neither.The blunt stopwatch approach is bad enough. This is just risible. 
This morning I was on @daily_politics discussing Brexit and how only a Labour government can deliver the policies needed for the many.  
Another #RemaineNow......every day we are seeing more and more decent people open about the fact that they have changed their minds as the reality of #Brexit emerges. Are you listening @Number10gov @CCHQPress @Keir_Starmer @LordsEUCom @CommonsEUexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Jeremy Corbyn, three weeks ago: Doesn't rule out second referendumDiane Abbott, two weeks ago: Backs second referendumDiane Abbott, today: Rules out second referendumTom Watson, today: Doesn't rule out second referendum 
LISTEN: @Tom_Watson Says Second Referendum Possible An Hour After @HackneyAbbott Rules It Out  
Demonstrates spinelessness and culpability of #LabourParty leadership on #Brexit. Amazing that people who built their brand around rebellion and being independent-minded are terrified of offending anyone.  
“Amid all the noise, we are getting on with the job” says May. Theresa, the noise is the British people clamouring that #Brexit is a huge mistake.#StopTheMadness #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Environment Secretary @michaelgove will get his 'own navy' to repel foreign trawlers trying to fish illegally in the UK's waters after Brexit  
Tory MP Heidi Allen's South Cambridgehire constiuency voted 61.6% RemainTory MP Stephen Hammond's Wimbledon voted 73% RemainSo Tories who are calling for their deselections for voting against their govt should remember this #Brexit #bbcsp #Marr 
Perhaps the most dispiriting thing about Brexit is the childishness of so many of its advocates. 
Interesting poll on brexit. Demonstrates clearly why both Labour and Conservatives are having difficulty formulating policy that doesn’t split their voters and their MPs. The divide is around age primarily, also education, although labour vote > 70% remain is surprising to me.  
Oh yes you did Ken, but nice try. To be fair, Ken is such a huge political figure, he is possibly the only rebel, one cannot accuse of inconsistency. He would demolish #Brexit and ignore the #EUREF result is a heartbeat- and do it with honour bcse he has always believed in the EU 
Barry Gardiner on #paterson: "The Labour Party has not said we will have a second referendum"Diane Abbott on #marr: "The Labour Party does not support a second referendum"Tom Watson on #pienaar: We "cant rule out" a second referendum¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
.@vincecable calls for Labour to back a vote on the Brexit deal.  "The problem with the position of Jeremy Corbyn’s and John McDonnell’s Labour is that they keep saying they won’t rule things out - it’s about time they started ruling things in.”  
."People born in N Ireland who carry Irish passports could have MORE rights after Brexit than those who carry British passports." . 
…and in so doing destroy the Scottish economy.  Explained to him face to face last Tuesday the problem in Highlands & Islands where fifth of workforce due to retire in next few years but like most of @GovUk seems ideologically fixated and impervious to reason and facts. #Brexit  
Outnumbered, defeated … where next for the diehard Brexiters?A tiny minority in the Commons for an extreme Brexit has held the country to ransom. Now, Remainers are fighting back.Keep up the campaign to #StopBrexit. And #FollowBackProEU. #FBPE. 
Brexit: Theresa May says she 'will not be derailed'  
Corbyn himself hasn't ruled out backing a second EU referendum: "We’ve not made any decision on a second referendum".  
Do the Brexiters quoting Irish independence as a model for Brexit in interviews with Guardian journalists understand the territorial and human cost the Irish paid between 1919-1923? 
Notable that we are now hearing a concerted effort from PM to reassure “those who voted Remain” over avoiding a cliff-edge/ chaotic Brexit, in addition to the “will of the people” 
What Irish commentators (especially on Marian Finucane) often don't grasp about Brexit is that the British working class favours it.  Labour MPs may be remainers but their voters, especially in north, are not. This came out starkly on Dimbleby's QT this week. 
If Brexit is going badly, it’s the fault of the Brexit elite: stop trying to blame the 48 per cent 
The @BMGResearch Remain-Leave poll tracker showed 11 point Remain lead - polling done, mainly before and on day of “sufficient progress” (5-8 Dec).Interesting thing: like Survation driven not by net Remain-Leave traffic, but referendum non-voters now falling heaving Remain  
"It is totally absurd to say that this is helping Jeremy Corbyn and weakening Theresa May" - Ken Clarke on Wednesday's Brexit vote #bbcsp 
Peter Lilley making absurd claims that Brexit trade deal could be done "in an afternoon" and businesses would "prefer WTO rules" - smart, clear & calm take down from @NinaDSchick 
Diane Abbott on #Marr: "The Labour Party does not support a second referendum"Tom Watson on #Pienaar:  We "can't rule out" a second referendum 
Last week: 11 MPs give Parliament a meaningful #Brexit vote.Papers: “Traitors! Mutineers!” This weekend: Johnson, IDS, Bone, Jones systematically undermine May on #Brexit.Papers: put it cheerfully on their front pages.  
NADINE DORRIES: 'We have to see an end game'.ME: Absolutely we need this #Brexit ended asap...the majority of the People no longer want it..it is NOT the WILL of the PEOPLE...it never was...polls are consistently proving this. You & the Govt no longer represent us.#StopBrexit 
I voted for #Brexit and I’m educated.I got a feeling I'm not the only one. R/T if you’re like me. 
Wrong: In order to maximise the opportunities of Brexit, we must have control over our tariff schedules, and we must have control over our domestic regulation.If we do not, no country will want to negotiate with us, and we will not be able to make any domestic improvements.  
New poll shows a 10-point lead for Remain. Largest yet since referendum.Remain: 51%  Leave: 41%Poll widens if don’t knows for ed to give answer. 
2017 has taught us to never take one poll too seriously... but there is growing evidence that as the reality of Brexit becomes clear, the lies of the Leave campaign are exposed and the facts change that people are changing their mind.  
.@NadineDorries says the "real heroes" are the Conservative MPs, who campaigned for Remain but stood on a manifesto to deliver Brexit. "Some of the rebels could perhaps learn a lesson from their Remain colleagues, who know the right thing to do is to deliver Brexit." #bbcsp 
Someone tell @MarrShow and @BBC that no Remainer accepts Brexit will happen and more than half the country want it stopped. It's time the BBC stopped trying to gaslight their viewers into believing politicians' lies. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Michael Heseltine says hard Brexit Tories have 'betrayed' the achievements of Conservative governments  
Diane Abbott has just confirmed where Labour stand on Brexit:  
Don’t buy into the inevitability line peddled by a few hardline Brexit nutters in the Tory Party who want us out by Christmas. The truth is that you - citizens - are in charge. You have the right to change your mind and the right to be listened to  
Diane Abbott: “We’ve never supported a second referendum.”Andrew Marr: “Well you did…”  
The PM promised not to weaken workers' rights after Brexit. This will test if she can keep her word, or if she's a prisoner of extremists in her own cabinet. 
This is exactly what Nick Clegg says on this week’s show: “The key phrase being deployed among senior Brexiters is: ‘Eyes on the prize.’ Just ensure Brexit happens. Everything else can be dealt with later.”Once we’re out they think they can do anything.   
WATCH | Dopey Diane Abbott says she wants to make it even easier for immigrants to flood into Britain after Brexit & boasts that Labour wants "an element of staying in the Single Market and Customs Union".Totally brazen betrayal of 17.4m voters! 
So much Brexit analysis in the media is the sound of pundits waking up to the things Eurosceptics actually want.  The pundits feel the need to call it “soft Brexit” as it dawns on them that it’s not so unreasonable after all.  1/2 
Although it has to be said none of what is happening to him is "the price of Brexit". We are all paying "the price of Brexit". He is paying the price of being an irredeemable wankstain. 
Proof aim of Brexit fanatics is to attack worker protections and rights  
One BMG poll with a tiny sample? Compared to 17.4million people that voted for Brexit? When will Lib Dems stop trying to frustrate the will of people and understand democracy. To cite one BMG poll as a reason not to is just embarrassing.  
Family worried how grandad will manage without hard Brexit 
Politicians be warned. If you push through #Brexit against the will of the majority (an ever more likely scenario), and things do not go well, then the consequences for you and our democracy are likely to be very damaging. There must be a #FinalSay.#StopBrexit #FBPE  /1 
Yet told wrote to a constituent saying she would back a referendum on the deal- where do Labour stand on Europe? 
Alternative headline for this story: ‘Boris has called for a hard border in Ireland after brexit’  
.@vincecable: the problem with my 5 years experience of working with Theresa May was she wasn't very interested in economic matters which makes it hard to place what she wants on [hard/soft Brexit]. She was obsessed with immigration as an issue. 
Sunday’s presidential election in Chile is shaping up as an unexpectedly tight referendum on the country’s market-friendly policies  
The 'issue' of the border between Norther Ireland and Ireland has been blown by Remainers out of all proportion to complicate #Brexit It's not even an issue and would have been decided easily, if not for Ireland's prostituting PM and weasels in Brussels. 
.@vincecable:  having a first referendum on the deal, having a vote is an important and the Liberal Democrats have an amendment to give people that right to be vote on this week 
What an exceptionally arrogant and incompetent man -David Davis 'tried to bet £1,000 on Brexit vote with fellow MP'  via @MailOnline 
Diane Abbott tells Andrew Marr that Labour has never backed a second referendum, only for Marr to read a quote from her two weeks ago backing a second referendum... #Marr 
Brazil reveals big ‘interest’ in post-Brexit UK meat deal.  
Well shut the front door!!! The kind folks over at Union Jack Twitter, Brexit Twitter & #ItsOkayToBeWhite have begun crowdfunding to send me on an all expenses paid holiday! I take back everything bad I ever said about them!!   
Can we agree to drop this "vassal state" nonsense.  It's language straight out of the Steve Bannon playbook #Boris #Brexit 
Brexit has introduced many to the WTO, but how it's understood can be skewed, because different people emphasise different parts of the beast.It’s time to complete the picture, and to understand why the WTO isn’t in the best of health. 
Brexit espionage: EU is ‘deploying COLD WAR spy tactics against UK’ as rooms are ‘bugged'  
Mrs May says she won’t be derailed from delivering Brexit. She is supported by the right wing and now the Archbishop of Canterbury. How many more cronies can she recruit? Fight Brexit everyday.#FBPE 
HANG ON A MINUTE...Apparently, Theresa May, writing in the Sunday papers, is keen to reassure us that her govt is not fully consumed with Brexit but is also dealing with *the causes of Brexit*.  Wait, what?! (1/4 mini-thread) 
All-round idiot Digby Jones hopes there'll be a Brexit benefit in "100 years time" #Paterson 
The key Brexit figures all avoid tax and are keen to continue doing so - at the expense of the prosperity of the rest of us and the next generation. #StopBrexit #Marr #Paterson 
Ministers are already planning to scrap a raft of employee rights if #Brexit happens. No one can say they were not warned - abolishing employment rights has always been part of the Brexiteers agenda  
#Brexit vote did not specify a direction of travel the UK's future. People are trusting the Govt to steer us in the right direction and do our best for UK citizens. Parliament must be in control not a small elite group of ministers or MPs who won't allow differing opinions  
‘Newspaper’ of working people sees working week of 48+ as a ‘boom’. But hopefully this will be seen for what it is - cynical attempt at manipulation & a serious diminution of our rights. Which is one of main goals of Brexit.  
New word, BREXINO describes what the Remainers fall-back position is: Brexit In Name Only. 
If that was Labour’s position, it would seek to stop Brexit.  
Lords threaten May with defeat if she pushes “an extreme form of Brexit”. But there’s no “extreme Brexit” — it’s just in or out. And if they defeat the government on a trade deal, they’ll get exactly the no-deal Brexit they claim to fear. 
Any celebrities or public figures out there who think Brexit is wrong but are afraid to speak out in case it ruins their public image? Believe me it won't, less than half the population want Brexit, the rest of us don't. Be like @eddiemarsan @GaryLineker @MitchBenn and speak out! 
WATCH: Diane Forgets She Backed Second Referendum  
The news that Brexiters want to scrap the Working Time Directive shouldn't come as a surprise. Despite all the warm words about "maintaining workers' rights protections", the real objective of the hard Brexit cabal in Cabinet has always been systematic deregulation. 
The state of Brexit as 2017 draws to an end. Support @theresa_may as she delivers the softest Brexit imaginable or else you get Corbyn. Rock and a hard place. Neither acceptable. 
There is hope: Brexit has few zealots and many floating voters. Today’s Observer column  
Mainstream parties are treating voters with contempt. Con rely on the fear of a Corbyn gov't to keep them in office, Lab shelved their integrity to play both sides of the Brexit argument. Party before country the order of the day, the electorate can go whistle. 
Shadow HomeSec and leading Corbynista Diane Abbott comes out FOR a referendum on the Brexit deal  
The Independent poll showing 51% to 41% in favour of #Remain shows the absolute necessity of providing for a democratic process, whether parliamentary or via a #FinalSay referendum, which allows a choice to #StopBrexit. #FBPE 
#Marr #bbcsp #BBCNews Five ways the @BBC is letting us down on how it covers #Brexit (via @InFactsOrg ) 
Shambolic interview from Diane Abbott on #Marr - Refuses to rule out paying billions more to the EU post Brexit- Says Brexit might not mean less immigration to the UK- Claimed she had never supported a second referendum 
.@HackneyAbbott and @UKLabour on #Brexit#marr 
Well that Brexit position sure lasted long now, didn’t it? “Diane Abbott says she would back referendum on final Brexit deal” - now on #Marr she said Labour’s policy is not to support a second referendum  
Thanks to @theSNP for keeping us informed of the dreadful state of affairs regarding Brexit at UKgov level Pity @scottishlabour MPs do not see fit to enlighten us too'I've seen secret Brexit impact papers' says SNP MP  
Diane Abbott just denied backing a 2nd referendum on Brexit. Last month, she backed a 2nd Referendum on Brexit.  #Marr 
Shouldn't that apply to your voters as well? We wanted out of the EU straight after the Referendum! You politicians are not treating us the public with tolerance, decency and respect. You are deceiving us on Brexit! You disgust me, you have made Britain look stupid to the world  
Britons now back Remain over Leave by 10 points, poll shows. #Brexit is causing skills shortage, price rises & exodus of jobs to EU. We need a second referendum on the terms of Brexit:  @NickyAACampbell @THEJamesWhale @iancollinsuk @KirstyWark @fifiglover 
Shadow Home Secretary @HackneyAbbott tells @MarrShow that she does not want second #Brexit referendum for electorate #Marr 
No wonder there's no credible opposition to Brexit when Diane Abbott @HackneyAbbott repeatedly insists on designating EU citizens with the very emotionally loaded word "migrants". That's the whole point of the EU ! - we're all European citizens everywhere in it #marr 
Here's Diane Abbott's letter to her constituents supporting a second referendum, in @guardian last month  
Brexit impact papers flimsy and contain nothing that isn’t already in public domain according to Stephen Gethins who was put through some kind of John le Carre type procedure to view them!  
Diane Abbott on Marr re a 2nd referendum "We think the electorate should have their say via their elected representatives" - the same representatives who are ignoring the wishes of the electorate 
Diane Abbott: “The Labour Party doesn’t support a second referendum. We’ve never supported it, we don’t now"Marr: “You did a few weeks ago”#Marr 
Shadow Home Secretary @HackneyAbbott says Labour's position on Brexit is putting jobs and the economy first #marr 
Diane Abbott suggests migration levels could be much the same after Brexit under Labour. Says business, education, NHS "need these eastern European migrants coming here" #Marr 
Diane Abbott promises Labour would "get rid of some of the bureaucracy" to make it easier for migrants to come to UK. Perhaps not what Brexit was originally about #Marr 
The Labour position on #Brexit is to ensure it does not happen. Abbott is just pure waffle on #Marr 
Oh no, Diane Abbott is trying to explain Labour's Brexit policy..  ...  #Marr 
Oh dear. Tax gap lowest on record. There’s not 17million racists in UK, and Brexit moving forwards. You seem racked with more prejudice than Leave voters.  
A year and a half are the Brexit vote, May still failing to even try to address the 48% of people who voted Remain. 
PM looks forward with stubborn optimism, after first phase Brexit deal, in Sunday Telegraph interview.We are getting on with the job of Brexit, and we will not be derailed 
Tremendous quote from @pmdfoster's inside story of the Brexit deal  
Tea and toast with #Marr and  is all well and good – but #Remainiacs has a brilliantly honest interview with @nick_clegg on Cameron, the coalition, and how we CAN stop #Brexit. Listen now:  
.@theresa_may "We will stick to our task until we have secured the best possible Brexit deal and built that stronger, fairer and ever more global Britain that truly works for everyone".  
We have a PM who is only speaking to those who voted for #brexit.She only governs for the brexiters. Those of us who think leaving is a mistake are being completely ignored.We have no political representation- we are half the country-possibly more #marr 
NEW: @Independent poll > 51% now back remaining in the union, while 41% want Brexit - not surprised by this 10 point lead given Brexit as it was promised (£350m per week extra for the NHS?) is proving impossible  
BLAIR: 'Stopping Brexit is more important than Labour winning the next election'. He really couldn't care less about the democratic will of the people... 
What sort of Brexit do you want?Retweet for an accurate result 
Looking forward to the #Brexit Broadcasting Company mentioning the 10 point lead for #remain in the polls. That'll be managed out. #marr 
When Fascism arrives in the UK it will be wrapped in the Union Flag, claim to be 100% English & shouting: "it's the will of the people!"#Brexit 
Spare a thought for Nigel Farage at this difficult time - our favourite 9 responses online  #NigelFarage #Brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May says she 'will not be derailed' - Are you sure about that Theresa? Don’t forget the ‘Will of the People’......it can change when they know they they’ve been conned. #BrexitShambles #FBPE  
Brits now back Remain over Leave by 10 points in biggest lead since Brexit referendum, new poll shows  
If the unelected House of Lords thwart BREXIT, it will be disestablished in three years, & rightly so.Could the press also publish the names of their lordships on EU pensions?They won't declare them as an interest.One for you Shippers?  
The BreXmas Advent Calendar day 17: just in time for Christmas, Christmas dinners will be up to 20% more expensive because of Brexit. Pls RT:  
Epic response to Nigel Farage goes viral because every one rings true  h/t @mrdavidwhitley #NigelFarage #Brexit  
All the Brexit embarrassments of the year past are being quietly swept under the carpet by MSM/ Sunday papers and today suddenly Theresa is wonderful.This is called "constructive amnesia" 
More than half of Britons now want to stay in EU, poll finds, in biggest gap since referendum  
Rejoice, citizens! Now you will be allowed to drag stone 24 hours a day to build the great Temple of Brexit. 
The EU Ref was an advisory ref, therefore there is no obligation to implement the results. Article 50 is revocable. Brexit has divided the UK and its citizens. It is hurting UK economy, people, breaking friendships. #StopBrexit 
EXCLUSIVE'I've seen secret Brexit impact assessment papers and they're an embarrassment to the UK', says SNP MP Gethins 
A majority of people say they now want to stay in the EU. Only a foolish government would insist on an extreme Brexit in these circumstances. But we have a foolish government.  
“Incidentally, may I respectfully remind people that Brexit has not happened yet? Even seasoned interviewers on Radio 4 make the mistake of confusing the referendum with Brexit” (Bring on the retirement of Humphrys) @BBCr4today 
#Brexit Tony Blair says stopping  Brexit more important than Labour winning next election. Anyone listening to this clown . He has ruined  with uncontrolled immigration. The Iraq War all british soldiers who have died. Multimillionaire Tony Blair go away FFS.     
Fantastic - perhaps they can free us from the tyranny of 28 days annual leave, Equal Pay, Non Discrimination Rights, the shackles of having to keep staff on when a company is sold  or contacts end? All these pesky rights cost bosses £££ & hardly help families#Brexit #Remain 
If the polls continue to show a majority wanting to remain in the EU please ask the PM why she thinks #Brexit is still the ‘will of the people’ @BBCNews @SkyNews @itn @CNN 
Call off Brexit bullies or face defeat, Conservative peers tell May  
Brexit: Britons now back Remain over Leave by 10 points, exclusive poll shows.The newly published survey gives Remainers their biggest lead since the 2016 referendum @nickynoo007 @spaceangel1964 @rhena_eichhorst @BritEuropa @EU_Remain_2017@FinalSayForAll 
Why do "Tory Eurosceptics" want to "ditch" EU Law? Because EU Law is already "tackling" Big Money Tax Avoidance and winning. "Brexit" has never been in the interest of "working" British people. "Deregulation" only benefits the so-called "Super Rich". #StopBrexit 
The more people hear what #Brexit means, the less they like it. We need a referendum on the final terms.  
PM May is trying to hide the fact that Britain will stay in the single market after Brexit  
Ex #MI6 chief ‘not convinced Russia influenced #Brexit’  
The key national priority should be prosecuting Blair for an illegal war. #Brexit is an important step for Britain to take. 
British workers set for post-Brexit loss of employment rights boom as The Sunt tells idiot readers their bosses aren't piddling on their shoes - it's raining.  
Brexit voters were ‘mainly driven by taking back control of law-making powers from EU’ – not racism  
Remember the Brexit impact studies that @DavidDavisMP says simultaneously do and do not exist?I explain why we are going ahead with a judicial review to get to the truth: 
Promises on #Brexit melt like snow in springTories & Lab promised to get us OUTThey are delivering de facto membershipEven @Ukip are happy with unnecessary 2yr transition period & don't want to set immigration targetsOnly #ForBritain  says get out now with no divorce payments 
Notice that @Number10gov line of "Brexit is the will of the people" has stepped up lately.They know it's in trouble and comments like this are designed to scare people silent. That if we challenge it we don't respect democracy.Please don't fall for it. MPs are public servants. 
714 people vote Remain in a crappy newspaper poll - "it's definitive, we must stay in the EU!"17,410,742 people vote Leave in a statutorily enacted referendum campaign - "it's not clear what was intended, ignore it!" 
Brexit fascism in a nutshell, there shouldn't be an application process AT ALL for exercising an #EUcitizens right to stay, this retroactive legislation is unacceptable and I hope the EU, @ALDEgroup and @guyverhofstadt take note. 
Tony Blair says stopping Brexit more important than Labour winning next election   
Voters have lost all respect for democracy UK parliament & PM due to complete betrayal of "brexit means brexit" May lied to us over & over again brexit obviously doesn't mean brexit it means leaving EU in name only with unspecified leaving date & never ending transition period 
Those elected MPs No longer represent us in parliament As Two Thirds of them wants to overturn a democratic vote Democracy is dead 
Brexit U-turn? @theresa_may  considering ‘sensible compromise with Eurocrats by creating new court' 
Brexit: Theresa May says she 'will not be derailed'  
EU nations are ‘using honey traps’ and hackers to spy on UK's Brexit strategyAn intelligence source claims foreign agents are using “Cold War tactics” to target the British negotiating team.  
So-called 'progressive, liberal' establishment continues to sneer at working class people who voted for Brexit calling them 'uneducated'.  
An actual shout just heard from the crowd directed at Billy Joe Saunders: "Have fun with Brexit, idiot!" 
1. On the basis of this latest poll MPs have no option but to put #Brexit back in the hands of the Ppl...only a #FinalSay in 2018 can give the real answer & if the real Will of the Ppl is to #StopBrexit then it must be stopped, no ifs, buts or maybes. 
For the lulzMore than half of Britons now want to stay in the EU #Brexit  
Since the death of Nigeria has been predicted for 2018. #Biafra will surely hold it’s referendum in 2018 
This is how pathetic the right wing press has gotten in the UKTrying to degrade the Irish and our government's intelligent respsonse to Brexit, by lying about how long it takes to get from St. Stephen's Green Luas Stop to Upper O'Connell Street.  
The EU External Affairs Sub-Committee published a report on sanctions policy post- #Brexit ,concluding that the effectiveness of #UK sanctions will be undermined unless the UK can quickly agree arrangements for future sanctions policy co-operation with the #EU 
There are peaceful well planned political coups using strategies that accomplish the same as the violent coups. Brexit for example IMO. We're investigating a possible Trump-Putin political coup. 
Exclusive - Bankers may get notes to help push industry line on Brexit  
Remain is beating Leave by 10 points in a new Brexit poll. How far ahead does Remain have to get before Leavers accept that the 'will of the people' is changing? 
Davis lies about Brexit reports with impunity. Gove and others are reported as looking to abandon workers' rights post-Brexit despite promises to the contrary. The Foreign Secretary attempts to make UKGov policy unilaterally on transition. Time to RT this old thread.  
Thread: The Sun knowingly disinforms readers on WTD. if Working Time Directive sounds boring legalese, it concerns, for example, permissible length of working hours, under what conditions. Subject: employment conditions in EU and Brexit.  
Brits now overwhelmingly back Remaining in the EU.Remain now 10 points ahead of Leave in latest poll for the Independent.Any mandate for Brexit has collapsed - we need to #StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Justin Welby.  Whenever would Remainers get behind a Government plan for a Brexit that will make the poor poorer?  In fact it is ALREADY making the poor poorer.Shame on you!  You might not have noticed that there is now a 10 point lead for Remain in the latest opinion polls 
Have to say he's right again...#Brexit is the most stupid act if self harm...it inoacts on every aspect of our future & not in a good way...we must get that #FinalSay & #StopBrexit.. 
In an exclusive poll of those “who did not vote in the 2016 Referendum”. I.e.: kids mainly.Fake news.   
Anyone still buying all that guff from ministers about protecting & building on all EU-derived rights post-Brexit is gonna be in for a shock  
Brexit blamed for letting British fruit go to waste  
The exclusive survey for The Independent by BMG Research showed 51 per cent now back remaining in the union, while 41 per cent want #Brexit. #stopbrexit 
."A legal bid to stop Brexit is to be lodged at Scotland’s Court of Session before Christmas"#MerryChristmasToEU . 
OBAMA: “UK will be at the back of the queue if it votes for Brexit”BREXITEERS: “Butt out, you’re not gonna be President! Trump loves Brexit, Farage went to his golden house! Rule Britannia!”TRUMP: “yeah... back of the queue, dweeb.”   
That Dacre's paper's incendiary coverage of Brexit has incited the hate and death threats that May is condemning here. Try to keep up. 
British hero speaks out against globalist politicians  #BREXIT"You're stabbing us in the back!" 
'I've seen secret Brexit impact assessment papers and they're an embarrassment to the UK', says SNP MP Gethins #scotref 
Yup most small farmers love seeing big farmers get £365000 a year from single farm payments. They’re equally overjoyed when people move into the countryside,buy farms,pocket single farm payments and rent out the land to working farmers. It’s why most farmers I know voted #Brexit  
Liberal elites believe in the democratic will of citizens so much they will demand endless re-votes until they get the results they want. #Brexit#TrumpStoleTheElection#HarperStoleTheElection 
Don't get Ill brexitears .... 37 Spanish nurses leave one hospital over brexit fears in York.  #FBPE @EuropeanYorks 
Good. Do something about the Brexit Taliban. Then I’ll believe you. Mrs A, who is Italian, was threatened and abused because of her race. I had some Brexity racist wish her raped by “Mooslims” and some arse threatened my kids- both on Twitter. 
Labour warn Theresa May to get Brexit deal in place by May or businesses leave 
Poll shows public backs Remain over Leave by 10 points. #Brexit #secondreferendum 
Ah the lucky British workers post Brexit; will get to work extra hours at reduced wages just to make the same as they did before Brexit.least they’ll probably pay more taxes to fund NHS and other U.K. gov initiatives, rather than Eu funds... that fund say Cornwall, or Grimsby 
Diehard Brexiters are small minority of HoC and the electorate. The political leverage they used to force Cameron to back a referendum and for May to back hard Brexit could be fading. As their influence reduces it increases chance of an #ExitFromBrexit 
There’s no need for Brexit. There’s no case for Brexit. Every forecast says we’ll be worse off with Brexit. The latest polls show majority support for cancelling Brexit. Time for our politicians to grow a spine, out country before party politics and cancel Brexit. 
The sole reason Brexit is stalling is because of the large amount of treacherous MPs we have in Parliament!  At every turn, they’ve made our negotiating position more difficult and in doing so strengthened the EU’s! They will go down in history known as ‘The Enemy Within’ 
Heading into 2018, we should me marveling about the fantastic advances in space travel and rocket technology.What are we actually doing?STILL listening to you lot whine about Brexit and Trump.Fucking move on already. 
Yes, many “lament the failure of the Labour Party to behave like a proper opposition when it comes to Brexit”.  
NOTHING will give me greater satisfaction than to see this man and his acolyte #PrincessZippy, who nearly killed my country, cost so many lives worldwide and has taken us to the point of cultural disintegration, sink all his money into fighting against #Brexit... and then fail!  
A way forward is to investigate Mr David Davis MP for Misconduct in Public Office so as to expose - and then appropriately punish - his many lies about "brexit". If you would like to add your voice, do sign up at  
There are three possible Brexit outcomes.Hard. Which is impossible.Soft. Which is pointless.Remain. Which is sensible.#impossiblepointlessorremain 
Bruno wants to know what sort of #brexit we want.Looks like most respondents so far want a hard brexit.You know what to do.#FBPE#StopbrexitPlease Retweet. 
This "Letter to the UK Parliament" by @acgrayling is simply perfect! How any "right honourable" member of parliament could read this and then, in good conscience, continue to support #Brexit in any way, shape or form, is beyond me! #STOPBREXIT 
And as a Labour peer I am sending exactly the same message. I will not support Brexit measures. This country is facing a tyranny of oppression by the right-wing media & cowardly politicians.  
What is really clear to me is that Very few people on both sides of the referendum actually had a good understanding of what it all meant. We are are left with a soup of humans being  grotesque to Each other. 
#Brexit: Britons now back Remain over Leave by 10 points, exclusive poll shows. The British public has swung behind staying in the EU by its largest margin since the referendum, with those backing Remain outstripping Leavers by ten points.  
You mean the mainstream public. You ought to get over it & stop being in denial. Whatever attempts are made to thwart the will of the people by out of touch politicians, #Brexit will ultimately prevail. 
All our #fbpe friends. Remember the celebration in the streets when the liars used the Tories’ austerity & lies to win? Nup, me either. Let’s focus on what those streets will look like the day this #Brexit terror is lifted! #StopBrexit 
Crikey, this Brexit. What a fuss. Anyone would think it was the Hundred Years War of the Roses, when Admiral Nelson played bowls before the Battle of Wellington on the playing fields of Eton! 
#Brexit Is One Step Closer As EU Agrees To Talk About UK Trade: - Brexit Is One Step Closer As EU…  #News #Politics 
Sensing some mirth there regarding Labour's Brexit policies..#skypapers 
longing brexit 
To maintain integrity, those claiming to take “The will of the people” seriously can’t ignore the clear emerging anti-Brexit trend. After all, referendum was non-binding and perceived consequences more contested.  
However they campaigned, MPs must respect the democratic will for an 'impure' brexit and reject calls for a tart brexit! 
467 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣆⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀ 
Brexit is 11232 hours away. #brexit 

